I’m going to buy someone a hot chocolate today and say something similar,   ;hugs!
thank you, i hope it helps someone in the way it helped me. 
thank you, i hope it helps someone in the way it helped me. 
Chocolate saves lives.   I don’t know if you believe in fate or god but you could say that you weren’t supposed to die now.  You could also say the old man knew how you felt because he went through a similar thing during his life. He lived through it and you too could do the same, saving someone else life in the process hopefully.  Idk, I hope you don’t feel the same way as that day again :>
I wish I could do such a thing. I would just imagine all the ways it might backfire and that would be the end of it.
You can! Just sitting in the food court sometimes just people watch for a bit, in a short time I bet you’d have picked out who you want to grab a coffee or whatever for,     My armpits got really sweaty, mild anxiety attack, guy looked at me pretty weird and said thanks!  It felt seriously great to do. First time I’ve ever done that.
That man deserves a medal
i hope he knows how much it helped me 
i hope he knows how much it helped me 
Perhaps someone did the same for him once and he realized how much it could mean to someone else too.
I had a similar experience. A guy came out from the convenience store and handed me a large hot chocolate. He said something about angels in disguise, which I honestly don't remember. So I sat drinking my hot chocolate until that ugly blue light of early morning began to creep into the sky and I accepted that she wasn't coming. It was small comfort but in moments like that small comforts are enough.
Hot chocolate solves all things shitty in life. 
Hot chocolate solves all things shitty in life. 
All sorrows are less with bread. 
Honestly made me cry. This is beautiful. Stay strong dude
thank you, you too <3
thank you, you too <3
I hope you find the strength to keep persisting 
How oddly weird that a person that you don't know picked up on that.  People in our lives that have know us for years, don't.  What a sweet story.  
Very odd indeed, kind of don't believe it because of that, my parents still are confused as to why I stay in my room all day sometimes, and other times I'm talkative and outgoing. Even though I've explained it to them.
Very odd indeed, kind of don't believe it because of that, my parents still are confused as to why I stay in my room all day sometimes, and other times I'm talkative and outgoing. Even though I've explained it to them.
Some people are just extremely perceptive, or perhaps the man had been through a similar point in his life while your parents haven't, so they can't relate.  Just a thought.  
((**hug**))  Great, now **I'm** crying!!
you're a kind soul 
you're a kind soul 
Thank you. I'm glad you decided to live, today.
Sounds like he was an angel. 
It makes you wonder sometimes. Just the odd random things or people appearing from nowhere to drag you back from the brink when you're feeling at your lowest. I'm not a religious person, but still, I wonder.
What a kind man, I'm so glad that he helped your life. Maybe he's an angel. 
Likewise :) no doubt in my mind you and I were in the company of angels. 
Wow, that guy was super observant, kind, and wise. I hope I can be like that guy for lots of other people.  I hope you take really good care of yourself and move past whatever is causing you to be unhappy with your life. I hope you eventually become extremely happy with being alive.  Also, I like your writing style. It's very descriptive but also concise.  Hope this helps
Thank you, that is great to hear. <3 I'm sure you're just like that guy. 
Hang in there, OP. I wish you many more days of good hot chocolate drinking.
You as well <3 
I, and surely a lot of others on this sub, am struggling very hard to believe in a god, but things like this force me to think about it.  That kind of thing just seems to happen so little in the world and it happened to you when you needed it the most. It really seems like a miracle.
I agree. I'm agnostic, but it felt like a blessing to me. Like someone is watching out for me. 
Damn. That must have been the tastiest and most fulfilling hot chocolate you've ever had.
You're damn right :) 
i broke to tears just imagined the whole thing in my mind and  just thinking about everything filling your head suddently almost making your nose start bleeding because of the thoughts and suddently just dissapear.  Is this what we need? just, care? love?
maybe, maybe all we need to be is like that kind old man. we need to change our society. 
I’m sorry you’re struggling with that.  And I’m doing SO much better :) I’ve found meds that work for me and therapy is going super well. 
I am glad to hear that.  I'm also managing to get through some pages right now, don't worry about me :)  I don't know why I'm bringing this up but the sky outside my window is looking beautiful. I love it when the sun projects light on the clouds and gives them depth.
Could that be all we need to get discouraged from suicide?   I think, even if that happened to me the day when i decide to take my life it wouldn't change a thing, suicide is a big decision for me, i don't think the kindness of one random person would be enough to avoid all of my shitty life decisions and moments.
I can't explain why it helped. It was a personal thing, and only you yourself would've been able to know why it helped had it been you. I felt extremely empty and someone caring for me made me feel a spark of something in my soul.  
Yep. You might be able to see it if you know what you're looking for. Otherwise I look a little tired and I'm probably pretty quiet but I'm conversing and even laughing at the right parts. People don't realize how tiring keeping up appearances is or that while they're talking about the weather or work my mind is still on whether or not I'd die if I jumped off the parking garage.  
Can relate
Yup, me today, in a bit of a rut... And re-remembering how exhausting it is to keep a smiling face. ✌️❤️
It's my husband's birthday so I'm trying to keep it up at home too. 
It's my husband's birthday so I'm trying to keep it up at home too. 
Is he aware of your depression? 
This. If undepressed folks around me at work really knew what I was thinking most of the time, (hurling self off parking deck) , that would totally blow my cover and might even earn me an ambulance ride to the nearest ER.
It would for me too....and if everyone could see my thoughts I'd probably have to resign myself to life in the hospital. 
I get it. That's what I have. I'll be with friends and my roommate having fun and all of a sudden I just start thinking whether or not I'm being included because I'm there or if they actually like my company. It sucks. And then they always wonder why you're sad when they notice and they get mad when I say I'm okay. I DONT NEED YOU TO DRAW ATTENTION TO IT IM VERY AWARE OF ITS PRESENCE​. 
Shit, I've never really noticed this happens to me until I just read this. 
Shit, I've never really noticed this happens to me until I just read this. 
Yea, same sentiments. Instead of 'shit' my expression of relation goes one step more vulgar: 'shoot.'
Same, I cover my depression with endless memes to the point where everything that comes out of my mouth becomes a Star Wars prequel line or US politics parody. They think it's funny or annoying but they don't know it's to hide the fact that I'm dead inside, and that I have no idea how to interact or relate with others.  My acquaintances say I make the best suicide jokes but they don't realize it's because I actually want to kill myself.
You sound like me....down to the suicide jokes. 
So many times, I hear 'You can't be depressed, you have friends... you smile... you have a home and a job, what do you have to be depressed about?'  People have no clue how good I am at faking being ok. 
Like depression needs a reason. A live a good life, still depressed. 
Like depression needs a reason. A live a good life, still depressed. 
That's such a dangerous line of thinking though. Chances are that there is a reason, even if it's hard to talk about it in polite company.
That's such a dangerous line of thinking though. Chances are that there is a reason, even if it's hard to talk about it in polite company.
The reason for me is a chemical imbalance. You're right though, people don't want to hear it
You're an amazingly strong person. Your family is lucky to have you
Thank you, it really means a lot to hear that, which is almost never. Thank you
I'm glad you are alive for your family. Not my business but does your daughter have depression?
Not at all, thank God! I divorced her father when she was 9, and she opted to live with him, to stay in her school, with her friends. We live in the same town, though, so she didn't 'lose' me. She benefits from having frequent contact with her mother, but didn't spend her formative years living in the shadow of Depressed Mom, witnessing how I really function when I don't have to put on a brave face.
One of the worst feelings is being down and lonely at a party. Everyone is laughing and having fun, but you're sipping a beer and feeling empty inside.
Totally. I've never felt so intensely depressed as when I'm feeling isolated in a crowd of people having fun. 
Totally. I've never felt so intensely depressed as when I'm feeling isolated in a crowd of people having fun. 
There's nothing like being in a group of people where multiple conversations are going on and you realize that you're the only one not in any of them, just standing there silent and stuck in your own mind. 
I remember my therapist saying I looked chipper one day when I was honestly feeling miserable and tired. I told him I must still be in 'fake-it-'til-you-make-it' mode from being at college all day and that I was actually feeling down. It's not the first time I heard what followed but when he said 'Oh well you must be pretty good at faking it then because I can't tell!' I felt even worse.
this shit is why i dont want a therapist
this shit is why i dont want a therapist
There are real magical workers out there, don't be discouraged after a mismatch
You don't have to *be* alone, to *feel* alone.
And you usually feel more alone when you are around (the wrong) people than by yourself. 
I would say find a therapist but I've gone to hundreds of therapists. People say, 'You just have to find the right therapist for you'. It seems like I have a better chance at finding a romantic relationship, and we know thats not happening.
What makes a therapist a 'good or an effective therapist'  ?
Oh yes. This hits close to home.   I need a job, I need housing, I need to eat, I need meds. If I didn't put on my facade and hide my depression, I'd have none of these things.   
It's a really crappy double standard though. I guess people just don't understand what they don't experience.
It's a really crappy double standard though. I guess people just don't understand what they don't experience.
I believe they could if they wanted to.   It's OK to be 'casually' or 'expected' depressed, such as over a breakup, over the death of a loved one (Normal people act like breakups are worse than death, ha!), or over withdrawals from drugs when they can't reach their dealers.  But if you're actually depressed, one of us, were marginalized, blamed, called pathetic, etc. They only want to help us when we fit the version of depressed they deem acceptable.
I sometimes finish my day at work and wonder how I put on an act so well. Also if I nip to the loo I get a horrible overwhelming of loneliness feeling and have to take deep breaths and hold back tears sometimes. 
I don't understand how you even maintain a job. I've been like this in multiple jobs before and in the end they just fire me cos I'm useless, which makes the whole thing feel even worse..
I don't understand how you even maintain a job. I've been like this in multiple jobs before and in the end they just fire me cos I'm useless, which makes the whole thing feel even worse..
When I'm really absorbed into something (school and/or work) I basically enter robot mode and it doesn't require emoting in any way like social settings do
I don't either. I have to work I don't have a choice but work has made my depression worse i belive at times.  
I can relate, in fact work is 100% the reason behind my anxiety and depression.
I understand. The sudden grip of loneliness can get overwhelming
It's horrible around family have to sit there with them hating it and feeling so awful and having to smile and laugh. I'm lucky I'm quiet anyway so people don't notice anything is up.  
So true. I sometimes feel worse hanging out with my friends cause I feel like I have to act bright and cheerful, otherwise I'm just bringing the mood down and just a pain to be around. It's draining having to put on a smile when you feel the complete opposite on the inside. Funny how being around people can be so alienating at times... 
I'm being clichè, but it really is the feeling of being alone in a crowded room
Yes. I can be sitting in class and have people speaking to me, letting me in on the jokes, etc, and still feel like I don't belong or like they're humoring me and knowing this is temporary until the next time we meet up and I still feel lonely as hell. However, there's a smile on my face and my mouth is saying the right things, so no one suspects it.   If I don't win an award for acting before I die, I will feel so cheated.
Me too. I feel mechanic, like I have to physically access that part of my brain that works the muscles that enable me to smile, and one by one put them in the right position. Happiness isn't doing it for me.
I have a relative that said this about depression, 'I just don't get why people can't get over it.' This same relative has lived a very privileged life and hasn't had to struggle for much. 
You can have the most privileged life and still fall into depression.    The sentence 'I just don't get why people can't get over it.' is ignorant though. 
You can have the most privileged life and still fall into depression.    The sentence 'I just don't get why people can't get over it.' is ignorant though. 
Yes totally. I know many people that live a privileged life and are depressed. 
Yes totally. I know many people that live a privileged life and are depressed. 
I'm one of those people. By all intents and purposes, I should not be depressed. But I am
Just keep wearing a mask. Tis what I do.
Yeah!! Sad things is we have to wear mask. Cant share our feelings to anyone around.
In this moment I am very pleased with the person I am pretending to be.
Maybe this is who you are.
God she sounds like a pleasant person to be around. But seriously what are you suppose to do? Be smiling all the time? You would creep everyone out! 
the only word to describe how I felt is flabbergasted 
I'm super cheerful and always cracking jokes at work. I'm always putting up a front. It can be exhausting! 
It so exhausting. Plus it just makes me feel so fake and empty. 
I was this way once and then I just stopped having the energy to pretend. There's no easy answer to any of it.
I really don't know why I even bother, but I don't know how to *not* be this way
I really don't know why I even bother, but I don't know how to *not* be this way
I feel you there.  On my really bad days I keep hoping someone notices the pain I'm in but they never do.  Not to any fault of their own, I just don't ever show it.  I wish I could but its a learned response at this point to just act normal.  At least I can talk with friends about it when I need to, but boy does despression suck the biggest bag ofn idiots
I went in and was like 'I think I'm depressed' lol I said that exact thing. Then they went on to ask several questions and so on
Very straightforward process with a few tests/questionnaires. It's mostly about whether or not if you identify as someone with said issues and then getting any help you may need. 
Incidentally, I've had both. I'm pretty deep in but higher functioning at this point (going to work and going about life but also anhedonic and suicidal). I've also had days where I couldn't get out of bed. I actually failed a semester of college due to depression...barely left my dorm room.  
Only reason I survived college was because I had a pet I had to take care of, which at least required me to get out of bed. 
Describes me perfectly. The mask is good, and well made, but it certainly wears you down after wearing it for 10 hours... I want to go and hide in bed most of the time I'm doing average social activities, but they would never know it...
Sometimes you become the mask I feel like. When I stop pretending I feel empty inside. Depression has stolen my personality
Sometimes you become the mask I feel like. When I stop pretending I feel empty inside. Depression has stolen my personality
I feel like I'm pretty close to not being able to cope... Today I just avoided meeting up with friends and went and sat by the river. It was nice, or it would have been if my mind hadn't been racing with shit.   This mask is exhausting.
I feel like I'm pretty close to not being able to cope... Today I just avoided meeting up with friends and went and sat by the river. It was nice, or it would have been if my mind hadn't been racing with shit.   This mask is exhausting.
It truly is. It's so crappy when you're in the middle of doing something and you're just hit with this brick wall of 'what am I even doing here?'
I want to go hide in bed too...I think about it at work, I think about it with friends, I think about it hanging out with my husband...
I'm in bed right now. It's pretty good. 
I kinda envy those who can hide it in real life. It's obvious that something is wrong when I'm in public or with friends 
I don't really hide it that well. To a normal person I come across as reserved and kind of boring. To others who know me better, they just think I'm stressed from school and work and tired. I let them believe that. 
I don't really hide it that well. To a normal person I come across as reserved and kind of boring. To others who know me better, they just think I'm stressed from school and work and tired. I let them believe that. 
I usually hide behind an extrovert facade that's SUPER exhausting to mantain especially since i'm usually dealibg with my depression. I feel like my facade is the me that isn't hampered by my mental health disabilities.
I used to feel that way. Then I started ducking phone calls and avoiding people so I don't have to put up a front. I truly do admire people who are able to put on a smile and face up to the day but I don't have the desire or the ability anymore. I feel lucky to work a job where no one notices how miserable and uncommunicative I am, or else I probably would have been fired years ago.
The fact you keep up a job is a huge accomplishment. Seriously it is. Depression makes everything so hard. Some days I can barely get up to brush my teeth
The fact you keep up a job is a huge accomplishment. Seriously it is. Depression makes everything so hard. Some days I can barely get up to brush my teeth
Thanks. I guess I do put up a front in my own way. My bosses have their suspicions (one of them even asked me if I suffer from depression and I denied it because I was afraid) but on most days I can keep it together. I know how that paralyzing depression feels as well. It makes life seem almost unlivable. 
me @ having a breakdown an hour ago. Wanting to give up, but I can't. Drugs aren't a solution, suicide isn't a solution, life seems too much but what else am I gonna do? Have to keep shooting trying.
Be proud of yourself for pushing on. A lot of people don't have the strength to keep trying, and a lot of people don't realize it's the best thing to do. Keep it up. :)
I don't have friends but I feel the same walking down a hallway and in classes
Me too. It's like a wall is separating me from them
I get it and I do have a question for you - as a friend what can I do that would help you.  What are my options.  
If I say I need to leave, let me go home. Don't give me a hard time about it. Also just being really low key not social (watching a movie or something) that doesn't require a whole lot of interaction and emotion are good activities for me. And honestly just keeping in touch here and there. I know that can be super tough dealing with depressed people
Im alone all time i have no one no matter how hard i try no one wants to be my friend
I didn't kno that other people had these thoughts. I thought I was the only one who felt this way.
I wish so much that this just didn't happen but it does, almost everyday. Right now, I'm at a big event and all I am doing is hiding in a hallway because I am pathetic. I hate feeling like I can't laugh, like I can't be happy. I know it's in there, it's just so hard for me to pull myself up.
I feel very separate from people. Like a veil or very thin glass is just separating me from everyone else. I can't absorb their warmth and happiness like everyone else is
I've had high functioning depression for years, a few times it got really bad and was debilitating. I tried a lot of things... multiple types meds ( on and off for years), counseling/therapy, AA, exercise, meditation, diet, etc.  some helped, some helped for a short time, some helped but i couldn't sustain because the depression was so much stronger. Finally, I think Cognitive Behavioral Therapy really made a difference. 
Can you expand on this - thanks
Still sounds nice to me!
I've been both. When you fake it that well, it's a totally different emptiness. If your depression is totally incapacitating, at least you're living 'honestly.'
I do not get why you have to fake it.   Meaning I work with people  and have friends that have dark moods (or/and are clinically depressed  ) and we have labeled things for what they are.  We know our limits and operate within the boundaries and are successful.   So my question is can we think about 'depression' differently.   
We should be able to. The stigma is just so deeply ingrained I think it is going to be a while before people totally accept mental illness as just that, an illness.
> And lately, every day has just been waiting for the next day to come and magically fix everything, which seems like a waste.  I can relate to that so much. I think that somehow next day i'll wake up motivated. I feel like i'm chronically lazy, not willing to put effort into anything at all, and i can't figure out how to fix it.
Holy shoot. I’ve always lurked on this sub but reading this is such an accurate description of my life that I don’t know how to thank you except for putting it into words.   So thanks. 
Same. And I feel horrible for my S.O . But he understands and is patient.  I feel guilty because we have a wonderful life, (not well off, just good.) I feel I have literally NOTHING to be so depressed about. So....why am i? I'm on meds but totally lazy and it's an effort just to get out of bed in the morning. 
I felt that way in the mornings (and we have a wonderful life too, but depression can ruin anything). Then I got booked to walk a little golden retriever puppy every weekday morning at 8:30. That used to be a solid three hours earlier than I was comfortable with, but now that I have a puppy depending on me, I'm out of bed at 7:50 with no regrets. It's crazy in how many ways dogs have saved me.
Same.  I just want to be removed from existence.  Never born.  Never died.  Just slap a different consciousness in this husk.
Ooh nice. Another flavour of 'hey, just give my life to someone who is disabled/terminally ill and let them enjoy it.'
Ooh nice. Another flavour of 'hey, just give my life to someone who is disabled/terminally ill and let them enjoy it.'
> 'hey, just give my life to someone who is disabled/terminally ill and let them enjoy it.'  Totally.
Every night before falling asleep I wish that I don’t wake up the next morning.
I hate agreeing with this, but jesus I am shooting tired. I'm constantly stressed out, I drink easily a fifth of vodka (usually) a night, my kid would be far better off financially because he's the sole beneficiary of all my life insurance and investments, I pop pills like they're m&m's, and every night I hope that this will be it. I feel like at this point I'm living for other people, because they need me here, and I am just shooting exhausted. 
You put it into words for me
Me too. My parents and my grandmother would never recover if I were to kill myself. I'm sure of it.
I want those things too, but I think I no longer have the strength to care anymore.
You do though. Don't imagine those things as unattainable future ideas, think of your life as a house and those big achievements are different floors you can explore and experience and then keep climbing the stairs onto the next floor. Take it all 1 day at a time. And most importantly, talk to someone about how you're feeling, bottling that pain is never going to make it go away 
> I REALLY want to know what it feels like to get to stability (girlfriend, great job, friends, and traveling, family, etc.).  I'm gonna go ahead and spoil that book for you -- I have all those things and I'm still horribly depressed.   The good news is that depression isn't related to your outside situation at all. I mean, it helps, but seriously, you don't need to achieve all that 'good life' shit before you can become happy. Just to take the pressure off. 
Situational depression vs. clinical. You may have the latter. Judging by many people's complaints here, we have the former. Read this:  https://www.psychologytoday.com/blog/shift-mind/201203/is-our-society-manufacturing-depressed-people
I feel the same way. I'm too cowardly to suffer the physical pain that comes with suicide, and I also wouldn't want to inflict the anguish on my family at all, although I'm sure they'd eventually get over it, move on and forget about me. It would be a much better choice to just never have existed in the first place. Should've swam AWAY from the egg.
Dang you just described how I feel 
I don't want to exist tomorrow 
Just take it one day at a time. Nurturing yourself FIRST. . Shower, dress, eat, drink water and rest. Watch tv, read, gaming, Reddit what ever works. One day at a time man.
Just take it one day at a time. Nurturing yourself FIRST. . Shower, dress, eat, drink water and rest. Watch tv, read, gaming, Reddit what ever works. One day at a time man.
I do that every day. It makes me feel like a zombie and I'm making no progress to improving my life. All I want is someone who values and appreciates me. I've had dreams that made me want to stay. Those worlds will be 10 times better than whatever I can get out of this world. 
I do that every day. It makes me feel like a zombie and I'm making no progress to improving my life. All I want is someone who values and appreciates me. I've had dreams that made me want to stay. Those worlds will be 10 times better than whatever I can get out of this world. 
I have the same experience with dreams! I write them down as soon as I wake up, so that they stay a part of me. I get really sad if my phone rings or something and I lose my dream memory. It's like a death of something. My dream world is fascinating and sometimes exhilarating and lovely.
Dang, I’m on 2 expensive antidepressants, are they even worth it? I feel like this too... 
I haven't gone down the meds route yet, but it pops up in my head more and more frequently now. I heard it helps, but doesn't solve everything. That's why I want to be in a decent place first before I start taking it. Taking meds won't change the fact that I sit in my room all day applying for jobs with no friends. I need to change that situation first before I can jump to medication.
I haven't gone down the meds route yet, but it pops up in my head more and more frequently now. I heard it helps, but doesn't solve everything. That's why I want to be in a decent place first before I start taking it. Taking meds won't change the fact that I sit in my room all day applying for jobs with no friends. I need to change that situation first before I can jump to medication.
Meds will change your view of the world dramatically, a depressed person sees themselves as a worthless loser, a healthy human sees themselves as lonely but doesn't feel sad about it, they try to change it. I know you feel like you will never be happy again, and you may even find comfort in the familiarity of depression, but medication is well worth your time. 
I'm curious actually. I've been feeling this way very strongly the past few months but I don't have any other symptoms of depression. Am I fine?
>I don't have any other symptoms of depression.   You're on /r/depression and you don't want to exist. Most professionals would probably think that you're depressed.
Feel the same way, way too often. Sorry you are feeling this way too. *hug*
Hang in there bud ❤️  Thank you for your kind words.
Jeeze both you and OP have described my situation so well
yeup, me too
Sorry I’m late, but jesus christ that’s exactly it
Don't worry. Somehow my comment turned into a #metoo campaign for depressed peeps
did it get better for you? did you find people?   i have a wife but no close friends in real life, just associates. the problem with commiserating is sooner or later your friends will have had enough. and sometimes you amplify each others issues instead of improving together.  i've had those close to me commit suicide.   their depression didn't make them useless, they were working people and had lives.   words are not enough unfortunately. but that's all i could ever offer.
I found people through work and other things. If you're friendly, and often about, you'll eventually run into someone that could be counted as a friend.  I'm sorry that you've experienced such great loss. I couldn't imagine, honestly.  I know words don't seem to do much, but for every time they didn't help, I'm sure there were plenty when they did.  I would think it akin to giving to charity. Just because it doesn't completely fix everything, it's still worth doing. 
Wage-labor is alienating, friend. My gf worked as a waitress to pay for her community college, and it was shit. Managers treated her like shit, and the workload was a lot. Now, her 60 something year old mom is working at a factory to help her. Capitalism is shooting depressing.   These are good articles that help me realize it's not me that's the problem, but the environment:  https://extranewsfeed.com/capitalism-mental-illness-reflections-on-the-human-costs-of-profit-798ce518cefd  https://www.redpepper.org.uk/a-mad-world-capitalism-and-the-rise-of-mental-illness/
my grandmother worked well into her 70s. pension's here are nonexistent. the middle class is disappearing in many countries, but no one seems to give a shit. a country's GDP is not a real indicator of social well-being, but some seem to take it as such.   anyway, those are good articles! i suggest everyone to take a look.
I feel the same way, like I'm a contradictory personality
YES  I feel absolutely capable of talking to others, being charming, funny, intelligent, etc.  But I also want to be left the F alone and also hide from all judgement. 
i want to get drunk tonight so i dont think about how shit my life is and how much i hate myself
I've been there. At best, it's only a temporary reprieve. You will most likely wake up back to feeling shitty but with a hangover.
I've been there. At best, it's only a temporary reprieve. You will most likely wake up back to feeling shitty but with a hangover.
True, but the temporary reprieve is worth it to me. 
True, but the temporary reprieve is worth it to me. 
There are days (like today) that it is for me too. I think I am going to tie on a few but not enough to get fubar'd. I need to be able to go to work tomorrow, and at 40, I don't recover from drinking as well as I used to.
I got up and made my bed and took a shower today. I’m going to blow dry my hair now. Will each of you do the same with me? We will get through this. Baby steps. Just start by making the bed. 
I couldn’t even get out of the bed today :( but I’ll think of your words and try it tomorrow. :)
I couldn’t even get out of the bed today :( but I’ll think of your words and try it tomorrow. :)
That was me this weekend. Each day is a new day :) And you replied to this post and made an intention for tomorrow so that’s something!
#
Username checks out
You ever thought of joining those communities where you live there for free but contribute by working the land?
I would love to do this
Buying expensive computer components is one of the things that makes me happy and makes my suicidal thoughts go away. But at the same time I am a complete failure at getting a job and earning decent money. Can anyone else relate?
I can, hardware is my life, I have a quite a large collection and its constantly growing, but I do struggle to purchase myself new equipment. I have a job, but most of the money goes to rent and living, not giving myself much spending (€100-200 to myself a month) which makes me depressed cause I cant buy everything I want :(
Pick one desire in your heart where you can be the change in the world and the rest will follow 🙏🏽😊🌎✌🏽
Lot of us or many of us don't have a true desire/passion. But we all need money unless we plan to off ourselves.
shoot drunk drivers.  
Self driving cars are the key, wish it could come sooner.
Where are you at, dude? If you're in Western Montana, we always have space at our table.
Good lord I teared up at this, there's still good people in the world, you're amazing
You're awesome
Nah, I'd like to think most anyone here would offer someone in need a space full of food and kind people if they could.
310 comments…  holy shoot /r/depression…  really reminds of a quote that I read years ago that stuck with me.  “The loneliest people are the kindest, The saddest people smile the brightest. The most damaged people are the wisest. All because they do not wish to see anyone else suffer the way they do.” ~Unknown  
That's a beautiful quote. Made me tear up.
This... I really needed this. I've strayed from social confrontation because of my anxiety and social stigma of my depression. But this quote, really encouraged me to say thank you for sharing this, and making my day a little brighter. 
Found this there now. Kinda hits home. Thanks for sharing.
Where are you? If you are within 100 miles of Detroit, I'll come get you right now.   I'm so shooting sorry. All my love to you. 
I love you. I know this is 3 months old. But reading this comment... it made my day
You are a good person
I hope he's okay. I can't even imagine. 
u/NeverFeltSoSad are you still with us? Your posting history suggests otherwise. I hope you're still out there lurking and finding whatever comfort/solace is best for you.
Hoping it's some sort of throwaway 
If it's worth anything, I'm in Indy until monday, I'd gladly take you out to dinner - on me. We're gonna have a mini Christmas too on Saturday, we'd love to have you. Peace and love to you. 
I really wish there were more people like you in the world.
How's it going?
I think this was an alt account. I sometimes come back and see if they replied to my PM or had any activity. I tried searching online to reach out but found nothing. I hope they're ok.
I think this was an alt account. I sometimes come back and see if they replied to my PM or had any activity. I tried searching online to reach out but found nothing. I hope they're ok.
I really hope the person is doing fine now. This is so unbelievable sad ... 
I'm in Massachusetts and can offer help if you need it. I'm sorry for your loss...
Same, we're here for you OP
This is my second thanks giving since my dad was abruptly murdered. I can't even imagine how you feel right now and I am so sorry for your loss. Just know that as time goes on, it gets bearable. Stay strong we're all here for you. 
How are YOU doing? Love to you
How are YOU doing? Love to you
I'm only 17, so its been really rough through these extremely important developmental stages, and these existential crisis' without a dad. I'm doing better than I did last year. I didn't cry this thanksgiving and I am so proud of myself for that. 
I'm only 17, so its been really rough through these extremely important developmental stages, and these existential crisis' without a dad. I'm doing better than I did last year. I didn't cry this thanksgiving and I am so proud of myself for that. 
Oh, honey. :(  I'm glad you're proud of your strength. I'm sure people have said this already, but, there's absolutely no shame in being strong enough to cry.   This isn't as much help as I'd like to be able to offer, but, I'm a philosopher. So, if you ever want to talk about existential anxiety in a very abstract, technical way, I'm your auntie. Lol <3
You have a world of people who care about you. 
This.  I'm getting goosebumps just reading all of the comments offering their home and support from many different parts of the world.  Surreal. This is what humanity should always look like. <3    P.S. OP, if you're near Houston, feel free to PM me.  Hang in there buddy. 
This made me cry
Same here. I clicked on top of all time thinking this post was made years ago.  I only just realized that it was only a few days ago. Incredibly sad and my heart goes out to this guy. May he find peace.
This absolutely broke my heart reading this. I am so sorry. 
happy cake day
Wanna play league of legends together? I'm sick and was exposed to TB monday so I'm avoiding family today so I can't see them either.
i'm down my user is FreazingBalls
Such a perfect analogy. I hate talking about my depression, I stopped after I opened up to someone about it and their response was “just try thinking positive:)”  Well gee, why didn’t I think of that?! 
I feel you, my friend called me a 'wussy' and a 'partypooper' for opening up to him. I smiled and said, he you are right and I walked away. We haven't talked much since.
I feel you, my friend called me a 'wussy' and a 'partypooper' for opening up to him. I smiled and said, he you are right and I walked away. We haven't talked much since.
Exactly! I feel like people have this perception that depression is just “woe is me” when it’s not even like that. I honestly don’t want anyone to even know I have depression. I hope you feel better, friend. Maybe the end of this marathon is attainable and it’ll be a walk in the park. 
Exactly! I feel like people have this perception that depression is just “woe is me” when it’s not even like that. I honestly don’t want anyone to even know I have depression. I hope you feel better, friend. Maybe the end of this marathon is attainable and it’ll be a walk in the park. 
People seem to think that you can cure depression by just 'being happy', without realising that depression is basically the inability to feel happy. Unless you've experienced it then you really can't relate to it in any way. 
reasons I'm subbed to /r/wowthanksimcured
God I love you for showing me that 
Except it's less like a marathon and more just running aimlessly until you die.
And I can also walk or stand still, look around, have a nice meal. Cry over my broken leg. Perhaps it can heal, perhaps it can’t.
And I can also walk or stand still, look around, have a nice meal. Cry over my broken leg. Perhaps it can heal, perhaps it can’t.
> And I can also walk or stand still, look around, have a nice meal. Cry over my broken leg. Perhaps it can heal, perhaps it can’t.  Not sure what that equates to in this analogy.
> And I can also walk or stand still, look around, have a nice meal. Cry over my broken leg. Perhaps it can heal, perhaps it can’t.  Not sure what that equates to in this analogy.
That there are other options. Took me a whole lot of time to figure out.
I opened up to two people about a year ago and they quickly disappeared. These were close, longtime friends. It is hard for me to open up when things are hard as a result. It took me a long time to even try opening up. Then when I did, it was exactly what I was afraid of.
Same thing happened to me couple months back. Haven't spoke out since 
Wow that is shitty. Sounds like they were not good friends as it was and that is very painful to realize. There are good pepole out there that won't bail on their friends. I have opened up to people that have been very supportive. 
Nah most are like that i would say.
You deffo don't have to run the marathon at first. Just take some baby steps. I went to a support group today. It staved off the depression for a couple of hours. 
That's actually really awesome. How'd you get introduced into said group? Internet? Friends?
That's the general idea, but it doesn't work for everyone. Could you just acknowledge that? 
Yes, hence the 'unfortunately this is also  pretty  difficult'
Don't try to use that comparison to most naysayers. Then they just start whining that you're not trying hard enough or some shit.  I tell them that whatever they're telling me to do is like telling a paralyzed person to walk. 'It's all mental bro, positive attitude bro, you're saying it's impossible, some people walk, you're preventing scientific advancement bro, with that attitude no one would invent a method to walk.' Like shoot you. It doesn't matter what the future looks like. That makes no sense.
Ha! Yep describes an old friend to a T. He thought I should just 'try to be happy' and when that didn't work it was because I wasn't trying hard enough. He knew, because that's what he did to cure his 'depression'. In all his wisdom and experience, he came to the conclusion that my problem was... I just wanted to be miserable. God. Some people, eh! 
Yes. Also, I like to just have the night to myself. There's something calming about the night time when most things are asleep.
Absolutely. I feel my best at night when everything is quieter and darker, I feel like I can actually think clearly and freely. The sun can be oppressively happy and I try to avoid being outside when it's blazing hot and bright and loud. 
Absolutely. I feel my best at night when everything is quieter and darker, I feel like I can actually think clearly and freely. The sun can be oppressively happy and I try to avoid being outside when it's blazing hot and bright and loud. 
They say the sun is beautiful. But the moon is more relaxing.
They say the sun is beautiful. But the moon is more relaxing.
I love this
My whole life. I just want to be alone and in peace, in my room, away from the judgement of anybody, and without any responsability. Am I going to miss the few hours that I can be completely free?    School sucked. Good thing I only do things in the afternoon now.
Yo i was the same way but I'm stuck in school though. I stood up all night during summer break though
Yo i was the same way but I'm stuck in school though. I stood up all night during summer break though
I'm still up all goddamn night. I just can't physically bring myself to a normal sleep pattern.
I'm still up all goddamn night. I just can't physically bring myself to a normal sleep pattern.
I had a tough time fixing that, in fact I fixed it just this weekend when school started a few weeks ago
That's exactly what I'm doing right now and I will regret it 
I'm with you..
I'm with you..
So bad lol 
its 3am... i have no job, no life, no school, if i stay up late i dont have to 'live' or deal with people.
Just scrolling through comments and i found this. I'm in the exact same position, no life, no job and no school. I feel like a failure. So staying up late helps me in some sort to calm down amd to not deal with anything. Your not alone. I hope it will get better for you! Stay strong! 
Just scrolling through comments and i found this. I'm in the exact same position, no life, no job and no school. I feel like a failure. So staying up late helps me in some sort to calm down amd to not deal with anything. Your not alone. I hope it will get better for you! Stay strong! 
thanks and you too.
thanks and you too.
Same as you two.I'll be 20 next month.I dropped out of high school.And i'm stuck in the same mentality as i was when i was 16.I've never had a job,girl,car.I have no life.All i do is stay at home all day and my mom pays for all my stuff....Sigh
I'm doing it right now 
Me too!!
Nearly every night now. It's the night time when I have the least responsibilities and can read to escape without being bothered. I also am scared of going to sleep because I have such bad nightmares. I have PTSD. It's like going to sleep and the bad movies turn on in my brain. So essentially, it's like not really sleeping when I do. 
PTSD is horrible. It's been a large factor in my insomnia. For a long time now (close to 21 years). I hope you can get on top of it. 
Of course, all the time. It shooting sucks.
It's wildly distracting too. Like how am I supposed to do my work when my heart feels like it's being squeezed by anguish. I just need to curl up into a ball sometimes.
It's wildly distracting too. Like how am I supposed to do my work when my heart feels like it's being squeezed by anguish. I just need to curl up into a ball sometimes.
The thing that pisses me off is that if I go and curl into a ball it doesn’t help at all. Nothing helps. I don’t feel more comfortable or anything. Just suffering until it passes 
https://i.redd.it/bff0kd3twic01.jpg
Bahaha! Thank you!
Bahaha! Thank you!
for sure :) i couldnt not post it
Yes.  Then the self-hatred takes over and tells me 'You are not allowed to have feelings, or break down. You do not deserve to cry, be upset, or have anyone to comfort you through this.' So I push it away and continue on with my undeserving life.
can relate.
can relate.
Same
Yes.  Then the self-hatred takes over and tells me 'You are not allowed to have feelings, or break down. You do not deserve to cry, be upset, or have anyone to comfort you through this.' So I push it away and continue on with my undeserving life.
'You don't get to be happy' several times a day goes through my head
'You don't get to be happy' several times a day goes through my head
It's like a shitty riddle;      'You don't get to be happy'      'Why not?'      'That's for you to work out.'
I don’t deserve to be happy because I literally caused all my problems. No one else did. 
This.  People think I’m angry at them but it’s not anger it’s this horrible self hatred and disgust with myself.  I’ve gone days, weeks even months without it happening but then there it is and it’s makes me feel like a complete failure as a human being.
Yes it’s a wave of apathy that makes me feel like walking out into traffic but it does pass
Precisely! It’s like a sudden rush of “man I could die this instant and I would be kinda ok with it”
Precisely! It’s like a sudden rush of “man I could die this instant and I would be kinda ok with it”
I try to think about it rationally every time it happens. “It’s just a chemical imbalance in my brain” I say to myself but it it’s an overwhelming feeling. Good luck friend
Yep. Or just stepping onto the train tracks.  But then you feel bad about how you'd be messing up everyone's schedule for the day.
Yes I think about my family and friends that it would hurt too. 
Yes I think about my family and friends that it would hurt too. 
I'm hoping it'll be quick though
I never cook or do anything in which I have use a knife when I'm home alone. I find myself standing there looking at it, thinking about how sharp it is or I I sharpened it, it would be so easy to run it over my wrists. So I've stopped doing one of my favorite things for fear of thoughts turning to action. 
Whenever it hits me while driving I pull off to the side of the road because of how much I fear my urge to cross the center line 
Whenever it hits me while driving I pull off to the side of the road because of how much I fear my urge to cross the center line 
Sounds like intrusive thoughts, too, which is a common symptom of severe depression.
Sounds like intrusive thoughts, too, which is a common symptom of severe depression.
This! Ah man. I'll be totally fine doing whatever then an intrusive thought will cross my mind like a shooting Jay walker on a busy street. Mother shooter. Why did that have to pop up in my head. I still don't know how to deal with them in a healthy way.
Yep. I've started to say these thoughts out loud too and I'm worried I'll accidentally say them in public  I'll just be sitting alone and all of a sudden I remember how much I hate myself and I'll just blurt out 'You should really just kill yourself already and get it over with', I literally have zero control over it ethier...
It happened to me in class
It happened to me in class
same here bro. it's starting to happen more and more. Louder too. I'll straight up say I shooting hate myself and that I should kill myself as if I was talking to someone else. Then I become embarrassed and hurt myself.
Every night when I try to get to sleep 
I put off sleep for as long as possible to avoid having to lay there with my thoughts.   I know it's not healthy but I can't take it any more and if watching something or playing something at 4/5 in the morning stops that then that's what I tend to do... 
I would appreciate it if you could stop reading my mind, thank you very much.
I was going to reply with “this made me chuckle.” Then I thought better of it and told myself “nobody cares what you think.” Then I realized how relevant that was and posted it anyway. 
Don't start drinking or doing drugs to numb that little part of your brain.  Stay active and focused on enriching people's lives around you.
Too late
Too late
See below :)
I wish someone would've told me that before I started drinking everyday about a year ago.
wish i had the money to do that
wish i had the money to do that
When you use your money to start drinking everyday, you won't have the money to do anything else. It becomes a self-feeding pit. And it is an even harder hell to try and climb out of.
I wish someone would've told me that before I started drinking everyday about a year ago.
It's never too late to /r/stopdrinking
Sometimes I'll suddenly stop and sit on the ground and stare at nothing for 30 minutes.
I feel.  I’ll sit on my bed and stare at the floor and feel so embarrassed/shameful about it if I suspect someone is to walk in on me. 
I seem to do this constantly, thought it was just benzo withdrawal but now I dunno. It sucks though, docyou then just kinda snap out of it and carry on? 
Dang man benzo withdrawal is not fun. I’m a few months out from it and I still have problems with anxiety. I think it just takes some time for your brain to get back to normal after that shit 
I’ve actually been getting this feeling more often in social situations. I’ll be out with friends and get that sudden intense self hatred in the middle of a conversation and I often have to find an excuse to leave. 
Yeah then you feel shitty for wanting to leave a social situation because you don't go out often enough. Staying feels shitty too and makes you feel alone in a room full of people. I understand.
Yes. Almost every morning I wake up and just don't want to face the day. 
Awesome username!
Your mind is searching for the truth in these ideas. But the truth is that your life has value in the little good things you do.
> the truth is that your life has value in the little good things you do.  Thank you so much for that.
Yes. Happens to me while I swim.  ...although a few months ago I was overdosing on Mirtazipine and for a week I could not think negatively if I tried, I was just constantly motivated and it was bliss.
I’m taking Mirtrazipine would you recommend I up the dosage? I need more self confidence 
This was an oddly uplifting story. 
Yeah it can't be all doom and gloom. Just wanted to do that silver lining thing people are always talking about lol
Yeah it can't be all doom and gloom. Just wanted to do that silver lining thing people are always talking about lol
Doom, gloom and the ice cream.  Sounds like a title fro some franchise or tv-series.
Doom, gloom and the ice cream.  Sounds like a title fro some franchise or tv-series.
Or some title of a digital genre album
I just hopped on this sub because I was feeling shitty, this was the first post I read and it made me laugh a bit, it was sorta cute and relatable, in a melancholy way. Thank you for posting this, it lifted my mood if only for a moment :)    It also inspired me to draw or construct a story about a suicidal person eating frozen yogurt. Thank you
Please please please write that story. For real. This is a blood contract. You HAVE to write it
Please please please write that story. For real. This is a blood contract. You HAVE to write it
When (if) I do, I'll post it to an appropriate sub and tag you, blood oath promise.
When (if) I do, I'll post it to an appropriate sub and tag you, blood oath promise.
Do it for YOU! I just want to see it :)
That ended well! Good job! What kind of ice-cream was it?
Basic Vanilla. Put to much got damn salt in it!!
Is it weird to say you made me laugh? Mate yeah fair play that was a surprising twist. Try coffee ice cream next time.
Not weird at all. This is ridiculous and i am dumb. And i absolutely LOVE coffee ice cream. With cookie dough. 
Not weird at all. This is ridiculous and i am dumb. And i absolutely LOVE coffee ice cream. With cookie dough. 
its probably what god poops (y'know if there is one)
its probably what god poops (y'know if there is one)
Its Gods stool sample to humanity.  
I love how you call it 'suicide mode' because I know EXACTLY what you mean. Sometimes it really is the little things that lift you up. :)
Yep  for me its like my head feels like a block of granite. Like everything is set in stone. Then that one little positive thing comes along and it crumbles to dust.
I'm happy that you were able to feel better for a little while. Please accept my hug :)
*spreads arms wide open*    *absolute bliss* 
I've been a member of Reddit for 7 minutes max  That story and sub(?) is the most REAL crazy shit ever. Sobering, yet hilarious...which is life in a nutshell!
Hehe yes!
I've practiced time and time over and I still can't figure out how to tie a noose properly, so you've got that skill over me.
Its sort of easy. I would post a helpful link but thats not a hot move 
That's the most amazing thing I've ever read.
Nah man. You gotta get out man lol
Nah man. You gotta get out man lol
That's the most amazing thing I've ever read!
This was a great post, thank you so much. Best of luck with everything moving forward. 
Im trying. We all are. Thanks a bunch!
You made my day, thank you
Np Stay Golden
I swear this has happened to me so many times and it's so frustrating. I'll be on verge of literally dying (every time when I put the rope on my neck and when I almost jump) and then I'll get these thoughts and I'll cry and try to convince myself to go back to the 'Suicidal Mode' but it doesn't happen and I cry myself to sleep. It's really really annoying.
There's a 'power' in contemplating suicide. A very addictive sense of self control. Its like any drug. Very annoying indeed. Also power in crying. Just as addictive. Idk if this helps you but yeah its all annoying  Please don't kill yourself.
I believe Hangen-Daaz makes a fantastic Suicide Ice Cream. ^^^see ^^^what ^^^i ^^^did ^^^there
Ben & Jerry ALL DAY EVERYDAY FOREVER. LOL thanks
I've been there.. felt completely useless and worthless and then something lifts my spirits and I live for another day 
Thats usually how it is. Things shift so easily
That would be insane! Lol
no dude nothing is too insane for reddit
Nothing that a cup of ice-cream can't solve! My pick: blueberry cheesecake :)
Got damn it. I want cheesecake now lol
this is pretty shooting awesome! really cheered me up. OP you're an inspiration!!
Im an idiot. I'm so shooting happy i made you feel a bit better.
I want to monkey scrub your head. That is all. 
Hehe you gotta catch me first!!!!!
hey, my grandmother has this ice cream recipe I love, I'm going over there soon, so I can try to put it on paper, just reply here to confirm (I'm lazy by default). I remember it being based on 1 (or2?) Mango/s, and 1 (or2?) banana/s. Damn you OP, I miss the ice cream now.  
Yeah!!!!!! I confirm I CONFIRM!!!!! 
At first i was like:  * Huh, yeah, this is familiar.  But then i was like:  * Wait... what? Ice cream?  And after that i smiled because of the last sentence. 
I didn't smile that night. IT WAS TOO GOT DAMN SALTY!!! LOL glad you smiled
Well, that was a rather silly story.
To be frank, you could make a good writer. Your style is pretty good and grabbed my attention. 
To be frank, you could make a good writer. Your style is pretty good and grabbed my attention. 
Ahh get out of here! You that to all the sad boys. Dont make me blush lol
What's the next thing you plan to make?
I plan to make a difference. Or a cabinet
You are too funny to commit suicide
Umm idk lol. Thanks a bunch!
I have to ask why would you hang yourself in public...park risks the chance of a kid coming across your body, scaring them for life. Or hell anyone coming across your body would shoot them up I think. But mainly kids. Or old people...could cause a heart attack if they're old enough.
Right. I wasn't in my right mind. I tried to pick the most secluded spot i could find. And i couldn't do it in my room. Real tight quarters. I  figured a jogger going out of the way would find me but even that sucks.  
Right. I wasn't in my right mind. I tried to pick the most secluded spot i could find. And i couldn't do it in my room. Real tight quarters. I  figured a jogger going out of the way would find me but even that sucks.  
Well when thinking about suicide, you're never in your right mind. Been there before...pills and cutting for me. I could never hang myself. I've heard that you struggle when you hang...might be painful. Cutting is a pain I could deal with but choking...no.  Maybe you should practice your ice cream making skills. I know they make ice cream makers you can just stick in your freezer then pull them out, shove all the stuff inside them and start mixing.
Well when thinking about suicide, you're never in your right mind. Been there before...pills and cutting for me. I could never hang myself. I've heard that you struggle when you hang...might be painful. Cutting is a pain I could deal with but choking...no.  Maybe you should practice your ice cream making skills. I know they make ice cream makers you can just stick in your freezer then pull them out, shove all the stuff inside them and start mixing.
I don't think i could have cut myself! Btw alternating between graphic depictions of suicide and ice cream is absolutely insane lol
Nothing was a win win. It was all very selfish
Well you didn't do it so it wasn't all selfish.
Ha thanks man. Im a comic so i thankfully i have somewhere to vent
Stand up?
I know how you feel. That's happened to me all this week. :/ I wake up a few times, but I just go back to sleep and hope the dream is still there.
Same. That's the worst. Then the rest of the day I'm trying to focus on not forgetting the details hoping I could retain that happy feeling. Never happens tho 
Same. That's the worst. Then the rest of the day I'm trying to focus on not forgetting the details hoping I could retain that happy feeling. Never happens tho 
You could try keeping a dream journal next to your bed so when you have a good dream you can write down the details so you don't forget them
You could try keeping a dream journal next to your bed so when you have a good dream you can write down the details so you don't forget them
That's a good idea. I'll give it a shot. Not sure if I'll be able to hold onto that warm fuzzy feeling on the inside tho. 
Internet hugs to you my friend, if you want them. 
I'll take what I can get! :) Thank you,
There was a point in my life where the only thing I'd look forward to was going to sleep at night because being being in my dreams was so much better than the lonely and painful existence of reality
wow this really describes how i feel :((
Sounds like torture. It's almost better to have nightmares all of the time.
My wife has PTSD and has nightmares most nights, which she finds pretty awful. I have nightmares much less frequently, and I actually kind of appreciate them; the relief I feel at waking up is hard to beat.
There's a bright side to this.  If you can feel happiness in your dreams, you have the capacity to feel it in waking life, somehow some way.  Your dreams may also reveal what you need in your life.  Do you feel like you're being true to yourself in your happy dreams?  Like you have friends who genuinely love you?  Like you have unlimited potential?  Do your dreams suggest something that you could work on?
My dreams have always had the happy end product, not the process of getting there so they haven't helped much.
My dreams have always had the happy end product, not the process of getting there so they haven't helped much.
The end product is what I was referring to.  A lot of depressed people don't even know what they want!  If you are aware of an end product that you actually do want, there's hope for you.  Your problem may be demoralization from not knowing how the heck to achieve that goal.  I, myself, struggle to even know what I want from this world!
Would often dream of family members dying when I was really young, waking up was usually a relief 
Ever since my car accident five months ago I've been dreaming of similar scenarios non-stop. I had a dream last night that I hit someone with my car and then crashed into a bank. I woke up sweating but breathed a huge sigh of relief. I was distressed but more than anything I was just glad it wasn't real.
Every time I wake up I just go back to sleep until I can't sleep anymore.
Sleep is the only think I enjoy. The only time I get not having to be in the real world.
i'm not getting happy dreams anymore 
Same. I remember having dreams all the time when I was younger but now they're once every couple of months, if that.
Child prodigy —> talented —> clever —> average —> incompetent   Never quite sure if it was the depression or just me peaking early and falling early. 
Could be   Child prodigy > talented > overconfident > starts paying less attention in class due to overconfidence > confidence drops as grades drop  Though now I'm just making assumptions. 
Could be   Child prodigy > talented > overconfident > starts paying less attention in class due to overconfidence > confidence drops as grades drop  Though now I'm just making assumptions. 
Yup that was me
Yup that was me
That's sort of me, but less child prodigy and more good at making people think I'm a child prodigy.
Haha. That's me right now. I might fail my Senior year. If I do, I'm either killing myself or running away. I don't think I could live with such failure.
My brother that dropped out is doing better at life than my college graduated ass.
I've read her book. It's crap.  A far more comprehensive critique is available https://www.ncbi.nlm.nih.gov/pubmed/27845531
Everyone is entitled to their opinion. So lets agree to disagree and leave it at that. 
This is so me, my head has been so cloudy lately :/
_Hugs_  I hope we can both feel better one day. 
It makes me want to kill Myself 
The beauty of being at  the bottom is that there is no other direction but up. It can only get better. You posted which is a very good sign. Keep that shit up. We are here for each other bro.
The beauty of being at  the bottom is that there is no other direction but up. It can only get better. You posted which is a very good sign. Keep that shit up. We are here for each other bro.
Bullshit. It can always get worse.
*Walks into the kitchen*    'Wait.. what did I want again?'    *Walks out of the kitchen*    'Oh now I remember!'    *Walks into the kitchen again*    'wtf am i doing here' 
5 times to get a cup of coffee. Thats my record so far.
5 times to get a cup of coffee. Thats my record so far.
xD
My memory is really going. I haven’t been excited about something that’s not alcohol/drugs/sex/food in a while. I sometimes forget what I’m saying while in the middle of saying it. It’s sucking the life from us
Things that excite me: driving, food, drinking a mag of wine in a half an hour......that's about it. 
Things that excite me: driving, food, drinking a mag of wine in a half an hour......that's about it. 
Oh I do like driving. And my cat. And podcasts
Perhaps it's the alcohol/drugs/unhealthy lifestyle that is imparing your memory? From personal experience I've noticed considerable cognitive improvement when I stop drinking and/or sitting around looking at a screen so much. 
I quit drinking, all it did for me was make me soberly aware of how horrible my cognitive ability has become. 
I quit drinking, all it did for me was make me soberly aware of how horrible my cognitive ability has become. 
Yeah, I feel like drinking on its own is bad for just about anyone if you indulge too much, but the good thing it does for depressed individuals is get you out of your head and enjoy life a bit more sometimes. This brain fog we all experience is from spending days, weeks and months just ruminating constantly and not experiencing life in general. Booze can definitely be a sort of window back into it.
I can't enjoy much things as I used to before. I'm losing interest in literally everything. Everything seems like so much effort, I wonder if all of this is worth it. And I ask myself 'Why am I like this? It's not like I have it bad.'  Yeah, I can agree, OP. I feel like I'm degrading immensely each time the mood comes and slaps me across the face. I can relate to you. 
I definitely relate. I can't enjoy, much less pay attention to anything anymore.   It's actually why I believe I so thoroughly shooted up my finances recently: because I tried to fill my empty unhappy existence with purchases hoping I could distract myself from the emptiness I feel inside.
I definitely relate. I can't enjoy, much less pay attention to anything anymore.   It's actually why I believe I so thoroughly shooted up my finances recently: because I tried to fill my empty unhappy existence with purchases hoping I could distract myself from the emptiness I feel inside.
So yes. Says the guy who just bought a Pixel 2xl when his Nexus 6P was working just fine. Ugh. I like to think I'm a little bit happier with those rounded screen corners.
So yes. Says the guy who just bought a Pixel 2xl when his Nexus 6P was working just fine. Ugh. I like to think I'm a little bit happier with those rounded screen corners.
And me, who bought toys and games he can't concentrate on and now I just lie in bed or sit on my chair crying.
Same here, school wise I'm suffering so much now, I've had close to a 17% drop in my GPA, and even in everyday conversations I just feel so slow. 
I'm lucky to be out of school. Otherwise I'd just be beating myself up for every F I get.  
I'm lucky to be out of school. Otherwise I'd just be beating myself up for every F I get.  
I uses to when it all started, now I walk into tests knowing I'll either fail or get a really slim pass. I've started skipping classes too, I just can't do it anymore. If I set my expectations low enough then maybe I'll stop being disappointed, you know? 
When my mental illness problems were getting really bad (I had not spoken out about anything before that point) I did a bunch of medical tests because I thought it was a tumor or something.  I actually wished it was a tumor because no one takes mental illness seriously and this might sound extremely juvenile and spoiled but I'd rather go through surgery than all the baggage associated with mental illness.
I went through the whole 'thinking it was a tumour' thing and honestly it has made me may worse. It makes me doubt everything. I've done so many tests and been cleared and it still leads me to 'maybe then I didn't have it, but maybe I do now...' My days are spent thinking about death and what's going to take me one day that I can't enjoy anything. I shooting hate it so much. 
I went through the whole 'thinking it was a tumour' thing and honestly it has made me may worse. It makes me doubt everything. I've done so many tests and been cleared and it still leads me to 'maybe then I didn't have it, but maybe I do now...' My days are spent thinking about death and what's going to take me one day that I can't enjoy anything. I shooting hate it so much. 
For me it's the opposite.  I just start shrugging off any potential disease because 'It's probably all in my head anyway.'
If you're losing that much memory, I'd say go to the doctor. For some people here, the severity is far less so it doesn't feel like a big deal. I looked it up and depression has been known to cause short term memory loss. But long term? I'm not sure. And if you think it's particularly severe or worrisome, go get it checked.
Don't underestimate the effects severe depression can have on your brain. It really can impair cognitive ability to the point where you forget names and events from the past.
Are you also very sleepy and exhausted?? I’m asking because I felt like this and we finally found out I had sleep apnea. I’m feeling much better now and less dumb lol. Maybe you should look into it. 
I've been meaning to get a test for sleep apnea because my brother was diagnosed with it and I'm a poor sleeper. I also don't breathe very well so I figured those two might be connected because isn't sleep apnea when your breathing gets shitty when sleeping to the point that it could wake you up/kill you?
I've been meaning to get a test for sleep apnea because my brother was diagnosed with it and I'm a poor sleeper. I also don't breathe very well so I figured those two might be connected because isn't sleep apnea when your breathing gets shitty when sleeping to the point that it could wake you up/kill you?
Your throat closes and you wake up from lack of oxygen.
Depression fog does that to you. Finally getting mine under control after years. I still regress some days and get super frustrated. 
What would you say has helped you most in your recovery?
What would you say has helped you most in your recovery?
Meds. Years of therapy and talking did help. But meds... Broke me out of the fog for a long time. I am tapering off now. Almost off them. 
If it’s any consolation, that’s the most brilliant headliner for depression ever and I applaud you 
Aw, thanks.   I do think that headlining depression with just one sentence isn't quite fair. Everyone experiences it differently and this is part of the reason I was in denial for so long about it.
Thing is, it's just intelligence that feels affected. It's everything. I'm no longer in control of my emotions, making me irrational. I'm no longer calm and collected and remotely good at anything.
Hey, I’m really sorry you’re still feeling so down. We can talk more if you’d like to PM me! I can relate to how you’re feeling. And btw, if you weren’t remotely good at anything, you wouldn’t have been able to articulate your thoughts and feelings as well as you did. Pat yourself on the back for that! 
Yes, it happens. It's not necessarily a permanent state of affairs.
Sure feels like it, though. I'll make it through, but sometimes I wonder if it's worth it.  Nice username. Is it a reference to something?
Sure feels like it, though. I'll make it through, but sometimes I wonder if it's worth it.  Nice username. Is it a reference to something?
It's almost certainly worth it. Depression is like a sneaky bully sitting at the desk behind ours at school, whispering mean devastating things at the backs of our heads all day. Such as: Believe me, sucker, you couldn't possibly ever feel better.  Thanks re: username. I often wish to be invisible and unnoticed. Sometimes my wish comes true.  
Doing brain exercises such as sudoku, jigsaw puzzles, playing an instrument, attempting to draw realistically from observation, juggling etc.. can help with this.    The general fog of being in your own world and having your own issues to deal with.. Especially coming into adulthood affects this I feel. 
I draw practically daily and I feel like I get worse and worse with everything I draw. I actually quit for a while because I beat myself up for everything I made.
I'm turning 20 this year...
Oh shit, you're shooted.
It's a double dose cocktail of 'shoot you', I know what you're talking about :/ It sort of forces you to watch yourself achieve nothing, and then makes yourself feel bad about it. 
I don't know if I've ever seen this described more accurately
These and ADD is torture
Oh God, I'm right with you.  I think my heart has outdone itself.   Do you have any good tips to deal with this trio of fun. 
Oh God, I'm right with you.  I think my heart has outdone itself.   Do you have any good tips to deal with this trio of fun. 
Shit, I never thought I'd run into someone with the same trio of problems.
Oh add agoraphobia to that list. You mean I don't care about anything, care too much about everything AND I can't go outside?  Cheers mum/dad for the lovely genetics👌
I feel your pain. If ever want a child, I'm adopting. Dang passing on this triple combo.
>It sort of forces you to watch yourself achieve nothing, and then makes yourself feel bad about it.   Holy shit that's some insight I've never had. Thanks!
Welcome, I think these issues become a little easier to tackle when you can describe them, it's the first step in understanding the problem 
I never could explain that feeling I always have. I might sit and achieve absolute nothing, or miss a college assignment and then afterwards, I feel INCREDIBLY bad about it. I've been known to go to dark places from my own failures sometimes, even the simple things.
That's the worst part, sometimes the smallest things can send you into that spiral :( 
That's the worst part, sometimes the smallest things can send you into that spiral :( 
That is absolutely the worst part.  I broke a glass once at the exact wrong moment and I cried for days about it, like that uncontrollable crying where you feel like you can't breathe and you can't eat.  
For me, depression isn't apathy as much as it is dread and hopelessness.  And yeah, paired with anxiety -- when everything is not only hopeless but critical and life-altering -- it's shit.
Yeah, depression manifests in different ways. I have had different effects from it at different times in my life.
Yeah, depression manifests in different ways. I have had different effects from it at different times in my life.
They are a parasitic relationship: anxiety is perfectly paired with depression; cure the thoughts by not thinking.  For me, that limbo between the two is where the battle resides.  Send reinforcements.  We're in this together, fellas.
The good old combination of caring too much but only about bad things.
My situation exactly. Depression makes me feel useless and anxiety makes me focus on why I feel useless. 
Depression is when I don't care about anyone, anxiety is when I believe no one cares about me.
Yep. When the anxiety kicks in too much, I feel like I have to go find people. But once I do, I realize I don't care about them or what they have to say. Isolate, rinse & repeat.
Anxiety isn't always necessarily about worry. Mine isn't about worry at all. For me, anxiety is a very physical feeling that's very difficult to describe using words other than 'trying to stay completely still feels like dying.' The 'energy' buildup is so relentless that I sometimes feel like my chest is going to both explode and implode at the same time. Can't think straight, shaky, a feeling of slowly losing your mind, confusion, and intense uneasiness.
Do you ever feel like your skin is too close to you?  Or that nothing you do, no matter how hard you try, you can't get comfortable?  That's how I describe my anxiety.
Do you ever feel like your skin is too close to you?  Or that nothing you do, no matter how hard you try, you can't get comfortable?  That's how I describe my anxiety.
I've never noticed how close my skin is to me until you said that
I've never noticed how close my skin is to me until you said that
I kind of wished I hadn't read his comment cause now my skin feels extremely uncomfortable and I can't stop thinking about it.
Do you ever feel like your skin is too close to you?  Or that nothing you do, no matter how hard you try, you can't get comfortable?  That's how I describe my anxiety.
The only relief that I find from this feeling is (sometimes) sleep and smoking pot.
The only relief that I find from this feeling is (sometimes) sleep and smoking pot.
I wish I could still smoke weed. It makes my anxiety 5000x worse.
Its called Chest tightening. Its not a common symptom. I have it and its terrible.
It's absolutely awful. Is it really not common?
I know this is months old, but I totally know this feel.  It's like being pulled in two different (but equally shitty) directions.
I wonder if there is a way to turn depression and anxiety against each other to cancel them both out. I'm gonna set some mutually assured destruction in motion.
No depression is living in the past and anxiety is living in the future. When you are present in the moment then you will be happy. Happiness is a choice. Source: The guy typing this has approx. 5 stays in psychiatric care and one failed suicide attempt.
No, as long as you're right, remember that these things are different for everyone. Happiness is not a choice. 
No, as long as you're right, remember that these things are different for everyone. Happiness is not a choice. 
To some degree, controlling one's thought process could be seen as choosing to be happy. Not really *happy*, but choosing not to ruminate on something and get stuck into a destructive feedback loop. 
To some degree, controlling one's thought process could be seen as choosing to be happy. Not really *happy*, but choosing not to ruminate on something and get stuck into a destructive feedback loop. 
True, but you sure need a lot of willpower for that. The thing with depression is, there's little motivation to change or even try, even it's for the better.
My entire life is like trying to get the broken earbud to work by slowly moving the wire around
That's a wonderful description. It's like you do something that works for a second, but you move and then spend the rest of the song/podcast/month trying to find that sweet spot again. Sometimes you hit it, but you just can get it to stay that way.
That's a wonderful description. It's like you do something that works for a second, but you move and then spend the rest of the song/podcast/month trying to find that sweet spot again. Sometimes you hit it, but you just can get it to stay that way.
And the whole time you're fidgeting, all this fantastic shit that you wanted to experience is passing you by while you try to fix it and experience a little bit.
And the whole time you're fidgeting, all this fantastic shit that you wanted to experience is passing you by while you try to fix it and experience a little bit.
Dang... 
I get these ''moments of clarity'' sometimes. They can last anywhere from half an hour, to a couple hours, or the better part of a day. The problem is that these moments are few and far between. Weeks between them.... Anyways, I'll use what little energy I have to make the most out of it, (workout, get some tasks done, go for a walk) and the next day it's as if it never happened. 
.
.
This is where therapy and medicine come into play. 
It feels like waking up
If the afterlife is anything like sleeping, count me in 
Several times throughout the day. Like they're remnant embers of many infernos of passions that refuse to die, but are too weak to survive the gusts of the black winds... 
Very poetic
This happened yestedray morning.  I made plans for weekend.  Today I canceled.
Try making plans for yesterday, that way you don't have to cancel them. Ps: shoot depression in the face
Yep.  Just applied to Walmart on that high.  Hoping this might last a while.  Cause I know it aint permanent. 
Good luck! 
Good luck! 
I'll need it.
Dude I did the same well not walmart but a store anyway, I got denied but tbh I was relieved since I wasn't on the high anymore.
That's the damnable thing about it... :(  I'm hoping I get it.  And good luck the next time you try, friend.
That's the damnable thing about it... :(  I'm hoping I get it.  And good luck the next time you try, friend.
Yeah thanks buddy
Yep.  Just applied to Walmart on that high.  Hoping this might last a while.  Cause I know it aint permanent. 
> Just applied to Walmart  I'm sorry.  Edit: Meant it as a joke, didn't mean to come off as insensitive. For what it's worth, I work at Dairy Queen for the same reasons, because it was one of the few places easy enough to work at that I could deal with my own depression while getting a paycheck and not having to worry about messing up an actual important job.
> Just applied to Walmart  I'm sorry.  Edit: Meant it as a joke, didn't mean to come off as insensitive. For what it's worth, I work at Dairy Queen for the same reasons, because it was one of the few places easy enough to work at that I could deal with my own depression while getting a paycheck and not having to worry about messing up an actual important job.
.
.
I'm hoping too.  Considering my material conditions, even though I'm qualified for... well I dunno?  Other things.  But really... if I don't do something, I'm going to wind up dead.  And it's the closest and most employment viable place I can go right now being that I hit economic rock bottom and couldn't find the ability to remain in the city.   
I had this the entire day. I was happy. I truly was. I saw some of the colours come back to life. And then she told me she met someone else and she's fallen in love and doesn't know what to do because it feels a little weird and she knows I shooting love her to death end me god damn it. Why does all of this shit happen to me
Oh man, this is what I fear right now. How the shoot can someone meet someone else while you are in a relationship? What happened to loyalty and honesty?
I've definitely had this in my life. Almost makes the pain hurt that much more when you 'go back'. Funny thing is, regular life isn't like that 'super high', but you sometimes trick yourself that it 'could' be like that 'super high' when your temporarily out of your hole. Have you every received therapy for your depression?
I haven't..I know it's something I should do but my anxiety stops me from doing so.
Mine last about half a day up to a few days. Then, when that inevitable crash hits, it's almost worse than before I got happy. It's like watching a movie about a tropical vacation. You almost feel like you're their and finally have a glimpse of the good life and then it ends and you're stuck with the same shit but now you have something to compare it to. 
Ugh when they last a few days that when I do things like sign up to courses that I don't finish or buy materials for hobbies that I never take up 
I was interested in trying Wellbutrin. It seems like your effects are short lived. Was there ever a time that it gave you long lasting relief? 
In my experience, it works a little bit. It all depends on how your brain is wired, though.
No, bipolar mood swings last much longer, at least weeks, sometimes even months.
.
type 2 is much shorter though. 
yep. I'm type 2 and I've never had a hypomanic episode that lasted more than a few days. It's usually much shorter than that, even. So while something like this could happen with bp2 (and does to me, all the time), what OP (and many others, apparently) is experiencing is not necessarily indicative of bp. there are other factors to consider.
i can relate... sometimes i even Wonder if im faking it.
Right? Like I’m thinking... am I just lazy? (Also boring and tired)
Right? Like I’m thinking... am I just lazy? (Also boring and tired)
I often wonder if there's even a difference
I often wonder if there's even a difference
me too. I don't want to use depression as an excuse so I just deny that I could be depressed.
I'm in my early 30s now and I can trace symptoms of anxiety and depression back to around 8 or 9 years old. Idk what it's like to be 'normal.' I often feel so discouraged I'll ever get better because at this point it would take a complete personality overhaul. I've lived with it so long it completely defines my outward personality. I don't talk very much. I hardly smile or laugh. It's just who I am. 
I'm exactly the same way. Between the mental and physical health issues, I don't remember what 'normal' feels like or what I'm supposed to feel like in general.
My biggest thrill in life right now is the feeling I get when I finish a show on Netflix.
At this point, I don't even want to watch new stuff on Netflix, I just keep rewatching the same stupid sitcom in loop.   I want to go back to when I first watched it, even though I know it wasn't better back then. 
At this point I wouldn't even be me without depression. It is essentially a pillar of my personality that I doubt will ever go away.
I'm the same, it became a part of my characteristic, it latches to me and it would take a part of my identity with me if i try to make it go away.  
You aren't alone. I have it for like my 10th year now, and depression made me delay my studies (by 3 years) and everything.  Nowadays I can't differentiate if I'm legitimately tired, or it's depression tired. I find myself wondering if it's the new normal.   Hang in there. 
Same boat as you. Depression related issues delayed my schooling by 4 years (which makes it worse when you compare yourself to your friends and the rest of society)
I've been depressed since I was probably in my mid-teens, didn't get a doctors verdict until I was in my early twenties. I'm now almost thirty-eight so you say I've been dealing with depression for twenty odd years.
Same. I turned 37 today and all I've been thinking about since I woke up had been 'it's always going to be like this.'
At least you still have friends
That's debatable 
This is part of the reason I'm so hesitant about seeking help. I don't know who I am without depression, and that's pretty frightening.
same here. I was in a mentally/verbally abusive marriage. After I was finally away from him I literally felt like my personality got sucked dry.  I reconnected with a friend that I had a fallout with because he tried to warn me and he instantly agreed that I was definitely this shell of a woman.
Without context this sounds like a bad idea. I've heard of drugs tackling depression but the wording threw me off.
Hah, you’re right. I’m probably biased in that because they really did help me so much, after battling this depression bullshit for so long. Since my early teens, at least.  In that vein though, there is emerging research and evidence that psilocybin mushrooms (psychedelic / magic mushrooms) may be a key treatment for years worth of depression brain reset / fix.
This stopped me in my tracks. What hurts is that we do want to enjoy living ... so bad
well not all of us, but I do. life is so damn good but I only get the bad bits it feels like. 
well not all of us, but I do. life is so damn good but I only get the bad bits it feels like. 
I'm curious what parts of it you think are damn good
I'm curious what parts of it you think are damn good
whatever makes you happy. for me it's rainy days, video games, sex, sunny days where it's not cold but not very hot, the feeling when someone appreciates what you do and loves you. there is so much good in the world, right now I'm just holding onto my rainy days and video games. also Netflix. I enjoy Netflix quite a bit. 
I personally do maladaptive daydreaming. 
Same. My night dreams are not dreams, they are nightmares so the only dreaming I get is this.
Right now I'm here. Speak with me. I will give you the moment to write with someone who loves life. Loves the beauty of the earth and all it beings.   I'm not there, but imagine a hug by me. Close your eyes and imagine me, someone who is caring for you, a beautiful person :)
I did read many times on internet that nobody can help you( usually it is seen as getting a GF or bf) and that the only person that can actually help you is yourself. And I just ruin everything I touch and I shooted myself up enough, there is no help for me.
I did read many times on internet that nobody can help you( usually it is seen as getting a GF or bf) and that the only person that can actually help you is yourself. And I just ruin everything I touch and I shooted myself up enough, there is no help for me.
That's true that no one can actually help you but yourself, but I think the nuance here is 'help' = 'directly change'.  Only you can directly change yourself yet things external to you, like people, food, experience, etc, can influence the probability of you to change. In a way, they indirectly change you in contrast to you directly change you.   This is not an advice; I'm just sharing my thoughts on how I rationalise the whole who can help who concept.
That's true that no one can actually help you but yourself, but I think the nuance here is 'help' = 'directly change'.  Only you can directly change yourself yet things external to you, like people, food, experience, etc, can influence the probability of you to change. In a way, they indirectly change you in contrast to you directly change you.   This is not an advice; I'm just sharing my thoughts on how I rationalise the whole who can help who concept.
not true, other people can help you. there's just so few that will love you and care unconditionally. nobody should be alone all the time.
Not OP, but I am imagining this. Thanks so much! <3
I am happy that this helped you :)
Donate a kidney, bone marrow, blood. Turn yourself into a living donor.  Then see how many lives you have saved
If it were possible, I'd donate/transfer my brain to my brother who suffers from Schizophrenia. I'm not scared of death anymore.
Give blood?
yeah, i'm a regular
We understand all too well amigo. Many of us that would also understand have already killed ourselves. Stay alive for all of us. Then enjoy your life for you.
<3  Thank you
When I was really depressed... back in college... I think I could sleep for 2-3 days non-stop.  I'd just stay in bed.  Doze in and out.  It was terrible.
At first, I thought 'I think I could sleep for 2-3 days non-stop. I'd just stay in bed.,' sounded amazing.  And then I saw, 'It was terrible.'  That is the reality of falling into that pattern.  I forgot.  I guess I needed that reminder.
At first, I thought 'I think I could sleep for 2-3 days non-stop. I'd just stay in bed.,' sounded amazing.  And then I saw, 'It was terrible.'  That is the reality of falling into that pattern.  I forgot.  I guess I needed that reminder.
I think depression is biology's way of telling you that something's wrong and you need to do something.  Unfortunately, evolution has screwed up somehow.  You'd think our ability to fight back and our resolve would further strengthen.  Instead, we just fall into this languid stupor, and then we just stay in bed all day.  Maybe many days.  God must be an awful designer.  Or maybe evolution is just random gene flow shit that's often unhelpful.
I think depression is biology's way of telling you that something's wrong and you need to do something.  Unfortunately, evolution has screwed up somehow.  You'd think our ability to fight back and our resolve would further strengthen.  Instead, we just fall into this languid stupor, and then we just stay in bed all day.  Maybe many days.  God must be an awful designer.  Or maybe evolution is just random gene flow shit that's often unhelpful.
I think it's fair to blame our inability to learn and evolve from depression because of modern society.
Yeah the dehydration really ruins what would otherwise be sweet bliss for me.
And then you have to get up to take a piss if you have the strength to actually stay hydrated.   C’mon God - at least let me pretend that I’m dead!
This is why I (probably) just failed my ecology midterm. :/   Guess I have yet another class to retake in the summer
I was on probation thrice and took an extra year to graduate.  I still graduated (ironically) with honors.  Try to ask for help.  Don’t make the same mistakes I did.
How did you get out of your depression?
Sheer willpower.    Mostly I practiced self-directed cognitive therapy.  I have never taken drugs.  And I have always found therapists to be useless.  But I read a lot about cognitive therapy and took a course on CBT.  You just have to push through it.  It never goes away.  I have learned to just power through.  There are times when I’ve considered shock therapy or ECT.  It’s still something I have thought about exploring.
I have nothing but nightmares now. I hate being awake. I hate sleeping. I hate existing.
I love nightmares, like a free horror-movie. 
Wet dreams are a double bonus.
A while ago I had a semi-lucid erotic dream. It was great until the girl I was making out with morphed into my ex...
A while ago I had a semi-lucid erotic dream. It was great until the girl I was making out with morphed into my ex...
You've got an ex. I'd kill for that
You've got an ex. I'd kill for that
You might not depending on how they became your ex. I wish I never met mine.
It's the reason we take so damn long to get help. Nothing but a vicious cycle tbh. A few days ago I saw Major Depressive Disorder written on my script for the first time and yet I still doubt myself.
I watched a youtube vid about depression, it said that people with it and similar mental illnesses take an average of 10 years to actually seek help.
I watched a youtube vid about depression, it said that people with it and similar mental illnesses take an average of 10 years to actually seek help.
About right for me
About right for me
Exactly 10 years for me, haha. 
From the last time I saw a therapist my parents set me up with to the first time I took initiative and sought help myself, 10 years is about right.
Took me five, and even during that period I'd come extraordinarily close to suicide a couple of times. It's frightening to imagine 10 years being the average. 
I was going to post this.   This is why I didn't go to get diagnosis. I'm afraid I just think about myself being one, waste everyone time and make me looks like a liar who want attention and make excuse for being lazy or unable to do anything.  Those feeling are the worst.
This is literally why I'm here... I feel that for so long I've been a burden on others. Typically, I bottle it up, tell myself I'm worthless, find a coping mechanism, and do my best to ignore that feeling.   Finally built up the courage to visit here. Thank you, OP and all. 
This is literally why I'm here... I feel that for so long I've been a burden on others. Typically, I bottle it up, tell myself I'm worthless, find a coping mechanism, and do my best to ignore that feeling.   Finally built up the courage to visit here. Thank you, OP and all. 
> Typically, I bottle it up, tell myself I'm worthless, find a coping mechanism, and do my best to ignore that feeling.  I do the same thing, my friend. It's a rough cycle, isn't it? Shoving it all down so you aren't a drag on everyone else? I'm glad I finally came around to visiting this sub, hopefully we can get past this thing.
> Typically, I bottle it up, tell myself I'm worthless, find a coping mechanism, and do my best to ignore that feeling.  I do the same thing, my friend. It's a rough cycle, isn't it? Shoving it all down so you aren't a drag on everyone else? I'm glad I finally came around to visiting this sub, hopefully we can get past this thing.
I actually haven’t read or met people who are like me. Like I simply ignore my problems for the sake of others and that they don’t have to worry about me. The first post I see on this subreddit is perfect for me. I haven’t gone to go get a diagnosis cause I think I can just move along and push past it, hasn’t failed me yet.
I'm this way as well. I've put off seeking therapy for several months now cause of this. 
Honistly thought it was kinda just me. That I was like 'Making all this up' or being dramatic or something. But then again I don't tell anyone that im depressed. Infact if people ask I usualy lie about it. 
Honistly thought it was kinda just me. That I was like 'Making all this up' or being dramatic or something. But then again I don't tell anyone that im depressed. Infact if people ask I usualy lie about it. 
Hell I sometimes question myself if I'm really depressed/bipolar or not. I keep this a secret from most family because I don't wanna be painted as an 'attention whore'
I don't have official diagnosis and my parents will not let me get diagnosed. This is eating up my days and the time at which I should be studying. I also feel like I only have a victim mentality and attention seeking problem. I don't know what is true and what is not so I don't openly say that I may have any mental illness as people would shut me up or most of the times I'd think that I shouldn't say it without any proof 
If your parents won't give consent, can you think of another way to seek help?  A school nurse, guidance counselor, a trusted teacher, your grandparents?  I'm truly sorry for your situation.  I was diagnosed at 17, but my parents wouldn't consent to treatment.  It is frustrating and horrible.  Maybe finding a hotline for teens may be the way to get help.  Don't give up and don't give in.  There are millions on your side.  Never forget that.
If your parents won't give consent, can you think of another way to seek help?  A school nurse, guidance counselor, a trusted teacher, your grandparents?  I'm truly sorry for your situation.  I was diagnosed at 17, but my parents wouldn't consent to treatment.  It is frustrating and horrible.  Maybe finding a hotline for teens may be the way to get help.  Don't give up and don't give in.  There are millions on your side.  Never forget that.
A good guidance counselor can really make a difference. Our school had really shitty, overworked counselors who would give attitude if you tried coming to them for mental help.   I found some comfort online and through Reddit (gotta sift through the cruel people of course) 
I'm the opposite actually. Don't have an official diagnosis but I'm pretty damn sure I am completely, fully, cripplingly depressed.
Too many adjectives for you to really be depressed. Kidding. 
Too many adjectives for you to really be depressed. Kidding. 
Hah. That was pretty good.
What I feel is constant malaise, unhappiness, and bitterness. I always think that it's not severe enough to be 'real' depression.
Same. I can imagine feeling worse, so I haven't crossed the line into depression yet. I know that kind of thinking is bullshit but I can't convince myself to believe it.
I can’t imagine someone saying they “want the old me back” thats heart crushing. Stay strong friend :)
Yeah, it was my dad that said it. We do not speak anymore. 
I tend to have brief depressive episodes alternating with periods of time where it’s literally the opposite. So much energy and overconfidence it’s sometimes an issue of its own.  So ofc I’m faking it because clinically depressed people don’t ever legitimately believe that they are the greatest person to ever have lived or overspend money because they’re so special that the rules don’t apply to them, right?
That sounds like you could be bipolar. 
That sounds like you could be bipolar. 
I’m going to be evaluated for it soon
Yesterday I told my ''friend'' how I felt and he said I was making drama and told me to stop being a jerk and deleted me. 
Get rid of these people. They'll understand when it happens to them. And I hope it never does. 
How do you talk about it when it seems like no one wants to listen though?
The thing is, being open about it, you don't need to tell a whole story about it. If they don't listen, that's not your fault, then there's nothing you can do, except to not let that attitude get into feeling even more bad, because maybe that's people's natural reaction when something's so hard to understand. But the point is; just being open about it.
I know exactly what you mean. I’m scared I might just be tricking myself into being depressed so I can be noticed. 
Same here, whenever i’m going through an episode but i’m not sure if it’s “depression” I go through an effort of putting a label on it because i think it will help, after that i start to question how i really feel and it just gets worse.
It's not you. It's your conditioning. People that don't have it don't get it. A lot of people try to but even more don't. Depression is real. We all have our doubts about our own but it's people that don't understand that make us feel awful about ourselves for uncontrollable feelings of despair and loss that create that doubt. Keep fighting friend. You got this ✊🏽
Yeah, and a shoot ton of people don't get it. I'm definitely not looking forward to explaining to my teachers that the reason why i didn't complete my summer homework is because i've been having a depressive episode for three weeks and barely done anything other than cry and play the Sims 4. 
And once you're dead they all sit around asking 'Why didn't they ever say anything? If only they'd asked for help.'
That's what angers me the most. In high school a fellow classmate committed suicide. Everyone on Facebook even those who had never talked him before said how they wished that they got to know him or had reached out. Its all lies though because no one cared about him when he was alive. 
That's what angers me the most. In high school a fellow classmate committed suicide. Everyone on Facebook even those who had never talked him before said how they wished that they got to know him or had reached out. Its all lies though because no one cared about him when he was alive. 
It's because 'Oh, if I don't say anything, people will think I don't care, oh well, better profit off of this dead kid to make myself seem like a better person, instead of just another attention-seeking douchebag.' I especially hate it when they pretend to have known the kid their whole life and have been friends with them since forever. It's especially funny when the same person saying they were friends is one of the people who bullied them. I have a couple of girls at my school like this.
It's because 'Oh, if I don't say anything, people will think I don't care, oh well, better profit off of this dead kid to make myself seem like a better person, instead of just another attention-seeking douchebag.' I especially hate it when they pretend to have known the kid their whole life and have been friends with them since forever. It's especially funny when the same person saying they were friends is one of the people who bullied them. I have a couple of girls at my school like this.
Sorry, deleted.
There's a great movie that mocks the whole phenomenon called World's Greatest Dad with Robin Williams
Thanks for mentioning this one, I've just watched this movie and I'm glad I reached to it.
The only person that can help you is yourself.   Of course there are experts who can support you and your way, but afterall it all comes down to you.
> The only person that can help you is yourself.  Last time I read anything on this it was showing that this is in fact not the case.  As hard as I work to not get back into depression it still keeps coming for me.  The number one thing that has been shown to help is socializing.  The more time you spend with people the less depressed.
But when you did they said shoot you to the face or 'stop feeling sorry for yourself or they're people in Africa starving'
or my personal favorite, 'You need to pray more.'
You'll be the jerk of the week. In another month you'll be forgotten. I have no idea why people are so intent on hating people who end their suffering.
It makes them consider suicide too, and for that, they hate. 
It makes them consider suicide too, and for that, they hate. 
It makes them magnitudes more likely to suffer depression and commit suicide as well
Because if it's not done for a valid reason, which most cases of depression aren't IMO, then they feel cheated. Their hate is an expression of how they care, whether anyone wants to believe that or not.
That's a shitty way to express how they care, considering they didn't show they cared in any way whilst you were alive.
That's a shitty way to express how they care, considering they didn't show they cared in any way whilst you were alive.
No one is perfect. Hiding your feelings through anger is completely normal for humans to do. Chances are they didn't know just how serious it was because of the stigma attached to depression.  >considering they didn't show they cared in any way whilst you were alive.  Most people don't know how to help. Also, I'm not sure who 'they' is, but it's not everyone.
Wow that's one of the most honest statements I've ever read. If depression was viewed like other illnesses maybe people would begin to understand the amount of suffering involved. Sometimes I'm so sad that I can't stop crying and it physically hurts. I hate it when people say it's all in your head. I know that when I feel like killing myself it's the most excruciating pain I've ever felt. 
Yeah, pretty sure if I had bone cancer people would be lining up to help with my laundry and cook me nutritious meals. Nobody ever does fundraisers for depressed friends, lol.
Yeah, pretty sure if I had bone cancer people would be lining up to help with my laundry and cook me nutritious meals. Nobody ever does fundraisers for depressed friends, lol.
So true. That's actually what my parents used to tell me. At least I don't have cancer or a starving child in Africa. 
Sometimes I'd  just settle for a sick day.....
Oh, you want to use one of the two sick days we give you per year? Ok, well then you need to go to the doctor today and have them write a valid note excusing you.  n idiots
If he has never gone through it he will never understand. People can't differentiate between being sad and being clinically depressed. 'Depressed' for most people is just a sad feeling, its not the all consuming beast that those who experience it know it to be. Like if you are sad you might not want to go out and stuff yet there are some days where I can't even bring myself to shower or eat. That's the difference.
Yes! This exactly! I've explained it 100000 ways. Now he just knows to sit back and enjoy the view of my beautiful insanity. Bipolar disorder is a pain. One day you're the happy go lucky person you used to be and the next you're a complete stranger.
Read this as I'm laying in bed due to fatigue  from a crying spell...I always hate the physical effects that come along with everything, as if what's going on on the inside isn't enough, it also makes me sore and exhausted...
I went through a crying spell this evening and then had to try to write a five page paper afterwards. I haven't finished it yet, and I'm not going to finish tonight.
Funny thing is that the only thing keeping me going is not being seen as a jerk for ending it all. It's my last tiny little thread that I hold on to and it will probably be enough because I am a massive coward....   I pay people to care [aka therapists] before anyone tells me to go talk to someone. Actions speak louder than words and I can say without a doubt that there isn't much action from the people in my life....   
Once again, I come here on my lowest and see my thoughts posted by others (replace 'therapists' with 'experts'). You lot make this shit slightly more bearable, whether first time posters or not...
This is probable the truest thing I've ever read.
Probably*
Probably*
I think someone downvoted this because they thought someone else was correcting OP.  (It's him correcting himself) just fyi.
I think someone downvoted this because they thought someone else was correcting OP.  (It's him correcting himself) just fyi.
That's just how it goes, it's okay though. 
You know you can edit your comments, right? 
No I didn't, but I corrected it anyway. It's really not that big of a deal.
The only reason I've yet to kill myself is probably the fact that I don't want to hurt people. I don't want to leave my little brothers and I don't want to put any blame on the girl who think she's responsible for my depression, she may be part of the cause, but frankly, I was depressed years before I even met her.
Same. I love my family too much to put them through it
Ugh, I really feel for you and wish I could come around to make you dinner and talk it through with you or something. (Let me know if you happen to be in Melbourne, Australia...) I'm so sorry you're going through this. :(
Thank you! That really means a lot to me. Unfortunately I'm from the United States, but, it's the thought that counts. You're a great human being!
Thank you! That really means a lot to me. Unfortunately I'm from the United States, but, it's the thought that counts. You're a great human being!
I'm just a human being who knows what it's like to suffer alone! I hope you can find a few more of us in your local area. [Hug]
Yes, yes, and yes. Although I'm thankful that I know a few people that don't think this way, a really vast majority of people that I know think like this, and it bothers the hell out of me.   Apparently my failed suicide was just a way for me to 'get attention'. What, do they actually want me dead? Is that what they're trying to say?
No they just want you to suffer silently. 
Hello. I’m 30 and went through the exact same thing. And still feel under my “potential”. I’m sorry and you’re not alone. 
Same.
Same.
Me too, most important thing is nto to let expectations make you who you are.
Me too, most important thing is nto to let expectations make you who you are.
Same. Indian parents.
Same. 29 here. I feel inadequate in every part of my life and have never took a risk on anything. As a result, I have no friends, no girlfriend/wife, and I hate the career field I'm in, but have no idea where to go from here. Really sucks.
Hey man, dont worry. I have friends, I have a girlfriend, but too hate my career, and Have a slight idea where to go from here (I figured if I dont know what to shoot to do with my life might as well just invest and save money and spend money in pleasure experiences etc).  And Im still depressed. So it doesnt matter what you do or dont do.
right? I just turned 30 last week and sometimes I'm still like 'do I wanna be a this or a that' like i can suddenly come up with college tuition or something :D
lol yes. one of this slow days in work I wrote down all the professions I could and would like to do. It was depressing because I still think I have all these qualities but they are all scrambled around.  - Soccer Manager - Soccer journalist - Announcer, Commentator, Pundit - Writer - Philosopher - Musician - Sociologist - Psychologist - Teacher - Spy - Voice actor - Actor  
This post sums up my entire existence. It's nice to know there's more than one of us.
we might as well all laugh at life and just all be cool with each other here.
Holy shoot, thinking that you're actually way behind mentally honestly proves it isn't that way. Needless to say I've had those exact same thoughts as well. Thinking people around you are just being nice.
Exactly. Like teachers and friends and colleagues - everyone just humouring you, rather than breaking the terrible news that son, you're an absolute dunce.  I know something is going on. That there's some sort of unspoken understanding and exclusive communication between disparate elements of my life, and it's this thread - that I'm missing something fundamental - is what binds them together. 
God yeah. In wish I found out I got some rare brain disease or a tumour or something to explain it away.
Not what I meant you  idiot.
What are the things that can help? 
Cognitive Therapy, mindfulness/ acceptance, goal setting, help with issues like ADD or anxiety if they're factors.  It really depends on the individual.   I've been meaning to put a series of posts together and put them online but... Well, procrastination / fear.
Pfft, I've never seen a person who isn't intelligent have clinical depression.  Ever.  Unfortunately, you are dead wrong and Intelligence and Depression go hand in hand. You will find with studies that have been done that the majority of people who are depressed for life are above average intelligence.  I know I am, and I know my fiancée was.  Ignorance is bliss, that saying really does exist.
Intelligent people are aware of it, but depression can affect anyone if something in their lives cause it to happen.    I'm sorry to hear about your fiancée from your wording.
Similar story here but I never let it get me down. I believed in myself and you can too! 1.7gpa in hs, went to community college, enrolled in university degree transfer program, graduated, then graduated state university, now starting my own business.
wat u doing now for business friend? 
Hey right there with you. Unemployed and trying to focus on the gym to help relieve anxiety and stress. It is hard to get out there some days and some weeks I'll only make the effort to work out once. Every day I go is progress though and I'm starting to lose the weight I gained during this episode. Keep searching for that job and don't give up.
Thanks. I'm still working on getting a job. I've been working out every day and take pictures before I shower just so I can see my progress. I have an interview tomorrow so I'm happy and keeping my fingers crossed.
So, what book did you read? 
I'm reading a series called *All the Wrong Questions*. It's kind of a prequel to *A Series of Unfortunate Events*. Nothing too dense because I don't think my numb brain can handle it, but I'm enjoying it. 
I did two out of seven of those things. Brushed my teeth and played with my cat. I need to drink more water. You did really awesome. Don't get down if it doesn't become routine. Just a couple of those things each day is a major accomplishment when we have depression.
I set up reminders on my phone to drink water a few times a day which makes it easier. If I haven't emptied my water bottle when the next reminder pops up I finish it off before refilling it. 
I set up reminders on my phone to drink water a few times a day which makes it easier. If I haven't emptied my water bottle when the next reminder pops up I finish it off before refilling it. 
Coincidentally this has been something I've considered. I forget to drink, but notice improved mood when hydrated. Good for you re: the alarms. 
Playing with your cat helps more than you know. Your cat loves you. 
He's been a little crazy lately (even though he's huge he's still a kitten). But even though he keeps knocking shit over I can't get mad because he's so cute lol. 
Hey how are you doing man? 
Hey, I see you deleted your account, but if you want to pm with a different account I'm down to talk. (apologies for the late reply; I usually only check this account every few days) 
Which one? 
Showering. Its summer right now in Australia with high humidity which helps.
Showering. Its summer right now in Australia with high humidity which helps.
You can try brushing your teeth while in the shower. Don't follow my example; I've had two teeth pulled because I didn't take care of them. Most of the things I did yesterday only happened because I had to talk to myself like a toddler. 'ok, thesaddesttrombone, now you have to do this and you can't do that until you finish these.'   Also have you ever eaten an orange in the shower? It's the only way I'll eat them now. 
Hey, that's pretty impressive.  You did more than I did all of Sunday! :) Question is what motivated you to do all that?
I it is technically procrastination since I'm doing that stuff instead of getting more serious about job hunting or taking a shitty job. Not sure how I'm going to keep up with this stuff if and when I become employed again. 
I it is technically procrastination since I'm doing that stuff instead of getting more serious about job hunting or taking a shitty job. Not sure how I'm going to keep up with this stuff if and when I become employed again. 
I hear you, but that's a lot of tasks that you accomplished, and not easy tasks.  Working out, exercise.  PLAYING with cat ;)  I'm being serious (Except for the cat part).  That takes a lot of energy.  So I wanted to know what your mind-set was.  Like what were you thinking when you're like, ok let me do this, and then this, and then this and then this?    
I hear you, but that's a lot of tasks that you accomplished, and not easy tasks.  Working out, exercise.  PLAYING with cat ;)  I'm being serious (Except for the cat part).  That takes a lot of energy.  So I wanted to know what your mind-set was.  Like what were you thinking when you're like, ok let me do this, and then this, and then this and then this?    
I'm using one of those habit tracking apps which helps. I find that these days I have to talk to myself like a little kid to accomplish the simplest tasks. 'saddesttrombone you need to do this' 'ok now you're going to do this and you can't go back on reddit until it's done '. 
What about us sad people who are too damned socially anxious to be able to try to make others happy?
Well thats not really your fault at that point. You're still a good person, you just don't have the social capability to help people. Its alright.
Well thats not really your fault at that point. You're still a good person, you just don't have the social capability to help people. Its alright.
Thanks.
Oh god this hits home so hard.
Yes, yes it does
The reason that stopped me from committing suicide. I knew that it would put me out of my misery but it would cause people in my life to go through the hell that I'm in, and I could never do that to someone.
I'd be long gone if it weren't for the people in my life. I want me gone, but they don't. I stick around for their sakes. 
I'd be long gone if it weren't for the people in my life. I want me gone, but they don't. I stick around for their sakes. 
I'm not suicidal anymore, honestly I don't want to die cause there is so much more I want to do. I just really wish I never existed.
Not only that, but the second you give them a taste of reality they usually can't handle it because it's always been about them not you. 
YES! I am the comedian in my family, at work, in college... Yet if I ever have a day when I want to be quiet, I get looks of disgust. 'Ugh, what's wrong with YOU?'  Danging hate that.
As you say, you want to be the 'real you'.  So how about we go about finding ways to identify more with the 'soul' and the 'real me', and identify less with the depression?  Because it seems to me that if we identify too much with the depression, in a way that we ought to be identifying with the 'soul', then it will become a self-fulfilling prophecy, and will unfortunately be 'soul crushing'.  How about we try to avoid that?  
I very much agree with you, but I also think that depression is a part of who we are. I know that I would view the world very differently if I wasn't depressed. Not saying you should define yourself by the depression, but as with everything in life, use the depression to develop yourself and your view of the world.
It's so true. I'm basically the funniest/happiest person ever in other peoples eyes but they are wrong. They don't see me fighting the demons inside my head everyday.
'You wake up every morning to fight the same demons that left you so tired the night before, and that, my love, is bravery.'  -Couldn't find a source
'You wake up every morning to fight the same demons that left you so tired the night before, and that, my love, is bravery.'  -Couldn't find a source
Thank you. I really needed that.
I think I'm very much like this. Everyone thinks I'm really nice but honestly, I just like helping people out who are having a hard time because I know it feels. 
That sounds like being nice... or empathetic at least.
I have a coworker that I suspect suffers from depression. She is always super nice and upbeat. Once in a while I manage to glimpse behind the mask and see the sadness. Nonetheless, she is a person that people want to be around.  When I am depressed, I am either a force to be reckoned with or a downer. Either way, it's probably easier to avoid me.
Have you tried talking to her? Your spidey sense is probably correct, and imagine what a relief it could be for you both to be able to drop the mask a bit with each other. 
Also proof that depression sticks with you your whole life. You just have to learn to live with it or finally be consumed by it in Robin Williams' case.
I don't know if I can live with this for the rest of my life. I hate having depression. I am a really outgoing person but this depression is really killing me. I just want to stop existing honestly. I feel so hopeless. 
I don't know if I can live with this for the rest of my life. I hate having depression. I am a really outgoing person but this depression is really killing me. I just want to stop existing honestly. I feel so hopeless. 
It gets a lot better once you learn how to manage it well. As in, a lot better. You just need to develop the 'tools' to do so. c:
It gets a lot better once you learn how to manage it well. As in, a lot better. You just need to develop the 'tools' to do so. c:
I've had depression for a couple years now, and it's caused me a lot of pain. It's ruined some really great things for me and pushed people away. I feel really alone. I feel like a burden on people. I lost my gf who I loved a lot because of my depression. My happiness is tied almost directly to my friends and family. If I'm not good enough for them, then my self worth plummets.
I would absolutely love that. 
Bottle of Scotch or Hot Cocoa? Your pick.
Bottle of Scotch or Hot Cocoa? Your pick.
Why not both? 
Why not both? 
Both is the right answer
I'd really love to go on a cross-country road trip with someone where we just drive, see the sights, and sing along to Tom Petty songs. But I ain't got no friends. Oh well.
Road trips with good music and a good person to share with... love them. It would be priceless.
I have friends but I don't have balls to ask them to do anything like that, even tho I always wanted to go on a roadtrip or camping and hiking on the northern part of my country
Oh man if I were you, I'd nut up and ask.
Oh man if I were you, I'd nut up and ask.
Social anxiety... Gotta love it
I'm  (Mediator Personality (INFP, -A/-T)
 You've only begun to discover your power! Join me, in the INFP community and I will complete your training. With our combined strength, we can end this destructive conflict, and bring order to the galaxy.  That was a Starwars reference in case you're unfamiliar lol
I did the test and the result was 'The Advocate' (INFJ-T). After reading about it, this type of personality seems a lot like me. Thanks man, I'm gonna explore it more.
Ah makes sense, I figured you might be an NF(iNtuitive Feeler) too because of how much you enjoyed just sitting and talking and also due to how emotional you were for a girl you just met. These are typical qualities of NF's.   Glad I could help! I always find knowledge about our personalities so empowering to understand. Mbti can even tell you what types you're most compatible with in friendships and relationships!
I'm a [mediator (infp-t)](https://www.16personalities.com/infp-parents) and I'd say it's pretty accurate for the most part
I'm a [Turbulent](https://www.16personalities.com/articles/identity-assertive-vs-turbulent) INFP as well. Yea obviously it's not going to be 100% correct because we all undergoe entirely different experiences in life but its true for a type in general. I think it's funny how some of the people who went and took the test were INFPs too. INFPs typically have an interest in psychology. In fact, MBTI was created by an INFP😊 
I am a Logician (INTP-T). It guessed maybe 3/4 right about me. A good read but not all true.
Right there's going to be some things here and there that don't apply exactly. With every specific type there is no single definition assigned. Each individual defines them in their own way and its very likely  that if you meet five people who all say “I am an INTP”, their definitions of what INTP means are going to differ. 
I think we all want that. Just someone to share life with. 
That's what it all really comes down to, doesn't it? 
I want to sit on a rooftop, then stand up and jump off
Into a pool! Ha!   Your Depression = 0   My Save = also 0
Into a pool! Ha!   Your Depression = 0   My Save = also 0
I rate that joke a solid 6/10
I rate that joke a solid 6/10
A man can try. 
That sounds sweet. I love rooftops.
It sounds like it to me too.  Do you often have strong feelings?
It sounds like it to me too.  Do you often have strong feelings?
Sorry, what do you mean?
Sorry, what do you mean?
Username checks out
Are you literally the embodiment of Into the Wild? If not, then go watch that damn movie and thank me later.
Haha! We've got different agendas tho.
Haha! We've got different agendas tho.
I can see from your username hahaha (and the whole point of the movie conflicting your beliefs too of course)
Did this once with a cute guy I had just managed to become friends with, we climbed up onto an old shed next to some horse stables and after we laid down and talked about deep stuff the tin roof collapsed and we fell into a horse waste pile... 
I'm feeling like shit but this made me laugh. Sorry that happened to you though. 
If it´s 2am where you are at I´m game. 
You're in luck if you live in Sydney
You're in luck if you live in Sydney
Stockholm
Stockholm
Close enough?
I did this once while smoking, for some reason being alone felt more right.
Smoking and thinking alone is always the best. I have entire playlists made specifically for this exact thing.
Dare I ask who you were talking to?
No one?
No one?
But everyone at the same time. Whoa. That's some good shit you got there.
Whoops. I found another reason to live. 
Isn't that such a 'shame' :)
Nah shoot a cuddle, I just want someone to chill with.
What's your poison?
What's your poison?
Mental understanding and support 
Mental understanding and support 
I was referring to what type of drink but that's cool too. Here if you want to talk man :)
i was thinking this last night while i cried myself to sleep. 
What do you think I was doing when I made this post? 
I can't tell if you mean it. This phrase is used a lot.
'I'm hungry' is also used a lot, and we can agree that most of the times people really mean it =P
I'd stick to just sitting and talking, maybe slightly drinking
I agree, just talking and sitting, maybe drinking and/or smoking. I've always been pretty averse to physical closeness due to social anxiety, so to me just being able to shoot the shit about life & real stuff without worrying about image/vulnerability is already closer than many people ever get in their entire lives.  
I would love that, but I would probably jump off the roof.
Into a pool. Surprise pool party dumbo. Gives a new meaning to lifesaver huh?  
This is exactly what I've needed all summer. Sign me up, OP. 
You down under?
Sitting on a rooftop? Sounds cool.
Jumping off a rooftop? Sounds cooler.
Why rooftop?
You can get into some deep thoughts on a roof top. It is known 
I think nowadays' culture glorifies this kind of behavior  I've been to rooftops many times in my life and it's nothing interesting personally speaking 
I think nowadays' culture represent rooftops as places used for reflecting upon life, and I see nothing wrong with that...  I like the feeling of isolation that comes with rooftops.
I think nowadays' culture represent rooftops as places used for reflecting upon life, and I see nothing wrong with that...  I like the feeling of isolation that comes with rooftops.
Rooftops are cool until you get bored of contemplation (see 5 minutes after getting up) and want to go back down to electricity and shit
Rooftops are cool until you get bored of contemplation (see 5 minutes after getting up) and want to go back down to electricity and shit
I see... I'm sorry that you don't enjoy it as much as I do
Don't you feel pleased by the isolation that we feel in rooftops?
Nah.  Just a simultaneous sensation of exposure and inadequacy at not being able to climb higher.   I've taken to living IN roof flats. Probably just some weird broken need in me to climb ever higher...  but being on top never cuts it.   The only satisfying sense of isolation I get is during heavy rain... if I'm somewhere dark nobody else can get to without going through the rain. That is somewhat peaceful.
Nah.  Just a simultaneous sensation of exposure and inadequacy at not being able to climb higher.   I've taken to living IN roof flats. Probably just some weird broken need in me to climb ever higher...  but being on top never cuts it.   The only satisfying sense of isolation I get is during heavy rain... if I'm somewhere dark nobody else can get to without going through the rain. That is somewhat peaceful.
That feeling of peace is awesome, whenever it comes...
Well it's been one month since you posted this. Have you had the talk with somebody while on a rooftop?
I have, my new girlfriend :)   I'm doing quite well buddy, life's been nice to me after years of depression
My partner got a GameInformer in the mail today. I should have been excited to read about the new Resident Evil or the indie games I would find intriguing. Instead I just stopped being able to take in the information a paragraph and a half in.  I used to be interested in programming. Reading fiction. I normally have dozens of ideas I can't possibly do anything with. Lately I just listlessly hang around the apartment and go to work to my terrible job.   Right there with you.
try reading online, its not a solution but it feels a little different depending on the person, maybe it'd be a start
try reading online, its not a solution but it feels a little different depending on the person, maybe it'd be a start
I try to keep up with around 13 webcomics at a time to fight the feeling of listlessness.  I fall behind at times but about 70% of the time it works for me.
What's worse is when you're playing a game and you're doing shooting terrible so it's like, great, can't even do one of the only things I enjoy.
Then mentally shut down and want to cry, so you log off and tell your only friend that you just dont feel good but in reality you just go lie down and think until the sun comes up.  Or is that just me
Then mentally shut down and want to cry, so you log off and tell your only friend that you just dont feel good but in reality you just go lie down and think until the sun comes up.  Or is that just me
It's not just you. I can understand the feeling, probably not to the intensity you feel it. But it sucks. But, you're also not alone. :)
Man that's crazy. I've got no money to buy games so I only play the free ones lol. 
Well, it's a bit easier to be careless with purchases when it's someone else's money lol.   To be fair though, a lot of my 150ish games were gotten for free from Indiegala giveaways, /r/freegamefindings, etc., or in dirt-cheap bundles. I'd be surprised if I've spent more than $300 on Steam, and nearly $100 of that was just Civ V. 
I'm always scared to play solo matchmaking in CS:GO because I always think they will kick me for my lack of skill
CS:GO is toxic. don't start it will make you feel worse.
Opposite for me. Im sometimes scared to play dota in ranked because I know my teammates will just feed. 
The helplessness is painful
I'm too depressed to smoke free weed. 'Do you wanna smoke?' No I wanna kill myself
(I'll just copy my reply to somebody else:)  I think weed makes it only worse once the effect is gone. It's easy to say, but try occupying your time with something beneficial like a documentary or video tutorials?  Also, have you tried sporting? It refreshes your brain most of the time.  
Go for Stardew Valley. This shit is awesome, i played 24 hours in two days.     Tfw nobody wanna dance with me evein in a videogame.
Seconded!
I built a high end pc a few months back. I dreamt of building one for half a decade and now I cant find the motivation to even turn it on.
Same here, I spent 1300 on parts to build a pc, which is something I've always wanted to do, and after a few months of playing games I just lost interest and can't even turn it on now 
Same here, I spent 1300 on parts to build a pc, which is something I've always wanted to do, and after a few months of playing games I just lost interest and can't even turn it on now 
Its sort of comforting to know that someone has been in the same position. Thanks for sharing your story. I hope you gradually get back into gaming again.
Exact opposite problem, my addiction means it's how I'm spending 90 percent of my time avoiding my issues. I didn't leave my house for 48 hours recently, even though I ran out of real food.
I'm the exact same, I try me best to distract myself from life. Today was the first day I've been out in around 5 days, it was horrible, I got in and went to bed. When I'm not sleeping I'm just coding on projects that I'll never complete, gaming when i get bored of that and reddit when i get bored of that, then back to sleep
I'm the exact same, I try me best to distract myself from life. Today was the first day I've been out in around 5 days, it was horrible, I got in and went to bed. When I'm not sleeping I'm just coding on projects that I'll never complete, gaming when i get bored of that and reddit when i get bored of that, then back to sleep
I know this sounds bad, but I kind of want to be where you are.  Not the days with not going out (I already do that), but I can't even get started with coding or gaming, I just sit and stare at it.
I've literally just been opening up steam for the past 2 months, looking at all my games, finally clicking play on a game after an hour, then quickly close out of it going 'nahhhh'. I wish I knew why I won't play the games I love, cause I genuinely enjoy them but I won't play any of them... idk why.
This is literally me lately...
There's a new map try it ;) one match might lead to more
Even that doesn't excite me anymore. It's pretty bad.
You could always try watching let's plays on YouTube? That usually gets me in the mood.
Yup, me too, when I can't play, I watch some guys playing for me. The only thing is that I can't do anything else, and I'll not return playing, i have to sleep or to eat between
Havey you tried watching people do play throughs - its less lonely with someone there making comments. I've been watching katieplaysstuff on utube - she's cute, funny and very incisive with her comments. She did Life is Strange which is a powerful, haunting game with some serious feels.
Second using letsplays as a window to socialisation without actually facing up to the things that make that difficult. You can watch almost passively so if you're spending your time doing nothing but staring it might be able to jolt some kind of interest instead.  Hang in there OP, the part which steals enjoyment doesn't stay forever. If everything is feeling unfun and crappy try doing something different to your daily routine - sometimes that works for me.
Been that way for several years now. Just takes too much effort for too little fun.
> Just takes too much effort for too little fun.  That's a perfect way to describe it. And it sucks.
I feel depressed a lot, and when I do I take great comfort in using emulators to play old arcade/snes/ps1/ps2 games. I find them much much more enjoyable than modern gaming on PS4/Xbox one etc. I could literally play them all day. You should give it a try.
Same here, I like that you can jump in and instantly be playing level 1. Helps keep you focused rather than newer games stopping every few minutes to play a cut scene or something.
I've been drooling over Pokémon moon for months. Got it for Christmas and haven't even opened the jacket. 
play that damn game right now its amazing please
This was me last night. Playing Madden and just said, 'I'm not having fun. What am I doing?'
you were playing madden. I thought that was a natural feeling from playing it.
Maybe you're just getting tired of your games. That tends to happen to me when I get bored with my library. 
In my depressive episodes I simply can't do anything. I would hate to think I'm simply tired of everything.
I was occupied reading berserk for a week but I've caught up and don't know what to do anymore
Great manga.
Smoking weed is the only way for me to truly enjoy video games with a sense of naivety and genuine wonder. Otherwise, just like you OP, the abyss stares back at me in the form of 150 (mostly uninstalled) steam games.
I think weed makes it only worse once the effect is gone. It's easy to say, but try occupying your time with something beneficial like a documentary or video tutorials?  Also, have you tried sporting? It refreshes your brain most of the time.  
I think weed makes it only worse once the effect is gone. It's easy to say, but try occupying your time with something beneficial like a documentary or video tutorials?  Also, have you tried sporting? It refreshes your brain most of the time.  
I'm actually buying a basketball tomorrow for that reason. I don't know anyone to play with, I just like trying to make a basket.
I'm actually buying a basketball tomorrow for that reason. I don't know anyone to play with, I just like trying to make a basket.
It's a good step forward. What do you think about joining a sport club? Boxing or anything like that?
then use a steam roulette, its a software that asks ou for your username and when you press start it gives you a random game in your collection.  if you cant make the choice yourself let someone else (or something else) choose
I'll give you a clue. You need one:  OP is lamenting the severity of his or her depression, not asking for advice on how to do the thing.  This is not some one-off problem; this is depression.
I'll give you a clue. You need one:  OP is lamenting the severity of his or her depression, not asking for advice on how to do the thing.  This is not some one-off problem; this is depression.
ok, i was just trying to help, i didnt mean no harm by trying to help him do mundane task
Are you going to therapy or seeing a psychiatrist?
UK Mental health isnt very good, so ive been waiting for about three years. Doesnt help my past is now coming back to haunt me
UK Mental health isnt very good, so ive been waiting for about three years. Doesnt help my past is now coming back to haunt me
Wrote to my MP about it - got a 'eh, we're trying' line - didn't even mention my name or write more than one sentence. Really worrying.
That's how I was too. I just wanted a casual happy/relaxing game but nothing fulfills that perfectly 
I've heard good things about Stardew Valley
At least you have games to play.
Hey man it really sucks you don't have games to play. But there is no 'at least' here. It all still sucks. I hope you'll have something you enjoy.
Hey man it really sucks you don't have games to play. But there is no 'at least' here. It all still sucks. I hope you'll have something you enjoy.
Idk man, I am just furious how a lot of people here have friends, money, social life, jobs and are still depressed, and most of you are in US, which gives you a lot of oportunites, and I don't have any of that. 
Happy Birthday! I hope this is a milestone of your impending greatness.
Whoa. I love that you didn't try to sympathize or even acknowledge my sob story, but rather just make a happy comment. I guess if there was a single combination of words that would make such a sad day so much better for me, it was those. Thank you friend. 
Whoa. I love that you didn't try to sympathize or even acknowledge my sob story, but rather just make a happy comment. I guess if there was a single combination of words that would make such a sad day so much better for me, it was those. Thank you friend. 
I was in the same position on my 20th, and had a similar experience. It's amazing how one text/call can change my mood for that few seconds. I'm glad you felt the same. I just wanted to tell you, I was always on Reddit, but never had an account. I made one 5 minutes ago just to comment on this post and wish you a Happy Birthday.
I was in the same position on my 20th, and had a similar experience. It's amazing how one text/call can change my mood for that few seconds. I'm glad you felt the same. I just wanted to tell you, I was always on Reddit, but never had an account. I made one 5 minutes ago just to comment on this post and wish you a Happy Birthday.
This is the last place you will ever see.
I'm glad you were born.
I'm glad YOU were born. 
I'm glad YOU were born. 
Hey, what about me?
Hey, what about me?
You're alright I guess.
I'm glad YOU were born. 
The bromance is strong here.   But for real dude, happy birthday. Not going to give you the whole 'silver lining' bullshit. But I hope you find happiness. We all deserve to find a little bit of it at some point.
I never expected anyone to even read my post and just assumed it would get buried in the sub. Thanks for the love, you guys. I love you more. 
You deserve it bro, you truly do.  Im still a bit teary eyed from reading your post.  And happy birthday!  
Um, you guys this just made the front page.... 
People making other people happy makes me happy.        It's 3:30am here, I'm a night worker and it's my day off. I'm going to throw on something Irish and have a glass of my best single malt in your honor. Happy Birthday! 
Um, you guys this just made the front page.... 
Reddit's like that, we would never leave another behind :)
I love you ~~/r/depression~~ REDDIT
Happy birthday :) if it's any consolation I wold love to hang out with you. I hope you get the help you need and deserve. 
Happy birthday, ya sack of shit! We all go through shit times in our lives. This is just your shit time to shine. For your bday present I got you my favorite quote of ever; 'The day before your life changes forever will be just like any other day.' Some day **will be** your day before that day. 
This is beautiful, I've never heard this quote before but it hits me in the feels.
Happy awareness day to you! Get a bouche of flowers, put a note in the bouche in plain sight that says 'It's my 21st birthday, my gift to you are these flowers, your gift to me is a smile and if you want to make my day, here is my number #########, or you can just stop me as I'm walking away to say...' With a soft smile hand the bouche to a lovely lady and graciously just walk away as if you don't expect a thing. 
Bouquet.  Sorry, it hurt my sensibilities to see it thrice.
Happy birthday. Just saw this on the front page. Takes a lot of courage to admit the things you just did. Today (21) is my birthday. Let's celebrate together! 
Well happy birthday to you too friend! 
I also turned 21 today, you should come here and have a joint 21st party! It'd be awesome!
Happy bday friend!
OP is not a faggot. 
I can tell that's coming right from the heart too. thanks, man.
I can tell that's coming right from the heart too. thanks, man.
I know the feels right now bro and I'm proud of you. Just keep up the good work. 
Happy real cake day from Australia!
Hitching a ride on this comment. Happy birthday from Perth, Western Australia!
Happy birthday from over here in SwitzerFrance! (where it's tomorrow already). So what the hell, happy birth(day+1) to you to for   ~~today~~ ~~tomorrow~~ um, now.  Also, if you want to message me with your address, I will send you a birthday present.
Believe me, you've already given me a great gift!
I'm spending 5 years on an associate's degree so don't worry. We are both stuck. But we can still finish school eventually. 
I want you to know that what you have said is true, it took me a while to do it but now I have 2 associates degrees by accident (Arts and a transfer)which i got within the span of 5 years- this indeed can be done. Keep going.
Please get some help and share this feeling with somebody immediately.  You dont realize how many people  loves you and would be affected negatively if you were not around. I am sorry to say this and please don't take this wrong but suicide is selfish. Please do not harm yourself I promise you you are worthy and people love you and I'm sure you make a difference and at least one person's life everyday.
You didn't have to say the second part. A lot of us feel like suicide is selfish, and that makes us feel worse for thinking about it, and that just makes things get worse, and worse, and worse. And a lot of us don't feel like there's anyone there for us who would care. 
You didn't have to say the second part. A lot of us feel like suicide is selfish, and that makes us feel worse for thinking about it, and that just makes things get worse, and worse, and worse. And a lot of us don't feel like there's anyone there for us who would care. 
I apologize, maybe I had to put that there as a reminder to myself because I really can't say where I would be right now it that saying didn't run accross my mind several times.  Just thought if it works for me it may work for someone else, my intentions were pure and I certainly did not want to purposely cause harm to anybody
They let you go before the holidays?
Yep. With no warning whatsoever. In fact, I was getting feedback that things were good. Can't say I'm a huge fan of my former supervisor.
Not be a naysayer, but sometimes with depression it's about warped goals.  Because goal seeking can feel so good with depression I think there's tendency to forget what's right in front of you.  Those are fantastic goals, I hope you get on them, but I think the one that will always be the most important is in your first sentence.
To me that's the hardest, though. With a task you know where to start. I just don't know how to keep in contact with anyone in a meaningful way. I can have fairly normal conversations in person but when I get a text I draw a blank.
You're already kicking ass in my eyes. That last paragraph is really inspiring, and _everything_ about your post is really well written. You do an amazing job conveying feelings. I'm glad you're feeling more stable now, and I hope you keep writing. 
Awww, this made my day! Seriously! Thanks, stranger! <3 
Currently in the works of a demotion I asked for because my current job was too stressful for my anxiety and depression. I’m so disappointed in myself. I can’t even reach my own expectations. 
Don't be. It's hard to take on a lot of responsibilities.
Don't be. It's hard to take on a lot of responsibilities.
It is hard, but I had always been able to fight through my mental illness and get shit done. But I’m so tired of fighting that I’m making mistakes and it just reiterates the internal monologue of “I’m not good enough”.  However, I’m told that I should be proud of myself for recognizing my limitations and finally putting my mental health above my job. So, I guess there’s that? 
It is hard, but I had always been able to fight through my mental illness and get shit done. But I’m so tired of fighting that I’m making mistakes and it just reiterates the internal monologue of “I’m not good enough”.  However, I’m told that I should be proud of myself for recognizing my limitations and finally putting my mental health above my job. So, I guess there’s that? 
It feels like I could've written that post. I'm so sorry you have to go through that. I don't think I have much I can say because I feel the same exact way right now, and I haven't been able to accomplish much about it, besides just discussing it with other people (Mostly here. You're all the best.) I wish I could say something more, though.
yeah. also doesnt help my parents constantly remind me of this and tell me how much im wasting my life away, drowning myself alone in my room every day lol
are you me?
are you me?
All are one. 
Even worse when your friends come back to tell you all about the adventures they've been on and you want to be happy for them but you can't stop thinking about how you're doing shooting nothing with your life compared to them, so you just listen to their stories and have none to tell them back because you're boring and sad. -sigh-
I ran into someone I used to be best friends with and we had dinner. They had all these stories, how they went hiking, climbed mountains, longboarding and so on. They asked me what I have done this summer and I kind of frooze up and couldn't think of anything.
I ran into someone I used to be best friends with and we had dinner. They had all these stories, how they went hiking, climbed mountains, longboarding and so on. They asked me what I have done this summer and I kind of frooze up and couldn't think of anything.
This happens whenever I run into someone I used to be friends with. It's always so awkward. It's one of the reasons I don't like leaving my house.
This happens whenever I run into someone I used to be friends with. It's always so awkward. It's one of the reasons I don't like leaving my house.
Yes yes yes this is so me. I absolutely dread running into anyone from my past and them asking me 'so what are you doing now?'
You can go and do these.things. join some clubs. The people will be very friendly.
I second this. They really are great places to make friendly contacts. But on the other hand, we should address the will it takes to go join something. Doing something outside one's comfort zone can feel impossible. 
Friends? What are those?
Isn't it a game achievement? 
Isn't it a game achievement? 
Definitely a platinum.
Even worse, when your friends come back and DON'T tell you about all the adventures they went on. You already saw for yourself on their Snapchats. -.- ugh. 
Or instaham 
Even worse, when your friends come back and DON'T tell you about all the adventures they went on. You already saw for yourself on their Snapchats. -.- ugh. 
At least I don't have anyone on Snapchat who posts stories  :p
It's my birthday In 3 days and I feel like complete shit. I will be 22 and my whole life has been boring. Nothing much really happened, I just sat in my room for years. I wish I could connect with others and I wasn't invisible. 
My bday on the 10th I'll be 22 I feel the same way . 
My bday on the 10th I'll be 22 I feel the same way . 
Mines on the 5th. What are you going to do for your birthday?
Dogs are seriously the best. I feel like my dog is the only friend who's stuck by my side most of my life, and I don't know what I'd do without him. 
That unconditional love is priceless.
Yeah i get that a lot honestly, teens my age are out with friends and having fun while i'm at home wasting my youth away
Do you enjoy being at home or would you rather be out doing things? You can always start by going outside and doing certain activities by yourself until you are comfortable, fresh air really helps. I go on a lot of runs and hikes by myself and it's like a little get away from life yet I don't feel bad about myself because I'm doing something productive. 
Do you enjoy being at home or would you rather be out doing things? You can always start by going outside and doing certain activities by yourself until you are comfortable, fresh air really helps. I go on a lot of runs and hikes by myself and it's like a little get away from life yet I don't feel bad about myself because I'm doing something productive. 
I really enjoy being at home because i'm an introvert but i wished i was more outgoing, i've been trying recently.
I really enjoy being at home because i'm an introvert but i wished i was more outgoing, i've been trying recently.
I'm a big introvert too and I'm sure most of us wish we were more extroverted because those are the kinds of people the world caters to. 
> Do you enjoy being at home or would you rather be out doing things?  no :(  there's nothing to do and no one to do it with
I wish I could do something with everyone in this thread who feels that way. I'm usually pretty good at making fun when there's absolutely nothing to do. Too bad almost nobody lives where I do. 
I also day dream a lot, I wish so much was different. Thanks for the comment anyway It was kinda intresting. 
Thanks. I love to listen to music and pretend to be a musician and I fabricate these intricate music videos. I also draw and escape by painting. I find it important to become my own person before anything else. one day we will be content with ourselves that will project outward and then our whole lives will change. You're not hopeless, friend. I just think we are all lost and need some time to find ourselves before feeling happy. I feel it exists. 
Thanks. I love to listen to music and pretend to be a musician and I fabricate these intricate music videos. I also draw and escape by painting. I find it important to become my own person before anything else. one day we will be content with ourselves that will project outward and then our whole lives will change. You're not hopeless, friend. I just think we are all lost and need some time to find ourselves before feeling happy. I feel it exists. 
To me you seem to be a very interesting person, seriously :)  Don't put you down. Give people the opportunity to meet you 
What do you daydream about? 
I daydream about a girl mostly and doing lots of things with her. Going to concerts, site seeing, star watching, going to abandoned places, fishing, road trips, walking aimless with her, sledding, going night swimming, camping, stuff like this. I also daydream about me in a different location with a different life. I daydream about me being a different person a lot.
Exactly this. There's event in town that I really want to go and I don't go because I have no one to go with. I don't go alone because I don't want to feel even more like a freak...
Get a camera? It's totally acceptable to go somewhere alone under the guise of being into photography.
I feel you, I'm almost 18. Everyone's having fun and making experiences. I don't even care if I end up with a drug addiction or in a ditch. Other people have a story to tell, and I'm afraid I never will. I knows that might be a bit dramatic and I'm still young, whatever. But I really do feel like I've wasted my entire adolescence.
Try to go out and have lots of experiences. You still can have the college experience too. 
I feel like I'm in a prison cell too. I have no friends or money either and it sucks being this alone. It's pretty selfless of you to stick around for them. It's selfish of them for you to expect you to. Anyway I hope something changes for you.
They don't know about my depression and me wanting to kill myself. I tend to keep things to myself I don't like to tell them anything. I love my family I know if I need something they will help me with what I need but they have their families and I can't intruded on that I never been that type of person. Sometimes I wish a truck or a freak accident would kill so I wouldn't have to do it
My age? I'm 22 but my 56 yo mom goes out every weekend to various events and parties. She makes me look bad lol.
My parents go out and have a better social life than me and they are in their 50's too.
I'm 20 and people my age and younger and already working up the corporate ladder, being music producers, artists, etc. and I'm just... here. Trying to convince myself to be here.
I am way behind everyone in life. Everyone has so much more experience. Everyone is moving on with life while I sit through identical days and wait for them to just end.
that kind of life is dying and overrated. Trust me you are NOT missing out on much. Those people going out making 'memories' are just as miserable as the rest of us.
That's bullshit. They are having way more fun partying, going to events, traveling. They have more life in one year than I have had in my entire life. 
Not entirely true! At the end of the day, a lot of those people are just as lonely, if not lonelier than I am (I can't speak for everyone). They're just better at putting themselves out there.
Yes they are lonlier than me when they have lots of friends, they are always going out and have a partner. Totally.
Yup. I've recently realized that I keep observing life but never taking part and being active in it. It feels like I keep watching things happen to me. I hate it.
I've been an observer for pretty much my whole life, I hate it. But I'm an unlikable outcast that people don't want anything to do with so I have no choice really.
If you haven't tried tinder or any similar app I would definitely recommend it...it's at the very least a way to meet new people. I know it sounds like a chore but there's no harm in putting yourself out there. If it doesn't work for you just cast it aside...but at least try it out. 
i've used tinder and okc in the past as methods to talk to people and it's a double edged sword. you have to remember the main purpose for such apps isn't to just make friends lol. be cautious if you follow through is all
Try to get involved in activities, if your not allowed to get out sneak out of your house 
I do go for walks alone sometimes but it has got boring. 
Did you wake up? 
I wish I didn't.
This defines every second of every day for me. Its to the point where i end up just doing nothing instead which makes me want to kill myself even more
Exactomundo.
'its easier to play the game when you know you can quit at any time'  I have these thoughts a lot and often it helps me get through the difficult task
This is weirdly comforting 
This is weirdly comforting 
Death twitches my ear.  'Live,' he says,  'I am coming'  -Virgil
Sounds like a really good day, apart from missing the lectures which is a pretty normal thing to be honest. Don't go too hard on yourself, cheers on the m&ms but skittles are better 8)
I love me some skittles too but I always finish an entire sharing pouch size. Then I get tummy aches :(
Sometimes it's not even something that's stressful, it's just something thats kinda... Effort  Sometimes even just brushing teeth 
Especially things with lots of effort - going to work. 
Or getting out of bed
Or going outside
I do this often. It's a very fleeting thought but annoying. Sort of a passive 'dying is easier... Meh' thought, but not an actual feeling or desire to kill myself. 
Yeah I always get too scared 
Shit, this is so relatable I laughed.
lol right  I've found myself progressively finding some of my darker thoughts funnier and funnier over time
yessssss i feeeel, like its not a full on depressed suicidal moment, its just a passing thought like.... ya know.... i could die n just not deal with this
it's lame but I always think of it like my Dark Passenger. Not really from 'Dexter' as much as old school cartoons with the angel and devil on my shoulder..  The angel is like, 'wow look at everything you have accomplished!'  The devil is like, 'look at all your failures and half-truths, you could clean up a lot of trouble if...'  Dang that I got things to do!
Yup! Ugh. *failure high fives?*
Failure high fives!
Same here. Or I know there's something I need to do but figure I'm killing myself soon anyway, so I just forget about it and go back to bed 
right? the plan is to off myself after i've milked my body and mind of its capacity to experience joy. why would i do something that makes me want to die even sooner? (why does it make me want to die even sooner? self loathing and jealousy directed towards every other person i see => generalized rage at the world, guilt, rage directed at self, the need to dip into something to make me not kill myself immediately, repeat) 
Yep. Absolutely anything stressful too. Ironically the idea of going to therapy makes me feel that way because I'm so anxious about restarting it. 
I had my first ever meeting with a therapist last week - just a consultation that ended up extending into a longer session which barely even begun to scratch the surface - and was so stressed about how it went and having to go back that I recklessly got trashed and then spent the entire weekend in bed from 5:30PM Friday until now, 4PM Monday and still in bed sort of wishing I'd been hit by a car or something happened while I was drunk. (edit: detail)
I had my first ever meeting with a therapist last week - just a consultation that ended up extending into a longer session which barely even begun to scratch the surface - and was so stressed about how it went and having to go back that I recklessly got trashed and then spent the entire weekend in bed from 5:30PM Friday until now, 4PM Monday and still in bed sort of wishing I'd been hit by a car or something happened while I was drunk. (edit: detail)
After my insurance finally went through on Saturday I honestly considering hanging myself...I've been waiting forever to get it through but when it happened it scared me. This Thursday is our first session....
Agreed. Anytime something hurts, that's immediately where my head goes-- nope! Let's check out of this shit.  I have a presentation to give this week... and once a month for the foreseeable future, and this is all work is-- a cycle of things I dread but pretend not to. I think I used to daydream about favorite bands doing impromptu concerts in the parking lot and me getting to meet them. Now I daydream about being murdered or getting into an accident.
>Now I daydream about being murdered or getting into an accident.  I debate what would be the most reliable way to get someone to pop me in the noggin. The point of me dying would be to end the pain and suffering, so if I suffered in my last moments it would defeat the purpose.
Or in my case, a mind that is already dead.  A mind that is too aware of its place in this world.
A mind that's too aware of its place in the world.  That is really perfectly stated. I so badly wish my brain would just turn it down a few notches and just zone out in front of a football game or TV show like most people. I wish I was oblivious to the ramifications of my thoughts, actions, and words long enough to have a conversation with someone.  Everything is a hypercritical, anxiety ridden, melodramatic nosedive off a cliff with me though.
A mind that's too aware of its place in the world.  That is really perfectly stated. I so badly wish my brain would just turn it down a few notches and just zone out in front of a football game or TV show like most people. I wish I was oblivious to the ramifications of my thoughts, actions, and words long enough to have a conversation with someone.  Everything is a hypercritical, anxiety ridden, melodramatic nosedive off a cliff with me though.
This. The moments I spend with friends and family that are filled with carefree, uncomplicated joy are always underscored by feelings of pointlessness and awareness of the suffering that characterizes the world we live in.
Reminds me of the philosopher Peter Zapffe, who argued that the human mind was over-developed and that humans have to consistently limit the contents of their minds in order to avoid panic about their existential condition, and depression is basically the mind pinning the body down. Suicide for Zapffe was seen as a natural death from spiritual (or lack thereof) causes.  It's inspired heavily from the writings of Schopenhauer and Nietzsche, as well as the psychoanalysis of the time.
That sounds like my kind of philosophy.  Although many of the people out there make me feel like enough human minds aren't very developed...
That sounds like my kind of philosophy.  Although many of the people out there make me feel like enough human minds aren't very developed...
Look into philosophical pessimism, i.e. Schopenhauer, Buddhism, Nietzsche, Zapffe, Cioran, Tolstoy, etc. Also check out /r/antinatalism
I feel like it's the opposite for me -- my mind wants me to be productive and pursue fulfillment, my body just wants to be fed and produce dopamine. I feel like my unconscious and conscious selves are in a constant battle and that my conscious self has all but given up because I haven't found a purpose.
Right there with you. If you find a purpose, let me know how.
Depression sucks plain and simple, I don't want to romanize it
Yeah, shoot the Romans, what with their dumb Latin and everything.
Yeah, shoot the Romans, what with their dumb Latin and everything.
Heheh, I giggled. Thank you. 
I saw a video and what clicked for me was something among the lines of: Depression isn't looking through a gray veil, depression is taking the veil off and seeing the world for how it truly is. 
Nah, depression distorts everything, its like seeing the world through a shit colored lens. 
Nah, depression distorts everything, its like seeing the world through a shit colored lens. 
That's pessimism , not depression
That's pessimism , not depression
I've had chronic depression/dysthimia since I was 6, pretty sure I know what depression is 
What I’ve learnt myself is that no one can give you a reason to live; you must give that to yourself
And you're screwed if you can't find the hat to pull one out of.
This is the realest shooting thing in this thread I hope it gets more upvotes. I’m saving this to remind myself, thank you.
It may be true, but it still rings as a hollow platitude.
I care 
I wish more people were like you
Most people like helping others, it feels good. They just don't know how!
You are so right! And when people can’t help they feel hopeless and want to avoid it. 
'Nobody cares until you're gone' - What makes you think that anybody cares after you're gone?
They really don't even when you're gone but at least you don't suffer when you're dead.
'Nobody cares until you're gone' - What makes you think that anybody cares after you're gone?
Oh I know nobody would care if I died, I'm saying in general nobody will acknowledge it until you've died.
People care if you're suicidal. It might seem that nobody cares because maybe the quality of help you've received, you might consider it useless, unhelpful. People don't know exactly how to help you if even you don't know how you need help. They will help any way they can but bottom line is that it is what you make of it.
I've explicitly stated multiple times how I need help. It's very clear I just can't do it alone. I need someone to help me figure out health insurance and how to afford a psychiatrist and all the technical details. 
Working with my therapist; we were able to trace it back as far as age 7. I wasn’t however diagnosed until I was 41.
Does a therapist help?. 
Does a therapist help?. 
Definitely!!! Once I was diagnosed (I finally found a great GP who saw the signs on our first meeting), she set me up with a psychiatrist, and insisted I find a therapist... I am not sure I would have made it through without one! 
Definitely!!! Once I was diagnosed (I finally found a great GP who saw the signs on our first meeting), she set me up with a psychiatrist, and insisted I find a therapist... I am not sure I would have made it through without one! 
I think I might have to speak to my GP some time. 
Makes sense why I always got told to smile and not be miserable my whole life...
Yeah, nothing worse than being told to smile when you don't feel like it. 
I don't have really clear memory of my childhood but as a teenager whenever I had a problem I sleep for like 14 - 16 hrs maybe similar feelings but not similar actions.
I don't remember much feelings from being a child, but this is one thing I can remember so clearly. 
I don't remember much feelings from being a child, but this is one thing I can remember so clearly. 
Lol I think that in and of itself can be a symptom of depression. I've been there
Yea, I remember writing 'I want to kill myself' on the wall of my bedroom. My house life was really really bad. But I always thought I was strong and I could get through but deep down inside I'd feel empty when I was home and I had very unhealthy coping mechanisms to give me the dopamine I lacked when I was home.   I wasn't strong, I just got better at pushing the thought of depression away. 
Same.. But my household is abusive well my mother is. When I told her I was(still am)  suicidal she shrugged and said everyone feels that way at some point.. 
Same.. But my household is abusive well my mother is. When I told her I was(still am)  suicidal she shrugged and said everyone feels that way at some point.. 
Same, recently I opened up to my mom about my depression after all these years and she said I went through it. And I overheard her talking to my brother saying I was a lost cause so :)
Absolutely. Did not understand that it was depression until I was in my 30's. All those years of self-destructive behavior -- root cause was that black hole of emptiness that I now know was depression. Happy to say that I am coping with it much better. Still have bad days, sure, but overall I can identify triggers and behaviors that signal when I am in a downward spiral again.  
What helped you?. 
I didn’t realize until I got to college and life had been downhill since then. I haven’t been diagnosed so who knows, I might be a fake.
It's really common for most depression symptoms to take hold in your 20s. Diagnosis or not, your feelings are real to you. Don't let others tell you what you're feeling is fake.
Yes. I'm 21 and just starting to realize this. It really holds you back once you're supposed to start being self reliant. I'm starting therapy again soon. Wish you all the best.
It really does, whenever I think back about it makes me feel as if I was just meant to be unhappy in life. Good luck with that! 
I've had anxiety and depression since age 8, but they weren't diagnosed until my 20s. Also started having panic attacks in my teens.
I feel as though we have the same timeline.  I didn’t recognize my issue until I was older.  I also got panic attacks, mostly at school, sometimes about things that didn’t even make sense to me at the time, but I realize now that it was loads of stress and worrying and something small made me reach my tipping point.  
I'm realizing now (35) that I've been depressed for as long as I can remember. No official diagnosis, but I do fit every symptom, and have felt utterly hopeless since at least 3 years old.
Same, I haven't officially been diagnosed but I've always had the feeling. 
Was permanently sad from 4 years old up. Never felt happiness.  The only thing I remember of that time is that I never felt happy. 
Like all the times you should have been happy it just felt hollow and like a watery imitation of what happiness should be? 
Like all the times you should have been happy it just felt hollow and like a watery imitation of what happiness should be? 
This is how I've felt good about 16 years now. Huh... Should probably do something about that. 
Sure did. That would be me
Did you ever find out why? Or find anyway to help with the feeling?. 
Yes oh god yes. I was just talking about it to a friend his evening. For me, it was like one of those cuts that you don’t realize you have. It’s bleeding but it doesn’t hurt. But the moment you look down and see the cut NOW it starts hurting. 
Yeah exactly, and now I feeling like it had so much more to do with my life than I ever realised. 
My first vivid memory of being depressed was when I was 3 years old. I remember being in the garden after my mom had been having me “help” her plant things and I remember wondering why I was not having fun and just feeling that emptiness that is depression. 
That would happen to me too, I could be playing with my toys or put with friends and just out of nowhere I'd stop and just feel lost inside. 
One of my favourite past-times is just spending hours on end using Street View on Google Maps. You can literally travel any route, go to any place in the world and see what it would look like.  You're definitely not alone, OP.
Another Google Maps/Google Earth junkie here. I've 'explored' just about every nook and cranny and it's still just never enough. I've listened to streaming internet radio stations from remote islands in the middle of the south Atlantic, watched Inuit programming, etc. I 'drove' the entire length of the PCH one night and stopped to see the sights (Big Sur, etc.   I really want to travel much more than I actually do. And I constantly want to escape.
I'm doing it. Right now. My flight is tomorrow and I'm so scared and I'm trying to keep focused (and I know that anxiety isn't this thread but man, it's been eating me alive). It's weird because of course I feel that 'drop everything and have new independent experiences' thing but what actually encourages me when I get too far is the mantra from my depression. Recognizing that nothing matters, I'm going to die eventually, should probably go do this cause it's something to do. 
Are you actually?? Would it be okay if I asked for you to elaborate on where you are moving, what your plans are and such, and what truly convinced and pushed you to follow through? This sounds exciting. 
If you don't mind, I'm really curious about what kind of 'escape' you made. What where the costs, the benefits?
Moved from America to Korea to teach English. Gotta fund your initial trip and the first month or so of life, after that you get a pretty decent paycheck and, in most jobs, free lodging. Moved on since then, but that's what got me started. 
Disappearing? Yes. Starting new? No. Where would I go? How would I get there? What the shoot would I do once I got there? Life is enough of a chore already. Having to deal with the challenges of a completely unfamiliar place would be hell. 
I did this. I lived in a different country for four months before giving up and coming back. Everything was different and impossible. Everything. Everything was hard. Talking to people was hard.  Going to the grocery store was hard. Taking a bus was hard. I had absolutely no comfort zone for the four months I lived there, and I wonder if I would have skirted around ever being actually actively suicidal if I never went.    You can't escape yourself. I do not recommend trying. 
Yes and no.  I did a form of escapism and while some things followed me for sure, I can say I'm reminded every so often that I made the right choice getting away from my toxic extended family.  Being far away from the toxicity and the drama is much better than being in the middle of it for sure.  I currently live about 20 hours away from 'home' and it's going on six years.
Hey i am sorry because yes, I did generalize, and there are definitely exceptions. I am glad that your 'escape' was beneficial to you. I bet being in that environment  made it hard to sort out what was actually an internal 'issue' for you versus the external ones. Sometimes it def does help to get away.
I did that... didn't turn out as I hoped
please tell a bit more
[If only I had the money to move to Alaska...](http://media.restraint.org/2012/09/xYukonHo1280x1024.jpg)
Calvin and Hobbes didn't live in Alaska, did they? 
Calvin and Hobbes didn't live in Alaska, did they? 
No but they went Yukon Ho!
i wish i was born in a different family who lives in a rural area. life is much simpler. i dont have to worry about going to college and stuff,
trust me on this, it isn't. It is stifling, and the work is tiring, constant, and unfulfilling.  Then you go home at the end of the day and realize you are going to have to work 15 years to afford a place to live that isn't a van
Depression can be really crippling. Well done! This is a big milestone and a sign of great progress
Thank you so much 
I'm not sure what makes showering so scary for you, but I'm happy for you nontheless! 
I was abused in a previous relationship .. with a man who forced me to Bath in very hot water and scrub my skin cause I wasn't good enough for him. And since I was a child I was scared of water cause it reminded me of rain which I'm terrified of too.
I was abused in a previous relationship .. with a man who forced me to Bath in very hot water and scrub my skin cause I wasn't good enough for him. And since I was a child I was scared of water cause it reminded me of rain which I'm terrified of too.
Im sorry you had to go through that :/ I hope you'll get even better at this soon ^^^
I lived with my abusive husband in a trashed fema trailer. The shower was broken and sometimes it would be a week or two before I got to take one somewhere else. Now part of my depression is taking five or six a day. 
So sorry you been through that keep your head up you're strong 
Man that's shooted up im so sorry, hope you're doing better. ❤️ 
Thank you ❤️ I am I'm not with him anymore :)
From the bottom of my heart,  a.) You're an amazing person. b.) Dang that guy.
Thank you ❤️
This hurts me deeply thinking about it. I hope the bastard is rotting in a prison cell. No one should have to endure abuse like that. 
Thank you, I don't hate him, he put me through so much but taught me a lot. By the way nice drawing  I saw your artwork :) I wish you the best 
He was the one not good enough for you. From where we are standing you are a warrior princess facing down your dragons. I really hope everything gets easier with time for you. ❤
Thank you ❤️
Hey, that's awesome. Did it feel good defeating your fear?
Sort of. I was shaking and crying . But I did feel powerful for a minute . But showering alone for me mostly just feels nerve wrecking 
Sort of. I was shaking and crying . But I did feel powerful for a minute . But showering alone for me mostly just feels nerve wrecking 
So impressed by your bravery to face the shower. If you get a chance, try listening to a podcast or audiobook while you are in the shower (waterproof Bluetooth speaker helps!). It's a pleasant distraction! 
Congrats!  I too sometimes go through bouts of depression where showering is like....what’s the actual point?  I am concerned that you may also have PTSD, though.  Do you see a therapist?    Sending you healing love.
Yup I use to see one I do have ptsd... it's definitely a struggle   Thank you I wish you the best too 
Yup I use to see one I do have ptsd... it's definitely a struggle   Thank you I wish you the best too 
I’m glad to hear.  Thank you!
That’s was probably a really difficult thing for you to do but I’m happy you conquered that fear. Many people don’t understand what kinds of things PTSD from abuse does to people.  
It's really tough I don't let many people know. And thank you.
Hey congrats. I have huge trouble with it too, for different reasons. That's a *huge* accomplishment, great work ❤ 
Thank you I hope yours gets better ❤️
This post and its replies make me so so so happy well done dude <3
Thank you I'm glad your happy 
One of my favorite things is showering. I find it so peaceful
I never want to take a shower until I'm actually in there. Then I start to wonder why I put off the feeling. (Part of it is washing my hair, it's a hassle.)
Not trying to be mean, in case it comes across as such, but if you're that afraid of such a basic task in today's society, it might be best for you to seek some serious inpatient treatment. 
I don't feel like it's necessary, I'm not the only one who is afraid of hygiene. I've been to therapy and doctors I just deal with it slowly and this was a huge step of showing I can do it 
I don't feel like it's necessary, I'm not the only one who is afraid of hygiene. I've been to therapy and doctors I just deal with it slowly and this was a huge step of showing I can do it 
I know you didn't mean it hurtful, i understand where your coming from it's just not very beneficial for me sometimes I think therapy does more harm 
A little inspiring quote by Hemingway:  We're all broken; that's how the light gets in.
Dude. That's beautiful. 
Dude. That's beautiful. 
I don't buy into that. Not everyone is depressed.
I don't buy into that. Not everyone is depressed.
Even if someone's not depressed; everyone has problems and things we tuck away into little dark corners. 
Holy shit. This. Right. Here. This is what is happening to me right now. I am single-handedly destroying and watching my life slowly shamble. Why is my mind doifng this to me?? No actually, why am I doing this to myself?? 
And also trying to hold it together and pretend life isn't a mess. 
And also trying to hold it together and pretend life isn't a mess. 
There is only so much of that charade one can keep up
One of my favourite lyrical passages from my favourite band, The Dear Hunter:  'We all have hearts, we all have homes, but when we die, we die alone.'
Brand New: 'Everyone who lives will someday die and die alone.'  This made me feel so alone after I lost my first love.   Ugh, but that first heartbreak is nothing compared to the current one. 
Dang. I almost started crying reading this. Too relatable
Glad I'm not the only one.
Not a fan of quotes being posted anywhere in any context, but this one kind of hits home for me. I know that I'm shooted school wise and I know I'm shooted in other ways I just don't realize yet, and yet I can't get myself to do anything but watch it just crumble away.  It's like this ultimate failure where you don't even have the power to pick up the pieces falling at your feet.
Hang in there, dude. You don't have to do anything else. You can work on picking up the pieces later, just don't get buried under them now.
Why did great gastby make you angry? I couldn't get past the first chapter to be honest
Yeah the first chapter was kind of meh, but it gets more interesting. All the characters except for the narrator made me angry. They were just a terrible bunch.      I accidentally didn't reply to this and made a new comment ._.
Yeah the first chapter was kind of meh, but it gets more interesting. All the characters except for the narrator made me angry. They were just a terrible bunch.      I accidentally didn't reply to this and made a new comment ._.
The narrator himself literally starts with 'I am a patient man, but shoot New York and shoot every single person I mention, Gatsby is genuinely the only person I like' The characters are god awful.
What doesn't kill you makes you wish you were dead  Lost gf of a year, love of my life, following week lost my job. I want to shooting end everything. So Danging badly. 
I do I can relate.  2013 I lost my gf love of my life, broke my computer, was living at home, had no car, lost my one job got fired, all my friends were at college...I actually attempted suicide thank god I lived and life has been amazing, fall of 2013 will hopefully forever be my lowest point.  I just went up from there.  
I do I can relate.  2013 I lost my gf love of my life, broke my computer, was living at home, had no car, lost my one job got fired, all my friends were at college...I actually attempted suicide thank god I lived and life has been amazing, fall of 2013 will hopefully forever be my lowest point.  I just went up from there.  
glad things are good for you
> What doesn't kill you makes you wish you were dead > Lost gf of a year, love of my life, following week lost my job. I want to shooting end everything. So Danging badly.  It could be worse. What if you never had a girlfriend, and you were a kissless virgin?
i've thought about that a lot actually  at least in that case i wouldnt want to die lol
Heard a quote today from an old movie that has not left my head all night. 'To live is to sleep, to die is to live' ~La Bamba Movie  Does anyone have a perspective on what this could mean? My interpretation is pretty scary yet soothing.
If you take care of yourself, and are careful, you live a long life,  but it's like you're sleeping, and doing nothing. On the other hand, if you have an exciting life, which means danger, you will die early.    
This quote is how I feel watching the political climate in the US right now. 
Oh my God. Tell me about it. I was just talking to my professor today about how toxic the political climate is right now.
I hate that. 'You look tired' is slightly better but it's always like, how do you respond? 'Yeah, I'm exhausted by the futility of life, I sleep terribly, and so I'm sure I look like shit, thanks for pointing it out.'
\* *internal screaming* *   'Yeah, i just need more sleep.' 
\* *internal screaming* *   'Yeah, i just need more sleep.' 
Haha I legitimately laughed at this. Thanks. If only it wasn't so relatable
Haha I legitimately laughed at this. Thanks. If only it wasn't so relatable
Sleep is hell, but i wish i could do it all day
I mean I ask that question to people I know because sometimes they genuinely look tired and I want to know if its because of stress in their life or if they had a crazy night.
I mean if it's a genuine question from a friend it's different. 'Hey what's going on with you, you look tired' from a friend is different than a random 'hey you look tired' from an acquaintance. Even so there's a nicer way to approach it than commenting on someone's appearance. 
'It's OK, I'm just tired'
My go-to phrase
Even though I slept for 10 hours and still had to drag myself out of bed.
The more hours I sleep the worse and more tired I feel. Is rest suppose to work like that?
I know how you feel :( I'm an extrovert so I tend to have to put up a mask 24/7. It gets really hard when I'm alone, to the point where I hate being physically alone but at the same time when I'm out with friends I feel mentally alone because my real thoughts are all so isolated
Wow that's a pretty great way to describe it. It's like the longer I'm alone the harder it is to enjoy going out with friends
If I had a dollar for every time I've forced myself to say 'I'm fine' when someone's asked if I'm okay, I'd probably be a millionaire. 
Wow, a lot of people are concerned about you.
Wow, a lot of people are concerned about you.
It's usually the same people, who say it out of obligation.
'Is everything OK?' '*reading newspaper* yeah' 'Are ya sure?' '-yes-'. 
That second 'yes' is always the hardest 
That second 'yes' is always the hardest 
Tipically me getting irated cos they pushing something i dont want to go thro, but also desperatly wish i did
I hate this. My dad, who is a psychologist himself, will sometimes casually say to me 'you seem depressed' or 'you look depressed.' I just want to scream at him that that's because I probably am depressed, but he won't take me to anyone to get help/diagnosed. Oh well. 
If he admits you're depressed and he clearly understands the importance of getting help, why won't he take you?
If he admits you're depressed and he clearly understands the importance of getting help, why won't he take you?
I don't know. It's caused even more tension in our relationship. He's an acclaimed psychologist. I mean, he *must* know. I don't understand how he couldn't know. 
I don't know. It's caused even more tension in our relationship. He's an acclaimed psychologist. I mean, he *must* know. I don't understand how he couldn't know. 
Are you saying you haven't talked to him about it?
'What's wrong?' 'There can't just be nothing wrong.' 'Well come talk about it'  NOTHING IS WRONG, STOP ASKING, NO YOU CANT HELP. 
Or 'What's wrong?' 'Well, my mom is abusive, and my parents are going through a divorce' 'Oh okay. Tough luck. Hope it gets better ¯\\\_(ツ)_/¯ ' and/or 'POSITIVITY POSITIVITY POSITIVITY!!! You'll beee okkkk <3 :)'
Yeah even when im having a good day I still get that. 
It really ruins my day
It really ruins my day
It's really annoying because I can still maintain a decent mood but at the same time im scared that everyone will be suspicious of it, I really dont want people to know about my depression.
'I thought you got over it because you stopped talking about it'  yea totally
'got over it' as if it was some kind of minor, unimportant and easily forgettable matter. I wish
Yeah... people keep saying I look sad all the time. That's not even true though! I have moments of not sadness. Like super hyper moments.
b i p o l a r
b i p o l a r
Hmm perhaps. I thought I was just really out of touch with my emotions.
I tried joining a group today, but I backed out and got into my car and drove back home.
Hey it sounds like you got pretty close. That's progress, no? :) 
'cheer up!' ugh.
'oh wow you're right thanks im all better now'
'oh wow you're right thanks im all better now'
'Days stuck in bed having no energy to carry on with life... and yet the solution was right there! If only I would have cheered up earlier. I owe you a big ice cream cone!'
I've gradually stopped being able to say 'good' when people ask 'how are you?'. Before I would say 'great', then 'good'. Now I usually say 'alright'.
I've gone a little cynical and respond with 'I'm here'. Just passively implying I haven't killed myself yet
I've gone a little cynical and respond with 'I'm here'. Just passively implying I haven't killed myself yet
Same for me. My version is: 'I'm still alive... that's good enough for now'
Two therapeutic podcasts I recently listened to & recommend:  - The Hilarious World of Depression  - Terrible, thanks for asking  In the case of misery loves company, these have made me feel a little more 'normal' and sane.
Thanks
If I admit to feeling down, my sister inevitably asks, 'Well, did you take your meds'? It's infuriating as it feels like I'm not entitled to any feelings. For good or bad, I was diagnosed with an underactive thyroid and that's helped me understand another level of lethargy I've been feeling. 
Being asked if you took your meds hurts Luke shoot. And it also reminds me that just taking meds alone isn't going to magically fix shit, so I don't know why other people expect it to...
Must be my darkened humor, but I actually laughed at this.
Same! I read it as a reply to a compliment, but given in a dry tone. :D Honestly it sounds like something I'd say.
You have to laugh at things, what's the point of living if you can't have a good joke every now and then.
> what's the point of living  I don't think you have the right sub for that answer. Hehe :D  existing != living
Whenever someone laughs in a group or something and I can't laugh because I'm literally about to blow my head off at times, I get the, 'Were you home schooled or something?' because I didn't laugh at the joke that I got... but when you're chronically depressed... nothing impresses you because everything is too easy to understand.
I always go for the Meatwad response from ATHF. I get it. It ain't making me laugh, but i get it. :D
I like your explanation  Home is where the heart is.  Easy to feel homesick when you don't know where your heart went or if it's coming back. 
You nailed it with this
Like your always being judged even though your home watching TV.
Like your always about to get in trouble for forgetting to do something..
Like your always about to get in trouble for forgetting to do something..
Whenever the phone rings, I get so anxious when picking up because I feel it's someone finally calling to tell me what a worthless dumbass I am
Whenever the phone rings, I get so anxious when picking up because I feel it's someone finally calling to tell me what a worthless dumbass I am
I always feel like I did something wrong  even though I probably didn't  I wish I could feel like I did something nice for myself once in a while... 
I say that, I want to go home, often. It's true. I think home is a place that doesn't exist for me. I try to accept it. I try to be happy where I am. It doesn't work.
Holy shit, I do this too. Even when I'm 'home'.
Holy shit, I do this too. Even when I'm 'home'.
god, me too. I've been doing it for years, and I've never quite put two and two together.  I still just want to go home.
Sorry to reply a month later but this is exactly how I feel. I say it to myself and sometimes to other people quite regularly and frankly I'm a bit shocked that people do it too. I myself don't really know what I mean by 'I want to go home', especially when I am, but the feeling is definitely there.
Home is not a place. I've lived in a lot of different places in my small time on this earth. Home is where you are comfortable, and the only way to truly feel comfortable anywhere is to be comfortable with yourself. 
Depression feels like...  ...You're functioning on 2 hours sleep when the reality is 12 hours.  ...Perpetual guilt.  ...Every whispered voice is a discussion about what a useless, annoying, waste of space drama queen you are.  ...You're lost, despite never having left.
I am so depressed and have been for a while.  Its comforting to know that I am not alone. 
I am so depressed and have been for a while.  Its comforting to know that I am not alone. 
I wish I had depressed friends to connect with. Everyone around me is a shootin giant smiley face.
Yeah, and home is where/what your life used to be like before depression :(
I recently told a friend about how I often say 'I want to go home,' and he pegged that this is what I meant. Childhood, life before my illness... I think I must have known, but it hadn't been quite so clear to me until he pointed it out.
I am not religious in the common sense but i do believe in a god. Whenever i am struck with a heavy depressive episode i always give a quick prayer and i always plee 'i want to find my way home again. im lost in the dark and i want to come home.'
This is beautiful. 
Its like having a dead goldfish and everyone tells you oh did you try changing its water? Did you try feeding it? Maybe it needs some sun... no one understands the fish is dead.
'No, see, that solution is for a different problem than the one I have.'
I agree. I always equated it to being at the beach. sometimes you're too far out fighting the current and barely breathing; others you're on shore and moving--albeit hindered and slowed by the sand.
Holy shit! This. This right here is what I wish I could scream to the world to describe my life. Now, if I could find a way to get to the beach....permanently...
I like it.
oo, also, perpetual stage fright, except you're home in your pajamas.
oo, also, perpetual stage fright, except you're home in your pajamas.
I definitely get this.  Feeling like you're constantly being negatively judged can be really shooting horrible.
My response whenever somebody says that to me: By that logic you could say I don’t have the right to be happy because there are people way better off than me.   
I will use this, thanks
And here I was thinking I came up with this, was ready to post this and spread my wisdom... nope 
technically you came up with it in your own mind, the same way that this person did :)
technically you came up with it in your own mind, the same way that this person did :)
Yeah but they made it up better so they have no right to have made it up. 
“Saying one can’t be sad because others have it worse is like saying one can’t be happy because others have it better.”   I don’t remember who originally said it, but I’ve used it for years now and it shuts people right up. It’s a great response. 
I love that
Exactly. I hate this. They ask 'What's wrong with you' and you finally tell them only for them to invalidate everything you feel.
JUST DONT BE SAD, BE HAPPY XD  Cheers mate I have not even thought about that.
JUST DONT BE SAD, BE HAPPY XD  Cheers mate I have not even thought about that.
/r/wowthanksimcured
It’s annoying how they seem to try to convince you to be happy.
They do it because deep inside they do not care about you thus they don't have anything worthwhile or meaningful to say to you while at the same time they think it's still rude for them to entirely ignore what you have say so this 'just be happy xD' response is considered by them to be 'good enough' and allowes them not to feel bad about themselves as well as not to spend any excessive energy on empathizing with you.
People have told me that before too. Since my life is good and I eat every night and have a place to live. They think I have no right to be depressed. But it’s not fair. Everyone has a right to feel sad. Even if we don’t want to. 
Kind of same situation
*Jesus Christ* sounds exactly like my parents
Same here. Both my parents are the exact type of person to say this.
Same here. Both my parents are the exact type of person to say this.
Yee, literally tried to kill myself in 2011 due to my parents, still live with them.
They say: - 'You don't talk to us. Please talk to us.'   You say: - 'I don't trust you enough to talk to you.'   They say: - 'Trust us.'   You open up your vulnerable heart.   They stab it.   You're scared of them.   They blame you.
Then you build even stronger walls and crawl deeper and deeper into your shell. 
Then you build even stronger walls and crawl deeper and deeper into your shell. 
The difficulty is trying to build a wall during a flood :( And isolation makes matters worse.
Tell your parents, that by their logic, Robin Williams should still be alive today. By their logic, he never should have committed suicide. That ought to shut them up. Robin Williams had all the money he ever needed and stardom, yet this doesn't cure depression either.
Robin Williams had been recently diagnosed with a form of Parkinson's disease which would've ruined him in his later years. It's thought that that contributed to his decision to kill himself. Sure, depression was a part of it, but it wasn't the whole story
Robin Williams had been recently diagnosed with a form of Parkinson's disease which would've ruined him in his later years. It's thought that that contributed to his decision to kill himself. Sure, depression was a part of it, but it wasn't the whole story
Okay then what about Chester Bennington? 
When I told my parents I was diagnosed with depression they kicked me out at 7am the following day lol. People just don't get it till they've been there mate. Just because other people have it worse means nothing, I'm always here if you need a chat 
You what!?  You were medically diagnosed with a condition, and their first thought is to get you out the house like you were contagious? 
You what!?  You were medically diagnosed with a condition, and their first thought is to get you out the house like you were contagious? 
Heh, tell me about it. Probably the best thing that happened though. Forced me to deal with my shit instead of sitting in bed all day though. Although I wouldn't recommend it as a fix lol
Heh, tell me about it. Probably the best thing that happened though. Forced me to deal with my shit instead of sitting in bed all day though. Although I wouldn't recommend it as a fix lol
Glad it worked it out for, but they could have helped you through it without going so drastic lol
Most people can't understand depression, just a handful and that's either because they had it or because they have a particular sensitivity.
Tbf mate, I personally have depression, finally had the nerves to get it officially diagnosed back in September, after 6-ish years of thinking I might have it, and others saying I showed the signs  I still don't understand it.  So I don't hold out much hope for people who have never had training/hands on experience of it to understand either
Tbf mate, I personally have depression, finally had the nerves to get it officially diagnosed back in September, after 6-ish years of thinking I might have it, and others saying I showed the signs  I still don't understand it.  So I don't hold out much hope for people who have never had training/hands on experience of it to understand either
Glad you got it diagnosed, it takes some some to do it as we often fear not being understood or that we might not be actually sick for some reason.  Yeah it's kinda weird, I mean having your brain fighting against you and not wanting to cooperate is definitely hard to understand (even scientists aren't sure about the causes yet after years of research).
> well it's a recession now and i got more expensive with words'  lol
Yeah, forgot to mention, feel free to use this line if you need to, maybe get creative with it like 'i still got payments on my words, so i can't be reckless' 
Just because you talk doesn’t mean you communicate effectively. Just because they listen, doesn’t mean they understand. The more you hold out, the worse it will become. You have to work harder at communicating better. You only have control of yourself. Not anyone else.
I my opinion choose your battles. My father don’t understand mental health/ depression issues and medication, so I avoid talking about it. My mother is angry cause didn’t come home for Xmas and doesn’t talk to me since Xmas. Costs more energy to deal with the hurt feeling than to talk to my friends so I talk to my friends instead to my parents.
I my opinion choose your battles. My father don’t understand mental health/ depression issues and medication, so I avoid talking about it. My mother is angry cause didn’t come home for Xmas and doesn’t talk to me since Xmas. Costs more energy to deal with the hurt feeling than to talk to my friends so I talk to my friends instead to my parents.
I've found that sometimes you have to plan ahead for the battle because there is no escaping it.
I thought about it and I'll be honest: I constantly wish I never *existed*, but regardless of how I die, my parents will be grief-stricken and will probably cease to function.  I've just resigned myself to being stuck in this shitty life for a few more decades, and it's soul-crushing.
I'm 23 and have severe depression and blah blah you know it all...  Have you searched for a positive professional service that might make things a little easier or even much better? I'm so tired of being depressed and not achieving anything and I'm finally taking positive steps like getting a life coach and a medical card to make things better while I'm here. 
I'm 23 and have severe depression and blah blah you know it all...  Have you searched for a positive professional service that might make things a little easier or even much better? I'm so tired of being depressed and not achieving anything and I'm finally taking positive steps like getting a life coach and a medical card to make things better while I'm here. 
Good for you! It's always great to take steps in a positive direction, no matter how small they might seem.  I go to therapy literally 4 times a week (and it *does* help; I'd be so much worse off without it), so that's the extent of the professional help I can afford with the help of my parents. I could always try your method if things stop improving.
Wow, this hit home.
Yeah, it really sucks realising i have to deal with this for the rest of my life.
Same reason u shouldn't jump infront of a train. It traumatizes people
I am hating and loving this thread right now. I was so ready to end it this weekend. Probably by high speed vehicle. Now y'all guilting me and i have to reconsider 😂😣
Same. I think that's why I guess I just like more passive thoughts on death, like 'what if I just keep driving, off the road and into that tree?' no one else (i.e. driver) would have to live with the guilt of thinking they ran someone down who didn't want to be hit.  
I relate to this a lot. I constantly have this feeling when I drive that I should just close my eyes on an empty road and let whatever happens happen. I highly doubt I’ll ever do that, but it’s a terrifying thought.
I felt like that for a while. I realized I didn’t want to die because I would miss the small pleasures in life. I would never pet another dog, or feel the wind on my face, or eat cereal... there are a lot of things that are still enjoyable in your worst moments. Try to hold on to whatever good things are left in your life.
You ever held a puppy while trying to eat cereal with the other hand? That sounds like it might be nice
You ever held a puppy while trying to eat cereal with the other hand? That sounds like it might be nice
I only do that when the wind is blowing
That's really good to hear that there are people in this world who know how to talk about it without freaking the eff out or invalidating people. Glad you have those people in your life.
 people like this restore my faith in humanity 
Yeah.. most I get is 'Depression doesn't exist' and 'just be happy'
Same here.  Most people are dismissive or condescending which is why I don't ever talk about it in real life anymore. I have met nicer people online, though.
That takes a lot to actually put yourself out there and share a potentially stigmatising part of yourself with others. Especially when you don't know how they'll react
Agreed. Great job in having the strength to talk about this with the right people. Keep doing this. And know that the first prof 'blew up' out of concern and love. Don't let it dissuade you from talking about these things in the future.
In my University, the profs are required to report you and you will be heavily encouraged to leave the university. This is also true for the phycological services people.
What country are you in, if you don't mind me asking? That's an awful way to treat someone. 'Oh you're suicidal? Go away, get out of here.' 
What country are you in, if you don't mind me asking? That's an awful way to treat someone. 'Oh you're suicidal? Go away, get out of here.' 
I'm like 90% sure it's he US
I'm like 90% sure it's he US
Probably true. Mental health issues are still so taboo in the US it's pathetic. I understand professors having to be mandated reporters if a student says they're suicidal, but encouraging them to leave school seems harsh. That's just another way of encouraging them to give up on life and depression does that enough on it's own. 
This. I work in student support services, and have seen this happen. They will strongly encourage you to take a 'leave of absence' to take care of your mental health. But if you get it documented with student disability services, it will help make it clear that it is a disability, and the college will then have to be careful about discriminating against you by forcing a leave of absence.   This is in the US.   
Also, adding this: if you do get some help, I strongly encourage finding your own therapists/psychiatrist/etc outside of the university, even if they are available (if you have an University hospital or medical system). Go to a different hospital. This will help protect you. 
Also, adding this: if you do get some help, I strongly encourage finding your own therapists/psychiatrist/etc outside of the university, even if they are available (if you have an University hospital or medical system). Go to a different hospital. This will help protect you. 
I eventually did this, but mostly because universities, especially smaller ones tend to have the fish bowl effect. Everyone knows everyone. I now work with a LCSW counselor and a PA that works with psych meds. I currently feel loads better.
somehow your post made me miss university  there's no room for curiosity in my life anymore
I would do anything to go back. I feel you.
Yes. Be careful. At the school I attended, if the administration finds out you're suicidal, you can be kicked out of university housing and/or forced into a 72 hour psych hold. Be very, very careful about this.
WTF?? I would hate that. HATE it
WTF?? I would hate that. HATE it
Probably make you more suicidal too.   Then you get into the 'why didn't he ask for help' thing with people
This is actually the happiest thing I've heard today. For you to step out of your comfort zone, so to speak, and discuss this with another person is very admirable and inspiring. Keep going, you're awesome!
AHH My heart!!! You're awesome too friend :DDDDD
People care man. And you would be surprised how many of us survivors want to help you learn from our mistakes. Pm if you need to.
Thank you friend :) I appreciate the care and support from everyone on this subreddit. 
I don't know mine well enough to bring that up. How do you even start with that? I'm going to try the counselors but they're booked for a whole month. 
Well honestly I literally threw it up as like the response to them saying, 'Oh? And what's been troubling with you recently?' And I just shooting said it, I couldn't control my words. But yeah they understood thank goodness. 
Well honestly I literally threw it up as like the response to them saying, 'Oh? And what's been troubling with you recently?' And I just shooting said it, I couldn't control my words. But yeah they understood thank goodness. 
Well I hope that situation comes up with me somehow. Thanks and good luck to you. 
Well I hope that situation comes up with me somehow. Thanks and good luck to you. 
And good to luck to you as well :) <3
How did you breach the topic? Must have took some balls to just go up to your professor and drop something like that, but I'd like to try as well. 
Yeah so the 1st prof just simply asked how school has been going for me and I said pretty not well, and he said 'Why?' and I literally just said it, it was almost like an instinct. It was pretty scary but once I said it they were super understanding which was a huge lifesaver.
And I'm so proud of you for taking care of yourself and getting help and if anyone judges you for that, then that's their loss. You are awesome! 
Thank you very much friend! I'm very lucky and humbled to have the support of those who care :)
I don't think I've ever been so relieved as seeing the time stamp on this post being 4 minutes ago. Please continue to keep us posted. 
I second that! 🙌
I second that! 🙌
Is he still alive?
'Go eat that elephant' is my new motto, thank you. 
:D
Does anyone in this damn sub read the sidebar? Don't guilt-trip the man. This is about HIS pain right now, don't make it about others.
Sorry, my bad. I wasn't payments nag attention to which sub I was in. Thank you for pointing this out to me.
Me too, I hate how people say happiness is a choice. You can't choose to be happy, you can't choose your emotion. I'm not going to pretend. 
Happiness is more a skill than a choice... But in the dark hole of depression it doesn't make sense. Nothing does. Yeah, when they say happiness is a choice to cheer you up, it really sucks.
Hey be easy on yourself. I give myself a bye on almost everything. Exercise, eating right, socializing....etc. I have just enough in me to make it to work and make it back. Hopefully at some point I can start adding more but if I don't it's an accomplishment just rolling out of bed and not taking PTO, ringing the bell and cashing a check. 
Thank you for this response. 
this, exactly. i feel like i've made so much progress over the years, and then someone comes along that questions my recovery and it makes me feel like everything i've done to get better is shooting meaningless. 
I know the feeling! Keep going strong!
I had a friend tell me she couldn't talk to me anymore because it's too depressing. She justified by saying since she got over her divorce quickly, I must not be trying hard enough or at all to make myself better.
Yeah because a divorce and depression are the same thing. I mean they both start with 'd' right?
And yet I feel like I should be able to do more. I just don't know what to do or how to do it. 
So much, feel lke shit cos i cant do what they expect and ask for
same  'but [myname] you're not doing ANYTHING so you aren't trying are you!!!'  ya i am youre just a shooting idiot who wont accept that mental illness keeps you from doing things!!
Also the shootin' change is more inside your own head than outward so even when you are making progress people can't tell
No one's truly afraid of heights, just afraid of the fall. Much the same way that some of us with depression are to the point where we fear being happy because the fall to our own sorrow feels that much worse. 
Personally, I'm not afraid to be happy.  In fact it's quite the opposite. I would give almost anything to show a smile that wasn't forced; to not shroud myself in phony displays of emotion.  It's been so long since I felt happy, or anything for that matter,  that I can't even remember what 'happy' feels like.
This. Also, when I'm drunk and I tell someone about it I immediately regret it the next day. 
me to a T - makes going out with coworkers a dangerous situation
Oh, you have depressive episodes? I'm as already on episode 2, season 5!
> 5!  5! = 120  /r/unexpectedfactorial
> 5!  5! = 120  /r/unexpectedfactorial
When a bot is too real. 
This is literally me! 'I'm making this all up, I'm not depressed- I was barely even crying earlier.' 2 hours later 'Cannot cope, why is this my life? I really need help.'
I'm really glad that I'm not alone in this. I have doubted so many times that I actually needed help because I could go X amount of time without feeling like death.
I'm really glad that I'm not alone in this. I have doubted so many times that I actually needed help because I could go X amount of time without feeling like death.
Yeah I get that. If I laugh or having a good time with my boyfriend or have an evening where everything goes away for a few hours I'm like 'See! It's not real.'  But we're allowed to be okay sometimes and still need help. How are you doing today?
Yeah I get that. If I laugh or having a good time with my boyfriend or have an evening where everything goes away for a few hours I'm like 'See! It's not real.'  But we're allowed to be okay sometimes and still need help. How are you doing today?
Just woke up and my main problem is I'm grumpy. Good start so far. Now I just have to wait and see if the chest or vascular pains will show up today. How about yourself? Hopefully you're doing alright?
Also me: 'Life is a joke, you're a piece of sh*t, I need help'. *On the bus to work* 'No you're just a lazy piece of sh*t.'   I've noticed more lately that I don't talk about myself very well.
I just wanted to say I like your username, sounds like a cute and fun time :3
I just wanted to say I like your username, sounds like a cute and fun time :3
Thanks :) I just want to build stuff (I'm an architect) and work with kids. Yours is great - makes me think of Futurama.
Lately my life has been like I'm nearing the end of the movie where the guy is obviously gonna kill himself. My highs aren't as high anymore and the lows are deeper and last longer. Crying seems to acknowledge all of those truths at once and it would actually be a great relief tbh. I just don't have time or space alone to really have a moment like that.
And there you've described how I feel too. 
Funny how we all think we are so alone in this and others keep showing you that you are not alone. For the longest time I didn't think that I deserved help but I still wanted to ask for it more than anything. Now that I'm in the process of getting help I'm constantly wondering if I really need it until I weep in the shower for no other reason than I can. 
Same here. Every time I have an appointment at my psychologist, in my mind I'm like 'why am I here?'
I do this as I'm in bed falling asleep. Almost crying, but I never get there. Then in the morning it all feels distant again.
I cry myself to sleep. :(
Get out of my head. Please
Seriously. Like straight from my thoughts all the damn time.
That is definitely me... and I hate it when i get very down and then in a few hours in am up and happy (rapid cycling) it is pretty exhausting and a little bit scary to others around you.
I've told my boyfriend just yesterday that I exhaust myself because of this. I feel extremely down, cry, go to sleep, wake up feeling okish, put all my energy into being happy and outgoing, which drains me again so the circle can continue. 
I've told my boyfriend just yesterday that I exhaust myself because of this. I feel extremely down, cry, go to sleep, wake up feeling okish, put all my energy into being happy and outgoing, which drains me again so the circle can continue. 
I relate so hard. Had a nice time with some friends earlier today but now I'm completely drained and back to feeling bad.
I get pissed off *that* I'm pissed off, then I get panicky at the thought of how much of my time I'm wasting on depression and misery. And that panic makes me feel worse and itself brings up loads of anxiety.  This is every day. 
Right? What's with that? What IS that?
Right? What's with that? What IS that?
It is the shooting bullshit depressing-ass human mind 
I have the same thing. I've tracked it down to a food allergy/intolerance affecting my gut. I believe it's an issue with dairy or caffeine.
Lol wut
I wish I could still cry :/
I do too. I feel like it's coming sometimes but then it never does. 
Is that depression or bipolar? 
Depression, bipolar is lot different having manic phase (euphoria, hyperactivity inclusive being delusional)
Depression, bipolar is lot different having manic phase (euphoria, hyperactivity inclusive being delusional)
I don't understand what you're trying to say.
I don't understand what you're trying to say.
The answer to your question is depression. Bipolars have two phases, one is depression  the other one is the mania phase. In the mania phase it is when you are hyperactive, elevated mood, having delusions, having a feeling of more energy etc. 
I already checked local businesses for cameras, witnesses and posted ads to find witnesses. :( no bingo.   Thats what I just planned for. In my demand letter I just want him to admit fault to the insurance.  I won’t sue him extra for giving me ptsd and rendering my driving ability.  If he admits fault.  I don’t think he understands how much driving meant to me or my background. He probably lied just to get away with insurance rates. 
If you can sue him for ptsd and affecting your driving....why not? Just asking out of curiosity. It is frustrating to read this from my perspective. People like that are selfish and deserve the worst in my opinion. If he was honest to begin with...that would be different. But he is basically screwing you over to benefit himself. I hate selfish and/or people who think they are entitled.  I respect your choice though. As I said....I was just curious.
That feeling when someone messes up the one, normally insignificant thing, you can actually enjoy. Beyond everything else, that's what hurts the most.
Its worst when they don’t even know how much pain they caused. When they lie about their mistake. “Its just another accident, oh well”. Sleeping soundly at night.  While you slowly suffer. 
Its worst when they don’t even know how much pain they caused. When they lie about their mistake. “Its just another accident, oh well”. Sleeping soundly at night.  While you slowly suffer. 
Yeah, being told what you value so much isn't supposed to be valued also adds to this. Becouse to you, it's not 'Just an accident', it's '*The* accident' and they don't have a clue. They can just move on. But you can't. You're being nailed to the bottom of the well.
'insurance tells me to go to court to prove he’s lying'  Surely he is the one who has to go to court to prove you are at fault, no? I mean it's innocent until proven guilty, right? He's the one who has to prove you did something wrong?
Its a special situation where its a left turn. Left turn is always at fault unless the other person ran the red. Which he did and lied about it (he said it was green). Putting the fault on me.    So I have to prove that he lied about running the red light by cross examining his story to the judge. 
Its a special situation where its a left turn. Left turn is always at fault unless the other person ran the red. Which he did and lied about it (he said it was green). Putting the fault on me.    So I have to prove that he lied about running the red light by cross examining his story to the judge. 
Ah, that sucks... But it still seems that if it's his word against yours, he should have to prove what he's saying?
Ah, that sucks... But it still seems that if it's his word against yours, he should have to prove what he's saying?
No sadly, in my province/state its auto fault on left turns. :( 
Is this 4chan? No but seriously, I hope you win the case.
I wrote it like that because i know /r/depressed redditors are too depressed to read paragraphs. Got to keep it simple! And thank-you!
I wrote it like that because i know /r/depressed redditors are too depressed to read paragraphs. Got to keep it simple! And thank-you!
You're a good person OP
The world is unfair. Guy breaks the law and harms other people. Victim gets put at fault. Okay.
Yeah, my case was also adjourned in court, something along the line of not being tried in a timely manner (14 months), the police officer and witness were there too.
Time to invest in a dashcam. Live and learn.
I have a dashcam in my car, the other car that crashed was my brother’s/dad’s. My car was in winter storage. Dad loaned me the car to go to a job interview. 
T bone
If he t-boned you then his insurance company is an idiot, because that’s an automatic “he is at fault”. Cars do not move sideways. Fight this, have your insurance company go after his for the money (this is called subrogation). Unless everyone involved is an idiot, you will win.   If you need to chat, I’m here. I have a background as an insurance professional so I’m not just whistling Dixie here.   Also yes submit the police report.
Have you tried exercise? That's a way to cope with depression. Good luck.
Yes, I’m dieting, exercising and on anti-depressants.  Sometimes its just not enough. I rely heavily on my s/o + driving/cruising. It makes me feel normal.
This is mostly true, up to a certain point were depression stops you from being nice. 
>up to a certain point were depression stops you from being nice.   Agreed... in which case, you would either get angry at other people or you don't care, indifference.
>up to a certain point were depression stops you from being nice.   Agreed... in which case, you would either get angry at other people or you don't care, indifference.
Anything that stands in the way of me being alone, with background tv shows and reading the internet is often met with irritability or silent loathing.   Edit: yet I love helping random internet people, odd
Anything that stands in the way of me being alone, with background tv shows and reading the internet is often met with irritability or silent loathing.   Edit: yet I love helping random internet people, odd
I find people tend to be more tolerable from a safe distance.
Why dont you look into making new friends, im going through the exact same thing and im jut tired of always having to listen to people going on and on about their lives. Im not psychiatrist. I have problems and feelings that would like to express too why is it so hard for you to listen, why must it be always about you 24/7.You seem like a wonderful person, i hope you can find people in your life that will be there for you.Thanks for sharing
:(((( and aw thanks... honestly I was talking to a few good friends and we discussed how so many people have become so apathetic and selfish. I've been trying for. A year but it's been so difficult making new friends who genuinely care about me. Idk life is weird like that 
At least give credit where it's due. This is a quote from Robin Williams.
Your right but dont we all know that already ?
Your right but dont we all know that already ?
Apparently not everyone here does.
It's true for me at least when I feel relatively okay. But I tend to feel the opposite way when I'm deep in depression mixed with anger. It's always mixed with anger. Then I'd rather other people be miserable too, because why should I be the only one?  Yeah I know it's not a good attitude to have. I can usually suppress the urge to be an idiot these days, but it's a shitty way to feel, too.
Thats how you know when your depression is really bad. I haven't gotten anger from it in a while but now I'm also dissociating more.
I feel you, I started drinking and the other night I drank a little to much and I started telling my friends everything and I wish they didn't hear any of it because now they are really worried about me. 
This is almost exactly what happens to me. As soon as I get just one drink in me (like now) I feel the need to start a conversation with multiple friends, and surround myself by friends. I don’t necessarily even tell them about how I’m feeling but oh how I wish I could. 
This is almost exactly what happens to me. As soon as I get just one drink in me (like now) I feel the need to start a conversation with multiple friends, and surround myself by friends. I don’t necessarily even tell them about how I’m feeling but oh how I wish I could. 
I used to talk to random people on the internet about stuff... Not the best idea but no one i cared about ever found out so i guess it wasnt too bad... Im here if you want to talk
I used to talk to random people on the internet about stuff... Not the best idea but no one i cared about ever found out so i guess it wasnt too bad... Im here if you want to talk
I get most of my social interactions from strangers haha
I mostly just sat there bawling my eyes out calling myself a shoot up and how I ruined everything. It was really depressing.
In my experience, the reason it might be awkward is your friends might feel stuck in-between the contradictory place of wanting to help/be there for you and not knowing what to say/do.  What I'm trying to say is it's probably not as bad as you think. I don't know what I could do to help my friends other than being there for them, but I hope they would still let me know if they were feeling depressed.
Yeah same I feel more comfortable sharing my stuff with strangers on reddit
I had been a lurker on this sub, (and Reddit in general) for a while and 99% of what I type just gets deleted when I give it a second thought. I had a drink tonight and just went for it. 
I had been a lurker on this sub, (and Reddit in general) for a while and 99% of what I type just gets deleted when I give it a second thought. I had a drink tonight and just went for it. 
> and 99% of what I type just gets deleted when I give it a second thought.  Put it out there.  Make an alt account if you're worried about posting something under your main.  You aren't the only one who feels this way.
Just know that if you ever need a friend, I'm here :) 
Thank you
Write it down in letter form? Write to an imaginary person and never send the letters.
I’ve thought about doing that. I’ve thought about using Day One to get out what i want to say but I find there’s a barrier that stops me.
I’ve thought about doing that. I’ve thought about using Day One to get out what i want to say but I find there’s a barrier that stops me.
Same. I have so much to write in my head by when it comes to actually writing it down it just doesn’t come out.
Similar situation. I want to talk to close friends about things and I have had a couple of concerned people ask me how I'm doing and I usually just bullshit and say that I am fine because I just don't want to burden them with my troubles when they have a life of their own - not to mention it'll just make me look like a completely unstable idiot.   I'd rather try and keep my false image up, smile and say everything is fine.
It’s so easy to default to  ‘yeah not bad thanks’ when people ask how I am! I desperately wanna say ‘ugh WELL’ cause I know they’re just being polite.
It’s so easy to default to  ‘yeah not bad thanks’ when people ask how I am! I desperately wanna say ‘ugh WELL’ cause I know they’re just being polite.
Lol, when I ask I would love for someone would tell me how they really felt so I could also...
Feeling like you burden someone with your friendship is what I'm going through right now. I lost my best friend in a freak car accident 6 months ago, and I lost the love of my life to stupid spending habits and me not growing up a month ago. I've been struggling with opening up to anyone ever since then, and it sucks. If you need someone to talk to, no judgement, no un requested advice, feel free, and remember, don't give up, skeleton. 
Wow I can't imagine what you are going through. I'm incredibly sorry for your losses. Stay strong buddy.
I'm here for you. 
Thank you
Good luck brother, I know what its like. Do you ever get a circling feeling like you are trying to resolve your problems and you feel as if you are progressing down the right path but again you find it is an endless maze?
No, not and endless maze.  It's More like good days are a distraction from the depression.  And then at the end of the day, I lie awake realizing that nothing has changed.  If anything... the 'good days' are just little vacations from who I am every other day.
This is beautiful. You can see the light, you know it's there. But you can't find it, can't get to it. You're just trapped in the darkness.. 
But some part of you doesn't want to find the light because you're used to looking for it. You're worried the light won't be as bright as you think it will be. You worry that it will be dimmed out of that warm glow by the darkness you were walking in.
But some part of you doesn't want to find the light because you're used to looking for it. You're worried the light won't be as bright as you think it will be. You worry that it will be dimmed out of that warm glow by the darkness you were walking in.
My thoughts exactly when i read that last panel. It doesn't just hit home, it beats the shit out of it.
are you a professional artist? (like graphic designer or something, I'm not familiar with the terms)
not yet! getting there eventually *crosses fingers*
not yet! getting there eventually *crosses fingers*
How did you develop your art style? It looks awesome. Also kudos to you for improving your life :)
Reminds me of the song 'I'm Open' by pearl jam 
If Pearl Jam can be referenced at any point- I'll upvote the shoot out of it ;).   I also agree with your comment! The comic is reminiscent of 'pendulum' as well IMO.  
I also have trouble doing things that make noise. I don't want other people to hear and I don't want to bother them. I used to lie in bed for hours, even if I had to pee, because I didn't want the floorboards to creak. 
I just did this exact thing recently when my in-laws were staying with us. They had two children and they themselves were somewhat loud, so when I would wake up in the morning I laid in bed for hours afraid to leave the room. I had to pee, shower, and was thirsty. I preferred to suffer rather than face my anxiety. What is worse is that my behavior was interpreted as being anti-social rather than being my inexplicable anxiety. I hate living like this and I hate myself.
Yep. All the time. I usually get out of bed, do my hair and makeup and get dressed in hopes it will motivate me to actually do something, but then I inevitably spend the entire day doing absolutely nothing. I mean... at least I look decent doing it? ;_;
it's something!
My day.  Wake up, Turn PC on, Pour cereal, Watch YouTube while eating breakfast, Keep YouTube playing while wash bowl, (Midday) Find snack while playing 5th 1hr long video on YouTube [TV shows recently like '8 out of 10 Cats does Countdown'] Visit loo throughout the day with the video still playing, Visit Reddit and Facebook for notifications, Continue YouTube after noticing no notification, Repeat last 3 continuously until 9pm, Cook minimal dinner, Play video games till 2/3am, Bed.  Everyday of my last week, no lie.
^
I want to do a ton of stuff, staying up till 8 am drinking isn't one of them.. yet here I am every morning..
I thought you just loved killing
I thought you just loved killing
I did till I died 
My problem is more in the perfectionism area- I'm afraid to do poorly, so I just don't 'do' at all. I need to memorize stuff for my acting class. I could do it half an hour. I've had a month and haven't touched it.
I have a similar problem. When I actually do find motivation to do something, I usually can't do as much as I planned, which is disappointing. I have to actively remind myself that it's an accomplishment to at least try, no matter how good or bad it turns out. 
I'd like to say I have this, but it's not exactly *mild depression* it's more of *i kinda don't want to live right now and everything is going downhill in my life* kinda depresison
Dysthymia doesn't mean 'mild', as far as I'm concerned it is quite serious.  Not knowing what happy is like or what energy is like can be freaking deadly.    I was pretty blown away when my doctor said I could fix it by changing my life, as if the choices I've been making caused this very serious condition.  Unreal, but I'm totally buying it now that I'm on the other side of it.
Dysthymia doesn't mean 'mild', as far as I'm concerned it is quite serious.  Not knowing what happy is like or what energy is like can be freaking deadly.    I was pretty blown away when my doctor said I could fix it by changing my life, as if the choices I've been making caused this very serious condition.  Unreal, but I'm totally buying it now that I'm on the other side of it.
I haven't felt what happiness is truly like since I was 8 years old (and younger) running around a park with no care in the world.
I need to find a job going on two years of unemployment here and i sit down and almost have a panic attack trying to job hunt. 
The struggle is real man. That is brutal. Job hunting is flat-out demoralizing. Soul-crushing doesn't begin to describe it. Truly there are few things worse than living in that state of constant rejection. When I was little, there is no way I could have ever anticipated the fundamental ways that becoming an adult would betray my expectations.
Shit, I thought I was the only one... all the morning coffee, and energy drinks, and beers every once and awhile never seem to help.
Coffee always helps because coffee is delicious.   Unless you meant like, helping my life, which is no. I just like drinking it a little.  Better than a life without coffee anyway.
Try sticking with it for another month and try socialize with the people in your college course.
I am doing, but that's in a way just making it worse. Everyone pretty much has their shit together and are really enthusiastic about what they're studying. They care. It just reminds me of my failings.  And when I'm feeling down or I'm just a little quiet they get suspicious and I feel so shooting useless.  I don't know how much more I can last.
Yep. I lived like that. It is horrible horrible. Honestly there is no point, and your body knows it. Why the shoot would anyone get up to just go turn the crank and produce grey pellets day after day after day with nothing to show for it? I think it is weirder that people have less of a problem than me with shit like that. I don't know why everyone doesn't completely hate their shooting life. Rich people not included of course. They get to live like the pharaohs. 
I feel like you thinking rich people live like pharaohs is a bit silly. Depression and suicide are extremely high in western countries, despite us being far richer, better educated and healthier (in terms of healthcare availability) than many other countries. Rich people can feel like shit too.
I fool my brain into thinking it's being somewhat productive by reading classic literature and writing about it online, as if I'm somehow better than people who watch video games all day or browse stupid forums, even though we're all just sitting on our asses and staring at different screens. 
You're not any better. But at least you sound interesting. And using your brain!
smoke weed.  but seriously, you need to break the cycle somehow. you aren't living the life you deserve to live. depression has its hold on you. please see a doctor!!! there are many different angles from which to attack depression.
we are seeing doctors, what we need is a powerful drug.
50%?  Geeze! I wish I could drink coffee now.  Not that I didn't wish it before, but now I have a legitimate reason other than the taste.  Damn caffeine, why can't I enjoy you??  
IKR? I imagine millions of *currently* not-depressed working folks would suddenly want to kill themselves if coffee just disappeared tomorow.  What about other stimulants though? I used to take Red Bull, it has something called Taurine, there must be something similar that would work for your body chemistry.
Yopeee horay wohooo yaaayy yeeehaaa
I'm a piece of shit feed me to dogs 
I'm a piece of shit feed me to dogs 
I'm a piece of 🐕 feed me to the 💩  Sorry about the emoji I have cancer  I mean I am cancer
I'm a piece of 🐕 feed me to the 💩  Sorry about the emoji I have cancer  I mean I am cancer
Hi cancer I'm a shit
You and me both. I finally showered and changed for the first time in 2 weeks last night. I hate the feeling of water on my skin but kinda feel human now.
At work we have clients who can't shower. We wash then with wetwipes designed for people like them. It is supposed to be just as clean as a shower even though it might 'feel' less clean to who haven't tried it . Maybe this would work for you?
At work we have clients who can't shower. We wash then with wetwipes designed for people like them. It is supposed to be just as clean as a shower even though it might 'feel' less clean to who haven't tried it . Maybe this would work for you?
What kind of wet wipes are they? Just curious...so they don't dry out the skin?
Did you know that the plague causes the bleeding.  It makes the gums soar :) 
I have the plague??? :O :O  And my gums can fly!?!?
happy birthday!, i'm also 26 today, what a coincidence
Happy bday!
Happy birthday! It's my bday too. I'm 28, severely depressed. 'Keep yo head up' and 'treat yo self' have kept me going all day. Cheers! (:
Happy birthday to you as well! Its your day, not your depressions. Not in any position to offer advice, but from my perspective my thought is shoot you depression, this isn’t your day. Good luck have fun. 
I feel that too. It's kind of like a brief glimmer of joy and laughter, only for your brain to remind you that you are worthless. It's like it's telling me that I don't deserve happiness.   You're not alone. 
'Really funny video we're watching, huh?'    'Yeah, brain, I'm glad that we're both enjo-'   'Too bad you're a piece of shit.'
'Really funny video we're watching, huh?'    'Yeah, brain, I'm glad that we're both enjo-'   'Too bad you're a piece of shit.'
There is a way to break that cycle of thinking by training your brain to say something different. Therapy and willpower goes a long way. Best of luck.
There is a way to break that cycle of thinking by training your brain to say something different. Therapy and willpower goes a long way. Best of luck.
What if you can't afford the therapy? Willpower is great but if you can't muster it up you're back where you started :(
Every time I get the smallest glimpse of anything resembling normal human life and contact, whether that be talking to the cashier at the grocery store or on the phone with a friend, I can be enjoying it at the moment but afterwards it's right back to the fortress of solitude I go.  The depression is always there, waiting to take the reins back at the earliest opportunity and say 'Alright, you've had your fun. Now back to your tomb.'
For me I feel even worse after having a good time or feeling normal.
That's your cue that you should be talking more to cashiers or friends, or doing other things you usually don't do. The depression is where you habitually reside - get the shoot outta there and find a new home, metaphorically, maybe also physically.
It's hard to do that when the few times I do go out it feels like I'm stepping onto the surface of Mars, or diving underwater with no oxygen tank.  I already talk with my friend too much. She has her own life, her own job and her own set of friends/coworkers to keep her busy.
I've accepted that I only experience happiness in swift fleeting moments, I found once I accepted that I was able to enjoy them more. Think as a society we're obsessed with chasing happiness and see it as an end goal, when really the trials and tribulations of life don't really allow for continuous, uninterrupted happiness.
Theres some quote by some one that basically says happiness doesnt exist, but moments of it do with in contentment. We get seconds of happiness in between our safe guards 
Theres some quote by some one that basically says happiness doesnt exist, but moments of it do with in contentment. We get seconds of happiness in between our safe guards 
Yes! I think being content minimises the risks of experiencing manic highs and lows. For me, when I'm feeling really, really happy about something I almost get like a come down afterwards? It's weird.
Yes! I think being content minimises the risks of experiencing manic highs and lows. For me, when I'm feeling really, really happy about something I almost get like a come down afterwards? It's weird.
I call that an emotional hangover. I had one recently. I had a great experience doing something that was really difficult for me. Then I spent 3 days in a really bad state for absolutely no reason.  I had too much fun and paid for it.
I go to work every day, my coworkers tell me how much they love seeing my smile. I chit chat with everyone. We laugh. Its all fun. I walk around for 8+ hours with the biggest most genuine loving, caring, fun smile across my face and give compliments out more than I breathe. The whole time I am wondering why the shoot I am existing and want to disappear. I understand. Some times faking it can help. Some times you realize how shooting pointless faking it is. 
One of the reasons I hate work is because of how fake so much of it is.  Employers lie to their workers.  Workers lie to their employers.  Workers lie to each other.  All the time.  I'm so sick of it.  I feel like I always have to wear a mask, and everyone around me is wearing masks.
One of the reasons I hate work is because of how fake so much of it is.  Employers lie to their workers.  Workers lie to their employers.  Workers lie to each other.  All the time.  I'm so sick of it.  I feel like I always have to wear a mask, and everyone around me is wearing masks.
The endless 'how are you?' I say fine but inside I am screaming.
Yes. I will have moments where I feel good and then a few minutes or at best a day later and it all whooshes away. And I try to grasp at it to hold on to it but I'm just grabbing empty air.  More than anything it's SO FRIGGIN FRUSTRATING that I can't fix this. I shooting hate it. I hate it so much. 
Thank you for feeling what I feel.
Suck? No I just accept it as the grim reality of my life 
Pretty sure accepting something as a grim reality is the same as acknowledging that it sucks.
I get even more depressed dawg but at the same time winter nights give me that weird nice sad feeling
It is even betrer when it snows or rains
It is even betrer when it snows or rains
its been 10 years since I've seen any decent snow in the the UK and that had to be the best winter I've ever had.  admittedly 20 something people died but the south of England has never looked so beautiful since then.  
its been 10 years since I've seen any decent snow in the the UK and that had to be the best winter I've ever had.  admittedly 20 something people died but the south of England has never looked so beautiful since then.  
Lol people are such pussies when it comes to weather in the uk, a bit of snow and the whole country grinds to a halt. I believe we had 2 winters in a row with snow, 2009 was the worst and then we had some more in 2010
I really like they glow you get from street lights reflecting off of the snow almost as if the sun is setting the entire night.
That description was rlly beautiful. You know i like sadness i dont like depression uk? Idk its weird
I know what you mean with that nice sad feeling. Like nostalgia almost, but not quite. You're sort of quiet and reflective, but not about anything specific. It's just nice to be cozy.
Like an old security blanket
Like an old security blanket
Not, op, but **YES!**, was about to type about the security thing. That feel of protection when you have some comfy and baggy layers of old, but loved, clothes on yourself, (in top of that your favorite blanket), surrounding your body. It almost feels as the safest I can feel on my own skin.
Small towns have their problems.  Mainly, everyone knows everyone and their business.   I yearn for the anonymity of a large city where I can go grocery shopping with out the fear of seeing someone I know and being forced into a conversation.
Walmart is basically a family reunion... 
I love imagining living in a big city up north so I get the winters but also the feeling you mentioned.
I come from a small northern town like that. Everyone knows everyone, but we all follow the unwritten rule of leaving others alone. It changed, but that's the basis of it.   Région du Saguenay Lac St-Jean, Quebec, Canada. If you're curious. Won't name the town, but there's plenty in these parts.
big city up north of where?
Just Northern America. Anywhere were it gets nice and cold. I'm possibly moving up to Minneapolis soon so that's a good example
god, yes--which makes it all the worse since it's been shooting *88* degrees lately
Yep. 95 degrees today where I'm at. :/
Yep. 95 degrees today where I'm at. :/
this is bullshit my dude
Dude thank you I needed this so much today thank you. A friend took her life last night and I spent the whole day with her family. When I attempted one of the main things going threw my head was now everybody else will feel like me, since then I don't want that for anybody EVER and after today I don't know how that though could get there. And now I'm crying. But in a good way for the first time today.
Even though we are perfect strangers, it makes me feel better knowing that you feel better. 
That's awesome! I haven't written my thoughts out ever but this makes me want to, just so that I can look back on them a year or two after and feel that I've improved.
It was a letter to my mom. Just apologising for putting her through it and trying to explain why I was doing it. It probably is good therapy to write even if it's not for that reason.
I have one on my desktop now from exactly one month ago, that feels really weird. I should... but I don't want to.
Print it then burn it  see how you feel after that  Do it in a bucket or something, not inside :P
Print it then burn it  see how you feel after that  Do it in a bucket or something, not inside :P
That sounds like a good idea. I just have this stupid thought that I should keep it because I might need it in the future. 
That sounds like a good idea. I just have this stupid thought that I should keep it because I might need it in the future. 
Well if you have to write it out again it will give you a little more time to think about it. Besides if you plan on following through its not like you will be late for something after the fact. 
The only reason I haven’t just ended it at this point is my family. I don’t want my little brothers growing up with something like that hanging over them 
Nice pun
Nice pun
I mean, they'll take him down at some point right?
I mean, they'll take him down at some point right?
Lol. You guys are terrible. I swear that wasn’t on purpose. 
I used to feel obligated to “stay” here because of my mother and my dog. Now both have passed.  I have no family members now. If you have a family, don’t begrudge them because you “have to stay” here. Embrace that you have even one single being on the planet that wants you here. 
I'm sorry for your loss I don't begrudge them at all couldn't imagine losing them
Yes I’m only here for my kids 
...and my elderly parents.
Wow. I feel EXACTLY the same way. I mean literally the same way. 
It's a rough existence pm me if you ever need to talk
I just got into an argument with my support system about suicide being selfish. I feel it's selfish to force someone who doesn't want to live to stick around just so they don't have to experience the pain of losing a loved one. 
Both sides are being selfish.it may be painful to live, but it can be just as painful to have someone you love die
Yes, though it seems more and more like that may not be enough to prevent it for me. I do try to find reasons but I don't know how much longer it will be enough.
Likewise like I'm just not getting happiness out of anything anymore.
the facade is exhausting. people seem to get annoyed when im not funny. its like they expect me to be a joker all the time. 
Just finish every sentence with 'Waka waka' and they'll be satisfied. It's even funnier deadpan.
Yeah, at this point, I'm only here for my dog
Two dogs here.
>what if you were dead?  Well, my wife and family would be sad and pissed.  >What if there was an afterlife?   If there was, it would be more logical than anything we've ever thought of.   >Imagine when u wake up, you’re in hell.  If there's a hell, then God is evil.  
If we're forced to be with God than he's evil. We choose Hell.
If we're forced to be with God than he's evil. We choose Hell.
Hell is earth.
TIL I'm depressed.
Me too. What the shoot. Now I feel even worse.
Have you found something that helps?
So far I am signed up for summer classes at my college. Since I feel obligated to go, it helps me accomplish something on a daily basis. Baby steps FTW!
And then I work out. Changes everything
And after, you still do nothing. At least, I do.
I wish I wasn't disabled, exercise would help a lot.  I don't think sleeping  counts.
I broke both my ankles and left thigh about a year and a half ago. Getting back in the gym and getting strength back feels. so. good.
> I think the world is beautiful. There are so many amazing things to see and do, and seemingly countless possibilities, too many for a single lifetime.  Every day when I'm at work, I hear the birds singing outside and it breaks my heart I can't be out there with them. I have hobbles, I love animals, nature, and travel. But I don't have time to enjoy any of those things. I spend all day slaving away, earning just enough to continue my hollow existence. 
>  But I don't have time to enjoy any of those things   And money in my case 
This is like saying, 'just turn that frown upside down'. 
'Just, you know, be happy!'
Same here. I feel like the meds have fixed all that they could. They aren't going to make my relationships better with people or, get a better job etcetc. Those are things I'm going to have to fix on my own. But a lot of the time I just don't feel mentally well enough to change anything and/or I've lost interest to care. It's a vicious cycle. 
I feel the same way about therapy. It has helped be a great deal, but there are still a lot of things it just can't change, things I have to change myself but just can't. So I just keep being sad about my life, feeling like I don't have any control over it all, no influence on it at all. Shitty things happen and people leave. I don't know how to not let that bring me down.
You're 21!  I wish I could go back then and change a lot of things.  Start today, make a change, as you get comfortable with that change, make another.  Keep trucking baby, you're young and have your whole life ahead of you!
I'm also 21 and I've been doing this for near 5 years. I'm tired of being crucified everytime i go out and try to make something out of my life; I'm tired of being pummeled to the ground and getting shit shoved down my throat.   I'm at that point where I'm just definitively disillusioned with trying to be decent and normal; I'm just universally and eternally exhausted with trying to keep pace. Just tired. 
Thanks for the heads-up. I do think that religion can be helpful for some, but you're probably not going to find Jesus or whatever from a reddit comment.
>I do think that religion can be helpful for some  Some is definitely the key word here. I've been religious all of my life, still got depressed.  Then again, I've had a lot of people come up to me and say 'You only think you're depressed because your faith in God isn't enough'.
>I do think that religion can be helpful for some  Some is definitely the key word here. I've been religious all of my life, still got depressed.  Then again, I've had a lot of people come up to me and say 'You only think you're depressed because your faith in God isn't enough'.
>'You only think you're depressed because your faith in God isn't enough'.  How in the bloody shoot is saying that even supposed to help?! I'm not religious and even I can see how idiot-y that sounds.  Edit: Is that what they call guilt-tripping?
>'You only think you're depressed because your faith in God isn't enough'.  How in the bloody shoot is saying that even supposed to help?! I'm not religious and even I can see how idiot-y that sounds.  Edit: Is that what they call guilt-tripping?
It's the same thought process that thinks that people get what they deserve. It might be related to the 'prosperity gospel' stuff that people like Joel Osteen sell.   Newsflash: sometimes bad stuff happens because of randomness.
Thanks for the heads-up. I do think that religion can be helpful for some, but you're probably not going to find Jesus or whatever from a reddit comment.
I agree that religion can be helpful; but only to those who seek it. I do NOT want to be sought after for any kind of recruitment, much less when I'm in /r/depression. yeesh, they need to back off
I agree that religion can be helpful; but only to those who seek it. I do NOT want to be sought after for any kind of recruitment, much less when I'm in /r/depression. yeesh, they need to back off
Yeah, some people who were actually nice to me so far mostly ended up trying to talk about religion(which I don't have any). I couldn't even be angry at them :p Now I just put extra guard up whenever someone is nice to me
I agree that religion can be helpful; but only to those who seek it. I do NOT want to be sought after for any kind of recruitment, much less when I'm in /r/depression. yeesh, they need to back off
Religion is best when sought for, not when shoved down your throat.   People also need to respect that there are different religions for different people, some may not be as appealing as others, and obviously /r/depression isn't the place to recruit. 
> religion can be helpful  Only to the extent that that it's an addictive mental drug. It's no better than saying that getting hooked on <some efficient euphoric drug> will get you out of depression. Technically, yes, sure, but that's a poor advice. Some real and not imaginary support is a much better option.
Thank you for sharing your opinion, but I don't think there is room for anti-theism here.  
Yeah. Nice ideas and all that.
Kinda culty following though. Shame
> ...but you're probably not going to find Jesus or whatever from a reddit comment.  This is a useless comment that may be downvoted, but I LOLed so hard at this. I wish I could double upvote, just the comment above mine.
thx bb
Anyone who comes into a place where folks are at their lowest and weakest to take advantage of that for 'their religion' is not genuine. That's more malicious, exploitative, and abusive.
I know, whoever does that is the one who deserves to go to Hell.
This is what i had to deal with when i went to therapy... and the reason i stopped going.
Nothing bothered me more than a counselor that took one look at my 'none' on religion and immediately suggested a free bible and a church visit.  Lady I am 30% here because of that bible. No, thank you.
Nothing bothered me more than a counselor that took one look at my 'none' on religion and immediately suggested a free bible and a church visit.  Lady I am 30% here because of that bible. No, thank you.
You should have complained to a higher up. That's unacceptable. 
You should have complained to a higher up. That's unacceptable. 
I did eventually report them when I found out a friend of mine went through the same thing.  It's funny, when it happened to me I dismissed it. When it happened to a friend I got angry and reported it. Because basically the intake person at their governments sponsored clinic was suggesting prayer and church. Great for if you're a christian. No bueno if you're anything else.
But this seems not too smart--because they are really picky on what church you go to...what if you go to a Catholic Church?  They usually want you to go to *their* Bible study. Not just any church. So I wonder if this is really a recruitment tactic. 
> So I wonder if this is really a recruitment tactic.   Based on what we know from behind the scenes, the person who's doing this is not being honest and only *starts* by saying 'any church will do'.  I'm leery about disclosing too many deets, but it's clear to us they do have a 'recruitment' agenda.  
*Sigh*. This again? Doesn't this seem to happen every other week or something?
Why yes, Daredevil. This is a constant struggle. We enforce the rules, people forget that the rules are there, or are new. Or the rules don't apply to them because ______.   I'm watching you on tv though, so everything is okay. Do try not to get hurt so much though, okay?   (I really should not be commenting when spazzing out.)
Why yes, Daredevil. This is a constant struggle. We enforce the rules, people forget that the rules are there, or are new. Or the rules don't apply to them because ______.   I'm watching you on tv though, so everything is okay. Do try not to get hurt so much though, okay?   (I really should not be commenting when spazzing out.)
I love how I've had this username for years and just now people are starting to recognize it. haha  And I will trying but the streets are rough. 
I love how I've had this username for years and just now people are starting to recognize it. haha  And I will trying but the streets are rough. 
We're all playing catch up to you. :) Me? I'm not so good with the comics. Much better with tv as constant company. Well, netflix.   Keep fighting the good fight, Murdock. When I eventually end up needing a lawyer for stealing kittens or feeding people too many cookies, I'll call. 
It's a shame but religious fanatics are exactly the type that will prey on the weak, sick, and fragile. In their head they're saving but the training they've received their whole life is telling them to go to those in their lowest. They are easy targets but if you ask the religious person they will disagree and say that no they are the most in need off god's blessing.  A bandaid can't fix a broken bone, I'm sorry.
They are PUAs for Jesus.
They are PUAs for Jesus.
and i've already been negged and am ready for the taking.
We've had both them and people trying to tell us we are ' indigo children' who should let our mania( creative and intelligent special snowflake side) out over in /r/bipolar too. Yay us:) 
What exactly is an indigo child? I've never heard that term before.
What exactly is an indigo child? I've never heard that term before.
http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Indigo_children  Essentially a load of utterly unscientific twattwaddle.
No, I'm serious. I was told that by my ex. Why would I joke about that?
I didn't say you were joking. I asked what you said in reply to her crazy shit?
Religion has never been a good experience for me. It was filled with people like this. Good riddance. Dang them and shoot their god.
While I agree, shoot that guy, I think we should be a little more sensitive to the religious members of /r/depression.
While I don't agree with forced evangelism and hypocrisy, attending a church can actually make you feel better.  Not necessarily because of the sermons and or religious teachings/practices... but because of the (generally) open, welcoming, and friendly disposition of its members.  Even just a welcoming handshake and smile on the way in can do wonders for someone who is craving a friendly social interaction. 
Until they find out you don't fit in with their worldview. Then they're not so friendly. 
Until they find out you don't fit in with their worldview. Then they're not so friendly. 
I used to go to church.  I was literally ostracized because I was the deaf kid with brain tumors (non cancerous) they believed I must have done something to deserve this and deemed me 'evil' before even talking to me.  Dang that noise.
I do agree with this post, but I also sort of see what their trying to do. It's most probably their way of reaching out to people themselves and not really 'recruiting', but yeah, at some point it will get annoying. I just think that hey, it's the thought that counts.
> It's most probably their way of reaching out to people themselves and not really 'recruiting', but yeah, at some point it will get annoying.  We gave them the benefit of exactly that doubt at first and tried to work with them until they demonstrated conclusively that they are *not* on the level.  
> It's most probably their way of reaching out to people themselves and not really 'recruiting', but yeah, at some point it will get annoying.  We gave them the benefit of exactly that doubt at first and tried to work with them until they demonstrated conclusively that they are *not* on the level.  
Ok then. If they crossed the line that's what they get.
Ok then. If they crossed the line that's what they get.
Yeah, we can handle a 'my faith helps me' self-disclosure or even using a church as an *example* of a community group that might be supportive, but this one's more along the lines of 'God will fix everything so I'm going to get people to go to church no matter how manipulative and deceitful I have to be to do it'.   
Man, that's crazy. It's especially bad in this subreddit's case.
It's even worse when we get the 'if you kill yourself you'll burn in hell forever' types over in /r/SuicideWatch &#3232;_&#3232;
Nice to know. I belong to a 'church'  and it's not much help right now. I believe in God but I'm not going to cram that down people's throats.  I know the Bible but words don't move me. Actions do. People talk a lot but I need to see action.  Shame on them for not listening to the mods. Seriously if someone asks you to stop you should just have the decency to do so. 
That's just it.  I'm a religious person myself, but there's no call for trying to shake up the belief system of someone in distress, especially using deceitful means to do so.  At the end of the story of the Good Samaritan, he's still a shooting Samaritan, i.e. *a person of a different religion*.  If Christ were telling that story in 21st-century America, the Samaritan would be a Muslim.  If he were telling it in the 21st-century Middle East, the Samaritan would be an American.  
Thank you for clarifying the issue.  I take comfort in my faith.  Being deceptive is never appropriate especially with people who are hurting and may seek harmful actions.
Yeah, dealing with these people always makes me think of the quote from Gandhi.  'I like your Christ.  I do not like your Christians.  They are so unlike your Christ.'
Is there a username you can disclose so that we can be on the lookout?
We're not going to violate the individual's privacy and potentially start a witch hunt. 
We're not going to violate the individual's privacy and potentially start a witch hunt. 
I just wanted to thank you guys for being such good mods. You follow the rules you set for yourselves and Reddits rules as well, you don't spout your personal opinions and subsequently ban people for disagreeing and you guys are friendly and willing to help out however you can. Thank you guys so much for making this a safe and sane community I can be proud to be a part of. 
I just wanted to thank you guys for being such good mods. You follow the rules you set for yourselves and Reddits rules as well, you don't spout your personal opinions and subsequently ban people for disagreeing and you guys are friendly and willing to help out however you can. Thank you guys so much for making this a safe and sane community I can be proud to be a part of. 
Bam!  Right in the cry-for-happy feels.  Thanks and hugs to you. 
Going to church actually really helped me with depression. Finding a place to belong went a long way on the road to recovery.
If this person weren't lying to people, manipulating them, and misrepresenting themselves, then talking about their experience in a church community would be no problem.  But as it is...
Going to church actually really helped me with depression. Finding a place to belong went a long way on the road to recovery.
Good! Glad that was the case for you.  Be that as it may, that's not what OP is addressing here as an admin. Seems like this person was basically harassing people via PM to join their church. Not the same thing as simply sharing a positive personal experience.
Not religion. But I am sure that a little bit of spirituality would help a lot of people to put their lives in better perspective.  There's Zen meditation, there's Vipassana. These thing will actually help a lot. But I don't think that you should force your religion on somebody and say that it will help you.
Oh, absolutely.  We have no problem with people sharing stories of anything that helped them in a way that's relevant to the OP's concerns and needs.  But when you're using deception and manipulation to 'bring people to God', it's really about power and other messed-up stuff.  
I dont think anyone should be labeled as being 'cultic' just because they suggested that people in this sub join a church as a means of support. Not all that glitters is gold, just as much not everything that we think is BAD is actually bad. Muslims arent terrorists, christians churches arent cults, and atheists arent all Satanists.   Please be open minded and respect everyones right to freedom of speech :)
> I dont think anyone should be labeled as being 'cultic' just because they suggested that people in this sub join a church as a means of support.  As we said, our main issue is with the use of manipulative and deceptive  evangelizing tactics, plus flouting the posted community rules.  By reacting to something we didn't say instead of responding to what we *did* say, you've undermined your own claim that most Christians are people who can be dealt with rationally.  
I'm a Christian and I have this to say: A Christian is supposed to share their faith, so I dont know what beliefs they have but after you share your faith ONCE if you are told by the individual person you shared your faith with to STOP talking to them about Jesus, you are supposed to back OFF and move on. Not keep insisting. So if you really dont want to hear about God just tell the person this. 
'supposed to share their faith' see there's the problem
Sharing ones faith falls under free speech..so there shouldn't be a problem as long as he/she is not harassing you
Free speech, sure, but that doesn't mean it's the right thing to do, especially when you participating in a forum that is specifically asking you not to say certain things (r/depression has a lot of rules about what to say, making free speech kind of irrelevant in this discussion).
/u/faloofay, this argument itself is trivial yet you are willingly participating in it. 
Just putting in  my two cents. :)
Not really religious myself, but why the aggression? The way this post talks about the aforementioned religious people like they're scam artists or something. If I really liked table tennis or drawing or the clarinet or whatever and found that it brought me happiness, I would probably recommend it to people who are feeling low. This may be flawed logic but that's the way I see it. 
There is a big difference between pushing religion upon others ('Go to church and volunteer', 'Have you accepted God as your Savior' etc) and mentioning that being a part of the religious community in your area has really helped you.   Our subreddit rule is specifically against people coming in with the intent to essentially 'prescribe' religion as a fix for what people here are going through, or people who think that this is a good place to 'save' people and get them into church. 
Sorry if I sounded accusatory. I wasn't aware of the context. I just wanted to address the whole religion thing as a whole. The pitchforks come out a little too quickly sometimes and I think we're better than that.
> Sorry if I sounded accusatory. I wasn't aware of the context.  No, your response was totally understandable considering my original, un-edited post, which I didn't word as well as I could have.  >  I think we're better than that.  Indeed we are.  
I feel like rules prohibiting people from preaching religious values here are dumb, since the worst thing that could happen is that they stay depressed.  Unless they are preaching for their suicide cult or something, It's kind of selfish that something that could actually help somebody is prohibited because of the feelings of a special interest group.
I'm completely okay with rules preventing the emotionally vulnerable from being manipulated and brainwashed :)
really.
My point is that you're starting with a false claim, one that you can't back up, assuming it is true, and then going from there. There is no reason to think that believing in a 'loving God' will help depression if there is nothing tangible to grasp, no evidence to present. I'm bewildered how having an imaginary friend to talk to helps people. 
I'm not trying to find evidence of discrimination towards Christians, or making accusations, I was simply asking for something more specific than 'profoundly unchristian behaviors' I'm curious what exactly happened for several reasons including.....to help me decide if this is a community I care to be a part of, and how to avoid the same behavior....it's no secret that I am Christian, how do I know not to do the same thing when I'm not aware of what it was in the first place
> how do I know not to do the same thing when I'm not aware of what it was in the first place  If you stay on the side of *de*scribing your own experience rather than *pre*scribing for others, you'll be fine.  If I'm reluctant to discuss  the full details of the worst of our serial proselytiser, it's because honestly I'm not sure how to without risking the privacy of some of his victims, people for whom he has already caused a lot of suffering.  
That explains my apathy and lack of interested in anything at all.
i just feel like this moving object of meat at this point. i feel no different than some animal
i just feel like this moving object of meat at this point. i feel no different than some animal
Animals actually have a very strong desire to be alive so I guess animals > me
Animals actually have a very strong desire to be alive so I guess animals > me
yeah.. i think i gave the wrong example. its hard to explain
[In his TED talk, psychologist Andrew Solomon](https://www.ted.com/talks/andrew_solomon_depression_the_secret_we_share/transcript) describes depression exactly this way, claiming that it is not a lack of happiness (as most see it) but the loss of vitality; a feeling of livelyness and health in life. It's going through life as though your already dead.  It's important to understand what you're feeling, as understanding what is wrong can enable you to better act towards the goal of healing it at least learning to cope better with your problems.
Thank you so much for sharing this. My parents don’t understand what depression is and this is a great video to show them. I appreciate you. 
Drugs.
Fortunately that's not my escape. I'm drug free. Never have and never will do illegal drugs. My mother committed suicide on opioids back in 2006 and I was raised by alcoholics. No thanks man. I've seen enough of that shit to vomit.
I was about to post something similar to this! I feel like I’m dying a slow agonizing death.
Same boat.. it’s like I’m in a coma and just waiting for someone to pull the cord cuz I can’t do it myself 
Same boat.. it’s like I’m in a coma and just waiting for someone to pull the cord cuz I can’t do it myself 
Exactly. I should add that to my will. As soon as I get into a coma, no more ventilator.
I thought dying would be more peaceful.. if I could have peace right now I probably wouldn't want to die.
Dying is more peaceful. Depression is far, far worse.
With major depression since early childhood, I feel like my depression is not just a premature death, but also a life that never started. :'(
I feel similar, although I do kind of remember a few moments of happiness as a child - not specific memories, but just this feeling of calmness and safety and inner peace. Then I remember I tried killing myself when I was 6 and I question my sanity, and ability to remember things accurately.
Im probably gonna kill myself soon
Please go to the subreddits on suicide. I am sure there is someone better qualified and smarter than myself to help you.  I don't want you to die. Nobody 'wants' to die. You just want to escape depression, the loneliness and sadness. I understand depression, I was diagnosed too.  But please do not kill yourself. Please, please, please.
Please go to the subreddits on suicide. I am sure there is someone better qualified and smarter than myself to help you.  I don't want you to die. Nobody 'wants' to die. You just want to escape depression, the loneliness and sadness. I understand depression, I was diagnosed too.  But please do not kill yourself. Please, please, please.
Thank you so much
I agree with what you say. And I like to believe that their are a few people who are selected for this job, it makes us stronger in a way. It sucks, but other people need us. I guess the question is, can you justify sacrificing the happiness of one person for the happiness of many? I say in some situations,yes. Maybe it is dumb to think that, but we all have to tell our selves something, even if it is bullshit. 
Makes me feel like 'Jesus' with crappier superpowers.
I frequently wonder if people with depression are more prone to becoming therapists.
It's pretty likely. I mean, who is more qualified to help someone with depression than someone who has been depressed in their life and (hopefully) has found ways to work through it? Really, I don't think that the majority of therapists would be in their profession if they hadn't experienced some sort of mental illness throughout their life. 
Can definitely agree with this. I love helping people, and I really do just feel better from it. However, not only do I hate myself, but with feeling like I look like a monster, together with just the general feeling of social anxiety/no confidence, I find myself scared to help others. I want to help, but I can't bring myself to for all the wrong reasons. I mean, I ditched volunteering at a school two years ago because I felt like the kids/staff would laugh/be scared of my ugliness....
Just leaving [this](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=7wRCWcQVSJI) here for you...as a person. Not sarcastic.
Trial and error.  I've found that some people are less mentally taxing to hang out with.
Exactly. I've had a best friend for around 15 years and didn't notice he was a horrible friend until my ex pointed it out. Still hang out occasionally but every time it's so draining and taxing. Gotta find friends or people you can be your truest self around and not feel judged. They're difficult to find, but when you do you can talk or just hang out for hours and feel glad that you did instead of feeling like you wasted time.
Exactly. I've had a best friend for around 15 years and didn't notice he was a horrible friend until my ex pointed it out. Still hang out occasionally but every time it's so draining and taxing. Gotta find friends or people you can be your truest self around and not feel judged. They're difficult to find, but when you do you can talk or just hang out for hours and feel glad that you did instead of feeling like you wasted time.
could you say why it was draining?
could you say why it was draining?
Not the person you replied to but I have a friend who's humour consistently aims to embarrass me, often by making up lies or stretching the truth. Often it's just uncalled for and not funny. 
I've found that I feel particularly isolated with people who turned out to be fake. Like with those with whom you always have to assume what they think about you. The ones who make you feel insecure. But I never felt this way with honest people. I just get exhausted after 2-3 hours of socializing when you run out of things to talk about. 
Holy shit. You can last 2-3 hours before running out of stuff to talk about? Dude, I do that in 5 minutes!
Holy shit. You can last 2-3 hours before running out of stuff to talk about? Dude, I do that in 5 minutes!
I used to be like that. But somehow you start to get better at phrasing stuff. At telling stories. I'm a shit story teller, but I manage to talk about an hour with the right people. 
I feel the same way as you.  I can't stand fake people, it's a lot easier to deal with life when you cut out the dishonest people from it.
Its funny you talk about fake people. I dont really run into that but I hear it in rap songs and pop culture. But I dont trust people. Maybe I can just read people too who knows.
It's okay to not know what makes you happy. 
How are you supposed to self improve if you don't know what you should be doing to do it? I just want to be doing something about it rather than a passive victim.
I've got an interesting quote for you, my friend:  'Happiness comes from solving problem. Happiness is a constant work-in-progress, because solving problems is a constant work-in-progress—the solutions to today’s problems will lay the foundation for tomorrow’s problems, and so on. True happiness occurs only when you find the problems you enjoy having and enjoy solving.' -Mark Manson, 'The Subtle Art of Not Giving A Dang'
Everyone always gives a shoot. If someone tells you they dont give a shoot, they are lying, they do. May not be what you think, but they do
Everyone always gives a shoot. If someone tells you they dont give a shoot, they are lying, they do. May not be what you think, but they do
I understand you. And you're correct. And that's why..  The main idea of the book is: 'Try to find something what's interesting for you and what's good for you and give shoots only about this thing(s). Stop giving a shoot about everything else.'  Something like this. 
Just curious, what society are you part of? I can't assume since Reddit is international.
Human society.
I still get depressed from embarrassing things I did or said in public from 5 years ago! If only I had no shame. 
I don't know what you did five years ago, and I already like you. People are actually very kind and accepting. I always mess up social interactions, just don't be too hard on yourself. Pretend that this is Skyrim or fallout and through each interaction you gain XP. Best of luck friend.
Same. I just embarrass myself out there by doing or saying something stupid...and later think over it like  1000times
I hate that inner dialogue / broken record that will endlessly play in my head after saying something stupid. I won't let go, even when I know that definitely should just stop thinking about it... I'll start over 3 seconds later. 
I hate that inner dialogue / broken record that will endlessly play in my head after saying something stupid. I won't let go, even when I know that definitely should just stop thinking about it... I'll start over 3 seconds later. 
[this is why](https://en.m.wikipedia.org/wiki/Default_mode_network)
It's okay to be anxious and upset. Never let anyone tell you otherwise. You've made the effort to travel outside and that counts in my book. Well done you! Keep doing what you're doing. Every smile from a stranger counts and each smile from you does to. 
Not OP,  but thanks. This helps, believe it or not. 
Not OP,  but thanks. This helps, believe it or not. 
Dear friend, whatever sins you believe you've committed are absolved. You have no need to thank me. I love you and those around you do too. Keep living as you are. 
This might be sudden, but what do you work as? 
I am an attorney. So I am drained by the time 5pm rolls around I have already used all my energy wanting to be around people. Lol
What kind of TV shows do you like man?
Anything sci-fi is what I mainly watch with some drama stuff thrown in
Anything sci-fi is what I mainly watch with some drama stuff thrown in
Have you seen Gattacca?
I'm agnostic but it's the thought that counts right. Nice to know there are a lot of empathetic people
I'm not religious either, but its still so sweet :')
I'm not religious either, but its still so sweet :')
why does anyone have to be religious to see the merit of a prayer? its like just wishing good on someone like wishing someone good luck before a game... does luck exist? but do you still say good luck? hmm.
How did he know you were sad?
once you reach a certain point misery shows
once you reach a certain point misery shows
This is so true. 
Well, if you're looking to be cheered up, xpost this to /r/athiesm and you can watch them rail the nice stranger who dared to say he/she was praying for you.
hahaha its funny because I'm not religious, i just see this as pure kindness. 
hahaha its funny because I'm not religious, i just see this as pure kindness. 
It was and it was nice. It's sort of like when my parents tell me that they pray for me and my family every day. I say, 'Thanks.'  'Stop wasting your time kow-towing to a pink elephant MOM!' would be one way to respond. I prefer the former, because I'm not an idiot.
It was and it was nice. It's sort of like when my parents tell me that they pray for me and my family every day. I say, 'Thanks.'  'Stop wasting your time kow-towing to a pink elephant MOM!' would be one way to respond. I prefer the former, because I'm not an idiot.
You should come on by to r/Christianity. We've got a lot of atheists/secular types like you. Fully agree. Prayer doesn't necessarily mean it has to be about a specific god or doctrine, but that someone is thinking of you positively in the way they know how, and that's still a nice thing to do, even if you don't believe the same things.
If the OP x-posted it to /r/atheism, there would be one person, downvoted to hell, saying the man is stupid for doing that and the rest would ask why is it in /r/atheism since the guy was just being nice.
You want to bet?  I'm not sure what we can bet, but something fun (account deletion is stupid).
You want to bet?  I'm not sure what we can bet, but something fun (account deletion is stupid).
haha, I'd prefer it not being posted there at all, there are enough useless posts there as it is. In /r/depression, that's great. But not in atheism.
Can you provide a little backstory?    What was happening to evoke this response from a stranger? 
i was at the airport about to go home after spending a weekend with my long distance sorta kinda boyfriend who i wont see for another year... :\ it was our first time meeting and it was the greatest weekend of my life. naturally i was sad, but honestly im happier than i've been in a long time because it happened. :) got me out of my two month depression spell.   i was sitting in the airport by myself crying.. embarrassing in public, but i just couldn't stop.
i was at the airport about to go home after spending a weekend with my long distance sorta kinda boyfriend who i wont see for another year... :\ it was our first time meeting and it was the greatest weekend of my life. naturally i was sad, but honestly im happier than i've been in a long time because it happened. :) got me out of my two month depression spell.   i was sitting in the airport by myself crying.. embarrassing in public, but i just couldn't stop.
I have been in a long distance relationship before as well and I know exactly what you're going through.  Best of luck to you and him.  
Yes followed by panic attack
—> To realization that you’re fine, followed by depression cause you think oh shit I’m not fine. I feel that
—> To realization that you’re fine, followed by depression cause you think oh shit I’m not fine. I feel that
same here. :(
I use to. However, I can't stress this enough. Just do something. Anything. No matter how mundane or irrelevant. Also always take care of your body. Hope this helps man.
this, cleaning my room works for me 
Recently (this week) I’ve been contemplating what’s it like to have a girl friend but then I come back to reality and remind myself that I will never be in a relationship because there’s just nothing about me.... that anyone would like.  I’m hopeless 
That’s not true dude. There’s someone for everyone.
yo! In my darkest time it was hard for me as well to articulate my feelings. Im quite rational and the feelings didnt make sense. Yet they were real. In the end I could only figure dhit out when I opened myself.  So yeah wanna talk? maybe we can figure it out together.
You're a very kind and good person, and honestly I broke down when I read this. I'm just lonely and no matter what I do it won't go away. Even when I'm with people I constantly feel it. I've felt it most of my life and I'm just tired of it. I don't want to kill myself but I just want to cease to exist. 
You're a very kind and good person, and honestly I broke down when I read this. I'm just lonely and no matter what I do it won't go away. Even when I'm with people I constantly feel it. I've felt it most of my life and I'm just tired of it. I don't want to kill myself but I just want to cease to exist. 
It doesnt work thay way. We are here from you around the globe. Its why this sub exists. Nobody wants to to not exist. The beginning is tough but i care for you stranger. I hope you feel better knowing thay even a random doesnt want you to do do something youll regret
It doesnt work thay way. We are here from you around the globe. Its why this sub exists. Nobody wants to to not exist. The beginning is tough but i care for you stranger. I hope you feel better knowing thay even a random doesnt want you to do do something youll regret
Thank you. I really appreciate this.
Always but then I'll realize no one really gives a shoot about what I'm feeling...
This is the biggest reason I neglect to finish a post
Yup... all the time. So I usually, pop over the sub to read over some threads, to see if I someone, out there, describe a little bit of what I'm felling, so maybe I can make some sense out of it, and try to understand myself a little bit more.. Sometimes, some things will get clear in my head, sometimes they won't.   Ok, did that made sense? ^((Please tell me that made sense)^)
I understand what you mean. I don't know if I'm usually looking for an answer personally. I think sometimes I just want a platform to express myself. Then I start babbling on to where it's a novel and I don't even know the point I was trying to make. I then realize no one is going to bother reading it, and I delete it. But, I definitely get you. 
that and the fact that no one cares or will read it anyway so whats the point..
I was gunna downvote you but that only adds to your comment. We all read into this and csres enough to comment. Soooooo um i care 
Literally like twice a day at work
I do it all the time at school 
I do it all the time at school 
It's shit. But I suppose it helps piece things back together until I can get drunk or high
It's shit. But I suppose it helps piece things back together until I can get drunk or high
shoot man, I really don't like how much your comment reminds me of me. I never really thought I was actually depressed and just thought I was being overly sad but the amount of stuff I relate to on this sub really changed that. 
I used to, all the time. I used to take a lot of shower and just stand there, letting the water blanket me. The warmth was nice, but after getting out the cold reality was there to embrace with its coldness. 
I do the same. When the night is unbearable and I know my eyes are puffed up because of crying, I go and take long hot showers. I sit on the shower floor while I cry. The water  just feels very comforting and relaxing.
I do the same. When the night is unbearable and I know my eyes are puffed up because of crying, I go and take long hot showers. I sit on the shower floor while I cry. The water  just feels very comforting and relaxing.
Showering at morning makes me sad most of the time. The thought that this will be the only warmth that i get to experience all day makes me just want to go back to bed
My roommate wonders why I take long showers. It's a coping mechanism. 
Whatever it takes to help you hold on one day, coping mechanism or not, you ought to do it.   And hell, everyone loves a hot shower. Being relaxed is pretty damn amazing.   What sucks is when you get out, and get slapped in the face by the cold. Damn cold. 
I'm a grown ass man. Burly beard and all. I at least once a day go to the bathroom, sit on the toilet and cry :/
You're not the only one. I come across as super macho and tough (have worked construction, ranching, farming, wildland firefighting), but have done the same. You're not less of a man - you're dealing with serious issues. Hang tough, broskie.
You're not the only one. I come across as super macho and tough (have worked construction, ranching, farming, wildland firefighting), but have done the same. You're not less of a man - you're dealing with serious issues. Hang tough, broskie.
You're a good brother, too sweets all around 
I wish I could. I'm so numb, it never actually comes out. I need to cry.
Even when I do cry I still think I'm faking it
Literally every hour. I also take my headphones in there and just listen to music.
I do that as well at work. Everyone must think I have serious bowl issues with the amount of time I spend sitting in there
Same dude. Just casually sit on the toilet and listen to sad songs for hours 
I enjoy hip hop and since my depression I’ve listened to xxxtentacion’s album 17. Really relatable. If you are interested i suggest you listen to it. 
I enjoy hip hop and since my depression I’ve listened to xxxtentacion’s album 17. Really relatable. If you are interested i suggest you listen to it. 
Idk why you got downvoted. Probably because of xxxtentacion or because you suggested an album. But I like this album. Though I prefer 808s and Heartbreak
Literally every single day. I live with 4 people and I have a roommate. Luckily my roommate is at work or outside of the room a lot but sometimes I'll just lock myself in the bathroom, sit on the floor and scroll through this subreddit because it's the only privacy I really get. 
reddit is a world of its own
it was kind of my 'safe space' in high school. i would go just to be alone, and i still do
Same here
Same here
I’m in high school and I couldn’t call it my safe space, but I go there to just be alone in my thoughts and relax bc I have severe social anxiety. It may be the thing I look forward o the most everyday at school. 
Yeah, I used to be thinking about stuff I like all the time, wrestling, movies or video games, whatever it was.   These days I can barely muster enough energy to care or think about them. My mind is just either empty or drifts towards thoughts that make me feel like shit and I shooting hate it. 
it kind of feels like losing your personality, doesn't it? it does to me. its an awful feeling
it kind of feels like losing your personality, doesn't it? it does to me. its an awful feeling
Pretty much, like I can feel myself kinda slipping away into sort of nothingness. It shooting hurts, it really does.
Pretty much, like I can feel myself kinda slipping away into sort of nothingness. It shooting hurts, it really does.
I kinda just sit and listen to my friends conversations, when I'm actually with any. I have nothing to add, can't find words or thoughts other than just repeating what they said. 
this is a very motivating comment, i enjoy being with people, so i know i need to try to talk more. thank you!
Among other things, I try to do one thing a day to strengthen a relationship. It can be planning a hang out sesh, having said sesh, or just texting someone a good morning or a funny dog photo. It’s helped me feel a lot less lonely. 
There's some research that links depression with reduced hippocampus size and function over time. I'm only 24 and my long term memory has deteriorated to the point where entire chunks of my life are just vague blurs. Old friends will joke about something that happened in high school or college and I just play along like I have a clue what they're talking about. 
its shooted up, I never even thought that it could lead to that, good memories is pretty much all i've got losing them and i  have nothing.
I am so painfully right there with you. I went on a date with a girl a few weeks ago. I ran out things to say and she was very confident and great at talking. She even spoke four languages. She asked me out again for some reason and I’m putting it off because I never have anything to talk about. I feel sad. 
She saw something that you can’t, don’t psyche yourself out trying to figure it out. If u actually like her, go for it- or make the largest effort you are able to. Maybe you’ll come to find that she can help you not be sad.
Thank you for writing this fact about the hippo campus. I just found an article that talks about this in detail, and how antidepressants can help:  https://www.ncbi.nlm.nih.gov/pmc/articles/PMC60045/
Wow, great minds think alike. I was actually editing my comment to include that very study at the same time you were writing this reply.  The effect of antidepressants on neurogenesis is really important - hopefully future drugs will be able to induce it in a more direct way and with less side effects. Boosting serotonin is not the most efficient route.
Yes. Depression slows down your thinking.  I’ve experienced this.    However, IMO it is a mistake to believe this is a permanent condition.    Your brain is not damaged and your thinking will speed back up when you feel better.  
I agree with this also......its like reprogramming your mind. Have to take in new information.
Me too, I don't like it. It feels like I'm losing touch with myself. 
I think I have lost touch with myself 
I tend to find a lot of relief watching youtube vine collection videos; it also gives you funny things to talk about.  
i really like these videos too and then when my friends reference them i know what they are talking about. i find the same relief with parks and rec. 
I feel like, instead of committing suicide instantaneously, I'm drawing the process out slowly, ruining my body, mind, and every aspect of my life. I'm aware of it happening, but I do nothing to stop it.
I’m so glad I’m not alone in this feeling. Terrifying
You dropped this \   ***   ^^To ^^prevent ^^any ^^more ^^lost ^^limbs ^^throughout ^^Reddit, ^^correctly ^^escape ^^the ^^arms ^^and ^^shoulders ^^by ^^typing ^^the ^^shrug ^^as ^^`¯\\\_(ツ)_/¯`
thanks retrieval bot, most useful advice i've gotten in a while tbh 
If I may ask a question, did your interests detriate or fade away because you couldn't find someone to share them with. I feel thats what always happens. Just built into us as social animals.
in a way, yeah, i suppose this can be attributed to not having someone to share my interests with, which is exhausting in and of itself.  I also lost motivation and energy to think about anything in general so as a result I've neglected alot of my interests 
For as far as I can remember I'd have moments where I wished I could just step back and watch the world. Like not have to participate and just disappear and watch.  
Yea me too. Like a ghost that can fly anywhere i want. There are things i want to see, and places i want to be in, just not as me...
Thanks for writing this out. I just wish that merely existing and observing didn't take so much energy, or require waking up daily. Even plants live their lives too quickly for me, I can't keep up and they usually end up dying. 
So much energy. It's exhausting.
Same. My only regret when I kill myself will be that I don't get to see how this shitshow ends. Climate change? Nuclear war? An asteroid? Aliens? I want to know goddamnit.
shits weird dude 
Many many of us. That is why so many of us sleep as much as possible. It's like being dead without the commitment 
That and depression really does sap your energy. 
Some days. Some days I just wish I could leave on a train and not tell a single soul. Maybe go somewhere new and try to start fresh. Go to a place where no one knows me and start all over again. Or just go away and never come back.
Sometimes I feel like this too, but the thought train always ends in 'I'd probably end up the same'.  Something tells me the thought isn't wrong.
you know you literally CAN do this right? ive been living a couple months now doing exactly this. its amazing
It's fear that holds me back
It's fear that holds me back
Its money that holds me back.
yes....tbh I think the hardest thing is you know you wanna die but I don't wanna do it myself so you keep living on and no one knows....
Same. Sometimes I just wish a car would hit me, or someone would murder me to end it already.  Cuz I really wouldn't go through the effort of doing it myself.
Same. Sometimes I just wish a car would hit me, or someone would murder me to end it already.  Cuz I really wouldn't go through the effort of doing it myself.
Me too...everytime I am in the bus I always wish It would crush or somethings like that..and ya thinking about getting shoot in the head by someone then I don't have to do it myself...
Holy shoot yes. I wanna turn inside out and just vanish. 
When I am in my darkest moments I have mental images of crawling into the ground and just staying there. 
I often say to myself, I died three years ago. I am still here but technically dead. Car crash of something, shoot if I know how it all works but the idea takes some pressure off for just a minute or two.
Sometimes I become lucid in a dream and wonder if I died. It does take some pressure off.
Yup.
Same. 
There really is no sadness involved for me, it's just an all-consuming void of apathy that eats motivation and time and shits out incomplete assignments and missed deadlines. Sometimes it almost feels nice as I get too tired to remember what I was supposed to do and get to experience the feeling of being free, then as my mood picks up the realization of how much responsibility i'm ignoring hits and I'm back in the void.
This is exaclty what I'm going through right now. Just reading that there is someone else that I can relate to makes it a bit better.
This is exaclty what I'm going through right now. Just reading that there is someone else that I can relate to makes it a bit better.
Misery loves company. That's why we're here. 
I just say I'm tired, if you say you are sad, people will often ask for an explanation. I don't know how to explain my feelings, to be honest, they arrive and change, sometimes because of a trigger, sometimes out of nothing.
Also 'I'm not feeling well' works great. It's technically not a lie.
 This is an excellent description! On point af
agreed. 
Why are you tired?  Why are you sad?  Like shoot off, I legit have no explanation.   My mom is the worse for this 'put a smile on your face, why are you sad? You must know? '.... says the mother who's been 'depressed' before.   Trust me if I knew, I'd change  
Well, I mean, we *do know*. Chemical imbalances and learned helplessness, for the most part. It's just that science isn't advanced enough yet to efficiently alleviate these problems for everyone.
My mom works in mental health but when her own daughter is diagnosed with depression? No, I just need to smile. I just need to eat better. I just need to think positive thoughts. I love my mom but it's hard when she doesn't think my depression is real. 
The shoemaker's kids have no shoes...ain't it the truth. 
I could've written this.
Same. :(
Same. :(
Yo tambien. 
It's not really tiredness though. When I'm not depressed, I can feel tired, but still satisfied. I would say it's more like a complete lack of vitality and motivation. A lack of life energy. Everything loses it's color, the world becomes desaturated. 
I love this. Thank you!
Haha, I usually just deadpan 'Nah I'm not tired, it's just the crippling depression' ¯\_(ツ)_/¯ 
Wish I could pull that off lol. 
Wish I could pull that off lol. 
Is it weird that I've reached a point where approaching life with a mixture of nihilism and apathy actually make me feel better?
Is it weird that I've reached a point where approaching life with a mixture of nihilism and apathy actually make me feel better?
Not really, I'm right there with you. I find self-depreciation to be what makes me feel really good because of the fact that I get to beat myself up before everyone else has a chance to, so I make a joke out of my screw-ups rather than being bashed for them.
I've learned that telling people 'I'm sad' will either lead to 1. them telling me that it could be worse and to cheer up or 2. Them trying to sympathize with a time in their life they were 'depressed'. Sometimes it just isn't worth the effort to be honest. 
Exactly.  That's why I always say I'm just tired.  It would be great to actually be able to talk to someone about it.
You guys don't know how validating y'all are. I always think I'm alone in my issues and it makes me feel a bit better to know that I'm not.
But it kinda sad that there are so many people at the same time... :
But it kinda sad that there are so many people at the same time... :
We're all in it together though! We need to remember that. 
I've take to just saying I'm not feeling well. People usually assume that means I feel sick and I don't correct them. If they ask me to elaborate I usually just say I'm not having a good day and that gets the point across
I've taken to saying I feel under the weather a lot. 
I didn't realize this for the longest time but when I did I realized how often I used 'I'm tired' in the past and that kind if terrifies me.
I'm using it a lot in the present 
Link? I'd really like to read that thread.
https://www.reddit.com/r/explainlikeimfive/comments/66zkaf/eli5_why_do_antidepressants_cause_suicidal/ The first comment here
Sometimes I wonder if the tiredness actually comes first!?! Causing the depression...
...No
...No
I notice myself getting tired spells during the days and weeks leading up to my depressions. It could be depression causing tired spells, but it could be tiredness causing depression... Or they could just be concurrent.  They definitely go hand in hand, but I have never read anything about it...
I appreciate it. If I figure out how to snap out of it you'll be the first to know haha
Haha cheers fella, it’d be appreciated 👍🏼
What's your job?
I do recreation at a nursing home. Just a college job... It sucks. not that its hard but I have to put on a fake smile all day... Id rather have a mindless job for now
Exactly this. I get home from work and rip bongs/indulge in other addictions solidly until I need to sleep. I've got laundry to do, and cooking, and cleaning, etc. Even personal hygiene. But nah, apparently my routine is more important.   It feels very stagnating but I can't seem to stop.
With the weed, I’ve started restricting how many skins I ever have on me at one time. I buy a cheap pack, take a couple out and chuck the rest. Sounds crazy but where are you gonna get a pack of skins pass 10 at night? It’s a nice cut off point and helps me manage it. I strongly recommend it! It’s working s treat for me, but I don’t use bongs or pipes, so that might be an issue if that’s your vessel of choice 😉
Im in the same situation, replace drink with canna. I kinda feel like you just have to force yourself to abandon whatever bad coping habits you have formed to leave the cycle as truthfully abusing them for a long time usually inhibits enjoyment. Problem is the cycle is familiar and comfortable in an odd way, and right now i cant seem to motivate myself to break it, even if i recognise that its necessary. 
Recognizing is the first step, and music helps with brain stimulus you’d get from your phone.   Also getting up early and having time to de-stress in the morning helps a lot. 
Recognizing is the first step, and music helps with brain stimulus you’d get from your phone.   Also getting up early and having time to de-stress in the morning helps a lot. 
Music seems to help me somewhat most days. I understand how hard it is to break the cycle. I am in the same rut. It is hard to feel motivated when the depression saps your personality , your hope and all your energy.
Music seems to help me somewhat most days. I understand how hard it is to break the cycle. I am in the same rut. It is hard to feel motivated when the depression saps your personality , your hope and all your energy.
Music used to help me, it still does sometimes when I find a new song I really like. But depression has dulled everything for me now. Music I used to love does nothing anymore, I don't even want to listen because I know I won't enjoy it.
Yes. This is my life. It's lonely and its shitty. I've recently pulled my socks up a bit and found a better job and a better place to live but it hasn't really helped much. I'm just waiting to die.
Same 
I have absolutely no energy to get anything done that needs to be done except when I'm at work. It's been 2 months since I was supposed to apply for health care and I just cannot get to it and it's been building up and giving me anxiety.
Sameee. I've let so many not-immediate-but-still-important responsibilities go I have a mild panic attack when I remember them. I feel ya 
Sameee. I've let so many not-immediate-but-still-important responsibilities go I have a mild panic attack when I remember them. I feel ya 
Yup. And then when I start them I get overloaded and can’t think 
I used to look forward to coming home, smoking bowls, and doing nothing, but recently I'll just get home, sit on the couch, and stare at the blank television for a couple minutes before deciding to take an hour long drive I can't sustainably afford gas for.
 I have a two hour commute round trip to work and people always ask me, how do I do it. My answer is that drive there, were I reflect on things and collect my thoughts has been so beneficial so I can totally relate to driving when stressed.  
Lol I basically planned by day around just that: today I'm going to eat a ton of oatmeal, then go running for like 1 1/2 hours to 2 hours straight, all so I can justify getting my dream pizza and getting hammered later tonight. 
Damn, this hits home. Especially the oatmeal
Damn, this hits home. Especially the oatmeal
Aren't we lucky to be privileged enough to waste our time, energy, and health like this? Eh, I suppose it really doesn't matter anyways.
Me today. Day off, rainy and dark. In my underwear about to order pizza, drink a few drinks and play resident evil. The life am I right? 
Sounds like heaven to me.
What games are your favorite? I need some new titles
Dying Light, Horizon Zero Dawn, Doom, GTAV, Red Dead Redemption, The Last of Us, Uncharted, LA Noire... those are all the games I’ve played recently. I actually bought a second hand PS3 a few months back with the intention of playing older games that I missed out on. My PS4 has had all my attention, though. 
Good luck bro, props for taking the necessary steps. Have you started to enjoy things more or is it still early days? 
Honestly, the anxiety and restlessness and overall hopelessness is gone. But aside from that too early to tell.  
Man working 10 hour days sucks. I'm unemployed now which also sucks but I used to work 10-12 hour days plus commute. No money is worth taking up that much of my time. 
You're 100% right. But bills man... also all those student loans suck 
Thank you. I've been volunteering one night a week but lately  it feels like part of the autopilot grind. Definitely something I need to keep figuring out
>  I've been volunteering one night a week but lately it feels like part of the autopilot grind.  That's nice, even if on autopilot.
I'm in school and yes, every day does seem like groundhog day. But on December 10th, I'll wake up and have a few weeks to breath... Next semester I only have one class, presuming I pass a super ugly test I have to take at the end of the semester.
Good luck on the test
Yes and I want to d*e
I feel ya buddy
Uhhh no.  No I don't, because I actually TRY to break and beat my depression.  
Grats bro, if this thread doesn't apply to you then why are you here? 
I understand  what you mean. It feels like wearing a mask sometimes. You keep pushing forward to make others happy. You do what's expected. But nights you take off the mask. Or sometimes, it just weighs too heavy and you are forced to take it off. Sometimes it cracks. I believe in you. You are not alone. Keep pushing forward. 
It's so much more tiring for me to have a day at uni, exercise and socialise, I envy everyone who can do it so naturally but I am so thankful I can actually function, even if its pretty hard sometimes. The mask gets difficult when I feel like I'm burdening the people close to me and I have to pretend I'm happy for them when usually thats when I'm completely honest and open about how I feel... Thank you for your kind words, hope all is good with you x
It's so much more tiring for me to have a day at uni, exercise and socialise, I envy everyone who can do it so naturally but I am so thankful I can actually function, even if its pretty hard sometimes. The mask gets difficult when I feel like I'm burdening the people close to me and I have to pretend I'm happy for them when usually thats when I'm completely honest and open about how I feel... Thank you for your kind words, hope all is good with you x
Just started uni and I don't know how i'm going to manage socially. I'm a boiling pot of water and someone has put a lid on me busy taking away a place to be alone. I don't know when I'm going to boil over from everything, but it won't be pretty  
Just started uni and I don't know how i'm going to manage socially. I'm a boiling pot of water and someone has put a lid on me busy taking away a place to be alone. I don't know when I'm going to boil over from everything, but it won't be pretty  
Check out the therapists at the health center. 
It's exhausting. I'll be hanging with my friends having coffee as usual  And the group we have there tends to grow and I'll spend two or three hours straight just talking to everyone. Smoking and drinking coffee. Eventually something clicks. And i feel worn down. My motivation to speak goes away, and at that point, its like i am sucked back into my room, where i can recover and revitalize myself. Where I can be myself. 
It super exhausting. And I get social anxiety thinking do my friends realize somethings off with me. That my personality isn't consistent when I check out? Then that's a whole other can of worms. 
I try to act frequently, and I've had a lot of training as an actor. Sometimes it honestly feels like my best 'performances' are days where I'm depressed, yet I'm able to function somewhat normally. I treat it like a performance because during those days I'm acting, pure and simple. I definitely understand how you feel.
As a black woman wearing the acceptable mask, I'm used to it.  
'Nobody realizes that some people expend tremendous energy merely to be normal.'  Albert Camus
Source?
Source?
https://www.goodreads.com/author/quotes/957894.Albert_Camus  Google is your friend
https://www.goodreads.com/author/quotes/957894.Albert_Camus  Google is your friend
Wow he's all over the place: 'live to the point of tears', 'in the midst of winter I found there was, within me, an invincible  summer' ............... 'should I kill myself, or have a cup of coffee.'   I like it
Yep. Some days I can't bring myself to open my email. Just can't do it, the thought makes me cringe. Picking up the phone can be a feat- especially when I don't know the number.  My body weighs 900 pounds and I feel like I've been shot with a tranquilizer dart.   But the worst part is the rationalization afterward. Am I a lazy person? Procrastinator? Afraid of commitment? How can I ever be productive?
This could be me, on a near daily basis. Sometimes I can't even answer the phone. The thought of talking to another person creates a tidal wave of panic and anxiety. 
I wish I could be the one with a high functioning depression. I can't work and that makes me feel really bad about my future.   But I understand you, it must be horrible because it makes depression even more confusing even to yourself. 
Aw I'm sorry about that, honestly I try to be as thankful as I can that I do actually function but because I manage I always think to myself; what's stopping me from just doing this so easily like normal people? Kind of like I'm 'so close but so far'.  I hope you manage to function one day soon, but you're ill at the moment, you might not be ill for your whole future x
It especially sucks when you're under a lot of pressure at work or school, and you have to live with the fact that no one realizes just how hard you have to fight every day just to even *show up*. No one knows how awful you feel while you're trying to get your work done, they just know you're not working as quickly or efficiently as you do on better days.
Exactly! I really hope one day there will be more understanding and less stigma. I try so hard just to get basic shit done,  but few people seem to recognize how impressive it is for someone with this little energy to accomplish anything.
I understand this. 😐 I didn't know it had a name.
I didn't understand it until a few weeks ago, I've been doubting that I've had depression since it started around 7 years ago until I learnt that functioning depression is a thing and recognised it and got help.
I didn't understand it until a few weeks ago, I've been doubting that I've had depression since it started around 7 years ago until I learnt that functioning depression is a thing and recognised it and got help.
Where do you get help? I'm so hesitant to self diagnose my depression but this is literally me everyday and I've never truly wanted to admit it. I'm sitting in a stall at work crying for the first time in God knows how long wondering what the shoot I'm supposed to be doing. I am so miserable I no longer want to live a luxurious life, right now I just want to live a normal one.
My god do I ever experience this on the daily. 
Me too. 
The hardest part of it all is not knowing when its going end or if its ever going to end. 
I'm afraid I'll one day be much older and still have a pointless life with nothing to be proud of
I'm afraid I'll one day be much older and still have a pointless life with nothing to be proud of
I don't know if I could take the mental anguish for that long. If you catch my drift. I'm 28 now. I wouldn't be able to stand the reality that I've gone nowhere when I'm 40.
I don't know if I could take the mental anguish for that long. If you catch my drift. I'm 28 now. I wouldn't be able to stand the reality that I've gone nowhere when I'm 40.
Basically. I've never been suicidal but I'm not well. I want to stay as far away from that point as I can and my current trajectory is going in the wrong direction.
mental illnesses are shit.
Powerful invisible monsters :(
As a high school student I struggled really hard with the dissonance that comes with being high functioning while depressed. The thought was always, 'my grades would be slipping and I wouldn't go out with my friends if I was really depressed.'  It's been 10 years since I was at my worst, and the fact that I was able to pull As and hold a job while being suicidal still blows my mind.   We're all so much stronger than we ever think.
It makes you feel like you're faking it or just making excuses for yourself, it sucks. I like the idea that I'm just being strong by managing to do all this stuff while being depressed, not just a lazy attention seeker.. Thank you for this comment, hope you're good now x
yep yep yep same here. Keep going, we both know there are others like us struggling like this. I think that knowledge will bring us a little peace of mind, perhaps? 
Absolutely, didn't expect this much attention from this post but I feel so much better knowing that It's not that uncommon 
Think it was near the 'get over yourself' aisle at the local 'things will eventually work out' mart, ya can't miss it. ^^^^^/s  But seriously people only ever get it when you take an extreme like suicide, and by then they can't do anything to make you better unless you somehow survive and possibly permanently disable yourself physically or mentally. All ages and all nationalities suffer from this, why is it still seen as 'oh no you're just feeling a little sad right now.'
Yeah. It hardly their fault, though. My mom used to be like that before I become really bad. She'd say stuff like, 'you have to CHOOSE joy' or 'don't let it consume you'. Like, thanks mom, I know you mean well, but 'choosing joy' would mean literally changing the physical state of my brain.
Yeah. It hardly their fault, though. My mom used to be like that before I become really bad. She'd say stuff like, 'you have to CHOOSE joy' or 'don't let it consume you'. Like, thanks mom, I know you mean well, but 'choosing joy' would mean literally changing the physical state of my brain.
Ok I choose happiness! ...now why didn't that work?   I WANT to be happy. My brain just needs extra help to function and keep me alive. 
I had a friend tell me 'well it sounds like you need to hang out with your friends! That always makes me feel better' ... 😒 Ok, im sure that is as effective as medication... 
Personally I find this is a pretty bad way to try to make myself feel better. Sure, I feel ok when I'm with my friends because everything we do is really just a distraction, but once I come home and sit down and think, I realise how much everyone else is progressing in their lives and how I'm just stuck here 'being sad' and generally makes me feel even more down than before. 
I normally go with “I’m just tired”. Response I’ve been using for the last 5 years and usually doesn’t get any follow up questions. 
I usually get a lot of: 'Tired of what? Sitting around all day doing nothing? Go do something with your life' and then I feel worse.
People just don't get that it actually is an illness. In their mind sadness = depression. You can't blame people for being dumb, it's not their fault.
I can blame them for not researching.
I can blame them for not researching.
well maybe they haven't been taught to do research on things like that
well maybe they haven't been taught to do research on things like that
My father refuses to research anything health related because he believes doing so would put you 'down a rabbit hole' and make you see health problems that aren't there, like medical students' disease, which is super frustrating because he refuses to think of depression as anything other than a personality or life-choice issue.
Yeah, think of it as when you were kid I couldn't possible comprehend the idea of someone killing themselves, like it seemed just a waste and pointless. Now on the other hand....
Can't relate since I wanted to die even as a child   haha
I will also often go with 'I'm not feeling well' or 'I'm just tired'.
Yep, I say I'm not feeling well or I'm not feeling my best. My husband and closest friends know exactly what that means because I've told them (negative thoughts, hopeless, having a pity party).
Do you want anyone to probe further? 
9 times out of 10, no.
I dislike it because I always answer 'yes'. I hate myself for lying when someone genuinely asked about me, not just as a trite question. If I say no, then I have to explain why and in the end, the other person has nothing to say except 'I'm sorry for you' or 'Everything happens for a reason' or 'Maybe things will get better'. I don't want their pity or cliched statements.
So what do you want people to do then? Not ask?
So what do you want people to do then? Not ask?
Yes 
That's the kicker, isn't it? If they ask, I get irritated. If they don't ask, I feel ignored. However I do realise I'm being irrational then and the feeling passes. So on the whole, yes I'd rather they not ask.
I hate this. I have to ingore almost all of my gut reactions cuz after a few seconds of thinking I realize I'm irrational. But then it's hard to tune into the gut feelings when I need to
'Are you okay?' Me: Yeah, just tired.
'Can't wait to go home, haha'
atleast people concern about u 
Thats not how it feels like, i'd rather somone ask me 'whats wrong' than 'are you ok', followed up by something like 'if you need anything i'm here for you'  thats what would actually feel like genuine concern. Nobody ever says that though lol 
Thats not how it feels like, i'd rather somone ask me 'whats wrong' than 'are you ok', followed up by something like 'if you need anything i'm here for you'  thats what would actually feel like genuine concern. Nobody ever says that though lol 
and if they do, chances are they don't really mean it and are just saying because that's what they're supposed to say. 
I've started answering honestly. 'No, but I'm working on it.' or 'No, not really but it's private.' Dang people who expect me to build up their happiness when they don't even know me.
Good on you, I think I'll try the same today.
Social interactions like this confuse me so much, nobody ever replies no to are you okay.  I just say 'the usual', because i am feeling the usual, like a piece of shit
So true, I always just say “it is what it is”, awful.
21 years old but an MCR song still comes to mind when someone asks me this:   'I'm Not Okay.' 
'trust me'  Now _this_ the most relatable thing, i don't even know how :c
It's like they know there's something wrong (hence why they're asking) but they want an excuse to not help.  Not saying they're bad for doing that since not everyone is capable of helping, but if you don't want to help then don't pretend to offer.
If someone asks..you just assume they are incapable of understanding you. Reaching out to you is useless, so I shouldn't pretend to offer?
If someone asks..you just assume they are incapable of understanding you. Reaching out to you is useless, so I shouldn't pretend to offer?
They may understand but they will always look at you and treat you differently. This is just my own experience, though.
Don't ever move to the UK. 'Alright?' is a pretty common greeting lol
I live in the UK too, and I still have an impulse to say 'no' anyway. Not good if you just passed by an old friend in a supermarket.
It's uncanny how much I relate to this. If you have good YouTube channels, feel free to share. I can list some of the channels I watch for this too.
Bob Ross helps me to not feel that lonely. All his 'Joy of Painting' episodes are on YouTube.
Bob Ross helps me to not feel that lonely. All his 'Joy of Painting' episodes are on YouTube.
I second the bob ross videos. I love piano music in the back too. Have them 24/7
I have to have a fan going, my nature sounds running, and an old episode of MBMBaM playing or I just cannot sleep. If I don't have those distractions to ease me to sleep, I'm simply too damn scared to fall asleep.  What if someone tries to hurt me in my sleep? What if *he* comes back and I'm not ready? What if I'm half asleep and someone tries to take advantage of me while my guard is down?  I just want it all to shut up.
You can let go of your fear. No matter what, you will be stronger than them because of what kind of good you believe in.
I can’t have silence at any moment, for any reason. Even if there are people around, I have to have a familiar background noise.   For me my background noises of choice are The Office on Netflix, Hans Zimmer compositions, or science channels on YouTube.   Don’t feel out of place or “weird” because you can’t handle silence. Embrace it. Find something that brings you laughter, peace, or knowledge. Then run with it. 
I'm currently binging the Office on Netflix as my silence killer!
I suggest listening to something when you fall asleep. Personally I listen to horror stories to fall asleep. 
I can't believe I'm not the only one! These days I just read them, but they do help me sleep.
oh god, i'm so sorry. it might not help saying this, but you're better off without him. 
Thank you. I need to hear that I think
Thank you. I need to hear that I think
I saw your comment and just wanted to say I'm sorry that happened to you. Sounds like that person was very judgmental and i'd say you dodged a bullet! Don't let the fact that they couldn't deal with it get you down.  Good luck and I hope you have a good day :)
Sounds like a  idiot. Deserves to have that dot in his eye after taking a photo with flash on for the rest of his life. You're much better off without him.   I hope you have a nice day/evening/night/morning :) 
😂 'Deserves to have that dot in his eye...' I might have to start using that one if that's okay with you lol
I naively believed all of the advice I had read in the past about opening up to others if you're struggling, and that's exactly what happened. I lost any friends I had, including my best friend of about ten years. That was a terrible mistake. I really regret ever looking to others for help.
It seems like the only people who understand and are okay to talk to are those who experience it themselves. I’m really sorry. You’ve always got me, and the rest of us in r/depression, to talk to.
Might you be projecting that onto him? Maybe that's not what he's actually feeling.
Kitchens1nk , totally possible, maybe likely. Maybe a combination of reasons, too. I do get lost in my own head when I’m trying to figure out if my thoughts are from my own intuition, or the depression talking. Great reminder of trying to keep perspective. Thank you 
I opened up to someone and he was great about it, but I always feel soooo guilty because there's just so much shit in my life and he's heard about ALL of it, and I feel like he shouldn't have to deal with that. I am now completely incapable of making eye contact with him. lol.
The fact that you opened up to him shows that you trust him. My SO told me everything about himself, and I was able to start opening up to him in return. Ever since we have become inseparable, though I have to admit it was a little uncomfortable at first. :-P
The fact that you opened up to him shows that you trust him. My SO told me everything about himself, and I was able to start opening up to him in return. Ever since we have become inseparable, though I have to admit it was a little uncomfortable at first. :-P
I'm glad things worked out like that! :) in my case he doesn't seem to think it's awkward but ahh I've always been weird about opening up
No one has ever taken my issues seriously. It took me becoming a half-starved shell for them to take it seriously, and all they did was threaten to send me to a mental hospital. So now I confide in no one, except for all you lovely people.   Thanks guys. I love you.
Love you, too!
A little late, but I feel sorry for you. Things should go better for you.
Thank you. I really appreciate it. How are you?
Thank you. I really appreciate it. How are you?
Me? I’m good for now, drawing again, but mood keeps swinging. Must be the weather. Thanks for asking though, didn’t expect this.
I think that I hide my depression pretty well. To my friends, I appear funny and energeric, so I am afraid that they would think I am joking if I open up, which would make me feel even worse than I already do.
I do this too. I have only opened up a tiny bit here and there, but when I have, what I have found, is that they do take me seriously, but they don't grasp the extent i am struggling because I can't ever really let down the mask outside of maybe that tiny bit of vulnerability...so the next second we are laughing and joking again.  They do 100% believe me...but the depth is what they miss. 
I also hate complaining to people because they're always just waiting for their turn to speak. 
I don't mind the commiseration of them complaining, too, especially if it is about similar things or similar feelings...but only if they ACTUALLY LISTEN, and not just jumping in with their chance to complain. 
No one cares that I want to end my life.
I care. You have no idea what wonderful things may be in store for you if you just wait it out. I went through a really low point too, and looking back, I am so glad that I kept going, I would have missed so much. 
I told my sister nothing feels like home to me, not even home. She said it's the saddest thing she's ever heard. 
Welcome to my world, sister. 
Same, i feel i have to go on a journey to find home, but going place to place searching is going to take a lot of time and effort which i dont have
This what i’ve been trying to do. I have time, effort has been hard but I’ve done it.  I underestimated the money of it all, though.  So even with time and effort it’s easy to fall on your face.
Me and my mom moved 500 miles away last March after my dad died, I’ve spent the last 7 months hating where I am now and yearning to be home again. Last Wednesday was my first time going back since leaving and my former group of friends all hung out without me, saying that I didn’t fit into their plans...I’m not sure where I’m supposed to call my home now.
That's the hardest lesson in life to come to terms with... Once you leave something (or someone) behind, you leave it for good.
When I was a child I would look down a street and become overwhelmed by a feeling to run down it until I was miles away and somewhere anywhere else. The longing was raw and powerful and I've never felt anything as strongly as I felt that. And sometimes during my nighttime strolls when I'm on a deserted street I've felt the exact same feeling. Nothing has come close to that feeling.
To this day I sometimes feel like this. You know, when you take a look at faraway city in the distance, and it feels like if only you'd get to that place, everything would be OK and all your problems would be solved instantly.
To this day I sometimes feel like this. You know, when you take a look at faraway city in the distance, and it feels like if only you'd get to that place, everything would be OK and all your problems would be solved instantly.
I can see a distant cityscape from my window and at night when it's all lit up, it looks so beautiful and peaceful that it makes me cry. 
I can see a distant cityscape from my window and at night when it's all lit up, it looks so beautiful and peaceful that it makes me cry. 
nice! i see the wall of another house
To this day, i’m still not sure I have a home, nor what that idea represents.  It just sometimes feels like you don’t belong anywhere and you never will
'Not all who wander are lost.'  I'm not sure though that I'm *not* lost.
I feel this completely. I'm currently sat in an empty car park in my car not having a clue what to do with myself, I have a home but it doesn't feel like home.. I wander around shops just to be out wondering if anyone else feels as lost as I do. 
Yep. I used to drive around for hours after work not wanting to go home. I lived with a roommate.  I saw it as, not wanting to meet myself.  Meet my emptiness and lack of presence. Driving seemed like I was going some place,  even tho I wasn't. I realized, I have little 'presence' in my life and that's what I'm running from.
In my opinion, home is where your loved ones are. If you feel like you don't have enough of that right now, don't worry. It's never too late to find those people, to meet and love them and be loved back. It's never too late to find your home.
I couldnt agree more. But when you call someone 'home', life could take that only home away from you so easily.
I couldnt agree more. But when you call someone 'home', life could take that only home away from you so easily.
:( this hits me so hard. Home no longer feels like home anymore because the person I loved is no longer there. I’m travelling right now but feel like I have nothing to go back for.   
That's why you shouldn't only rely on one person for emotional support. I think in our culture (speaking as someone who lives in the West) we fetishise romance to the detriment of other kinds of relationships (friendships, etc). 
Couldn't agree more!
There is family of origin and family of choice. 
r/raisedbynarcissists
Can't give up hope though, that's not an option.
Too late, it abandoned a while ago.
It's an ever present sense of nostalgia for something unidentifiable and long lost, for me. A constant yearning for.....something. 
https://en.m.wikipedia.org/wiki/Saudade
Very interesting. Lost my mother at age 7 and have had so much abnormal tragic shit happen. Thanks. 
I'm so sorry!  And you're welcome. It's one of my most favorite words. Another one is *voyage*.
https://en.m.wikipedia.org/wiki/Saudade
Thanks, TIL! As a manga reader, I'm familiar with the concept of Mono no aware, but Saudade seems closer to the feeling of melancholic nostalgia/longing that I/we feel all the time.
I relate to this so much. In my weakest moments I'm crying and saying 'I wanna go home. I wanna go home.' No idea where I am talking about. It's more of a feeling. I want to go to a warm place, a safe place, where there is nothing to worry about.
I do the exact same thing. l cry that I want my mom where in reality I can't stand her.  l suppose we both miss the safe and protected feeling of our childhood. (tbh my childhood was neither safe nor protected, still... l was very close to my mom while growing up.)
I feel this too. I’ll be at home and tell myself “I wanna go home” but then I realize I’m at home. 
Totally.
I’ve lived in four cities in the past four years. My hometown is toxic and awful. The only reason I go back is for my family. It isn’t home. Where I live right now isn’t home either. I feel like I haven’t felt like I have a home since a young teenager. 
Me since I was 21 or 22. Almost a decade now. l moved to a different continent in search of home. Still looking.
Wwhhoooooo I'm from Washington state
We moved to the tri cities area
We moved to the tri cities area
Awesome, I'm looking to move to Portland.  I'm in bham right now 
I moved from AZ to WA state only 3 years ago, sometimes it still doesn't feel right but its better than AZ weather.
I've lived in Tennessee all my life except for 3 months in indiana. Its like a breath of fresh air everywhere i look
Oh man. Our goal is to get to Washington. I hope you guys settle in to your new home soon. ❤️
Thanks! We sold everything we could and took a trailer and about 500 in gas for two cars 
Thanks! We sold everything we could and took a trailer and about 500 in gas for two cars 
You make it sound so easy. I can't wait until we get there! The husband and I are just waiting for a Washington store to open up for a new SM (he's in retail). Maybe we'll meet you there one day!
I always felt like this, having been in the art and travelling about for 10 years plus, always wanted to keep moving anywhere and everywhere. But then I found a girl.. and she’s the same, always moving. But when we come together again.. that’s home.  Everything about her is home, from the smells to the warmth, and the clock that is her heartbeat. So it doesn’t matter where in the world we end up really.. home is where we both are
I've had this before, a few times actually, what's awful is when it's taken away.   Maybe I'll have it again someday. 
You're truly the most blessed man on earth.
And I know it. Thankyou for the reminder though.. every time I get that feeling that maybe I can’t be bothered to reply, or I’m annoyed with her, I’ll take a deep breath, and re look at what you wrote to remind myself of the fact...!
How do I like this a million times?! I've been constantly telling my family this for years, but I don't know where to go. They all thinking I'm crazy because I have a good life here, but that doesn't mean it feels like home! I've thought about running away to the forest, other countries, even my old family home, and nothing seems right.   I'm about to move to the moon
Sometimes home is a kindred soul.
Me too man, me too. This world is so shooted up in so many ways and they focus on all the wrong things.  Have you checked for OCD?
I haven't, I don't think I've really experienced the symptoms of OCD though. Is this thought/feeling common with people with OCD as well? 
I haven't, I don't think I've really experienced the symptoms of OCD though. Is this thought/feeling common with people with OCD as well? 
No, it's not like that. But you mentioned obtrusive thoughts, so... Just get it checked. Better be safe than sorry! ☺️
Same here.I made a subreddit just for this.
Which one
I know that feeling also... The home I grew up in is now owned by someone else, even tho I was supposed to inherit it.  The new home I made for myself, I just recently lost also.  
That sucks!
I think I procrastinate before _everything,_ even if it's something I really need to do, like eat, sleep, or use the bathroom (I've never done the piss in a bottle thing, I just hold it in).  I'll just be in pain and exhausted, but I'll be like 'No, I don't really want to do that.'
I would love to take a crap for the last hour but it can wait I think.  
I would love to take a crap for the last hour but it can wait I think.  
Sometimes poos are more rewarding if you let them develop though.
Sometimes poos are more rewarding if you let them develop though.
Until you got a lovely 2 pounder.
I find my procrastination having to do more with things I used to enjoy. I feel like I can't derive joy out of any activity at the moment. It's just a constant hell of boredom and apathy (among other things) about everything. 
I procrastinate playing a video game I've been wanting to play for ages. I procrastinate watching an episode of a series I should like. I procrastinate reading more of a book.  I loose all interest in everything. Life is just forcefully going through the motions of living
I procrastinate playing a video game I've been wanting to play for ages. I procrastinate watching an episode of a series I should like. I procrastinate reading more of a book.  I loose all interest in everything. Life is just forcefully going through the motions of living
Man that word, 'forcefully'. I feel like everything I do requires *willpower*. By the end of a day of *forcing* myself to do things I reach a point where I am just done. Right now I can't even get up and just go to bed. 
Go to a party with 2-3 friends ang get drunk. Not one of these bar evenings. Rather these loud music, techno beer stuff. Dontlet your selfminded buddys be like 'naw mate, party is for idiots etc' Just go, get drunk and let loose, meaning just dance like you dont care how you look like. It will help belive me. Its fun and the next morning you feel like you have a terrible headache. Now go jogging. After that you find joy in doing nothing for a while
This advice definitely does not suit most people with depression.
Totally. I am led to believe this is a mixed anxiety/depression feature. The process is something like 'I want to do this thing > I'll lose control of it > I'll fail > I can control it by choosing to fail from the outset'.
You might be right.
I really like CSGO. Sometimes, on holiday I would wake up thinking 'I'll get breakfast and spend the rest of the day practicing and trying to get higher in ranks'. And then just scroll Reddit for the whole day.
It’s like we have to force ourselves to do almost anything.
It’s like we have to force ourselves to do almost anything.
This exactly.
Oh yeah, probably 70% of my life is procrastination atm lol 
90% for me not counting sleep
Yes, it's quite odd. Even when I am studying and have absolutely no technology around me, I just sit there and stare into space. Disrupting and my concentration has completely gone.
I️ have such a hard time focusing on anything. When I study I️ either need someone to help me or I use adoral to focus. Even then I️ get distracted. 
Do you have high levels of anxiety & stress?
I'm a fairly anxious person and don't handle stress well, but those things came about after the depression tbh
I love to plant beautiful gardens every spring. This year I did but my heart wasn’t in it. By July I’d say to myself  “I really need to get out there and water today”.  Then I’d put it off till the next cause it just felt overwhelming. By early Aug they were all dead. And I felt really bad each day for putting off but not enough to go out and water them
Because of depression etc. you can literally convince your brain to not take pleasure in doing things you love. Even though you know that you want to do it so much and it's better than doing nothing, you still choose the latter, because somehow you succumb to the part of the brain that makes you feel miserable. It's really like a Stockholm Syndrome, you want to get away from your captor, yet you stay idle.
I love watching anime but I have trouble deciding on what to watch from my list and instead just spend hours on Reddit that I could have spent watching something.
That's the worst, I used to not know what movie should I watch cause there's so many that I want to see and I usually ended up watching nothing, fortunately I do that less nowadays.
Mmh, I procrastinate things I enjoy but that require performance somehow. If you procrastinate tv watching, what activity do you do instead of it?
I browse internet/reddit, listen to some music or watch YouTube videos.
My wife called me up for sex 20 minutes ago.
What I would do to have someone in my life...well procrastinate at first for sure...
*raises hand*  *Goes back to aimlessly surfing through the internet*
Attempts to wave at you due to common interests.   Never make any attempt to speak. Returns to aimlessly surfing through the net. 
Yeah, the fact is I like it more than I don't. Studying what I want, watching what I want, sometimes being slightly productive, even. Taking care of things.  Sometimes, though, it gets me. People have friends in the city they live in, people to call and see every weekend. I don't.  Sometimes I go places and don't click with anyone, just go back home worse off.
Are you me 
Are you me 
Yeah, let's add multiple personalities on the plate, just to further mud the waters
Yeah, let's add multiple personalities on the plate, just to further mud the waters
lol 
That's the thing, the loneliness can get pretty bad, but having complete control over your evening makes it worth it. I don't have to deal with others pestering me.
I think it's more lonely to be around the wrong people. 
I think it's more lonely to be around the wrong people. 
The wrong people feel way worse than being alone ever will. Some make me grateful for my alone time.
Yes. Zero. None. My only two acquaintances are dogs. I'm getting to the point where if a human being does talk to me, it's almost too overwhelming and I don't respond appropriately and get flustered and weird. Oh well.
Sometimes people don't think I speak English because I stare at them in confusion or give short replies (or maybe they're just racist, lol). 😁   To think at one point in my life I wanted to be an author and even wrote a poem that got published in a local magazine. Sad truth is that it doesn't matter what I once was, because the mess I am now is the only thing people see. 
Loneliness is slightly less painful than people.
That perfectly describes how I feel sometimes, even though it's hard to admit. 
YO WHAT'S UP MY DUDE I'M DEAD INSIDE BUT I LURK REDDIT, PLAY VIDEOGAMES, SMOKE MARIJUANA AND WATCH NETFLIX TO NUMB THE PAIN
Don't we all
Don't we all
No, not all of us like smoking and/or drinking
That's me. Besides school and work both of which I am forced to go to. I have no way of expressing myself, depression has taken over my life and I can feel my mind slowly stagnating. It is very sad to feel trapped like this. I want to be happy.  
Well you won't be happy if you end up unemployed with NO social life.
Well you won't be happy if you end up unemployed with NO social life.
I know, you're right. I just want a way out.
Yup. Though I tend to prefer to be asleep, since only then can I not be aware of reality. The internet isn't able to distract me all the time...sometimes even making things worse.  I only go outside once every 2 weeks for therapist appointments. And I also don't interact with family much.  Sigh. Hopefully this lifestyle of little activity leads to my death soon. It's the only hope I have.
Even with depression, death just sends chills through my spine...  I like to be asleep too, it helps me deal with my emotions when i get too emotional  At least you go to the therapist though, that's a good first step.
Yep going for a drive to get a coffee seems like an adventure to me. 
That's good though. Start with the small things and build up. Edit: small mistake
That's good though. Start with the small things and build up. Edit: small mistake
> Start with the smash things and build up.  Gotta break a few eggs to make an omelette.
I just sit in my recliner playing video games and switching to YouTube. It's simple but for some reason I'm happy. 
I feel like that too, but it just doesn't feel right to me.   I'll have to support myself eventually (i'm a teen not a neckbeard mind you) with a job eventually, just the concept of having to go to a job and working scares me.  I won't accomplish anything if i stay like this, or if i don't get a job 
I guess the grass is always greener on the other side.  I was lonely and without a gf for a while and was depressed because of this. But then miraculously I got a gf. And she turns out to be a complete pain. Now I wish I could be alone again. But then i realize how alone i was and that also sucked....shoot
I have experienced that it's better to be alone than in bad company. If you aren't happy in the relationship, find someone you can be happy with. Being alone is at the very least peaceful even if a bit lonely sometimes. 
Yep! And I try to make friends but I'm not really sure how, and everything I've tried is failing.
If you go out and try to find freind you will find none, if you go out to be a good friend, you will befriend the world- some guy with friends 
If you go out and try to find freind you will find none, if you go out to be a good friend, you will befriend the world- some guy with friends 
How can i be a good friend if i don't know what that's like?
The best way is to find a hobby and be the first one to make a move, but it's not easy to have the confidence or energy to do so. 
I have tried over and over to contact first, and have tried several different hobby groups, I am still friendless, I don't even have acquaintances really.  
Have you seen NHK?
I have. Twice. I could really resonate with Satou. I saw it once when I was in high school and once again when I became a NEET. It has become one of my all-time favorite anime. 
Unfortunately, yes. Sometimes I actually think that presenting a positive outlook to other people on social media is sort of like 'fake it until you make it.' But in reality, I know that's not real life. I'm hungry, too. I know living on SSI just isn't enough to satisfy that hunger. I want to make plans, but I don't feel like I would ever gain the motivation to actually follow through with them.
Take small steps. Do something different that's relatively easy to do. Once you've done it look at it. How much you enjoyed it and maybe plan for the next one. Nothing is a rush and wait for the moment that you feel comfortable to make the change. But when you feel like it, give it a try 
Yep reddit is all i got!!    I wanna join college so bad but my agoraphobia is so bad 
amen brother. good luck to you
amen brother. good luck to you
Thank you my freind:)
I sit in an office for 40+ a week and STILL have no social life inside or outside the office. 
At least you have some social interactions 
I can't even make it out of bed to get to my computer 
Then how are you here?
Then how are you here?
She never left
Yep, I finished college recently and I have been doing this for the past couple of months. I wake up, eat breakfast, stare at the computer, lunch, stare, and sleep.
My life after graduating too. Then suddenly I realized 5 years went by and I forgot about my career/job and school bills. 
Yep, and I'm in college, which is supposed to be one of the easiest times in life to make a lot of friends. When I graduate next year I'm shooted...
Personally i think that when you're just at the start of your teens (and childhood too), that is the easiest time, i guess i'm inclined to that since it's what happened to me
It's worse when this reality smacks me in the face. I was making small talk with a guy working on my car the other day. He asked me what I do for work, I answer IT. He asks me what I do for fun, I answer computer. He immediately went silent. I gather that he's probably the type that believes if you have nothing good to say then don't say anything at all.
Perhaps he felt like you didn't really want to chat if you were only giving brief answers? Maybe he wasn't judging you the way you think
I love going out with friends, it's my escape from the dark scary place i'm in when i'm alone with my thoughts. I feel like i'm one of the only extroverted people with depression on reddit  That being said, I haven't been able to go out much recently because i got a job a couple weeks ago so i'm always tired between work and school, so that's why my depression is becoming more and more prevalent.
Same here, but I guess I'm weird. After I hang out with people and have a good time, I get down because for me hanging out with people isn't common. So it's like a taste of fun only to come back to real life. 
In essence, yes.  Many people are like that, I believe.
I don't even think that it's a problem. If other stuff is more interesting than social life, why waste your time on something that does not bring any good emotions at all? 
Yep. Played LoL the whole day basically and made me feel even worse because I should've been doing stuff and I wasted all that time.
Nothing worse than wasting your entire day on league and ending with less LP than you even started with...
Nothing worse than wasting your entire day on league and ending with less LP than you even started with...
I don't even play ranked anymore lol. For some reason, I play with better people in normals. It's a lot less frustrating.
Are you  student? Or do you work?
Im in highschool and I dont work
Yep. Just got a dog so that should help with the loneliness.
Not even my dog wants to be my friend.
This shouldn't have made me laugh, but it's too accurate.
This shouldn't have made me cry, but it's too accurate.
I went through this.  My ex just asked me 'When are you going to grow up?'  Dang her.
She doesn't get it. She can sit and spin.
She doesn't get it. She can sit and spin.
She's some other guy's problem now.
Your counsellor is a champ!
Thankyou! And also quite glad that I can talk about having a counselor somewhere and I get positive response instead of that fear look people get
This kinda reminds me of Allie Brosh's post about depression on [Hyperbole and a Half](http://hyperboleandahalf.blogspot.com/2011/10/adventures-in-depression.html). Totally worth reading.
That was pretty amazing. Thanks for posting that.
At first I thought the person was turning into a shrimp. Then I realized it was the shirt.
Sometimes depression feels like you're turning into a shrimp...
Sometimes depression feels like you're turning into a shrimp...
Or a cockroach.  There's a nice story about that.
Too true.  I saw something similar to this a long time ago.  Like years.  This is different enough for me to consider it original.  I really like the drawings theyre so accurate :(
You're right, this comic is very similar to the Hyperbole and a Half one. [Link.](http://hyperboleandahalf.blogspot.com/2011/10/adventures-in-depression.html)
All I got from my shrink when I did that was a weird look because she 'doesn't understand why I'm depressed' what an unqualified idiot
How does this knob have a job?
How does this knob have a job?
A friend saw a psychologist and they brought up everything she’d been holding back, dug up every bad thought, then said see you next session in a months time. There are so many unqualified psychologists it’s unbelievable.
A friend saw a psychologist and they brought up everything she’d been holding back, dug up every bad thought, then said see you next session in a months time. There are so many unqualified psychologists it’s unbelievable.
To some it's just a job. They don't have much invested
LMAO I'm glad I'm not the only one. I went to a psychologist for anorexia and he said it wasn't a big deal because I had 'a pretty nice body' ... I was 15, he was like 55. 
That's shooted up! I'm sorry you had to deal with that unprofessional idiot. 
I was seeing a social worker after high school for 2 years (and saw her a few times when I was around 8 due to family issues) and when I asked her, she didn't think I had depression. She ended up booking an appointment with two - I repeat - two psychologists. Neither of them saw any signs of depression.  And yet, I would argue my entire life revolves around it. I suffer from 9/10 symptoms and I haven't wanted to live a single day of my life.
how does that process work? 
how does that process work? 
I don't really remember but I believe they did the usual tests and evaluations.
If she doesn't understand why you're depressed, she's just told you she's given up on her job/isn't doing her job and that you shouldn't be working with her anymore. Its like an admission of incompetence, wtf
And my GP once asked if I thought I was depressed because I was poor or because I didn't have a girlfriend...and people wonder why I don't want more 'professional' help
My regular doctor I saw before a psychologist was basically like  Me- I'm depressed   Doctor- why you think that  Me- I tried to kill myself.  Doctor- you may be depressed see a psychologist     Ya no shit doctor 
They're trying to train doctors to handle these situations better, but it's definitely an adjustment for them. I was once asked in broken English (little Asian lady) if I 'feel sad sometimes.' My response was 'Well, yeah?' And she got wide-eyed like an alarm went off as she hurried out of the room.  She came back quickly with a psych reference and a bunch of information and a mini crisis handbook. Christ, lady, I just said I feel sad sometimes.
They're trying to train doctors to handle these situations better, but it's definitely an adjustment for them. I was once asked in broken English (little Asian lady) if I 'feel sad sometimes.' My response was 'Well, yeah?' And she got wide-eyed like an alarm went off as she hurried out of the room.  She came back quickly with a psych reference and a bunch of information and a mini crisis handbook. Christ, lady, I just said I feel sad sometimes.
Yet here you are, on this sub. Clearly, that tiny woman holds great amounts of wisdom.
Yet here you are, on this sub. Clearly, that tiny woman holds great amounts of wisdom.
Oh trust me I needed that reference (although admittedly I threw it away).  Although I'd be impressed if she really knew that from my awkward 'Yeah?' Even now I'm glad that she took it seriously, but it was just a funny moment. Or maybe she saw through my sham. 
I've had that happen to me. I went to a podiatrist about an ingrown nail. He noted that the nail did indeed need to be operated on and dismissed me telling me to see a specialist. WTF was he?!?!
Yes you do indeed seem to be on fire, unfortunately my degree is in burn treatment not putting out fires. See a fireman. Alright that'll be 300 bucks.
Yes you do indeed seem to be on fire, unfortunately my degree is in burn treatment not putting out fires. See a fireman. Alright that'll be 300 bucks.
yes you do seem to be on fire, hold on here's some water... *chucks a hacked apart water canister at person*
I didn’t want to bring that score up when I spoke about it with my primary. She just wants me to try therapy again and see how that goes. That might be good for mild to moderate, but I scored 69 on that test. 10 points above the severe cutoff. 
I'm sorry...but 69 :p
I'm sorry...but 69 :p
You're a winner *and* a loser when...
Did you get to enter your initials somewhere?
1. A S S    2. R A B   3. P E N   4. 1 5 5
1. A S S    2. R A B   3. P E N   4. 1 5 5
Is that a Harry Potter reference?
Is that a Harry Potter reference?
Yeah second one is Regulus Arcturus Black. 
I don’t know if I should laugh or feel bad
Welcome, friend. 
>I'm really good at being depressed
It's almost like I was born with the raw materials for persistent dysthemia (and probably a personality disorder or two), was forged in the hot fires of a tumultuous childhood,  and was tempered in the freezing waters of an underwhelming adulthood.
It's almost like I was born with the raw materials for persistent dysthemia (and probably a personality disorder or two), was forged in the hot fires of a tumultuous childhood,  and was tempered in the freezing waters of an underwhelming adulthood.
DEUS VULT
Is there a proper online test? Over here in Germany I never had to fill out any of those tests.
I do believe that most therapists/ psychologists use the Beck's Depression Inventory:   PDF: https://www.google.com/url?sa=t&source=web&rct=j&url=https://www.increase-project.eu/images/DOWNLOADS/IO2/DE/CURR_M2-A12_Beck-Depr-Invent_(EN-only)_20170920_DE_final.pdf&ved=0ahUKEwjM6_7xg8nYAhUBTCYKHe1_APMQFghQMAM&usg=AOvVaw10xdM-6q4D_rYVxsQHQfPW  Online: http://treat-depression.com/depression-test  Edit: formatting plus non-pdf link
I do believe that most therapists/ psychologists use the Beck's Depression Inventory:   PDF: https://www.google.com/url?sa=t&source=web&rct=j&url=https://www.increase-project.eu/images/DOWNLOADS/IO2/DE/CURR_M2-A12_Beck-Depr-Invent_(EN-only)_20170920_DE_final.pdf&ved=0ahUKEwjM6_7xg8nYAhUBTCYKHe1_APMQFghQMAM&usg=AOvVaw10xdM-6q4D_rYVxsQHQfPW  Online: http://treat-depression.com/depression-test  Edit: formatting plus non-pdf link
 Sorry, that's a pdf, I'll try to find it on a site. Edit: okay,  all fixed. 
Seriously, I remember when I used to play and just had a good time no matter what.   Now it feels like a chore that I do because at least I’ll be distracted from all the shit in my head. Now I almost can’t take losing and take it so seriously because it’s something I do so often I can’t accept how terrible I do sometimes. 
Dang, me too. Often feels like a chore and have no desire to play anything new. No interest at all to play any challenging games anymore. Feel like gaming is the only thing I’m good at and yet I suck at it.
Same here... I used to love video games, and that bums me out so much. These days, I just end up thinking 'why am I even doing this? It just frustrates me. I'm not even enjoying myself' and turning it off.
Same, most of my games I only resent playing because of one flaw or another. nothing is really ever fun anymore. even new games are joyless, AAA or indie. nothing matters
yea :/ but i started playing skyrim again recently and its pretty fun still. casual gameplay, pretty much cant lose but doesnt feel *too* easy. have u played skyrim?
I also played skyrim but it does not seem fun to me anymore like it used to be.I do play a lot of RPG game but none seem to amaze me.Maybe my mind is shooted up .
I also played skyrim but it does not seem fun to me anymore like it used to be.I do play a lot of RPG game but none seem to amaze me.Maybe my mind is shooted up .
Try something you've never done before - a new challenge. I used to go for playing as myself as honestly as possible. I'm a wimp so no weapons except daggers and I would use summoning magic.  Respond to quests and decisions in the way you actually would rather than the way that's best. You'd be surprised how much fun challenges like this can be. 
Try different builds of ur character
Skyrim? Build? We all go down as stealth archer my friend
Retrogaming always makes me feel a little better, no matter how badly I feel the void. That's because all of my childhood is crystallized in that games and I want to live again like I'm an embodiment of my former self
same I still enjoy the nostalgia. not sure if games were better, I was less jaded/depressed, or if that was just the wonderfulness of childhood that I'll never experience again
I can't enjoy them anymore either. And I just got a new laptop for this. It sucks.
Try a new hobby?...id love to get a laptop that can handle rendering for animation..try learning 3d animation/modelling on blender. Its free and really cool. Start with an andrew price video like how to make a mug(the goto basic tut) and over time you may(will) like it..  Id also recommend OP this.   If not there is a growing cryptocurrency sub here which is always interesting to check out
I can't even concentrate on the damn thing. shoot me lol
I will shoot you... in Overwatch! *pew pew pew*
I will shoot you... in Overwatch! *pew pew pew*
Geez that made my day.... 
Have you ever played Life is Strange?
Such an emotionally gripping game! You become so attached to those characters , and the soundtrack is perfect. I wish I could replay that game and experience it how I did playing it for the first time. Amazing game! 
I feel this too. I feel perfectly alright and the smallest of things could go wrong and it sets off a trigger somewhere and suddenly I'm once again thinking of everything that went wrong and could go wrong and drowning in a downward spiral already...
I’m in the same process right now. It makes it worse knowing that a week ago I felt like I was on top of the world and that maybe this time I’d finally found a way to manage it. One tiny little trigger has sent me spiraling emotionally over the last few days. 
Yea same. I felt really good about myself this week but I'm already becoming depressed again
Hey, me too
I can relate. Sometimes late at night I’ll feel fine. Then I’ll go to sleep and wake up depressed as hell. It’s like I’m afraid to sleep cause I don’t know what kinda mood I’ll be in when I wake up.
Exactly this. I'm worried about tomorrow. I'm in a good mood now, but it's past midnight after finishing work. See which one I get tomorrow.... Dr jekyll or mr hyde
So this reminded me of a really good song.  'Comes and Goes (in waves)' by Greg Laswell. Almost verbatim of what you wrote ha. Music helps me get through things, and this song is stellar. Listen to it buddy and know that he clearly felt the same way you are and that you aren't alone :)
I like 'waves of loneliness' by Jon bellion
I like 'waves of loneliness' by Jon bellion
IRobot by Jon Bellion is so good too @_@
By the time a wave of depression hits me it’s already too late.   But I’ve started to recognize the signs of one coming, and there are certain things I can do to quell or entirely avoid an incoming wave.  Sort of like all the water rushing out to sea before a tsunami rolls in. When I feel something like that happening I’m like, “Oh shoot, get to the high ground!”
'It's over, depression! I have the high ground!'
'It's over, depression! I have the high ground!'
If you're not with me then your my enemy..... Only depression deals in absolutes
Better its waves than constant.
Not to me. The little bits of happiness give me hope and then I try to be better and reach out to the people I’ve isolated.. and then it washes over me again, and the cycle repeats. I’d rather just have it all the time. 
Last week I felt so bad that I decided after my exam tomorrow I'd go to a therapist. Now the depression wave is down, just like it happens everytime I decide to go to therapy. I don't know if I should go.
Go. Because when it gets bad again you won't have the energy or cognitive resources to reach out. And it will get bad again.
This sounds like bipolar disorder.
Not really. Bipolar disorder waves are far spread out, not happening rapidly in moments 
There's really something about showers that somehow sparks hope in me. Idk. It's so therapeutic. When I'm in the shower, it feels like I can do anything again. Or I have all these set of plans to get back on my feet again. Sometimes when I shower I just don't want to get out. 
I agree! Sometimes it's hard to remind yourself how good it makes you feel though. Some days, I'd rather be stinky.. 
I thought I was alone 
I'm clean, too.
Currently struggling with this now. My shower is shooted up so I'm restricted to taking baths, and it takes 30+ minutes to fill the tub. I hardly ever find the energy to actually do all of that work. And I feel ashamed for even viewing it as 'all that work', let alone the fact that I acknowledge how disgusting my body is getting.  Glad you were able to power through it.
When I was working as a CNA and I would come home from work feeling and smelling terrible, but too tired to take a shower or bath, I would just stand in the tub, grab a wet rag and just wipe down. Its easy and quick and doesn't waste a lot of water.
I live in the philippines and its impossible not to take a bath, especially in june, because of the humidity.
Kumusta, ka kaibigan!
Kumusta, ka kaibigan!
Ayos lang ako, kaibigan! Better than usual thanks to the meds.
I'm legit stoked for you!  I've been there.  The willpower that takes is more than what usually gets celebrated.  Feel good about it, and go outside and interact with some people. 
This exactly. Sometimes the willpower needed just to take a damn shower is so high.
This exactly. Sometimes the willpower needed just to take a damn shower is so high.
Some would even say it's... [too damn high](https://imgflip.com/i/1hjnz4) 
Congrats! Taking care of myself is what goes out the window first when my depression acts up. I'll think back and go 'Wait, when did I last shower?' It's all too easy to let that cycle continue.  But when you break it, it feels so good to be cozy and clean.  :)
I was just thinking this yesterday. I don't know why but my hygiene drops off when I'm depressed too. It's so hard to just get in the shower, even though a shower and getting clean feels great. I'm starting to slip into that cycle again though, doing the bare minimum to keep presentable for work. Best to force myself out of it before it becomes an issue. 
I was just thinking this yesterday. I don't know why but my hygiene drops off when I'm depressed too. It's so hard to just get in the shower, even though a shower and getting clean feels great. I'm starting to slip into that cycle again though, doing the bare minimum to keep presentable for work. Best to force myself out of it before it becomes an issue. 
Depression sucks the energy right out of us, and with it goes the want to do anything extra. If you don't feel well enough to get out of bed (or you barely drag yourself out of bed just before work, which I totally do), you're not going to put in the extra time and effort to shower!
I know how hard it can be!  I bet you feel amazing.  Enjoy this day and this feeling.    Maybe try to put clean sheets on your bed too.  Nothing feels so good as going to bed with a clean body and nice clean sheets.  I'm only saying this helps me on these kind of days.  Baby steps, right?  Really, great for you!!
Thanks for the reminder! I really need to do that.
You're that guy I haven't seen in over 2 years. I'll see ya, when I see ya. 
I don't know if you're nervous about going after so long, but my dentist made me feel so good about it the last time I went. My teeth are really messed up and they said it was all fine, they've had people who haven't gone to the dentist in decades. She said there was an old woman who had never been to the dentist before, so my 9ish months were fine. 
shoot
Nice name 
Tell your teacher, school counselor, vice principal, and principal. Verbally and in writing. They are legally obligated to act. This girl is a bully who is probably saying destructive things to other students too, perhaps without even realizing it. She needs to be readjusted mentally, or she will likely be a menace to society as an adult.   Seriously. Report the little  idiot.  And no matter what, stay strong. You’re stronger than you know.   
u/TomerMeme This! So sorry this awful person is projecting her own shit on you. 
Next time tell her 'y'know you need to be less of a stupid girl to be a decent human being.' 
Don't think that would work.  Cunts will be  idiots.
I would’ve knocked thatbad influence  out
Clock that stupid girl in her grill grrrr
Honestly, me too. At some point you just gotta beat  sensitive little girls up. 
And get into trouble over it?  Girls like that aren't worth it.
And get into trouble over it?  Girlss like that aren't worth it.
I punched a boy who had been teasing me in the face when I was in grade 7, and broke his nose. I got detention for it, obviously.   It was totally worth it, and I do not regret my actions at all. I didn't even regret them when I was *in* detention. 
did you beat the shoot out of that stupid girl, i would pay for any of your legal fee. what a inconsiderate  idiot
Dang I need you in my life. 
Dang I need you in my life. 
hell. i would beat that  idiot up for her and deal with the whatever criminal record. 
I have no respect for people like that. Those are the girls who cry over their boyfriend dumping them after he had fun with them. They're like 'OMG I thought he loved me truly!! Life's so unfair!!'    I understand that's not a nice thing to do but those kinda people deserve that to happen to them.
There was a girl at school the other day sobbing because her friend told the girl’s crush that she liked him. Seriously- she’s EIGHTEEN and she was acting like her life was ruined because her friend “betrayed her” and she’ll “never have a chance at dating him”.  Then the next day she was talking about how stressed she was trying to figure out a THEME for her expensive graduation party. Her life is just SOO not fair huh..
There was a girl at school the other day sobbing because her friend told the girl’s crush that she liked him. Seriously- she’s EIGHTEEN and she was acting like her life was ruined because her friend “betrayed her” and she’ll “never have a chance at dating him”.  Then the next day she was talking about how stressed she was trying to figure out a THEME for her expensive graduation party. Her life is just SOO not fair huh..
I mean that's kinda traitorous of her friend but sobbing because of that and overreacting? That is some 13 y/o girl bullshit right here. 
I mean that's kinda traitorous of her friend but sobbing because of that and overreacting? That is some 13 y/o girl bullshit right here. 
I didn't have the patience for that, even at 13. I was given the option to go away to school when I was 14 & jumped at it. Best. Decision. Ever.
'I don't care about school'   'shoot I can't skip class they're gonna kick me out'   'make up your God damn mind, me.'
I went through this today. It's my last semester of college and I can't even convince myself that I can do it. I woke up today so tired and careless that I went back to sleep after breakfast and skipped 3 classes. Now I'm really worried if my mental health is going to take another nosedive this semester
I went through this today. It's my last semester of college and I can't even convince myself that I can do it. I woke up today so tired and careless that I went back to sleep after breakfast and skipped 3 classes. Now I'm really worried if my mental health is going to take another nosedive this semester
It's good you're still pushing yourself though. I dropped out of college last semester. I don't regret it because my mental health was taking a serious toll on me but sometimes I wonder how life could have been so different if my mental condition wasn't this bad.
Your last semester? Its only been my first month and i already feel like dropping out. 
I'm like 3 weeks in and feel this way. It's frustrating. It's not a question of my abilities, but when I can't get motivated for shit... It sucks a lot.
THIS IS ME.
ME TOO
ME TOO
Currently in this position. Don't know whether I should just drop out again 
Ah yes, the special hell.... I know completely what you mean. The bouncing back and forth forever kills me. 
Does it get easier? I've been through this hell 3 years now
Does it get easier? I've been through this hell 3 years now
No
No
:(
If I didn't fear death and being a complete piece of crap I would have no worries.
I don't fear death, I fear what's after death
I don't fear death, I fear what's after death
I fear what is not after death
And having both is just...:/
Hell
Wow, are you me? This is exactly how I feel all the time. About pretty much everything.
I am not you, I am me :)
I am not you, I am me :)
Haha. :)
This is the explanation Ive been struggling for
You're welcome?
This made me cry. I'm so sorry you went through that.
Don't cry for me. :) My life is significantly better! My mom is in recovery. Alcohol free for two weeks, drug free for 6 years. Even before she decided to stop drinking she had gotten better. She's trying to find a nice Korean or Japanese man to make her happy like my daddy did. She's smiling now. She loves the world.   And more importantly, she loves her children. 
Don't cry for me. :) My life is significantly better! My mom is in recovery. Alcohol free for two weeks, drug free for 6 years. Even before she decided to stop drinking she had gotten better. She's trying to find a nice Korean or Japanese man to make her happy like my daddy did. She's smiling now. She loves the world.   And more importantly, she loves her children. 
That's so good to hear. Congrats to your mom on those milestones! :) 
I'm not sure you will see this but there is a really great website called 7cups of tea where you can talk to someone anytime you want. It's a very nice community which really helped me before
Amazing community. 
I'm here if I can be of help. You are not alone. PM me if you need to talk.  This hits close to home in some ways. My partner is bipolar, frequently very depressed, and often says she wants to die/end her life. I often worry she might follow through. 
You and I are in similar situations. If you need to talk, then I am here to listen.
did you not read the whole thing as i made an update at the bottom.
Wait she's alive?? That's amazing! Could we get the full story?
I think for them it was a mind-shifting reality check about how serious your illness is.  It is life-threatening and they didn't know until they saw the evidence you created.  Hopefully they'll be more supportive of your wellness in the future.  You can ask your therapists about having a conversation with your family about respecting boundaries and your personal space.
That's no excuse to go through someone's personal things when they admitted themselves to hospital and there was no threat ( ie: he/she disappeared and they didn't know where to look etc ) Ridiculous.
That's no excuse to go through someone's personal things when they admitted themselves to hospital and there was no threat ( ie: he/she disappeared and they didn't know where to look etc ) Ridiculous.
But it *is* an excuse to go through someone's stuff. Whether it's right or wrong I don't know, probably neither. But it's totally understandable. You might not understand, but to who people who love you more than you love yourself It goes without saying. Sure, it must've been embarrassing and painful to know they read all that stuff - but what else were they supposed to do?
But it *is* an excuse to go through someone's stuff. Whether it's right or wrong I don't know, probably neither. But it's totally understandable. You might not understand, but to who people who love you more than you love yourself It goes without saying. Sure, it must've been embarrassing and painful to know they read all that stuff - but what else were they supposed to do?
Privacy is an important right. It's true that it could help but it could just as well do the opposite, you simply can't know. You need consent, even if you do it with good intentions you can't take decisions for others. 
You're obviously not a parent. What would you do if you were in the parents shoes?
Parent here, I would turn them over to his therapist. His private thoughts are none of my shooting business. Shit like this is what prevents kids from asking their parents for help. This is a gross invasion of privacy. Getting rid of self harm items? A great idea. Reading something that someone is using as therapy? Horrible shooting idea. I can't believe that people are actually defending this. If this guy checked himself into the hospital he's obviously not an eight year old that needs to be closely monitored.
The threat was there, that their life could be lost.  The health care providers and parents have a legal responsibility to keep people alive if they can.  The sufferer may not intend to act on their thoughts or writing, but the fact that the thoughts are there mean they are at significantly higher risk for suicide and need treatment.  They basically stop trusting your judgement and override your right to privacy, removing all known methods of self-harm.
The parents do NOT have a legal responsibility to read his journals. Get rid of self harm tools yes. They went over the line. Being mentally ill doesn't mean you lose your God given rights unless a court says you do. Don't defend this.
You see, my roommates would have been extremely sorry after the fact. Extremely and for a very, very, very long time. To make absolutely sure that this will never ever happen again. Get the word out what can happen to these 'heros' and it will stop, especially in small towns. 
Relevant user name?
Relevant user name?
No, just in a bad mood after reading some posts here. Don't listen to me. Also bombs are a bit too impersonal, don't you think? 
What's SH?
Self harm 
From one hand they mustn’t read your private things but from another. They worry about you
Worrying is one thing.. BUT there was no reason to go through his/her things. They hadn't disappeared.. they were in hospital and checked in there on their own volition. 
Worrying is one thing.. BUT there was no reason to go through his/her things. They hadn't disappeared.. they were in hospital and checked in there on their own volition. 
Absolutely. I'm actually really pissed for OP. What a violation of privacy. I wonder how they'd feel if OP went snooping around their rooms. I'd be livid.
This is such a weird goal, but one I so relate to. I work in a professional setting, I'm decently presentable. But something about my depression just makes it so hard to brush my damn teeth.   I'm so excited for you that you get to have this 'one small thing'. 
Glad I'm not the only one. Why is it so hard? It's like a sign I know when I'm really feeling better (when I do) I will start to brush my teeth. It's almost funny. Anyway, keep it up bro. Or ma'am. 
Glad I'm not the only one. Why is it so hard? It's like a sign I know when I'm really feeling better (when I do) I will start to brush my teeth. It's almost funny. Anyway, keep it up bro. Or ma'am. 
I have the same thing, if i brush my teeth that means I'm feeling at least slightly hopeful. But I have genetically awful teeth so most of the time I feel like there's no point because no matter how much I brush they are just gonna detiororate by the time I'm 50 I'll need dentures
I brush my teeth in the shower. If you're gonna be standing there for a while waiting for your hair to get wet or leaving conditioner in for a minute, might as well brush your teeth while you wait!
That's a good use of water, too. I need to pick up on that as opposed to justn idioting around while I am waiting. 
It's not just me!!! Congrats. Maybe I'll work on it this year.
same. i need to as well
i started to learn how to code .
Nice, what are you learning? 
Nice, what are you learning? 
i learned python now i am trying to learn c# , i really want to build a website .
i learned python now i am trying to learn c# , i really want to build a website .
 awesome, I always wanted to learn to code but I think it would be too much for my brain haha. Dont have the time either
How did you manage to do it? Were there any tricks that you used? I have a hard time brushing my teeth every day... honestly sometimes, its like 3 or 4 weeks between times... I am trying, I think I have brushed them 3 times in the last week and a half... that is good for me.
I brush my teeth twice a day every day and have been since I was a toddler. it's just mostly habit. I don't feel comfortable going to bed without brushing my teeth first.   i just feel dirty otherwise 
How did you manage to do it? Were there any tricks that you used? I have a hard time brushing my teeth every day... honestly sometimes, its like 3 or 4 weeks between times... I am trying, I think I have brushed them 3 times in the last week and a half... that is good for me.
Start out by brushing before going to bed.
Yay that's great! I really need to start brushing my hair every day. It's basically just a ball of knots on top of my head 
Me too!!
Slim Shitty standing up
Guess who's back, back again. Shitty's back, tell a friend - Me, a fellow Slim Shitty.   I guess there is Slim Shitty in all of us, let's all stand up. 
The worst part is when you think your luck has changed and you have good things and hope but then you realize that the good thing was the fluke and you are who you are.
If vaguely good things happen to me I get really scared expecting something REALLY bad to happen. The good never lasts.
Me too. Can't get a job, terrible at making friends, never dated anyone, never did that well in school, can't hold a conversation, and I'm pretty ugly. I don't even think my mom likes me that much, she constantly criticizes me. So, you're not alone. 
Same, except it's my dad who constantly criticizes me, and I did achieve academic success during high school.
I envy people who merely 'lost something.' Even if they're depressed by losing a job or gf/bf, it's usually true they have a good chance of replacing it. Not everyone, but you hear so many success stories trying to guilt you with positive and happy.  Nobody knows what it's like to be in *our* position. Where you literally can't just 'move somewhere else, do something crazy, get a different job.'  Nothing to lose but my sanity, and I think I'm losing it too.
I see posts on this sub all the time of people like 'was anyone else super successful in school but didn't amount to much?' And I think damn, I was never even good at anything. I literally have no reason to live because I have no potential to do anything
I didn't fail at failing :D
Damn. Just smiled for the first time in a long time. Aaaand now it's gone. But yeah, what you said. Sigh... 
Almost everything in 2017 has been a train wreck for me, if that counts for something. 
I'm with you there! 2017 has been a terrible year.
I'm with you there! 2017 has been a terrible year.
Joining in. 2017 sucked for me too.
Joining in. 2017 sucked for me too.
for me only 70% of 2017 sucked...
Same here...never had a job..dropped out of art school that i only stayed one semester for. no friends..nothing.. needless to say im not sticking around anymore 
Please don’t go
yeah same here... and it doesn't get any easier the older you get.. 
Yeah, i feel like the prospects dont necessarily get harder, I just become more lethargic and less willing.  I used to be so optimistic in my early 20s deapite the fact that i failed many classes, had no friends, and couldnt hold a job.  Now, nothing...  
The good thing is, as you said, you don't have much to lose. You can do whatever the shoot you want with your life, it's not going to be worse. I hope.
*Debbie Downer incoming* If there's one thing 2017 taught me, it's that it can always get much, MUCH worse (and it often does). 
I'll raise my hand. Is it possible to have a convo about your situation and mine though? 
I wanna keep the embarrassing details of my failings to myself, but if you wanna share, I'm willing to listen and give some insights, though I couldn't even help myself with my insight.
But guys, it's never too late...
Never too late what?
I thought I was the only person. I just want to be the person that I was before, don’t you?
I want to be the person I never got to be
I want to be the person I never got to be
I know how you feel. Like it’s hard to describe, I would like to be the old me. When i worked out, I ate properly, and I laughed genuinely. Like I’m today I was at a family function and people were telling jokes. I know the jokes were funny but I did laugh. But I made myself laugh because it would have been weird that I didn’t. Does that make any sense 
I want to be the person that everyone told me I would be. 
Ouch
I can relate to this so much, and it’s awful thinking that now you’ve let all the people that had such high hopes for you down.
I really do think that about just about everything in my life. My therapist tries to tell me that what I view as failures, are also “learning experiences”. Some people refuse to even let me say that I have failed at accomplishing goals that I, or others, set for me. So yes, I guess my failures are learning experiences, but all I’ve learned is that I shouldn’t have even tried. 
A little advice..   Use the hate.  Depression is boredom.  Anger is action.  This is mainly for myself but feel free to use it.
the problem is that it's only good for short explosive stuff  when you're done with that and you haven't gotten anywhere, you feel twice as disheartened because you gave it your all and still..
This all describes me perfectly. I know this sounds cliché, but just know you’re not alone. Far from it.
Sometimes even knowing there are other people experiencing the same kind of thing as you doesn't alleviate the despair.
... am alive. 
You are worth so much man, hang in there :)
So do those things. Just because you're depressed doesn't mean you can't do these things. You're making excuses for your own lack of self control.
Of course you can *physically* do those things. But internally the means just aren't there anymore.
on one hand, i feel ya, but on the other hand, downvote, because clickbait
This is a peer support subreddit, not YouTube. What is this comment 
This is how I broke up with my girlfriend.  I was always there for her, went out of my way to support her.   When I needed her she was MIA.  Feels bad, man.
Same thing happened with my ex, the day my dad died she wasn't there for me when I need her most. A couple days later I broke up with her because I knew she would never be there for me
Same thing happened with my ex, the day my dad died she wasn't there for me when I need her most. A couple days later I broke up with her because I knew she would never be there for me
My best friend completely shut me out when my brother passed away. She said that I was “too much” to my best friend. I cut her off and never talked to her again. I am not someone who generally cuts people off because I’m a very attached person but that’s the day I learned to cut toxic relationships out, still learning though 
I was once sitting in a room with about 10 people and I was the only one in it. 
Surrounded by people, yet more alone than all of them combined.
I've had friends and had no friends. Two years ago, I moved back to my hometown. In that time I've had 1 social outing and my entire family (parents and 3 siblings) have completely stopped talking to me. I'm going to go ahead and say that being alone is FAAAAAR worse than being around people and feeling alone. 
I completely understand. I recently just moved back to my hometown as well and im already itching to go back. The days go by very slowly when you are all that you have. 
I was once at a New Years Eve get together where it turns out everyone who went was a couple except for me. I've been single since 2011. When the clock turned 12, everyone around me had a partner to kiss and love.   I got a pity hug when one of my friends realized I didn't get anything. It was absolutely soul crushing. 
Reading this made me shed a tear. I hope you find love soon! Props to you for not breaking down in front of them. I’m sorry you had to go through that 
Reading this made me shed a tear. I hope you find love soon! Props to you for not breaking down in front of them. I’m sorry you had to go through that 
Thank you. If you haven't as well, I also wish you luck. However, my current predicament is loving myself. Until that obstacle is cleared, I am not ready for any form of relationship. 
Thank you. If you haven't as well, I also wish you luck. However, my current predicament is loving myself. Until that obstacle is cleared, I am not ready for any form of relationship. 
You are great for this. Thank you. I appreciate people who acknowledge the necessity for self love prior to diving into a relationship. I APPRECIATE YOU SO MUCH
I’m quickly giving up on people.  I have a couple friends in different parts of the country who I don’t feel have given up on me. Even if we just text, the initiation is two-way. It’s not just me always reaching out.  With everyone else, forget it. Nobody bothers.
It sucks but that is life. Almost all the time you are gonna have to be the one to reach out. It isn't that people don't want to be around you the thought just doesn't cross their mind tbh
People really can be wonderful! What an awesome story.
I find those while stoned are extra friendly usually
I find those while stoned are extra friendly usually
Terrible drug , isn't it? Making people extra friendly and hugging people. The horror!
Terrible drug , isn't it? Making people extra friendly and hugging people. The horror!
It’s horrible drug! It should be ILLEGAL in all STATES!! Period!
I'm usually a really big bigot/idiot but I find that when I smoke I'm usually alot calmer and ive started to do the same even when I'm not high
Opening your mind is always good, no matter the means.
Wish that were me. I get so much anxiety when im high
Same. It sucks because I know and have heard from so many people how helpful it is for them in so many ways, like life-changing ways. I wonder why it has negative effects on some of us. 
Just because he was high doesn’t mean he wouldn’t have done that sober. I’m the same when I smoke and when I’m sober when I’m in public cause of low dosing or high tolerance. I would have given you a hug too. 
Well I’m definitely more receptive and expressive to people’s feelings when I’m high so I do think there was a chance he wouldn’t have done it sober. Not because he’s an idiot, he might just have not been that brave sober. I know I probably wouldn’t hug someone idk sober since I’m not sure how they’ll react to it.
Well I’m definitely more receptive and expressive to people’s feelings when I’m high so I do think there was a chance he wouldn’t have done it sober. Not because he’s an idiot, he might just have not been that brave sober. I know I probably wouldn’t hug someone idk sober since I’m not sure how they’ll react to it.
That’s true, everyone’s different. 
Moral of the story: legalize marijuana.  In all seriousness though, its amazing how one small act from a stranger can completely change ones mood.
Yes! I’m not big on weed, but I did smoke up on my birthday on Saturday and it makes me a lot more sensitive to the feeling of others
Thats so great :) i need i need one of those
I want to give you a hug
You can always have a free e-hug from me :-)
Thank you  <3
Yeah me too. Where are you from, so I could give you a hug?
Los Angeles
Los Angeles
Ah damn.
Hugging is awesome. I met a singer whose music I adore, and when I told her how much I liked her music, she gave me a huge hug. I was so surprised by that that I think I was on a cloud for quite a while. :)
That is so sweet :)
High or not that was still a sweet thing he did! Sometimes I daydream about that same thing happening to me but I usually just end up hugging myself.
I would hug you:) everyone needs one now and then
Stoners are just walking teddy bears. We mean no harm! Glad we could help you out :)
God grew these herbs especially for this purpose. Weed is love
I would love to give you a hug.
Right back at ya:)
I love this! I love hugs, they are a great expression of love without resorting to something too intimate or sexual. Here's one from me to you :-D
Aw thank you
'Eew junkie, don't touch me!'
Lol this made me laugh idk
Do you definitely still have your wallet?
Lol I have no money to steal anyway
That....that's actually groping.....
It was consensual he asked first
Yes I also wish I have the ability to donate my life to someone else who would value or appreciate it more 
That's a good one. I like that idea. 
And sometimes it is so hard to keep the wheel straight, urge to just give a slight left to meet a front hit is insane.
I'm so glad I don't drive, it would really be too easy.  Take care of yourself, my friend. Though we probably feel relatively the same about life, I wouldn't want you or anyone on here to hurt themselves. Only I'm allowed to hurt myself. 😜
I will, mate. Soon i will take care of myself. I'm so tired to be here. You should never lie about how you care about people over internet, this aint helping, and just be realistic, you are not the one and only person who is allowed to hurt himself.
I was making a joke, but perhaps in poor taste. I'm sorry. I don't mean 'take care of yourself' like that, and I'm not lying about caring. Wanting myself to cease doesn't mean I want anyone else to feel this way. 
sometimes I want to see what happens if I get mugged- I'd calmly tell the attacker, 'I'd greatly appreciate it if you just shot me dead. Then you can have what you want. Thank you.'
Yeah, that's about right. The worst thing is that might be so unsettling for 'normal people' and they'd probably run away from me anyway. 😬
I was actually pretty relieved when i thought i could have cancer. Get no treatment and just play the waiting game.   Honestly, there's only 2 people in my life that are keeping me going at this point. 
Those two people must be pretty special. Hang onto them tightly. :) 
Every day, all the time. Or to be killed by a mugger, or change bodies with a terminal patient who really wants to live.   I just want to be done. 
I'd be long long gone if I could donate my life energy to someone else.  Take care today. :)
It won't ever leave you that feeling and I've had that feeling since I was 12 and I'm 28 now. But rest knowing tomorrow is a new day where you will feel the same as you did the day before. Dark, but it a warm blanket to pull over yourself.
Same, except 14 to 26 and counting. Perhaps I should find comfort in knowing I'll always have this deep loneliness to come back to. Hell it likes me so much it forces me back in sometimes.  Thank you. My blanket is pretty warm right now, and it's kinda nice. 
Woes are woes. No matter how someone stops existing, it hurts those around them. 
That is true. I suppose it's just my selfish side wanting not to be blamed. 'How could she do this to us?' vs 'How could they murder her?' or something.
And then, after being ignored repeatedly nobody texts. It's a shitty cycle. 
This is where I'm at now. Haven't left my house/talked to any friends in almost two months and now it just feels too late ):
i like people i don't like people
I like people who don't like me.
I like people who don't like me.
Why is this true?
Why is this true?
Because of insecurity. You think that if someone likes you then there's something wrong with them.
>Those affected display a pattern of **social inhibition**, **feelings of inadequacy and inferiority**, **extreme sensitivity to negative evaluation**, and **avoidance of social interaction** despite a **strong desire to be close to others**.  https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Avoidant_personality_disorder
Well shoot
and now I'm reading about the various personality disorders to determine which describes me most accurately
Hopefully there isn't. :)
r/2meirl4meirl
Funnily enough, I think I found it either there, or in another sub like that. I'd search for it, but all posts have the same title.
I do too. I tend to feel stressed out and anxious when people (who aren't my sister) text me, but then I feel lonely af and because I never talk to anyone, no one ever tries to get in touch with me either. 
This^  Most of the time I am totally 110% content in my own little world of work, video games, and tinkering around in my garage...  But every so often I get this rush of emotions or thoughts and I text a few people and immediately regret it lol
This^  Most of the time I am totally 110% content in my own little world of work, video games, and tinkering around in my garage...  But every so often I get this rush of emotions or thoughts and I text a few people and immediately regret it lol
> I text a few people and immediately regret it lol  Same lol.Especially when they don't reply right away.
I honestly wasn't expecting to live to 24 but somehow I'm still here. I think the trick is to not plan for the future and take life hour by hour, day by day because things can change out of the blue. 
This attitude calms me down when I start to feel anxious, but then I start to worry that if I don't plan for the future, I'm going to regret that I didn't 10 years down the line.
This attitude calms me down when I start to feel anxious, but then I start to worry that if I don't plan for the future, I'm going to regret that I didn't 10 years down the line.
What if the world doesn't exist in 10 years? 
What if the world doesn't exist in 10 years? 
But what if it does?
24 was my magic number too. Never thought I would see it. But here I am still going day by day. Some days are way harder than others but I get through. But I also want to be the change not wait for it. Its the maintaining positivity to do so that is so hard. To keep going. This is why depressed and anxious people are some of the strongest people.
19 was my number. I think it had a lot to do with being raised LDS and always being pushed to go on a mission. I never had a desire to do that but my thoughts never went to what I wanted to do, just that I didn't want that. I'm 24 now and shit is so shooted I have been contemplating what life is after this so much. I bet it's way more peaceful than this world we live in. 
Thank you :) and I love Uncle Acid! One of my favorites
You're the first person to recognize my username 
Not having planned my future is the cause of my current state of depression. 
mine too. also having a plan and not following it through. to its correct end. that is truly depressing. 
You just described my life except it'll be a suicide in an indirect way for me. Like since I haven't tried to find a job or get an education I'm liable to die from hunger in the streets one day. Maybe I'll get a bad infection in my teeth that spreads to my brain and kills me because I can't afford dental care? Who knows, but one things for sure: it'll probably be my own lack of goals and effort that kills me one day.  
My thoughts exactly. I've even occasionally stopped eating for days to prepare myself for the hard times that will come. Kinda weird. I can prepare for that but can't find a job/education. 
I was honestly just thinking it. My counselor was helping me pick classes for the spring semester and I thought 'why am I wasting this persons time. Go help someone that has a future.' 
:c Dang, that really hits me where I live.
Yeah. All the time. And I keep my house in a minimal style so people wont have to clear up too many things when I'm gone. If I feel Ive got too much in drawers/closets I donate/throw it away. 
Everything I own fits in 1 maybe 2 large dufflebags
Everything I own fits in 1 maybe 2 large dufflebags
Dang... same here. Maybe I've been doing it subconsciously because I know I'll be gone soon...
Dang... same here. Maybe I've been doing it subconsciously because I know I'll be gone soon...
It started subconsciously for me too, but it became quite clear after a while. I have a lot of empty closets and drawers, my house is just for show.
I’m currently prepping for suicide by packing my stuff up and getting rid of excess
Do you mind if I ask you some questions about purging clutter out of your life?
Do you mind if I ask you some questions about purging clutter out of your life?
Ask away
Ask away
I have a storage locker full of furniture, a few appliances, loads of boxes and I've had it for over a year with most of it remaining untouched.  I was wondering if you had idea on how to get stuff organized and getting rid of excess short of just putting stuff on the curb?  Also do you feel a difference in your mood when you're packing up your stuff vs. when you think about having to do it and not doing anything?
My death is one of the only things I've put a lot of planning into. Hopefully I'll be gone by September 2018 if things don't get better for me
What things will convince you to do otherwise? What things do you want that will make you feel better?
What things will convince you to do otherwise? What things do you want that will make you feel better?
Being able to talk to people easily, no more goddamn social anxiety. A girlfriend, screwing, hooking up while i still can. Those come immeditely to mind, and idk if they'll even work. I just want my life to be better than me waking up and going to sleep angry and sad every day
This sums up my life. I've felt this way since 6 years old. Although I have pretty much been a straight A student even up to graduate school, I can't seem to get a career going.  I also become extremely resentful towards any obligations forcing me to live a bit longer. I was planning on dying few months ago but I didn't want to let my group members (4 consecutive group projects) down.
Getting a career started is hard, especially if you're field is in low demand and your mental health is poor.
It sure does. The depression-anxiety combo is especially fun.  Depression sucks the joy and motivation out of everything, anxiety starts bringing up concerns of losing skills, depression concedes they're gone forever so why bother.  I also have this issue in which I stop indulging in pleasant things because I'm worried that I'll 'ruin' those things for myself. As in, I don't want to associate the pleasant thing with the awful feelings/whatever made me feel awful.
Don't forget about the random bouts of paranoia and panic!  I feel like I'm living a double life. I'm depressed and anxious but pretend not to be, and it's only when I get paranoid and begin to panic that I realize how much I'm just playing myself.
I know sleeping all day and laying in bed wallowing over my mistakes is going to  do the opposite of help. but I don't have the energy to leave my bed. it sounds so awful to do anything but lay down and grieve. 
Me too. I feel ya. It's awful, and people that don't have it just don't understand it.
Most of the time I do something 'fun' it just feels 'meh.'  That only makes things worse.  It's not being alone that's a problem.  It's being lonely and alone with people.  It feels worse when it doesn't feel better.   Running and other physical exercise usually brings me some lift of mood, if only short term
>Most of the time I do something 'fun' it just feels 'meh.'  Absolutely.    I'm not unhappy because I don't do things that would make me feel good, I'm unhappy because nothing makes me feel good.
So freaking true. My depression has been really unusually bad the last couple days. I am in hell. I empathize with anyone that has depression.
 
 
Then it's back to those sweet, sweet dark summer days. 
I'm in Florida, I got sunshine and depression 365.
nanaa
Currently so depressed I am wasting my days off from work binge watching crap TV instead of writing & working on house projects like I planned. Also so anxious that I neglected to make an important follow-up appointment to evaluate meds. I've put it off for so long that I'm now panicked to call to make the appt.
I started to feel a rough patch coming on Sunday night.  YMMV but I've found it very helpful to try my best to just accomplish a couple of things to keep the ball moving forward.  Also the awareness that this is temporary and I'll be better soon.    Be well.  
Depression to me makes the world tofu. Literally there are things around me but it tastes like nothing. No texture.  nothing.
You clearly need to up your tofu game ;) 
Depression prevents me from Killing myself then
Honestly, that's how it is for me. Feel too guilty to leave my family.
I've been told to exercise countless times by my doctor, yet that is the single hardest thing to find the motivation to do...
The first time is always the hardest friend. The second becomes less hard, and the third even less. Before you know it, it's extremely satisfying to put out all that shooting stress and depression on the bar. Trust me, it helps. Please try it. 
The first time is always the hardest friend. The second becomes less hard, and the third even less. Before you know it, it's extremely satisfying to put out all that shooting stress and depression on the bar. Trust me, it helps. Please try it. 
>The first time is always the hardest friend. The second becomes less hard, and the third even less. Before you know it, it's extremely satisfying to put out all that shooting stress and depression on the bar. Trust me, it helps. Please try it.    He's right. It's a natural high.
I'm struggling with this. I need to start applying for jobs but I keep pushing it back.
What helped me is> Send 1 a day. Just. One. I did it at a certain hour everyday. 
well said  for me it often manifests in very basic ways, like being hungry but lacking the energy to get up and put together some food
Or reading reddit when I want to go to bed.
Or reading reddit when I want to go to bed.
i'm definitely not doing that right now...
it's even worse if you're also an alcoholic
True... I have been sober for 940 days but those invasive thoughts are crippling
True... I have been sober for 940 days but those invasive thoughts are crippling
it's a vicious cycle
I believe that being a loser is what prevents me from doing those things, not depression.
Maybe you feel like a loser because you're depressed.  Thoughts fuel emotions that fuels depression.  IMO, the thought you're a loser is a depression lie
Ham radio; that sounds pretty cool. Hobby?
Yea Amateur Radio. Been licensed for about 3 years and other than going to club meetings (which I can't even motivate myself to go to) I still feel like I have done barely anything with it. 
Yea Amateur Radio. Been licensed for about 3 years and other than going to club meetings (which I can't even motivate myself to go to) I still feel like I have done barely anything with it. 
I feel ya with the neglected hobbies. My home is filled with the ghosts of enthusiasm past... 
Seriously, if happiness *were* a choice, why the hell wouldn’t I choose it? 
Exactly!
I think this is because when we have depression our brain is configured in sort of way that we cannot decide how to feel other emotions than depression. In that state saying this is like saying 'just snap it out', not a good advice
I agree
I find that it often just makes things worse. For example, if I'm listening to music, happy songs will make me sad, and sad songs will be comforting. This seems to be the opposite of some people. Acknowledging how I feel or connecting with art that supports it does more for my mood than trying in vain to be positive. It's like my emotional landscape is just shaped differently.
Happy songs have always made me anxious, and sad songs seem relatable.
Anhedonia inhibits feelings of fulfillment as well, so then what?
True, but thinking about how sad you are makes you even sadder, so whenever something triggers sadness you get sent down a positive feedback loop of sadness. You can't really feel unfulfilled by thinking about how unfulfilled you are in the same manner.  Two Good Books on this:  The subtle art of not giving a shoot  12 rules for life: an antidote to chaos
For what it's worth, I've started being this direct with people in my life. Sometimes it works out, sometimes it doesn't, but I feel better for having been direct, instead of tailoring my communication based on societal expectations. I'm personally happier, though my outlook on how freeing it is could most certainly be different than someone else seeing the times it doesn't work out as something to feed the depression. That's totally understandable and why results may vary. 
The problem is  when you openly go and say shit like that everyone assumes you're attention whoring.
The problem is  when you openly go and say shit like that everyone assumes you're attention whoring.
Not in my circles. There are more mature people out there.
I wish my friends would tell me that. I live for that kind of stuff. Call me at 4am and tell me you need to sit in a room with someone and do nothing for awhile.
yes omg i wish i had a friend i could do this with
yes omg i wish i had a friend i could do this with
Maybe you do have a friend that you could do that with. Maybe you just need to be the one that sends the message. 
Maybe you do have a friend that you could do that with. Maybe you just need to be the one that sends the message. 
have def been the awkward initiator on multiple occasions. nothing's come of it so far
Ye i know the feeling... but if you have a solid friend try bringing it up with them in a 'delicate way'.  Like ' im really having a bad week, really need to take my thoguhts elsewere, wanna go do something?'
Yeah this is the approach that's always worked for me. Be honest, but palatable. Putting some context to it helps also.  'Hey man, can we just play some Street Fighter tonight? Long week of work bringing me down' is super easy for anyone to swallow and it makes the conversation flow a bit easier. 
Certain friends may respond to that. I have a couple of online friends who know depression themselves. Both offered their phone number when I was ranting about suicide.  Otherwise, that'd be a pretty awkward hangout. People very rarely expose their genuine feelings in life. Just how it is. 
Have you found that it easier to ask the opposite sex (gender) for help? I have no problem opening up to a friend of the opposite sex but I would in no way do the  same to my friend (s) of the same gender 
That's sweet and sad at the same time... is there any way I can help? 
At this point, I doubt it. I'm on a path that I see a very dark end to, I'm double teamed by depression and anxiety; I'm terrified of all the horrible things that might be going on with my mind and my body, too petrified to do anything to stop the inevitable.  
All the time.
I think I erase my comments more often than I post. 
I think I erase my comments more often than I post. 
I just did it again!
I just did it again!
no you didn't
I'm fighting my anxiety not to type this as I type it. I'm not sure if I'll actually press submit or not. 
hey but you did it
hey but you did it
Pure unbridled willpower. I showed that submit form who's boss. 
Pure unbridled willpower. I showed that submit form who's boss. 
Hip Hip, Hooray! 
I'll spend large amounts of time fiddling with my word choices and what I want to say and then just decide what I have to say isn't important anyway.
I've spent hours making a post virtually flawless just to scrap it right before I post or right after. 
honestly depression makes you hate everything you say. Even saying 'Hi, how are you,' can be warped in some crazy sick way due to depression. deleting is usually easier than experiencing your depression breathing down your neck saying that what you just said is stupid. even now depression is like 'suffer silently, don't comment.' 
I feel this way all the time
Personally, I'm typically not looking for advice so much as for someone to commiserate so that I feel less alone in my position. Anyway, this seems like the last place where someone would be judged harshly for sharing their feelings.
That makes me feel a ton better - thank you :'^)
I'll write a post, but then end up deleting it after.
Same here
Pretty much all the time. I'll go to a post and then I'll get worked up because it's really interesting and I feel like I want to join in on the conversation, but then I usually talk myself out of it because I get to thinking that no one really care what I have to say anyway.
people on this sub will definitely enjoy a comment from you or anyone that's not rude/hurtful. even your personal experience i find comfort in since I--like many people--have experienced it. the more the merrier, in a weird way. Anyway, you're not alone. 
Every time. I'm a depressed prick myself how can I help some people who posts here? Only thing I can do is try to empathize. 
I start to empathize and then feel it's too much about me and then don't post it. Even though the only experience anyone has here is about themselves.
Oh all the time. I'm always left with this feeling that the original poster will think I'm stupid and not worth listening to. Then another part of me deletes comments because I'm scared of being replied to. I never know how to respond to internet strangers lol. 
i doubt anyone here would say you're being stupid or silly where most people experience their own self consciousness to the same extent. you're safe here 
And when I actually do so it I beat up myself for days for what I have said thinking it was stupid/useless , I also want to delete most things after I post them wrote most times I don't
what you say is worth while to read or listen to. say shoot you to depression and try to not delete your comment tonight. 
All the time. Actually it's more like I want to stop existing but I don't want to die.
This describes it perfectly. I always said I wanted to just cease to exist, but I didn't want to die to leave a body behind for someone to find.
This describes it perfectly. I always said I wanted to just cease to exist, but I didn't want to die to leave a body behind for someone to find.
Yep, same feeling for 3+ years. Mentally I'm so exhausted/lost.  Tough to explain for sure. Just tired of everything and have lost the love I once had for life. Clinging to straws just trying to make it by. 
My first thought when I wake up and my last when I sleep.
That’s exactly mine too!! First and last thought and at least 1000 times during the day!!
I want to die but i dont want to go through the actual pain/dying part. I just want to stop existing 
This is exactly how I feel a lot of the time. I just want to fall asleep one night and just fade out if existence. 
This is exactly how I feel a lot of the time. I just want to fall asleep one night and just fade out if existence. 
Same. Just like a forever nap.
All the shooting time. Sometimes I so desperately want for a car to run me over as I'm crossing the street.
Me too, but I never actually walk anywhere. Maybe exercise really would cure my depression! Just not in the way people intend...
Me too, but I never actually walk anywhere. Maybe exercise really would cure my depression! Just not in the way people intend...
Holy shit I choose walking over any other form of transportation. I think I just realised why.
The freaking thought “You are a failure” keeps echoing in my mind, and at the same I wonder what it would be like if I don’t exist anymore. Suicidal people usually gives hints like that to others as a cry for help because they don’t know how to explain thoroughly. So bad very few people get the clue.
I throw out hints like crazy in the form of suicidal/self-depreciating jokes. People laugh, which helps me. But nobody figures it out.
that's literally me but I'd do it if I'd have a gun
I almost always have a gun. It's a lot lot harder to pull the trigger on your own head than you would think, or want it to be.
'Depression is the inability to construct a future.'
This hit me very, very hard. I'm 26 now and without few short bursts, the future never seems to exist to me.
Thanks for posting that, hadn't seen it before and like it a lot. 
What does it mean, that you like it? Don't you want to build a future?  Sorry, if I don't get it, I see people commenting, that they like another definition of depression, fairly often and always wonder what's so good about that. Maybe, that someone did the hard job and put a feature of depression into words..?
Everything that has been stolen can be retaken. It has not yet been lost forever. 
You sound like Gandalf
You sound like Gandalf
Until depressions screams, 'you shall not pass!'
Not even out in the world yet and my life has been ruined. Then I think to myself 'why should anyone have any sympathy for me?' when there are people who work their hardest and put their all into the things they do, and I just sit here like the unmotivated deadbeat I am. Went to sleep last night begging to die, and woke up fine. Dang my life.
Some put their best to reach million's open business, some just to survive and yet trying to keep them alive. And that sucks cause most of 'help' is just 'be yourself' and when you show you're true colors people around you will start ignoring you or making fun... And you're back where you started but now with a scar... And you make yourself like a shadow. or you just act like everything is alright.
I used to feel like this. I lost contact to every single friend I had from schools I went to. But lately I was able to make new friends and go out more. Life is possible to change just like that. Although I still don't have any close friends yet.
I've been losing a lot of my friends lately due to my terrible mood swings and rage (I lost six just last year) How do I fix my personality?
I've been losing a lot of my friends lately due to my terrible mood swings and rage (I lost six just last year) How do I fix my personality?
Go see a therapist as soon as you can. You've already made the first step- realizing that you have a problem.
It's working on me now too. Tell it to stop!
Oi! Cut that out!
Oi! Cut that out!
Thanks
me too dood, we gotta take it all back tho.
The rebels have captured the command post. Take it back!
I need to get my motivation back. And soon. 
But how? I'm having problems even waking up in the morning and when I do.. I take a long ass nap in the evening even though I woke up late. It's hard to do the things I love because I keep making excuses to not go out... 
But how? I'm having problems even waking up in the morning and when I do.. I take a long ass nap in the evening even though I woke up late. It's hard to do the things I love because I keep making excuses to not go out... 
idk
Glad it's working for you. I never had success with therapy. I never felt comfortable talking to counselors. It felt like they were scrutinizing my every sentence. It was hell.
Yeah, life can be ruthless and unfair, some people are simply more fortunate. I'm sorry you fell on the other side of things. Here's hoping your fortune will change.
How old are you actually?  (just curious )
Just turned 22.
Just turned 22.
well congratulations, my friend
well congratulations, my friend
Thank you :)
Way to go partner.  One of my favorite sayings is **MOOD FOLLOWS BEHAVIOR**, and you just exemplified it perfectly.  I doubt you would be feeling as well had you crawled back into bed and pulled the covers over your head. Way to go.  Enjoy some gold!
holy crap, that's my first gold! thanks a lot, kind sir/ma'am :D
holy crap, that's my first gold! thanks a lot, kind sir/ma'am :D
No problem friend. Keep up the good work.
Yeah I agree with that, I think that I say the same thing but a different way: Action creates inspiration (which creates action, which creates inspiration....and so on.)  It's all about momentum. Sometimes it's downward, sometimes it's upwards. When it's downward you have to find a way to break the cycle. Another good quote for that is, if you want something you've never had before, you need to do something that you've never done before. :)
I totally agree! It's really hard to start, but once you get going, you're really glad you made the effort!
Can confirm. Felt like killing myself last night and roughly the first half of this day. I didn't do anything to stop it, and now I feel weak and a bit sick.
You got this. Jogging works for OP, find what works for you and make it happen. And remember, it's o.k. if it doesnt work the first time through. Just keep at it. Very rarely do people feel better without doing anything to get better. You got this. 
Can confirm. Felt like killing myself last night and roughly the first half of this day. I didn't do anything to stop it, and now I feel weak and a bit sick.
So sorry to hear that. But it's never too late to start over; try to get up tomorrow like today didn't happen and keep trying your best.
Respect!
thank you!
That's AWESOME!!!! :D High five and a burst of confetti (because confetti makes everything better....let's pretend we don't have to clean it up). That's really amazing, I wish I could get myself to do that
Room is now covered in confetti and has never looked better, thanks!
YEAH! :)
:D
Wahey!! That's brilliant, congrats 
thank you! my brother gets the credit though, since I dragged him out of bed at 6 am to go with me 
thank you! my brother gets the credit though, since I dragged him out of bed at 6 am to go with me 
Nah, if you dragged him out of bed you get all the credit. It was your idea and your motivation. Rock on dude!
FWIW, I discovered a long time ago (not that I always follow this knowledge) that there is a definite point on a long walk/run where the mind just clicks over, like a switch, and suddenly everything is OK. Endorphins be your friends. The tough part, of course, is taking those first few steps. Congrats, OP.
Agreed! 
That's the stuff I like to hear! We have the power to control our depression!
HELL YEAH
So happy for you!
thanks a lot! happy for myself too tbh :)
That's awesome!! :) Really happy for you
many thanks :)
Been wanting to jog as soon as I wake up but I just end up... not. Tomorrow is the shooting day I do.
Tomorrow, me too. We can do it! (:
Family kept me hanging on too. You can get through it
Thanks man I appreciate you taking the time to comment
Thank you for this I was having a bad and this put a smile on my face and made it a little better I really appreciate you taking the time to comment
I’m so happy I could help even just a little bit. When I’m at the bottom of the barrel my doctor always tells me the moment I feel any interest or happiness in anything, go for it. Even if it means folding post-it’s into triangles! Anything to help distract from harmful thoughts.  Just need to find your own version of postits. It might be bad now but I promise you it will be good again. You can make it til then! You can dooo eeeet : D
I’m so happy I could help even just a little bit. When I’m at the bottom of the barrel my doctor always tells me the moment I feel any interest or happiness in anything, go for it. Even if it means folding post-it’s into triangles! Anything to help distract from harmful thoughts.  Just need to find your own version of postits. It might be bad now but I promise you it will be good again. You can make it til then! You can dooo eeeet : D
Yes, so much this. Even if you are living for your cat or dog or gecko. Hang on to that. There's no wrong way to hang on to life.
Oh I've been through it all.  A blind rehabilitation center, psychiatrists, psychologists, occupational therapists, you name it.
Ok, gotcha.  Sorry none of it worked for you.  I understand the desire to die.  I feel it everyday, especially at night.   But have no choice but to continue to carry on, for my God, Son and family.  I’m still trying to find peace in my life myself.  I pray that something comes in your life, that helps you find purpose and happiness.
Nah, my family will get over it.  It ain't my job to suffer forever just to make their lives easier.
A lot of people don’t understand this. And tell that “suicide is selfish”. What is not in this world? Is one obligated to go through hell to save people some tears? It is not.. and for someone to take his own life means that they suffered a great deal and belittling people who killed themselves is disrespectful in my opinion. Except for people doing physical harm for others in the process (e.g. purposefully provoking a car accident).
A lot of people don’t understand this. And tell that “suicide is selfish”. What is not in this world? Is one obligated to go through hell to save people some tears? It is not.. and for someone to take his own life means that they suffered a great deal and belittling people who killed themselves is disrespectful in my opinion. Except for people doing physical harm for others in the process (e.g. purposefully provoking a car accident).
Same. I am so so tired of the guilt trips. I don't understand how being told that you need to keep suffering for others helps people. 
Are you getting professional help for the depression? Let them know you're in a slump and SI (suicidal ideation) is becoming an intrusive problem,  and ask about DBT.
It'd be one thing if you felt like you wanted to die while perfectly happy, but I don't understand what's 'intrusive' about wanting to die when you're deeply existentially miserable.  That's like saying I have 'intrusive' thoughts about eating a sandwich during lunch time.
Wow.  I'm sorry that you had to go through your sisters death like that.  Society can be cruel.  One wonders if more awareness and education would solve this problem.  It's an invisible disease people have difficulty putting their shoes in.
Yeah, if people knew as much about depression and other mental illnesses as they do about cancer, HIV, etc., maybe it wouldn't be such a taboo topic
'Don't worry, you'll be fine!', 'Tomorrow is just a day away!'  I hate those sayings.  Mine is 'Maybe tomorrow I'll get tired of all my bullshit and just do something.'
[This comic](http://www.akimbocomics.com/comic/2010-10-04-Eat_Shit_And_Die_164.jpg) hits the nail on the head about the 'advice' others give you.
eh, there's really a stigma no matter what your gender. if i talk about being depressed then the attitude is that because i'm a female, it must just because i'm overly emotional or because of shark week. society sees men with depression/mental illness as something to feel sympathetic about, whereas women are just seen as crazy 
I'm not disagreeing that there's a stigma no matter what gender, but I have no idea what society your living in that sees men with depression as something to feel sympathetic about. In my experience it's the exact opposite. You're seen as weak, frail, not a real man. There's no escape no matter what gender. 
>No body cares about me so why should i care about them?  Because if everyone had this attitude then no one would be taken care of. If you think there are no kind and decent people left in the world--be a kind and decent person--and there shall be kind and decent persons in the world.
> If you think there are no kind and decent people left in the world--be a kind and decent person--and there shall be kind and decent persons in the world.  That's actually beautiful. Thank you.   :)
Not giving a shoot is a slippery slope, once you start it's hard to stop. I used to at least pretend to give a shoot at work. Now I just hope I get through the day without getting killed.
Work at this point has become more of a thing I am doing so people won't harass me about laying in bed all day. I don't care about the money or my future. I even forgot to pick up my checks from the past 3 weeks. 
Work at this point has become more of a thing I am doing so people won't harass me about laying in bed all day. I don't care about the money or my future. I even forgot to pick up my checks from the past 3 weeks. 
That's how I feel about college. I'm here because it's what I'm supposed to be doing and my parents won't harass me. I don't really care about getting a job or doing anything at all really. 
Mentioned to some friends that I've been suicidal and have all but decided to end it. One of them said 'If you choose to murder yourself, I have no respect for you.'
Omg.  That's awful.  I once went on a date with a girl who said her x husband with ptsd was a coward for attempting siucide.  Never saw her again.
According to insurance companies, dying of suicide is an attempt at fraud and therefore not payable.
But getting sick from voluntarily smoking, for example, is ok.
So true. I wish i had cancer
I don't. I hope I die in something like traffic accident, where there will be no time for me to rethink my life.   I also truly hope that nobody else would get hurt in such crash, I'm not psychopath.
I don't. I hope I die in something like traffic accident, where there will be no time for me to rethink my life.   I also truly hope that nobody else would get hurt in such crash, I'm not psychopath.
i've been lamenting about this all the time. I wish to die a quick painless death that brings no inconvience to others. I live around an area with many trains but as a person who has witnessed many train deaths (the train Im in hit someone and i was on a platform when someone jumped) it causes so much delay and hassle.
Trust me that is not how you want to go. There are so many variables to them, like ending up paralyzed instead.   Think about the people that have to extricate you from a wreck like that, it's not easy to see someone die like that up close.  Not to mention it can be dangerous as shoot if your car starts leaking gas for example.
> There are so many variables to them, like ending up paralyzed instead.  That's why I can't kill myself. I try to do it, but then I think of all the alternative endings like paralysation or blindness (my nightmare). That was with trying to poison myself. But I'd probably have similar fears with other options.
Afraid?  That's closer to the truth than I'd care to admit.  Or at least that's what my mind tells me.  Not 30 quite yet though, so I could still shoot it up even more.
Well this one kinda hurt bc this is me minus the job part bc I suck
Well this one kinda hurt bc this is me minus the job part bc I suck
How do your parents feel about you living at home? Just curious because I'm 20 and in the same situation, it's not fun. If I don't get my shit together soon I'm going to get kicked out before I'm ready.
How do your parents feel about you living at home? Just curious because I'm 20 and in the same situation, it's not fun. If I don't get my shit together soon I'm going to get kicked out before I'm ready.
Well the one part is I don't live at home only bc thank God I got married. So being a depressed loser I'm just bumming off someone else. Tried to tell my mom yesterday that I'm not ok, they don't believe in depression so that didn't go well. They prob wouldn't let me live at home and I'm not even the only failure of a sibling. You're only 20, you have time. Or just go to college on scholarships and live there. I did that for like 10 years hah
Exactly, me to afraid of - still there's room for more shoot up to be accomplished. 
Yea, I hate thinking that it could be even worse, but it could.  
Always told myself I'd kill myself on my 30th birthday if that became true.  Here I am and it sucks.
Ditto. Had the bath setup and took aspirin. Alas, here I still am.   I just got blind drunk instead.
Wanna be buds> :)
Yes! Let's all meet up. Then we wont be friendless, right? I'm feeling oddly good today so maybe this is misplaced. 
Yes! Let's all meet up. Then we wont be friendless, right? I'm feeling oddly good today so maybe this is misplaced. 
Don't feel bad for feelin good
Yeah me too. Can we start over?
Same.  Always resonated with the Leonard Cohen line:   'I want a face that's fair this time, I want a spirit that is calm'
I'm 39, living with family, no job, single with no friends. It's not great but it's not as bad as I'd feared. I'm not that much more unhappy, subjectively, than I was when I was 'successful' and had a life.
I'm also aligned with this kind of happiness where I'm ok with. However, family is unpredictable too, it can create issues from nowhere. It did for me pretty recently so I even lost what you have, for no reason.
Im 28.. living with my parents.. 'casual' hours security guard.. (the only jobe ive been able to land in 6yrs)..gaining weight.. hair thinning.. terrible teeth.. got dumped yesterday.. i hear from one of my 3 friends around once a week if im lucky..  Ever since i was 12 i said if i end up in this situation by 30 id end it.. ive never been able to see life past pretty much now..  Yet somehow i keep going. It sucks..
Been there. 12 year old piece of shit me laughing at 30 yr old virgin basement dwellers thinking what sad life they have. oh, How the tables have turned.
Not afraid anymore cause that already is my life! Never thought it would happen but i never really had a choice in the matter. Dorian xx 
I just lay lifeless, just keep staring at the ceiling and wish to die. My head hurts, I just keep asking one question - why me? What did I do to deserve this? 
Two and a half more years. I never thought I'd be here at this age. 
How could anyone imagine things to get this messed up. Nightmares are far more easier than this, cause you know that they are just dreams and they gonna end soon. But this is real, and the fact that this gonna continue and you are unable to escape or do something about it - scares the hell out of me. 
Uhm excuse you... dont you shooting judge me. 
Right! Not quite 30 but this stung nonetheless. I try dammit.
33 years old.  Live with family.  Making less than 9 dollars an hour.  Most days, I'm not happy about the situation.  Other days, I could be worse I guess?  Eh.  And I do work weekends.  Every.  Single.  Week.  Two days off in a row is a blessing.  Something that just DOES NOT HAPPEN.
I work 6 days a week, 2 days off in a row is a dream 
:(  Sorry to hear that, friend.  Hopefully you get some kind of windfall and get a decent break soon.
Thank you. Once my debts are paid, I'm going to 4 days a week because my existence is more importsnt than $.
I'm doing it. 28, unable to graduate college, living off parents (no option though, cause unless you graduate college there's nothing much actually you can do in my country). Single, the person I loved, she got married and had a kid in between these years. No meaningful friendship, recently severed communication with the ones I had. I shooting hate it, don't know what to do or what's gonna happen in the coming days. All I could think of is death, can't even do that.
I'm in a similar situation. Sucks.
28 full time employed married still shooting miserable/depressed. Really sucks.
Achievements will never make you happy. You've got to love the process. 
Turned 27 last week. It sounds so old while I don't even feel like an adult. It's a horrible feeling: thinking about my life and realising I have nothing to show for all those years. I may not live at home anymore, but at least then I had someone to talk to. 
I turn 28 in November and I feel sick thinking about how I really didn't expect my life to be like this by almost 28. I wanted to be happily married and living with SO, in a job I like and a puppy. My heart hurts :(
I turn 28 in November and I feel sick thinking about how I really didn't expect my life to be like this by almost 28. I wanted to be happily married and living with SO, in a job I like and a puppy. My heart hurts :(
Same..Almost 26 and I realized how disappointed I am in myself. I had huge dreams and I do and also don't know what happened to me. When I turned 25 I gave myself two years to get my shit together and now I have a year left. Not looking so good.
If your struggling so much then why bring kids into the equation and possibly open them up to the pain your presently going through? I'm not attacking you I just want to see what you say.
i was gonna ask that too. i will never understand that logic.
Because if I die without having any it would seem like a waste of a life. I do want them one day. In ten years. And I want to be a teacher by then. 
Oh I see. The kids would give you purpose. Okay, thanks for answering back
You will still be able to make friends tho. Just have to step out from your comfort zone :) engage in leisure classes or just travel to meet ppl! 
Hes probably already out of his convert zone
Hes probably already out of his convert zone
I don't like convert zones.  Too many religious fanatics. 
It can be more stressful to tell others, because they might constantly bother you with it. If I told my parents, they might give me the tough love scenario, or they might ask me every half-hour hour of the day 'Are you ok? Do you want to go to the doctors?'. I'd rather not deal with that constant attention.
That is an issue I worry about too. I dont want the people I open up to be hurt or concerned for me because they don't deserve to go through the same stress I go through.
That is an issue I worry about too. I dont want the people I open up to be hurt or concerned for me because they don't deserve to go through the same stress I go through.
one of my friends that I have always messages me checking if I'm ok it's honestly pretty annoying because I never am ok. 
one of my friends that I have always messages me checking if I'm ok it's honestly pretty annoying because I never am ok. 
I can relate. I always say 'I'm fine' then change the subject. 
Please try not to look at it that way. People who aren't depressed don't feel the same way about this. If your friend worries about you and you shut them out, you hurt them more than by letting them know how you truly feel. If they are truly your friends, they won't mind sharing the pain, and it may give both of you better insight into your friendship, which will bring you closer together. Please trust me on this one.
Unless they tell you that you're depressing and they want to stop talking to you. My experience has been that it's better to keep it to yourself.
I've told my best friend about the suicide of my girlfriend, major depression and DR and guess what? I get a shootibg message every day with ' heyy how are you? are you okay? do you need something? omg we should meet today i missed u soo much' yeah kiss my ass. 
hey thats kinda messed up, it sounds like theyre trying to reach out. no ones in your head knowing what your expectations are but personally id prefer someone to hit me up to chill and shoot me a text then just flat out not say anything after i told them that kinda heavy shit. 
hey thats kinda messed up, it sounds like theyre trying to reach out. no ones in your head knowing what your expectations are but personally id prefer someone to hit me up to chill and shoot me a text then just flat out not say anything after i told them that kinda heavy shit. 
Look I know that but I told him not to treat me like a little kid all a sudden. He asked me why I was so shy and silent all a sudden. (I was always very shy but imagine even worse for my current situation)
God, shoot yeah. Telling people about my problems usually just makes me even more stressed.. and when I try to explain that to people, they get angry with me. It's a frustrating loop.
Exactly! ^
I simultaneously want to bottle up all my problems, and say nothing about them, by virtue of how stupid everything seems to me...  but then, as a completely opposed idea, I also want things to boil over, so I have an 'excuse' to take everything out on someone. It's not healthy. lol
Me too thanks.  On a serious note, it's not fun walking that emotional tightrope of all or nothing.
Only my most trusted friends really. I don’t trust anyone and try to keep my troubled early childhood a secret to most. 
That's pretty smart.  Not many people understand enough to keep from doing more harm, but it's important to have at least one trusted friend who knows enough to help in ways that actually help.
That's pretty smart.  Not many people understand enough to keep from doing more harm, but it's important to have at least one trusted friend who knows enough to help in ways that actually help.
Agreed, I have this one close friend who I really like and she has helped me with depression and anxiety a lot. She is perhaps the person I trust most. 
I never tell anyone. Not my gf, not my family, not my best friend what's really going on.  
Would you ever tell a psychiatrist? I feel like getting one through my school, but still feel awks sharing feelings and stuff. 
That's me! I can just be having a typical day sitting in class, and then the depression hits me like a punch to the stomach.
When the pain hits your head  And you wish you were dead  That's depression.
When the pain hits your head  And you wish you were dead  That's depression.
Depends on which head you're talking about... It could be an STD.
I honestly do want to disappear or just die, to be honest. I don't see myself making anything out of my life and I don't honestly think I can live like this for a lot longer even though I am still fairly young. 
I just wish I could go somewhere isolated on demand so it's just me and my thoughts
I just wish I could go somewhere isolated on demand so it's just me and my thoughts
Weed and music, man
Sometimes I keep staring at ppl around me talking, waving, smiling, laughing, concerning themselves with jobs, schedule, clothes.... and I'm like 'what the hell dude? Why? We are all a bunch of meat balls with bones and cells inside and we are all gonna die so.... wtf?' And I don't know the answer and I go crazy.
 That's half of my day right there. 
 That's half of my day right there. 
What do u do? The only time I get better is at the weekend with my bf. Sometimes we do pot and shit and play ps4 but that's that. I'm not in the mood for life. I mean, I don't intend suicide but it's a pain living in auto pilot.
Hating college makes me feel this way every other day. It's so exhausting.
Same. They say college is supposed to be the best 4 years of your life. Well, so far it has been the most stressful and depression.
wow, dude. Did I write this comment? Cause I had this exact same realization. E.X.A.C.T! I had the 'none of this matters cause we are going to die and be forgotten' conversation with my wife and her only response was 'That's pretty bleak'
Yeah that's typically the response people give me when I tell them that. 'That's bleak/depressing/etc.' Its the truth though. Truth isn't always pretty, and people don't like that.
This happened to me last night while I was laying in bed trying to fall asleep. I felt like I couldn't breathe and was going to explode.
This is so relatable. I don't even know why I've started feeling this way.    At least we are not alone, we can all explode together ;-;
Yes. This is me. I dislike being in school but I'm in a position where school is my entire life right now because I desperately want to be a nurse. I have to get through school in order to get to the place that I want to be. I feel like I'm trapped sometimes and like I can't escape my awful reality of being in the most challenging classes I've ever taken. 
Same thing with me except in Programming. Learning C++ and other languages right now and the material just seems so overwhelming for me. The harder the material, the more I lose initiative and interest in that course to the point where I sometimes don't even want to open up the course notes. It just gets worse from there and it's like a pipe clogging up, where I end up having to work extra hard towards the end of the semester to catch up on concepts. 
For me the 'saviour' is alcohol, I'm able to consume a shooting stupid amount almost constantly when I'm home and still make multi-million dollar decisions, but yet I can't be shooted to cook for myself so I eat shitty microwave food if at all.
Elon Musk, is that you?
Rain sort of puts the pressure off. It's a license to not feel great. To me that's really liberating.
It brings everybody down to the same level.
I did the same thing a month ago except it was snowing.   Came across [this view](https://i.imgur.com/eQCAstM.jpg) and just sat there watching the snow falling for half an hour. It was magnificent.   Glad you found some escape, even if only for a night. Make sure you drink lotsa tea so you won't get sick!
That is a beautiful picture
I absolutely love rain storms.   Do you write? Because this is beautiful. If you don't, you totally should start practicing with writing prompts.  Hope your day goes well!
I agree! It was wonderfully written.
Um. Weren't you scared? I can't relax walking around alone as a woman at 2am
There's a lot of safe places at 2am. Depends on location.
I want alcohol, too young :(
It only makes things worse in the long run. Don't make the same mistake I did.
Yeah, I feel really lucky that I can experience happiness these days, even if the depression comes and goes. I remember a time when everything felt dark. Maybe things will just change slowly and the periods of happiness will be much longer than the periods of depression. Good luck man 
Shoot man that's a really good perspective to have.  I was sitting here sulking about my lack of friendships, but at least I know that I have the capacity to experience happiness.  If I can have moments or even days/weeks where I'm happy, that means it can happen again.  
Your comment sums up my condition better than anything I’ve read. Thank you and happy holidays. It comforts me to know that I found a sub of friendly people who struggle with the same feelings I do. I am new to this sub and new to the idea of being able to talk about depression.
Thank you for your kind response. Yes it's very comforting to share our thoughts with the people who are going through the same thing; we can understand each other better and share our opinions on how to make things a bit easier.  Happy holidays to you too and welcome to this sub!
Yep. I can feel happy for a few days and then I get sucked back into it for weeks, hell even months. I know how you feel. It's terrible. 
Sometimes it really makes me doubt my own perceptions. I wonder how I can trust myself when my entire outlook on living can change so quickly 
Sometimes it really makes me doubt my own perceptions. I wonder how I can trust myself when my entire outlook on living can change so quickly 
I feel you, buddy. I wish I could give you a different outlook but it's the same shit for me, I can't really help... 
That's lowkey one big side of depression, I think. At least major depression. Sometimes it feels like it gets better, then you get another depression episode and sink back in. Though, it's still not impossible to break the cycle. It takes time, more for some than others, but it's doable.
I'm hoping it's a cycle that can eventually be broken. 
Yeah I'm in that cycle. I just don't know how to cope with strong feelings, so whenever something bad happens I get really depressed. Like a few months ago me and my boyfriend broke up, and for the first month or so I was right back to cutting and wasting away. It's reasonable to be upset over a breakup, but I feel like I have no 'middle ground' when it comes to being upset. I'm either good or suicidal.
I was broke up with my girlfriend about one month ago, and it feels terrible I cry a lot, spend the whole day to re-think what i had did to her. and the worst part is every time i'm alone it gonna snap back again and again just like everything was yesterday.
I hear you. Sometimes I'll be watching a good show, focused on a good game or into my workout, then suddenly my mind will race with all of this terrible shit going on and my drive to do anything is completely gone. My game will feel worthless, my workout stops, I can't focus on the show anymore. All I can feel is this lump in my stomach. It's really aggravating.. 
the lump in the stomach, dread for waking up tomorrow, and irresponsible excitement at the thought of buying a gun..
the lump in the stomach, dread for waking up tomorrow, and irresponsible excitement at the thought of buying a gun..
I'm one of those that also has an anxiety disorder and the idea of death scares me even more than thinking about all of the shitty choices I've made. I'm not sure if that's a good thing for me or not. 
Sadly I never have a good time anymore. The loneliness is just always present and distracts from everything else. Sucks to know I will always be alone. 
Yeah, I've pretty much accepted it at this point. I'm sorry
Yeah, I've pretty much accepted it at this point. I'm sorry
I felt this way every day of my life until I met my wife. I honestly don't know what I would do without her.
We are all lonely together. :( Until you find someone, enjoy that you are okay. That's a big achievement on its own. 
I'm pretty much never okay, my brain always finds a way to shoot me over
I'm pretty much never okay, my brain always finds a way to shoot me over
Oh haha me too. My brain is my worst enemy, turns a normal life into a disaster. Its like a badly trained dog, I guess? Idk if that's a good metaphor lol.
Married. I still have a lot of loneliness. 
Being alone and loneliness are not mutually exclusive. Thank god someone else gets this! Having an SO does not cure depression, not having one isn't the cause of it! 
I've never related to something as much as I do to this, holy shoot
Same....^same.....^same......
All I can say is continue to distract yourself. I know it really sucks because it feels like a never ending cycle... but this is how I've been making it through my days. ((Distractions and Pretending))
This is so accurate. I saw an old couple yesterday sharing a joke and it made me feel so far removed from the world. Like I don't deserve that kind of love. I've been trying to distract myself because that's all you can do! 
This is so accurate. I saw an old couple yesterday sharing a joke and it made me feel so far removed from the world. Like I don't deserve that kind of love. I've been trying to distract myself because that's all you can do! 
The problem is: you DO deserve that kind of love. We all hate ourselves for things we probably would forgive someone else for. Idk you, but I'm sure you are worth loving. I believe everyone is to an extent.
The problem is: you DO deserve that kind of love. We all hate ourselves for things we probably would forgive someone else for. Idk you, but I'm sure you are worth loving. I believe everyone is to an extent.
I know. That's just another part of the problem isn't it? Knowing that you are beating yourself up for reasons that only apply to you. I'd never hate anyone else so vehemently, or treat them as such an annoyance.
Same here. No one taught me to stand up for myself so people walked all over me. I wasn't properly prepared for the adult world so when I graduated high school I had no known goals and felt like a waste of space. And I break down under pressure, even when it's not that intense of pressure. And that effects my job and my relationships and everything else. 
Hello me. Nice to meet you. 
Hello me. Nice to meet you. 
Oh man that is me!
Oh man that is me!
Me too. I can only work once I've been completely broken and then I end up working and making progress as I am picking up the pieces, and I stop working and being productive once I am whole... till I fall apart again.
Mhmm. This is actually a huge problem with school. They teach you about a wide variety of things but, for the most part, they kind of just throw you out into the world and expect you to sink or swim at the end. 
It’s because they leave life skills to parents. If your parent/sir caregivers lack them or don’t give a shut, your shooted
It’s because they leave life skills to parents. If your parent/sir caregivers lack them or don’t give a shut, your shooted
Well, that explains why I'm so shooted. 
I'm 26 and I only learnt how to pay rent and tax 3 months ago. I also often feel like a burden to those around me, but when it comes to teaching about the functions and systems of growing older, I assure you, it's mostly the world's fault. There is a terrible lack of priorities put in place to prepare you for those kinds of things.
There's no priority to learn these things, yet the expectation is so high that you should already know them
I don't know how things work in the US but where I live you can pay people to do your taxes. Most likely you can do the same in the US but I don't know how common it is, here it is extremely common especially with small businesses.
I'm 24, most people my age in the US have no idea how to pay bills or cook their own food. I had to teach my friend how to fill out W-4 tax paper so he could get a job.  W-4 are mandatory for all jobs in US
Why? Because I said so/because i'm your parent. Turns out those are actually not great reasons and do harm in the long run.
Whenever my sister or myself questioned why our father wanted us to do something, 90% of the time it was 'because I'm the adult and what I say goes'. Doesn't really build up good habits in a kid.
Why go to university? Because you have to. Everyone does it.  Now here I am. Bachelor degree and unemployed (left my job because of unacceptably low salary). I don't remember them promising a job, so at least they can't be blamed for this exactly. But I remember them saying something like 'get a diploma and we will shoot off'. So next year if someone compains about my unemployment, I will reply GFYS.
Atleast you managed to get a degree so there's that.
4th beer shows that the issue is deep. Real personality should come after 2.
Ain't that the truth :)
I've pretty much been raised by the internet, it's all I know.
Me too but what sucks for me is that my social anxiety bleeds online as well...when I play games online or even some Reddit sometimes I will type out a full message and something just makes me erase like I shouldn't have even bothered typing anything at all.
Me too but what sucks for me is that my social anxiety bleeds online as well...when I play games online or even some Reddit sometimes I will type out a full message and something just makes me erase like I shouldn't have even bothered typing anything at all.
Believe in yourself. Just throw those thoughts out the window. They're all bullshit anyway. Negativity is a strong liar.
I’m 27 I have aspergers and feel the same way....  and currently I’m dealing with suicidal feelings and thoughts ..
I deal with theses thoughts every day. They give me a bit of relieve actually but in the end, I don't even have the courage to kill myself
Yes, I was a good obedient kid. But I'm not anywhere near a functional adult.
Ah! Yes. Doing what you're told and then not having anyone to tell you is difficult. I usually have to tell myself out loud.
Me too!  I feel like a cake that was improperly prepared before being thrown in the over and is not a soupy, chunky mess...too late to rebake, you can't take apart a failed cake ingredient by ingredient and start again...the cake will just have to learn to advocate for itself and learn techniques to accept the shit baking job done on it and find ways to love life and feel ok. 
what a writer you are!  Love your analogy.
I never knew there was a way to describe how I felt. I've always felt like I must have missed something growing up. Like I wasn't taught how to make friends or be very social so I Just kind of exist as an adult.
This sounds like me. Currently 30 and friendless, outside of work acquaintances. I mostly sit in silence unless I'm at work.
I think I've gone many days at college without saying a single word. And then I go home and do the same.
Is it bad that work is my escape?
I feel the exact same way. I'm 18 years old and I'll be 19 in a month and still don't have a job nor go to school. I barely made it out of high School, ffs.
For what it's worth when I was 19 I was going on week long methamphetamine benders and now @ 25 am doing well in the career department but still depressed. I don't really know how I got here to be honest but at least that can give you some hope. 
For what it's worth when I was 19 I was going on week long methamphetamine benders and now @ 25 am doing well in the career department but still depressed. I don't really know how I got here to be honest but at least that can give you some hope. 
It's all good man! Thank you for sharing that with me. I hope you can get thru or get some help with ur depression. Danged up illness man.. really shooted up. For what it's worth,  im actually having TMS therapy very soon and it sounds extremely promising! I recommend you look it up and consider the treatment. From what I've read and the video interviews I've watched it seems like a medical miracle. 
It's all good man! Thank you for sharing that with me. I hope you can get thru or get some help with ur depression. Danged up illness man.. really shooted up. For what it's worth,  im actually having TMS therapy very soon and it sounds extremely promising! I recommend you look it up and consider the treatment. From what I've read and the video interviews I've watched it seems like a medical miracle. 
I'll certainly look that up, but I live on a claustrophobicly small island smack in the middle of the Mediterranean where new therapy takes a while to catch on with larger countries. I'm so grateful for subreddits like these where I can feel like I'm in a community of people that feel like me. I've never been to therapy ever and consider this therapy of some kind.
I understand the feeling. Wasn't depresson per se with me. undiagnosed ADHD. Kept failing at everything in life and never understanding why. Now as an adult and father I feel like there's obvious things that escape me that I really *should* know.
I was going to say the same. ADHD and depression travel together way too often. :(
This is me
That's me, too!
I wish I was taught the jargon and process of seeing doctors and working with insurance in high school. I just started the process of being treated for depression with my general practitioner. I was given 4 referrals, and I have no idea how to handle them.    
Man I feel you on so many levels , I hate how I never knew how beurocratic the world is.
This....what I go through every single night.
It's always a love/hate reaction when I relate so much to something on this sub
I live to sleep. 8 hours or more of unconsciousness, where the world around me also shuts down for a time. I even have a few minutes in the mornings after waking up where I am able to appreciate the disconnection before all of the dread starts again.
Same here, except on the rare nights I dream i always have nightmares so that's my gamble, but smoking weed lessens the chance of dreams 👍
Same here, except on the rare nights I dream i always have nightmares so that's my gamble, but smoking weed lessens the chance of dreams 👍
Keep a TV on with quiet sound playing, and you won't dream.  That's how I manage it, at least.
I'm on the other side of the spectrum. I can't sleep but I want to. Been using cough syrup and alcohol but I just cant seem to fall asleep before 4am even with those. I dread the end of the day now because of the thoughts that would come to my mind when I try to sleep. Thanks depression. Live Strong!
For me, alcohol makes falling asleep easy, but makes the quality of my sleep bad, thus making it hard to get up in the morning.
At night everything is so nice, your left alone and it's all dark. It's like the day but you get left alone and can do whatever you need to do, such as cry and get all your emotions out and vent however you need it. Sometimes I wish the day didn't exist 
This. For a few hours nobody bothers you, you're all alone and for me it feels a little surreal, as though your problems don't exist.
This. For a few hours nobody bothers you, you're all alone and for me it feels a little surreal, as though your problems don't exist.
Yeah it's amazing. Until yknow it ends, and you have a lack of sleep and the morning feels like shit. . . Like usual. Like OP said thanks depression. You Make my day that much better . . . 
Sometimes I feel like I have shooting Alzheimer's. I hate this shooting shit.
Holy shit this is so true. One time i went as far as going to school without my backpack, thankfully i noticed halfway through in the bus
Holy shit this is so true. One time i went as far as going to school without my backpack, thankfully i noticed halfway through in the bus
Left my bag in a restaurant. Didn't notice until 9 hours later.
If you're like me, when you forget something - you forget it's in part because of the depression... and just think you forgot because you're stupid or something. :/
Yep  And even when you know, depression still insits it's because you're stupid.
I'm the same. Used to be the best student up through the end of high school. Now in college, I can't do crap and fail classes left and right. It's shooting ridiculous and I feel like shit because my life is crumbling and I can't stop it 
I am experiencing same stuff. It's hard man! Not to mention the procrastination for hours!  Dealing with reality that you aren't what u were before is hardest. 
It's made it practically impossible to sit down and study for school.
Tell me about it. I feel like a mindless zombie staring at a wall.
Way too relatable. People tell you do get up and do things, but just nothing makes me happy nor gives me any pleasure, so I just end up sitting on my ass all day and playing videogames/watching yt. I think laziness is a part of depression, as in not being tired, but just not having any motivation whatsoever.
yeah and what truly sucks is even if you end up spending the whole day playing games/yt/browsing the net, you're still not happy.
Except for your mom...that matters.
literally the only reason I keep myself alive. For her. Funnily we are not even that close but since she is the only person that never lets me go, she is close. 
It affected me so much I might as well be retarded
I've actually considered that I have some kind of adult onset dislexia or ADHD- it's that bad some times. 
I've actually considered that I have some kind of adult onset dislexia or ADHD- it's that bad some times. 
I have depression and ADHD so it's certainly a possibility 
it takes me 10 mins to send a text message because im stupid
that's not why
Yes. I tend to forget my things (like in school) and I find it super challenging to work on something and stick to it
This is me in. But then again I've always had trouble with these things.
Yep, i made a post about this myself not long ago.
Apologies. I wasn't aware.
Apologies. I wasn't aware.
Nothing to apologize for, i was just saying i relate lol. I feel you 100%, depression has wrecked my cognition, i wish it was a more widely known symptom of depression as i've seen so many posts here similar to yours and mine.
Oh yes. My vocabulary has taken a huge hit in particular.
THIS. I used to write and would have people ask me to write screenplays for new projects. Now everything is just a 'thing'. I don't know the name to anything and my way of describing things do not go past 'nice', 'good', or 'happy'. It's like I'm a five year old when I speak and write. 
I used to think of sleep like that, but then all of my dreams started becoming so emotionally traumatic that I now hate sleeping. Every time I wake up I'm even more depressed than usual because of these heavy emotions. It sucks.
/r/LucidDreaming
/r/LucidDreaming
I could never get it to work. I feel I'm too exhausted during the day so when I finally fall asleep I'm next to dead. 
I just wish those dreams would never end. I wish never to wake up. The moment I wake up from a dream, I feel horrible, sad and more depressed. Cause you know, you feel like - that could have been me, things should have been like that in reality. But yes, it's an actual respite from the reality.
Yes! It feels like everything is just snatched and taken away when I wake up. 
Yes! It feels like everything is just snatched and taken away when I wake up. 
Exactly! I feel disconnected, like I am in a new place. Distant from anything that I've ever known. 
SO much. The sucky thing is I have trouble getting to sleep so I only get to escape for like, 5 or so hours before I have to get up. But those 5 hours? Pure nothing. And nothing is better than whatever this is.
My problem with sleep is that it's like a time skip. So when life goes particularly sour, i tend to procrastinate sleep a lot, so i won't have to face the challenges of the next day as soon.
Yes! This is me to a t.
I feel better in my dreams knaw what u talk about
Your girlfriend is trying to kill You? Nothing makes sense about this situation. Unless the reason you waited so long to confide in her was because you knew shed freak out and literally do all the wrong things. Really sorry about your kid...
She says id be happier staying with family instead of her 
She says id be happier staying with family instead of her 
Is that because she thinks it's her fault that you feel like that?
Is that because she thinks it's her fault that you feel like that?
Yeah
why don't you go to your family? 
I'm at my dads now who I haven't really been speaking to much since I was 19 (22 now). No idea where to go from here 
What the actual shoot
Ikr ... this is so rude and hearthless ..
Post in r/legaladvice. This isn't just a depression thing. It's a, 'She's keeping my stuff hostage' thing. And, how to move forward with your baby, too. She may think she's protecting herself and your child, too, so at some point, you could talk with her about your reality of depression and how it doesn't mean you can't be a good father and that this role is important to you.
This too, maybe.  She is literally keeping OP's child from him because she doesn't understand the basics of what depression actually is. She thinks that everyone with depression seems to be some sort of psycho.
This too, maybe.  She is literally keeping OP's child from him because she doesn't understand the basics of what depression actually is. She thinks that everyone with depression seems to be some sort of psycho.
Yes.this is a very strong possibility. I believe the mother may have this feeling as well, and put the pressure on the daughter, especially since the daughter lives with the mother. It is not just the gf making the decision, it is also the mother in this case (I think). Living on one's own helps this, but even I do not do this so I understand why the OP does not.
You can't throw someone out on the street and lock them out of their own house.   Are you leaving out details that might make her kicking you out seem more justified?     If you're not, and she really did just boot you for admitting you're in a rough spot,  call the police.   She has no legal right to do this.
It's not my house I was just living there with her family 
It's not my house I was just living there with her family 
If you were living there, it's your house.  You should look into tenant rights.  The police will most likely heavily encourage you to move on and find somewhere else to go to if you can... but if you literally cannot and you're homeless, you have the right to stay at that place while you find other housing.
I'm at my dads now. My girlfriend packed some bags for me and now I'm back with my dad like I'm in high school. Back at square one lads. Words cannot define the turmoil im feeling 
I was back at square one a few months ago when my gf kicked me out. Just gotta start digging yourself out of the hole. It's tough but you need to move forward and use it all as motivation to get the help you need and start doing everything you can to get your shit together. 
I'm at my dads now. My girlfriend packed some bags for me and now I'm back with my dad like I'm in high school. Back at square one lads. Words cannot define the turmoil im feeling 
No, you're not at Square 1. Just a different stage of your life, a transitional one. First thing is to tell your doctor how you feel. Antidepressants are a great crutch to get you back on a more even keel. Therapy to help with the root cause. Lawyer for access to your daughter.      It'll feel overwhelming right now (woo anxiety!), but just focus on one thing at a time.      Hugs man, it's shit. But you got this.
Ex girlfriend now I should hope. Did this to help you? Dang that, kicking a suicidal person out on the street isn’t helping them, it’s being fearful and ignorant and cruel. It sucks that there’s a kid in the picture but you should leave her vile ass for what she did for your own sake because people like her will never change, she’ll hurt you again the first chance she gets.
It's just no im at nothing. No car no job no bedroom of my own, no family now... I have nothing. I don't know how to recover from This 
Nothing about this situation makes any sense. 
Nothing about abuse/crime ever makes sense.  It would make more sense for everyone in the world to cooperate, never lie and be friendly with eacher other and never commit any crimes.  It would make more sense to communicate directly, communicate discomfort instead of being passively/actively aggressive and give constructive critique.  It would make sense to analyse problems and solve them.
It sounds like she doesn’t want to “deal” with someone with depression. I’m sorry you’re going through this , someone who cares for you would be there for you especially when you open yourself up like this. Maybe you dodged a bullet ... 
Don't know why you got downvoted. Sounds pretty accurate
How were her actions supposed to help you?
You'd have to ask her and her mom. They're the masterminds that came up with that idea, without consulting me at all or talking to me 
You'd have to ask her and her mom. They're the masterminds that came up with that idea, without consulting me at all or talking to me 
OP I know this is hard but you have to stand up to them for what’s right not just for yourself, their views on mental illness are extremely skewed and will be a risk to your child down the line as well.
'She told me she did this to help me'  Then she is lying to you. Get your belongings (and daughter if possible) and get away from this obviously toxic relationship. You're better off without her.  There is the possibility however that this was just a knee jerk reaction because she didn't know what to do. Even if that's the case, she should know better than to keep your belongings and daughter from you.
I want to get my daughter but she's telling me what she's doing isn't illegal so I don't know what to do 
I want to get my daughter but she's telling me what she's doing isn't illegal so I don't know what to do 
Post on r/legaladvice about the issue, because I am fairly certain what she is doing is illegal. Not 100% sure, but likely.
This legit pained me and made me cry. That's so ridiculously shooted up 
Sorry it made you cry, it made me cry too 
Where you at bro
Sacramento ca brotha 
Lifeprotips - never get or share a house with anyone else.   Getting my own little house all for me very soon.
Except what this chick did is illegal, if you get mail there you're a tenant and have rights..
A good response to 'what is so hard about your life that you are depressed and what to kill yourself?' is the point out that part of depression is not having 'normal' reactions to things and there is an irrational dissonance with reality and your perception of reality. If depression was simply having a tough life then it could easily be solved with more money/friends etc but it's clearly not.
Exactly, I have depression, I've struggled with suicidal thoughts very recently even...I have a good marriage, a good job, a nice apartment...but I can't always see anything worth living for....because I have depression. 
Exactly, I have depression, I've struggled with suicidal thoughts very recently even...I have a good marriage, a good job, a nice apartment...but I can't always see anything worth living for....because I have depression. 
This is so true. You may have 'everything going for you', 'stop being so sensitive' or 'don't be so selfish' (as I was told), but if it's not you experiencing the hell and in the throws of depression, then you have no idea how alone and disabling it can be. If that makes sense. Depression sucks, and there isn't a day that goes by that I don't feel it in some way. Some days are easier than others. Therapy and/or medication helps to an extent.
This is so true. You may have 'everything going for you', 'stop being so sensitive' or 'don't be so selfish' (as I was told), but if it's not you experiencing the hell and in the throws of depression, then you have no idea how alone and disabling it can be. If that makes sense. Depression sucks, and there isn't a day that goes by that I don't feel it in some way. Some days are easier than others. Therapy and/or medication helps to an extent.
You have it good. Imagine having depression *and* a shitty life. 
Im so sorry you went through this  >You are a peice of shit parent if you have done this to your kid.  1000000%   >'you know they just put the parents under a microscope'.  please at some point let them know that a microscope isnt needed, a shooting blind person could see they are shitty parents
>a shooting blind person can see they are shitty parents   🔥
pfff. I told my mom i wanted to commit suicide and she pleaded with me to not do it in the house.......... she doesn't want any problems and to ruin her relationship with her bf. She said to please go to a park or something and do it there.  This really happened
What the shoot? That must have hurt a shit ton I can't imagine :/ how are you doing now though? 
What the shoot? That must have hurt a shit ton I can't imagine :/ how are you doing now though? 
Sigh. You know the psychological damage she did to me as a child hurt more but being older im honestly very numb. Now? I'm just trying to stay strong and to maintain my sanity and not let existentialism get in my head. 
wtf is wrong with some people??? jesus christ man i feel sorry for you, genuinely hope things get better for you
It's ok man, honestly you shouldn't feel sorry for me. Feel sorry for her. Because at the end of her life, when her looks fade away and she's no longer desirable, no one wants to take care of her. She'll realize how bad she shooted up on some mothers day anniversary like a decade or so from now.
I didn't confess, but my brother found out I was reading a book about depression. We had an argument and he mentioned it, saying why am I depressed when I have the things I need, that I can't possibly have it and calling me in a very insulting tone a 'maniodepressive freak'.  Thinking about it again now makes me want to beat the shit out of him, but I will just say he dropped to a whole new level of low for me.
I have been dealing with depression for over 10 years. Anxiety and hearing voices.  My wife doesn't understand. And my health insurance. Things that is not medical needed for me to see a psychiatrist.   Until I hurt my self or someone else. Then they will probably be like. He  should have gone for help.  So I know what's like having people not to believe you. Until is to late.
Go to the doctor. They can't keep you from going, and at some point you have to stand up for yourself. You're in their home so be respectful and everything, but don't wait for them to care before you'll start taking care of yourself. Once you're better, you'll get a job; once you get a job, you'll save up to move out and surround yourself only with people who truly love you. They aren't worth dying over, get your health sorted. 
I know, I know all of these things but it's just so damn hard to get motivated to actually do anything about it. My parents usually act like I don't exist so I do the same back. I just wish I didn't have to do everything alone. Thanks though, it helps talking.
I know, I know all of these things but it's just so damn hard to get motivated to actually do anything about it. My parents usually act like I don't exist so I do the same back. I just wish I didn't have to do everything alone. Thanks though, it helps talking.
One step at a time, although I can totally relate. Sometimes there's just something, that even if it's not a life-or-death situation, it can be just some tiny thing, you just can't muster up the motivation to do it. Try to break that cycle and get yourself there anyway. Someone can't be holding our hand every step of the way. Take care. 
That's because they think functioning = happiness   
Well when im functioning well i feel happy like instead of another day wallowing in bed i get to be busy cleaning and decluttering my place and that enough is therapeutic for me
'he was such a nice guy... we were the best of friends, I don't know why he didn't ask for help?'
When in reality you have been crying out for help every day for years. Not always verbally, but you can tell when someone is deeply depressed by the way they carry themselves, the fact that no matter what they never want the conversation to be about things that they want or care about, or even when they haven't seemed 'connected' to the group in ages (like they are always zoned out or 'have a lot on their mind') 
And then they'll all say how SHOCKED they are when you off yourself.
I feel like if I ever did off myself id probs leave a list of like 'here's the six people that actually get to say they care, anyone else who says that is a liar.'
As long as you don't bring down their mood then they couldn't care less about how you feel.
Ain't that the truth. 
This! I can't imagine myself being happy or under what circumstances. I don't even enjoy the most things I used to enjoy anymore.  Everything I see in the future is myself being a slave for society without any personal happiness. 
That's why I have drugs on my list of things, the numbness makes it hard to be self aware. Harder to feel. Easier to deal and live 
> but there are people out there like your family/close friends who genuinely want you to be happy.   That's not quite true for everyone.
Indeed. And that's the worst part of it all.
I had a similar epiphany. Its hard to make friends if you don't act like everything is okay. Also good friends do care, but they want you to 'function' as you said. I don't want my friends to think I'm a chore so for the most part I keep to myself aside from one or two person I confide a bit.   It sucks. 
Careful how much you confide in your close friends. I use to confide in a friend and he won't even talk to me any more if I'm being depressed because he knows nothing works. Eventually. Everyone. Gets. Tired. Of. Hearing. It. Sorry not trying to be a jerk I just don't want you to have to experience that.
Happiness aside, I'm less depressed when I'm functional and vice-versa. Funtionality is a key indicator for me. If anyone can help me be more functional, it's often key to helping me dig out of my depression. 
Don't you ever, just, in the middle of functioning just get a heavy dose of depressive thoughts hitting you in the side of the head?  Happens to me all the time and instantly kills all motivation and drive I have.  This would even happen when I was lifting everyday.
Don't you ever, just, in the middle of functioning just get a heavy dose of depressive thoughts hitting you in the side of the head?  Happens to me all the time and instantly kills all motivation and drive I have.  This would even happen when I was lifting everyday.
I have this, sometimes I manage to be productive and then just out of nowhere I start weeping about my life. Makes it hard to get things done. 
If you can't function, what good are you to society?
Perhaps very little. But remember, brain chemistry and circumstanses of birth is largely a crap-shoot. iI may be reasonable to ask not what you can do for societey, but what (if we are to call ourselves a society) society can do for 'the least of these'. Should life be a roulette wheel, should we apply a gambling model to society, with big winners who should be worshipped for thier great luck, and big losers be damned for lack or same? I hopoe not. 
I feel like suffering from depression totally bars you from being in a relationship too. Nobody wants to be with a sad person.
it's important to hear 'I still love you when you're sad'  or angry, or when we're arguing, or sick, etc.
CBT in a nutshell.
That's because functioning is the first step to happiness.  You can't finish the last chapter if you haven't started the first one.
I agree that very few people care if you're happy or not as long as you function, but I feel like for me, functioning is a giant step towards happiness. First and foremost, focus on what's going to help YOU be happy.
i really agree with this. I had to be able to get out of bed, and pick up the phone, and do simple chores and stuff like that - then i started to be happy again.   there are a lot of aspects to happiness and the practical day-to-day functioning is one important thing. Same with self care, and recreation, nutrition and exercise ans general health... lots of things add up.
For someone who is not depressed, being able to function is a sign of working to combat your depression. I would rather be depressed and 'faking' being functional than be depressed and non-functional.
but feels equally as pointless :/
but feels equally as pointless :/
It has some benefits. It makes other people happy, which makes my life less stressful.
I care if people are happy. My problem is that I can't tell if I care because I truely want other people to be happy, or if I just want them to be happy because their suffering makes me uncomfortable.
Not quite sure how to put this, but is this a useful distinction to make? If the suffering of others makes you uncomfortabel, you're an empathetic person. The alternative is people who aren't bothered by the suffering of others.
Why is every depressing reply on this post getting a lot of upvotes and the ones actually trying to help barely get 5? That feeds the depression mangs. 
Because that's depression is what about, it won't let you slip away.  EDIT: Funny that you got 5.
I've been telling people I'm 'just tired' since junior high. If I was to be believed they would assume I had a thyroid problem or something. No one likes to hear 'ya, I hate life'.
It's better than saying 'Terrible' when you're asked 'how's life?'.
It's better than saying 'Terrible' when you're asked 'how's life?'.
I facepalm at the memory of all the social contacts I've ruined by being honest. 
Holy crap.  I'm having a huge problem with an incident at work.  Everyone keeps asking me how I'm doing since then.  They are being nice, but it keeps making me think of it, and then I get a sad.
I always get told I have sad eyes, even if I'm not feeling sad, which just makes me think of being sad, ruining a happy moment. If only we could all be more understanding of each other's emotional states. 
I sit on the same spot on the couch for several days now. This avoids contact with the outside world, which avoids the statements stated above. What day is it?
The same day it is every day. 
Thanks to years of therapy no one ever guesses I'm miserable.  Everyone thinks I'm a happy go lucky, cool calm and collected, dude.   Plastic smiles are a curse.  Thanks to that therapy I look happy living in misery, and cannot get any help.
That therapy doesn't sound very therapeutic...
You should try getting more sleep and smiling.  Then people wouldn't bother you so much.
I sleep too much already.
Sleep at night (:
'In a real dark night of the soul it is always 3 o'clock in the morning.'
Wow, people took that seriously.
I know.  I guess I should have added a winky face.
I know.  I guess I should have added a winky face.
I don't know, that still sounds a bit too subtle. Maybe something more along the lines of **I'M BEING SARCASTIC** 
I know exactly what you mean. I've pretty much lost everything (career, hobbies, friends) due to depression and right now it takes all the energy I have not to give up completely. The only reason I haven't killed myself is because it would destroy my parents. I've tried over 20 different meds, a shoot-ton of various therapies and almost 30 electroconvulsive therapy treatments, and I still feel like this. I don't know what else to do. I feel doomed. 
I'm sorry you are going through all that 
The problem is that sometimes that's the only thing that brings (at least) me round and makes me think of the levity of what I am considering. I've never felt like I'm living for someone else but I have often 'put off' suicide because of the impact to others. When I come out of my episode (haven't found a better name yet!) I'm so glad I did.
I think whatever it takes to get you back from your lowest point is fine, but as a general rule I really think you have to find your own reasons to live.    I also feel that if you use others as an everyday reason to stay alive,  you will inevitably associate your suffering with them and come to resent them.
Man sorry you're going through this. I went through a similar thought process while taking LSD for the first time. My brain catalogued my life and told me I can't kill myself because it would destroy my parents.  Out of curiosity, have you tried lsd or mushrooms? I feel like taking acid has helped me a little with my depression. 
I would like to try lsd and/or mushrooms, but I don't know anyone who could help me get any
Try the ketogenic diet and devoting a substantial amount of your life to nature. Ever since I got back into surfing, my insanely gnarly depression is nowhere to be seen :)  Good luck hommie
Yes, do the things that depression makes it super difficult if not impossible to do! Such good advice /s
Yes.   Whilst others have found a way to cope, to move on, and to grow up, I seem to be perpetually trapped by my mind - that of a frightened child with very limited coping mechanism. I have no friends, no partner, no career to speak of, and too old and tired to really change anything. 
How old are you then if I can ask.
I lost all my friends trying to talk to them about how I feel. 
Ayy those sound like the type of friends I used to have. Now I just keep it all locked inside and don't tell anyone new. 
On top of that many people fundamentally don't understand depression. Here in the west, people generally have a negative take when it comes to mental illness. My whole family has a spectrum of mental illnesses. Maybe if people stopped shooting stigmatizing and assuming shit when it comes to the complexity of these illnesses, we would be able to make substantially faster progress. But society holds the mentally ill back. Its sad. Almost inherently depressing.
The west has a lot less stigma than other parts of the world. But it still sucks anywhere. 
In post-USSR countries people just don't believe that depression is an illness. For them it is just a state of mind which will soon end. Also it's not cool for man to have 'feelings hurt', 'are you a girl or a little baby'?  As a result - skyrocketing suicide rates and enormous level of alcohol consumption 
> it's not cool for man to have 'feelings hurt', 'are you a girl or a little baby'? As a result - skyrocketing suicide rates  Same situation here in New Zealand :(
I lost my marriage a couple months ago. I've been fired from jobs, lost money, lost a huge chunk of my kid's lives, and a shitload of friends. If I were a video game character I'd have re-rolled myself years ago. 
That's funny.  That's how I used to view things too.  If my life were a videogame I'd choose to bail on a run and start another attempt.  I see I was wrong now but it's cool to see someone else thinks like that.  Cool in a - ummm - sad way.  Don't give up man.  There is more good in life than most of us see.
Yep. My exSO has ptsd and depression, and that shit has ripped my life apart (and I'm only a third party). His day to day is a struggle of meds, drs, and trying to afford all the things he needs to keep his head above water. He's a beautiful, wonderful man who deserves a break. Our mental health care system in America makes me shooting *sick*. Dang President Reagan for that. 
 I'm sorry to hear that. Is that why you broke up?
What's the point living as a workslave? I sure as don't know.
Same here. You go to work to pay the bills. Wth, when is this gonna end? Am I just a warm body? (Well, im dead inside, but you get what I mean).
 Same here. I can't get a degree or find a job because of my anxiety, can't do even simple tasks because of depression. I don't have any dreams or plans for the future, everything seems pointless and I'm only alive because I don't want to ruin my parents' lives.  I feel completely destroyed and trashy. No idea how to get out of this 
I feel the same way. I'm sorry you also have to deal with this.
Is there anything which would be helpful saying if a depressive person really answered the question? My girlfriend has depression and is suicidal, but I got my depression under control (in the moment), so I am somehow able to understand the situation she is on. So I also know how a 'Im good, how are you?' is meant and what's really behind it and I really want to help her but I don't know how.   
Well, you can try listening to her. Tell her to share whatever she's feeling. Say things like 'I understand', 'I know it must be really difficult for you' or 'I see you are trying really hard'. Avoid things like 'It will be okay'. It doesn't help at all.  Just being there for her and genuinely listening is the best thing you can do
Spending a lot of time at work in the bathroom or break room trying to stop a panic attack or just because you need a break from people. 
True. I do this all the time. I get so out of breath and sweaty. I hate panic attacks. They are the worst thing. People who are 'normal' won't ever understand it. 
True. I do this all the time. I get so out of breath and sweaty. I hate panic attacks. They are the worst thing. People who are 'normal' won't ever understand it. 
They hurt my chest really bad too. I must look like I'm having a heart attack....
>Being 21 but feeling like you are already 81  Worst thing for me is feeling like I'm young, and these are going to be the best years of my life, and I'm too depressed to actually take advantage of them. 
I think that every morning while I'm in the shower. Idk but it has become like a norm for me. I guess the thought is too scary to let go or simply avoid. It's heartbreaking to know that you are wasting your youth and but you can't do anything about it.
Crying quietly in public when there's no instigating factor. You feel sad, so you cry.  Sleeping, and sleeping, and sleeping.  'I slept for nearly 15 hours yesterday.'  'Oh my God, that sounds *awesome.*'  No, no it's not. I'm trying to reach out to you right now, but you're missing it.
I think the best/worst part of those long sleep sessions is it's more 'I laid there immobile pretending to sleep for as long as I could' rather than just being passed out. I find I lay there trying to sleep, sleep a little, wake up, then am disgruntled that I am conscious again because being conscious means facing how you feel. I shift, roll over and try to pass out again so I can pretend I'm dead. Then people think you're lazy for laying in bed all day...
I think the best/worst part of those long sleep sessions is it's more 'I laid there immobile pretending to sleep for as long as I could' rather than just being passed out. I find I lay there trying to sleep, sleep a little, wake up, then am disgruntled that I am conscious again because being conscious means facing how you feel. I shift, roll over and try to pass out again so I can pretend I'm dead. Then people think you're lazy for laying in bed all day...
I usually end up right on the edge of consciousness, it's usually the only time I have dreams I can remember. 
I'll also add not reading (which I usually love).   Feeling guilty about everything.   Everything feels more difficult than it should be. 
True. Reading used to be my most favourite thing but i can't bring myself to do it anymore.
True. Reading used to be my most favourite thing but i can't bring myself to do it anymore.
Same. :/ I keep staring at my books. 
Same. :/ I keep staring at my books. 
Same here. Wish we could start reading again. 
Delete Facebook. It's been a year for me and my life has significantly improved. Limited my sugar intake. Bring dried fruits, water and protein bars with you everywhere you go. Learn a new skill. Go for a walk. You can do this.
I actually did do that for a month and it was a good month. Should do it again.
I actually did do that for a month and it was a good month. Should do it again.
Do it again!!!!
Getting irritable easily (I have a friend who actually knows when I'm doing really bad because of this).   Feeling totally apathetic about things that should be exciting and trying to fake excitement 
I do this too. My husband took me to Disneyland for us to reconnect. I had to pretend everything was exciting and I was having a blast. I was miserable and hated everything and everyone. Nothing is fun anymore and the things that used to bring me joy I can't even bother to get out of the house to go do. Depression is insidious. 
I do this too. My husband took me to Disneyland for us to reconnect. I had to pretend everything was exciting and I was having a blast. I was miserable and hated everything and everyone. Nothing is fun anymore and the things that used to bring me joy I can't even bother to get out of the house to go do. Depression is insidious. 
It really is. I hate that part so much. I really do want to have a good time....but can't. We're going to the upper peninsula (Michigan) in May and I'm scared of not enjoying something I was really looking forward to when we started talking about it last year. I used to enjoy so much...
We do live action role play too which is something I remember loving and now I can't bear the idea....I'm not excited and I'm scared everyone might see that and playing a character that's very happy....isn't going to be easy. 
See?  That sounds so fun and if I had friends I'd totally be into that. I hope you enjoy your time. Sincerely I do. 
Wanting to make friends on reddit to get out of this crippling loneliness. See a post I like. Do nothing.
--
Add start drinking to the list. Doesnt change anything, but helps with sleeping.
When I quit drinking I got markedly more depressed... Instead of being able to escape from my reality, I was forced to face it head on every day. Drinking was the only that brought me anything resembling joy. Now I only have depression, but alteast I've saved a ton of money not buying booze! 
Going to bed at the right time but not falling asleep right away, waking up several times a night, waking up on time (6a) if I have to go to work...waking up at 10/11 if I don't...then moving to the couch for the day.    Eating pb and Js despite there being other food available because they don't have as many steps.   Spending my free time all on reddit or watching tv.   Neglecting relationships...this one is sad because I'm married. 
Man, the PB&J really struck a cord with me, as silly as that sounds.  Literally eat it every single shooting day...
wishing you had artistic talent so people would actually listen to your problems
I learned how to produce music to help with my depression (music therapy), they still don't care smh.
I learned how to produce music to help with my depression (music therapy), they still don't care smh.
Been thinking about picking up guitar just so i could play out how i'm feeling. Do you think i should try it out? 
Been thinking about picking up guitar just so i could play out how i'm feeling. Do you think i should try it out? 
That's what I am doing, but learning to play is difficult ): tabs are not too difficult though and it does bring me some catharsis to be able to play some of the songs I listen to to work through how I'm feeling. It's like a stronger/more immediate way to experience the song. 
Wanting to get out more. Finally go out and feel guilty about it
And finally getting out & feeling just as alone or even worse than when you're in; so why bother with the hassle?
Existing too much, feeling too much, thinking too much.Reality is crushing the life out of me.  We have been in the dark for so long, but maybe we are all just made out of stars.
Happy Cake Day man.
Happy Cake Day man.
Thank you.  *Wo
Realised I browse Reddit so much so that I can just get away from reality a little longer. Having a massive desire to succeed but just not doing anything about it.
I get these surges of desire to do more and be great. Followed by research and plans. By the next day, it's life as usual and no follow through... Full of shame and disappointment in myself. 
I get these surges of desire to do more and be great. Followed by research and plans. By the next day, it's life as usual and no follow through... Full of shame and disappointment in myself. 
Yes the same for me. It shooting sucks I need to shake it
Go work as a steward or something at a music festival this summer.
That might be a good idea if he feels lonely actually 
the last one is bullshit though. i shouldnt have to call they should at least once or twice call me.
I mean you shouldn't expect people to call you if you never call them...
The simplest thing to change right there is your eating. Eating at a caloric deficit to lose the weight. Your self-esteem will be boosted. It may not cure the depression (I'm still down) but I feel like when the journey to recover begins, it'll be a lot smoother with that hurdle out of the way. Thoughts?
I don't think I need to eat a caloric deficit to be honest. I weigh maybe 140 lbs and am a lanky SOB.   I think it's more about not eating properly out of laziness and feeling terrible about myself for it.
I don't think I need to eat a caloric deficit to be honest. I weigh maybe 140 lbs and am a lanky SOB.   I think it's more about not eating properly out of laziness and feeling terrible about myself for it.
Oh, right! Well then the best thing to do then would be to eat whole foods that give you nutrition and energy, and avoid all empty calories. It's amazing how the body corrects itself once you clean up your diet. But that's easier said than done ya know.
That and it's good to try your hardest to be around people who can make you laugh. I don't have that around me but try texting a nearby friend and ask if they can chill soon!
Here's how I am with plans.  'Hey man, want to hang out this X' 'Sure dude, call me!' 'Will do.'  And I never do.
Only when I'm awake
Dang is this too true. 
Every day, every single day, I will inevitably think 'Jesus Christ, I hate this.  I hate my life, could I please die?'
'an aneurysm, anything would be nice'. God I feel it.
These thoughts have actually shooted up my past few years because I just hope I'll be dead instead of actually pursuing things I love.
Holy shit I've never actually seen it in words but that's how I feel  Mainly about uni but yeah wow it's the worst   I'm loving cities in a few months to start fresh and keep postponing important things because I don't know if I will or wont be alive by then  I probably will but I'd rather not 
All the time. My antidepressants just make the feelings manageable but a certain melancholy colors my every waking moment. 
'a certain melancholy colors my every waking moment' that sounds like poetry. beautifully put. are u lana del rey?
'a certain melancholy colors my every waking moment' that sounds like poetry. beautifully put. are u lana del rey?
hahaha maybe I should be one of her writers. But thank you!
r/parenting had a thread yesterday about a 7 yo girl whose friend of the same age was going to die soon of an inoperable brain tumor.   Everyone was sad. I felt envy.
I envy her desire to live perhaps, if she had it still.  Not that she gotten what we sometimes want out of many emotions.
r/parenting had a thread yesterday about a 7 yo girl whose friend of the same age was going to die soon of an inoperable brain tumor.   Everyone was sad. I felt envy.
Wow, I feel the same way when hearing stories like that and then feel bad about it. So many happy people get these horrible illnesses and I keep wondering why not me so that happy people can live on and I don't have to...
I do but my desire is not casual. My desire is constant. I have failed at killing myself, and I go to sleep hoping each night is my last. I'm tired and I just want it all to stop. Life is not worth it to me and it has not gotten better. 
Maybe try some psychedelics! Everything feels brand new on LSD. (:
I understand you. You want people to notice you and they ignore you. You want people to feel you yet they push you back. During my life i was used like a doll only to be thrown when they finished using me. When I feel like crap, i switch to one of my hobbies.
I can relate, used to do exactly the same. In the past months however every hobby I used to have slowly decayed due to depression. This leaves so much free time to think about suicide...
I can relate, used to do exactly the same. In the past months however every hobby I used to have slowly decayed due to depression. This leaves so much free time to think about suicide...
I have the same problem. I know spending time with hobbies is good in general, but most of the time I can't feel the slightest motivation to engage in them. It's like being paralyzed. The only motivation to do sth is through fear of things getting even worse. 
Yes, I have always contemplated suicide to calm myself or self soothe when my emotions flare up. I didn't admit that to anyone until I was in my mid 20s. My friends either distanced themselves immediately or voiced anger at me for being negative. My mom threatened to institutionalize me whenever I brought it up. I was shocked that I terrified them; after all, this was just my interior monologue, as it had always been.
I told a therapist in my late teen years about how I always said I wanted to kill myself, but never really go past the planning stage. She just told me it was probably my coping mechanism, and didn't even seem worried about it. She just continued to draw squares in the margins of her notebook. 
I get you, death is kind of a 'fantasy' for me me, in a way. If something makes me feel upset in the slightest my go to thing is imagining myself commiting suicide, like imagining myself dying will actually release me from the pain. I wouldn't kill myself for real, I'm too afraid, but I wallow in my fantasies of dying...
I never knew other people actually treated it the same way. When I'm really upset I will fantasize about death but usually I take it too far in my head and end up making myself worse. In real life, I'm too scared because I'd worry that my suicide wouldn't work out and then I'd end up with horrible injuries or brain dead and end up being even more miserable than I currently am. 
I wouldn't mind not waking up honestly.
That's me each time i am going to sleep.
for the past 40 years.  and i'm still here making a difference for the better.  i don't let the black dog win.  don't let the black dog win.
I like dogs, he can win, he's just too cute
Yeah, that sounds like me. I haven't made an attempt in a long time, but I frequently casually fantasize about being killed in a freak accident, or just not waking up after I go to sleep. Or maybe even just being badly injured somehow, so that I'd end up hospitalized and have all responsibility taken off my plate for an extended period of time. 
Same here. I don't think I can kill myself - either too cowardly or I have this false belief I'm strong enough to make it through - but on a semi-daily basis at least I hope for that 'freak accident'.
Since I was 12 brother. Just remember you're not alone with those thoughts. Charity work may help a bit (as cheese as it may sound). I mean if we look at the condition of the world's population, you can bet that there's always someone out there wishing they had your circumstances vs their own. 
While this may have been helpful for you, the whole concept of 'it could always be worse' is unhealthy, as it can lead to fantasizing about how much further down the rabbit hole one should go before reaching out for help, and it can also lead to thoughts like 'I have no right to be depressed', and only serves to strengthen the stigma associated with this disease.
Sometimes am speechless like i dont know how to help so i just upvote and feel shitty about it
As do I  sometimes I just don't know how to respond 
As do I  sometimes I just don't know how to respond 
Yeah. I don't like to spew that cliche 'it will get better' bullshit immediately if there are no other comments because it makes me feel like I didnt even try so most times I don't know what to do.
Yeah. I don't like to spew that cliche 'it will get better' bullshit immediately if there are no other comments because it makes me feel like I didnt even try so most times I don't know what to do.
Exactly.  damn.
I rarely even get any upvotes even if someone replies :/ 
I've even gotten a downvote (on an alt). That hurt.  Sorry, realized this could sound like one-upping. I don't mean it that way, I totally just mean I can relate and empathize. It sucks. I'm sorry you've experienced that. 
Even something as simple as message me if you need to talk can go miles. 
And then that person doesn't reply.
And then that person doesn't reply.
LOL. True. Even the depressed don't need us to worsen their lives. On that note, I hate my therapist. Feels like he is letting me down by trying to guide me. Should just give me a gun and go, 'Hey, you suck.  Let's just get done with this'.
I feel that each comment I post needs to live up to certain 'standards' to be effective and helpful for the particular post. Sometimes, I just feel that I am not qualified to answer or assist with certain posts, or it's too depressing to offer any sort of encouraging advice.  But I still care and hope for the best. Just don't have the life experience to offer good assistance unfortunately.
Agreed. I like to up vote them and maybe toss in a positive comment if the tone is ok
I think we all know deep down we actually dont care that much. This place is just to let out our feelings
now im even more depressed
I think we all know deep down we actually dont care that much. This place is just to let out our feelings
Agreed. Sometimes it is just as good to say something out in the open. Even if it is on the internet
did that couple of times here haha..., just deleted one yesterday as i did with the previous ones, i feel better when i reply to someone and try to help, it's like i also give advices to myself
That is what Marcus Aurelius did with his diaries in what is now 'Meditations'. He wrote to help himself and now it helps so many.
THis is the reason I never post here. I don't think it just 'feels like' no one cares, it's just that nobody actually cares. Why should they? I don't blame anyone. 
But people do care. Do post, what you have to say. Even if there is a chance that nobody would reply. But I've seen it, people actually cares and take time to help you. 
Thanks. My last post got one reply. I feel like I'm expecting too much but all I want is to maybe feel like I'm not alone in feeling how I'm feeling. If I post here it's bad enough for me to ignore that wall that prevents me from even commenting. 
Well, if you need, and it means something... I will care. I know what depression does to people. Been through it. And after a course in counselling, I am trying to extend help as much as possible. Give a shout out, if you feel unable to cope with anything. Will be here.
 i see what you mean I think, thank you 
Glad I could be of some help. Great deal for me too. Hope you are well? 
Yeah, like even a 'hi' would be appreciated.
Hi, i hope you have a nice day.
Same shit from my Mexican parents but I think it might be a universal belief among immigrant parents seeing as they’re providing for and presenting their children with better lives than their own. Just my two cents. 
This. I think it has to do with all immigrants everywhere. Your parents, the one that made the decision to migrate, probably feel that why would have depression if now we’re living better? Or now you live in a more safe place, etc.   At least that’s how I feel my family is. We are immigrants but not from Mexico.
This. I think it has to do with all immigrants everywhere. Your parents, the one that made the decision to migrate, probably feel that why would have depression if now we’re living better? Or now you live in a more safe place, etc.   At least that’s how I feel my family is. We are immigrants but not from Mexico.
True. East African here with parents that believe depression is for white people only
Yup lmao. I'm Cuban and everytime I mention my depression they start talking about their experience in the camps and shit and that I'm just being dumb 
I wonder if they know it’s not a competition 
I've been there. When I finally built up the courage to tell an elder about how I was feeling, they literally just said, 'It's a phase, you'll get over it.'
Probably were trying to be  supportive but caught off guard and messed it up unless it is a recurring theme. 
I didn't know depression was racist. I wonder how it knows. It doesn't have eyes. Guess it has a 6th sense.  Yeah, people of Mexican heritage certainly never kill themselves. 0 suicides, it is supernatural.
Well racism causes depression. A lot of colored people suffer from it silently. Look up social death. Societal social isolation causes depression and anxiety big time.
Asian parents. When you have refugee parents from a 3rd world country, who struggled through wars and bring you to America to have a better life, their thought is why would you be depressed? This is my best friend's mom. Smh.
Tell them to tell their parents that no pain has little value. We should all comfort others when you see it.
If they brought their children to America from a third world country to give them a good life, then tell them they should be eager to take advantage of the superior mental health resources available in a developed country.
Except even then our mental health resources aren't that great and it can be expensive lol
I'm just plain old black lol... My parents told me I was just manipulative and a bad person 
Fellow brother here, read your comment and lol'd right along with you. My parents legit asked 'why can't we just talk about your issues without you crying'. Sorry fam, I'll be less human and more 🤖 🤖 🤖
Yah i have a weird one , after 2 years of self harm and broken bones i opened up to my parents about my problem after i had to dropout of engineering coz of this , guess what they laughed it off and made fun of me i cut myself the entire next week and was hospitalized due to too much blood loss .   Guess its a funny story :\) ..
Man, I’m sorry for you, hopefully you have help now?
I'm sorry but your closest friend is a massive retard to even think about an mental disorder like that.
That friend is not a friend. Pretty simple.
That friend is not a friend. Pretty simple.
That's a better word for it
There is some truth to it but i’d say its more of an economic rather than race issue.If you are depressed to the point of dysfunction you still need a place to stay and food. Fear of being homeless and hungry are motovaters that can override some level of depression. Alot easier to stay depressed if i can order food and stay on my couch.
No. Depression affects even the rich. Economic prosperity will not save you from depression.
They’ve shown that they’re not true friends. Dang them. Cut them out of your life - they’re not worth your time.
I feel that. The only thing that I'm afraid of is that i don't exactly have other good friends outside of this group. I'm currently trying to find other friends. I'm worried that if I tell them off now, I'll mess up making new friends and then I'll be friendless and depressed. Granted, I'm pretty much that way now, but...
I feel that. The only thing that I'm afraid of is that i don't exactly have other good friends outside of this group. I'm currently trying to find other friends. I'm worried that if I tell them off now, I'll mess up making new friends and then I'll be friendless and depressed. Granted, I'm pretty much that way now, but...
They're toxic dude. Your life would be better alone than with them. They're not, in any sense of the word, your friends. Meet new people and in the meantime focus on bettering your health
I feel that. The only thing that I'm afraid of is that i don't exactly have other good friends outside of this group. I'm currently trying to find other friends. I'm worried that if I tell them off now, I'll mess up making new friends and then I'll be friendless and depressed. Granted, I'm pretty much that way now, but...
These are toxic people. Get out now 
What kinda pussies you hanging out with that they are afraid of you? jesus christ sounds like you need to ditch these losers
It's because they're ignorant and don't understand anything. Basically news media and tv/movies make it seem like all mentally unhealthy people might become school shooters or something.
It's because they're ignorant and don't understand anything. Basically news media and tv/movies make it seem like all mentally unhealthy people might become school shooters or something.
Still, what kind of friend wouldn't even try and understand their own friend's situation? They just sound like absolutely terrible friends! About 2/3 of my friends know I have depression and they still try and get me to hang out with them all the time, even if I never do it. 
I’m in college too , I would never tell my friends about my true mental state as they are the type of people who don’t even understand the term psychology and depression to them is something that “losers” have .  They wouldn’t talk to me if i lost my fake smile for even a day (which is lately becoming very difficult to maintain), so , i know how you feel .. 
Haha I can relate to your 'fake smile' comment. That's me all over! I know how you feel, it can be tiring sometimes. 😊
you could talk to them, as another user suggested. if this doesn’t work, however, you’re going to have to move on. associating yourself with a group of people who basically berate you for having a illness that is out of your power will not benefit you in any way. 
I'll try. I talked to a few of them (girl I was going to room with, girl #2 I was going to room with, and another girl I study with (my group is 7 girls, me, then my roommate)) and they all said they didn't want me around. I'll talk to everyone else individually, but it's looking pretty bad so far
I'll try. I talked to a few of them (girl I was going to room with, girl #2 I was going to room with, and another girl I study with (my group is 7 girls, me, then my roommate)) and they all said they didn't want me around. I'll talk to everyone else individually, but it's looking pretty bad so far
They're idiots. You'll find your group. I finally came clean to my friends and it turns out we're all pretty much in the same sad boat. :) Like finds like, just ditch these losers!
I'm sorry this happened to you. They don't sound like true friends. I recently 'came out' about my issues and found loads of support from some completely unexpected areas.  I'd recommend trying to talk to individuals face to face and maybe you'll find an ally or two. People don't always say what they really feel in a group setting.  If they're still beingn idiots, cut them out. I'm sure you can find way better friends that can understand your struggles and support you through them.
100%. They can’t all be bad people- sounds like mob mentality 
I've been friends for a year and a half now, and we see each other usually every single day. I assumed it was enough time to open the window
Sorry it went this way. Please don't let yourself become a colder person because of this experience. I know it's hard but people usually act mostly unconsciously so try not to take it personally. 
Show up at their place and just talk to them, people don’t show their true colors through texts.
We did meet up. She said that her and her roommate don't want to associate with 'mental people'
We did meet up. She said that her and her roommate don't want to associate with 'mental people'
They are toxic. Trust me, move on. Join a club or get a hobby, any activity that gets you around others and go from there.
I have to ask, are they deeply religious? If they are, they may be trying to employ a 'tough love' strategy to try and scare you out of your depression. 
I have 2 of the 9 that are religious as far as I know. I would consider only 1 of them deeply religious. That sounds shitty
I have 2 of the 9 that are religious as far as I know. I would consider only 1 of them deeply religious. That sounds shitty
It's not shitty. Having an honest opinion of a person's personal beliefs is okay. 
Honestly, that just shooting blows. You did they right thing seeking support from people close to you and it sucks that they seem to so badly misunderstand or don't care enough to understand the situation. Have an e-hug for all the good it can do :)
THANK YOU FOR THE HUG ;-;
honestly, it strikes me as strange. are they afraid you are going to hurt them or that you are just going to 'get them down'? the first one is ridiculous. the second is also ridiculous, and selfish too.
I don't know about hurting them. I'm pretty damn soft. They said they 'don't like seeing my depression' (not me being depressed, but my depression around them?) So
I'm gonna try to talk to everyone individually. I can't see my roommate being serious about this, and another girl I really feel would understand.
Give it a shot. Depression is absolutely no joke. It will make you believe everyone is leaving you, but in actuality they're not. It will make you feel lonely in a crowd and hear silence at a live band concert. It will mess with your head and make you think what you're thinking.   Be prepared for some questions. Like what can they do, and what they should not do. Be honest. Try to accept the encouragement. Above all understand that it will be okay. 
Im seconding you on the not showering every day thing! If I shower and wash my hair every day, my skin gets way too dry and my hair starts to break off. Not cool. 
I wash my hair every 3-5 days
You probably stink to high heaven
Rude.
As someone who hasn't showered for four weeks now, congratulations! 
Go take a shower now! It'll feel good.
Go take a shower now! It'll feel good.
I'm too tired and it's too late.  ^ Two things I keep telling myself.  Thanks for the encouragement though... 
Yeah I've felt this my whole life. I genuinely care about other people and go out of my way to learn about them, yet no one wants to learn about me. Its probably the reason I don't value friendships and just want to be alone most of the time. 
How did you learn to cope with it? I'm oftentimes very lonely. It sometimes leads to me crying in the car on my way home from work or when trying to fall asleep in the evenings...
How did you learn to cope with it? I'm oftentimes very lonely. It sometimes leads to me crying in the car on my way home from work or when trying to fall asleep in the evenings...
Yeah, that.  Crying so much lately...
That's a great philosophy to have. Goes back to the golden rule, which I consider to be one of the greatest moral maxims ever conceived. Thanks for the reminder of that timeless truth.
I try so hard to make sure everyone else is happier than my sulking sorry ass.
I found out, that if you tell this to a nice friend, they actually change their behaviour.
Doesn't it become awkward quickly though? I could imagine them desperately trying to come up with new questions.
Doesn't it become awkward quickly though? I could imagine them desperately trying to come up with new questions.
Depends on the friend but more communication rarely makes things worse. 
This is incredibly relatable. I try to deflect all conversation about myself but I still wish they'd persist. Damn that must sound stupid.
Not at all as I feel the same way.  But maybe it is. I don't know.
It's been difficult for me to find a friend that genuinely wants to know how I'm doing and what I'm interested in. It's been a very long time since I've had a conversation that went further than, 'How are you? - Good.'
Do you also sometimes think about how you would answer this question truthfully? I do all the time...
Do you also sometimes think about how you would answer this question truthfully? I do all the time...
'Keep your chin up, it'll get better.' - is usually the response I get for the rare times I tell someone the truth about how I feel. I'm tired of empty platitudes because no one *really* cares that you're upset, they just don't want to deal with it and say the same things everyone else does.   It sucks.
'Keep your chin up, it'll get better.' - is usually the response I get for the rare times I tell someone the truth about how I feel. I'm tired of empty platitudes because no one *really* cares that you're upset, they just don't want to deal with it and say the same things everyone else does.   It sucks.
+infinity 
I'm in a similar position, i always have to be the one that asks how people are, I never get anyone asking how i am first. It annoys me but I dont wanna say anything, I also have to start the god damn conversations.
Sometimes I do get asked by the other students, or maybe 'how was your weekend?' But when I give them the perfect possibility to ask further questions, they're always like 'oh, sounds good' and turn around...
I feel for you. Yea it's so hard to get a good friend you can talk with about anything.   Don't feel selfish though. I mean for example I talk to my friends about myself a lot but I always make fun of myself. I tell them some stories that happened to me etc to make them laugh.
The thing is, I'm not a very funny person. I kind of lost my sense of humor during the last few years. I don't have anything to laugh about in my life.
The thing is, I'm not a very funny person. I kind of lost my sense of humor during the last few years. I don't have anything to laugh about in my life.
Well it's not like the funny things stick just to some specific people. It's the people who create them, the people who see them. You can surely find something.   Maybe start by simply putting a smile on your face. That helps. Laugh, try it in front of the mirror.
Well it's not like the funny things stick just to some specific people. It's the people who create them, the people who see them. You can surely find something.   Maybe start by simply putting a smile on your face. That helps. Laugh, try it in front of the mirror.
>    The first thing is to not try to please others. If they are literally turning their back on you, forget about them. Yes, it's not easy, but finding people to converse with is the best next thing. Reaching out on this forum is the right foot forward :-)
Everyone is selfish, at all times. We choose to believe otherwise, so that we don't focus on gloom and doom.
Jeez, the down-votes.  I actually agree with you. 
Jeez, the down-votes.  I actually agree with you. 
Almost everything I type is down voted. I'm used to it.
I know this feeling. Have thought this many times myself. So scared of the impact it will have on others. This seems like a torturous place to be, staying alive only for others feelings 
I'm only planning on being around for maybe a year after my parents die, but that won't be for a few decades at least, til then I'm basically trying my best to kill time 
It's like torture, no? I've had suicidal thoughts before but the thought of my family and few friends grieving ended up holding me back but pushed me further into depression. I can relate pretty well.
I'd feel horrible for abandoning my cats, as pathetic as that sounds.
I'd feel horrible for abandoning my cats, as pathetic as that sounds.
Even more pathetically, my dog died last month and I want it to just end because I haven't got her here but I don't dare because my next (hypothetical, rescue) dog might need me. 
Even more pathetically, my dog died last month and I want it to just end because I haven't got her here but I don't dare because my next (hypothetical, rescue) dog might need me. 
I'm so sorry. My cats mean everything to me and I'd be so devastated if I lost one of them. I almost did last year and it sent me spiraling. I'm still terrified she'll have a relapse. Pets are a lifeline, but losing them is so painful.  I don't think it's pathetic that you hang on for future dogs. You have a good heart. And there's always going to be a pup who needs you. 
I've been feeling like this since kindergarten, I wish I could just leave this place but I care too much. I have also been keeping it a secret since kindergarten and I finally talk to someone about it today and the pain is so much worse.   
Same here. It's been the same way since childhood.
There's no real joy anymore just pretending for everyone's sake and then when I spend time alone I realise how much I want to disappear and for everyone to forget about me. 
I feel you 
I'd say my mood falls mostly between null and undefined.
js dev detected
js dev detected
!!'Guilty as charge'
This. So much this. It's like a normal person's 'low' is on par with a depressed person's 'high,' and then a depressed person's 'low' is just -really damn low-. I'm definitely in the same boat though, if I can distract myself enough with random crap to not feel shooting miserable even for a little while then it's a decent day.
I have a job where for a few hours there are absolutely no distractions and I am alone with my thoughts. For those hours I can see the past and future very clearly. Worst time in the world. Thankfully I am very good at distracting myself at other times. 
I have a job where for a few hours there are absolutely no distractions and I am alone with my thoughts. For those hours I can see the past and future very clearly. Worst time in the world. Thankfully I am very good at distracting myself at other times. 
I've been trying recently to teach myself not to feel the 'need' to be distracted from depressed feelings (unsuccessful so far, not giving up yet). But, I can't help wondering: what did depressed and alone people do before internet/tv/radio/theatre/shock therapy/video games existed? 
I get really anxious if I have absolutely nothing to distract me. I start thinking too much.
Please do something with this. Pick up a hobby, go for a walk of clean your room. Don't sit down for a ride on the thoughts train as it will only make you feel worse. Try to stay busy, I know that's hard and consumes a lot of energy. It helps, I promise.
I think im between suicidal  and sleepy
This is where I've been at for the past few weeks.
Video games distract me a ton, any other time im just freaking out
I almost cried reading this. I've wasted so much of my potential just trying to distract myself from my misery in video games.
I almost cried reading this. I've wasted so much of my potential just trying to distract myself from my misery in video games.
Dont get me wrong i really have a passion for gaming,  but it does do its job of distracting me to the point where i feel just as worthless for wasting, like you said, potential
Are you me? I recently went abroad for a month and felt the happiest... then I crept back into my depression when I came back home and got back into my routine. 
Sometimes, I feel like I could just get up and change my life in an instant if I just did something. The next minute I've wasted a whole day and it's 1am on reddit again saying tomorrow will be different. Gets you down.
everyone else is playing guitar and we're playing bass :(
As a bass player, come on dude :(
Don't stop your routines that kept you healthy despite of depression, that is all how the downward spiral begins.
Cannot say this enough, a healthy structured routine keeps you up. Stick with it, and keep your routine daily, don't give your self the sympathy of taking a day off. For me, I took 1 day off and I'm still climbing out of this hole 5 years later.
Cannot say this enough, a healthy structured routine keeps you up. Stick with it, and keep your routine daily, don't give your self the sympathy of taking a day off. For me, I took 1 day off and I'm still climbing out of this hole 5 years later.
After all that? Time off is okay, but keep you connections and friends close. 
You get cancer, your mom passes away and your wife talks about divorce instead of giving support. Holy shit that's awful, I don't even know what to say.
That’s what I was thinking. Surely his wife showed some signs of not being a very nice person before they married? I mean what sort of a person picks that moment to divorce? You’d at least wait a year. 
I wish I could offer more than support from an Internet stranger, but that's all I can do. I hope you can make it out of all of this. 
Thank you. Support is enough :)
Thank you. Support is enough :)
So sorry to hear about your mom. Hope she finds peace
Thanks a lot. Yeah, that's what I'm telling myself - Get the 3 hits at once. The grief of losing my mom is so overwhelming right now that I don't have the headspace to worry about anything else. And yea, you are right. I still can't believe she brought that at this time. It's cruel. And again, we didn't have a bad relationship - but turns out she wanted something else out of life. :(
Just can't believe it... meant to say sorry aboit yoyr diagnosis too, you can pull through it!! Look after yourself and take things day by day, batten down the hatches and dig in....  You got this! We got you...
Just can't believe it... meant to say sorry aboit yoyr diagnosis too, you can pull through it!! Look after yourself and take things day by day, batten down the hatches and dig in....  You got this! We got you...
Thanks again, means a lot to me.
I can't imagine going through all of these tragedies at once. I wish you the best.  You sound like someone who is generally upbeat and that depression isn't a regular thing for you. I think you are smart by finding help asap before it develops more.  What are some of the things that lift your spirits in the past outside of your wife and mother? What strategies have been successful for you?
Thank you! I think I've got the basics right: exercise almost daily, eat right, avoid too much alcohol/sugar/meats, read a lot, be with friends. I'm considering going vegan - I have vegan friends and they look radiant and more happy that normal people.
Thank you! I think I've got the basics right: exercise almost daily, eat right, avoid too much alcohol/sugar/meats, read a lot, be with friends. I'm considering going vegan - I have vegan friends and they look radiant and more happy that normal people.
I am very sorry for everything you're going through! Veganism can be helpful for mental health, helping to develop a different relationship to food, learning new things and a new community. But it's not a magical thing that will cure everything and make you happy. In fact it has the potential to harm your acute mental health bc it can make you focus on a very cruel side of humanity. Veganism is great, but proceed with caution :)
hold your thoughts on divorce and wife for some days. It is about your mom. mourn for her whole heartedly. suffer that pain otherwise you will just be shutting down her memories. It is a tough time, things will never be the same. I wish you all the strength it takes to overcome these times and be happy again.
Thank you. It's exactly what I'm doing.
Thank you. It's exactly what I'm doing.
You can handle all of these things. It's going to suck. But you can do it, and I bet by this time next year, you'll be a stronger and more determined person than before. ♡ 
Thank your for writing such a thoughtful message. I thought I ran out of tears, but apparently not :) As you suggest I'm going to take this as an opportunity to improve something in my life - Maybe smile more or drink more water or stay in closer contact with my friends.
Thank you for reaching out. It helps to talk about things. And I know sometimes having another angle on your situation can help too. You've got this! I'm going to drink more water myself. Thanks for the great idea. People don't drink near enough water. Keep those friends and family close.
I’m sorry this is happening to you but your wife is a piece of shit for not waiting to tell you later. Who asks for a divorce the same week as someone significant dying and being diagnosed with cancer? I️ say you dodged a bullet there. As for the two other things, surround yourself with friends and family, build a support network. 
Agreed. The  idiot....
What kind of person says she wants a divorce right after such things? You should say good riddance to someone that selfish.
Yeah I know your mother just died and you literally have cancer but I want a divorce. Hahaha. Like unless he is like an abusive piece of shit husband, then she obviously never cared for him deeply, because you don't do that to someone you love, even if you grow apart. 
Yeah I know your mother just died and you literally have cancer but I want a divorce. Hahaha. Like unless he is like an abusive piece of shit husband, then she obviously never cared for him deeply, because you don't do that to someone you love, even if you grow apart. 
She still doesn't know about the cancer. But yea, we had fights and all but I never considered myself a shit husband. Her reason for leaving is to pursue a career opportunity on a different city.
She still doesn't know about the cancer. But yea, we had fights and all but I never considered myself a shit husband. Her reason for leaving is to pursue a career opportunity on a different city.
Such BS. She basically picked a desk and a computer over you, her life partner and fellow human being.  Career is important, but the manner in which she went about it is so mercenary.
No, it's true, awalt indeed
Whether you made a throwaway account simply to be a troll, or whether you made one because you are too scared to post the same comments on your main account, either way you're the type of person I don't feel bad for when unfortunate things happen to them. Have a nice life, idiot :)
Women are the scum of the earth
https://imgur.com/oAGudPM
Sorry man life is rough sometimes. Look into high THC cannabis RSO oil. I know someone who cured her stomach cancer with it no chemo. Also look into megadosing vitamin C, liposomal is best, ascorbic acid works too. Cut sugar off too if you can and drink clean water. I hope you get well
Thanks for the advice and words. I will definitely look into those - Normally, I avoid sugar as much as possible, but I do drink socially. I'm thinking of switching to Gin or Vodka with mineral water, or stop cold turkey :( Will talk to my doctor.
Part of my depression has been getting stuck in survival mode- what do I have to accomplish before i can go back to bed? What's the bare minimum i can do to get by? Building long term plans requires hope, and that's in fairly short supply most of the time.
Thats hit the nail on the head for me 
Real talk, is always wanting to just get back to home and being in bed a sign of depression?
Can be a sign of exhaustion, unless you feel like you haven't done much with your day at all and you're disappointed with yourself...
“I’m not living, I’m just killing time”  Radiohead - True Love Waits 
And time is killing me.
....yeah.  Always proud of myself for making a schedule in my head of useless things I can do to pass the time. Kind of sad.
Not sad at all
Every other year really. I'll fight my way out of a horrible year long rut, get back on to living, build bridges, find hope in life. Then it all comes crashing back down after around a year and I'm back to just surviving. All my work feels like it's gone and it's just another failed opportunity in life. My mental illness is this horrible cycle that I can't seem to escape. I'm either at 0% or 100%.
A similar thing happens to me. I'll get a job, start taking care of myself and escaping my rut and within a year it always gets destroyed. I don't want to try anymore.
A similar thing happens to me. I'll get a job, start taking care of myself and escaping my rut and within a year it always gets destroyed. I don't want to try anymore.
I feel exactly the same. I don't want to keep having to do it over and over. It's debilitating the idea of having to pull myself out of depression every other year for 60-80 more years. 
Yep. I'm just waiting for the next opportunity to drink/sleep. 
yeah that. sleeping is so relaxing, at least for a short period of time until you wake up again...
yeah that. sleeping is so relaxing, at least for a short period of time until you wake up again...
I get quite upset and frustrated when I first wake up. It's when I cry the most. I reflect on my dreams whether they are good or bad. I fantasize about what my life could be like. I weigh up all my wrongdoings and beat myself with them...yeah. Waking up is a pain. 
I get quite upset and frustrated when I first wake up. It's when I cry the most. I reflect on my dreams whether they are good or bad. I fantasize about what my life could be like. I weigh up all my wrongdoings and beat myself with them...yeah. Waking up is a pain. 
Lucid dreaming is helping me. It takes some weeks or months to learn but when i wake up after a lucid dream im always in a good mood. It happens only 1-2 times a month for me but its really good
I had a conversation with friends, and they said how they were killing time like parting and stuff. They turned to me and asked: 'whats up with you?'. I shread a tear (visiable) and sit queitly. They said nothing after. I have no idea what I am doing with my life and how to have fun. 
Maybe your idea of fun isn't partying. Personally, I would much rather build up close relationships instead of forcing myself to be an extrovert. It makes me stressed, depressed, and I end up just not having a good time. I would rather hang out with a couple of friends, discuss life, how they are doing, what THEY want to do, and I'll include what I want to do.  What I have trouble with is confidence, I think it's very hard to talk about myself in a positive light.
Showers are awesome. I hope you end up showering everyday. Good days ahead!!
I just get overwhelmed but the long routine of it. 20 minutes for actual cleaning (including hair), 20 minutes for hair removal, 20 minutes for putting products into my hair and blow drying it, another 20 to straighten it, then lotion everywhere, getting dressed and then make up. This can easily take over 2 hours and it all just seems like so much to not even make me feel better lol.
I feel the same way. Should've shooting died in my mother's womb
I couldn't agree more! I would have been spared soo much pain.
I couldn't agree more! I would have been spared soo much pain.
It would have likely shooted your mother up though. (and probably your father to an extent as well.)  Losing a child is never easy, even if they haven't been born yet.
It would have likely shooted your mother up though. (and probably your father to an extent as well.)  Losing a child is never easy, even if they haven't been born yet.
They decided to take that risk
The people who don't do well usually won't show up in your life. They are at home alone.
Agree 
This guy speaks truth, as hard as it might be for some of us to accept. You need to focus on what you can control. We all have immense power though it may be hard to see somedays 
Thank you.  I'm not trying to give tough love or anything. I struggle daily and am often extremely pessimistic. I just know that a lot of my problems (not all, but a fair amount) are within my control.  I fail most days and I'm not where I wish and feel like I should be in my life, but with motivation I could be closer.  Finding that motivation is the difficult part.
that's the reason i've become inactive on social media for many years now because i know my life sucks and i'm too embarrassed that anyone might find out. i just lurk on FB checking for latest feeds, but my profile page has been technically dead.
I tried cutting out social media too, but this feeling is still inescapable. Something as simple as somebody talking on their phone in the grocery store or recognizing someone by chance in Walmart makes me feel so unimportant and boring.
All the time, my dude. I keep seeing people my age (I'm ~21) getting married/engaged and having children, or they're single and moving across the country to their dream cities and working their dream jobs.   Meanwhile I probably won't get my degree because I'm failing statistics lol. Bummer. 
21 seems so young for marriage and children. I wouldn't compare myself to those situations, personally. Good luck with your degree.. stats suck, I did a little last year.
It blows my mind that there are people who go through college and *don't* do that. I mean, I imagine there are people who don't do that. But the rest of us definitely do that, lol.
Totally, I think virtually anyone who's been to college can relate to this, especially damn research papers!
you worded it really well. this is exactly my iusse, thank you!
Same. I have an end of term chemistry test today (my weakest subject) and in idioted around till the last minute to study. Now I'm panicking. 
It's proven that procrastination actually causes depression.  Many people who go to therapy,  specifically CBT therapy, are encouraged and helped to reduce their amount of procrastination, and many claimed that their depressive symptoms went away. What I learned when I was in CBT was that action precedes motivation. Basically, you won't feel motivated to accomplish a certain task but if you force yourself to start that task, you'll begin to feel motivated.
That is almost like Stockholm Syndrome, but tasks, time and depression are your captors. You just have a positive outcome when you learn to just deal with it.      There are two kinds of people in this world:    1. Those who finish what they start.   1. Those w
I feel like it's a socially acceptable method of self harm. Like even if you know you're capable of completing the task, you in a sense force yourself not to even when it's constantly in the front of your mind. 
Huh!!! That's shooting interesting. Makes so much sense. 
What was your thesis?
Though Julian English of *Appointment in Samarra* seeks to escape his unearned and unwanted socioeconomic status, his quest is dragged down by his upbringing, his wife, and his own society. In the end, it is his desire to flee his status that ruins and kills Julian English.  The teacher's right, it is too broad, but it's disheartening that a week's effort gets me just as bad results as last-minute procrastination. (And it was an actual week, too—I spent about five hours each day in a café working on it)
This has been my biggest problem this semester. I've procrastinated so bad on my final thesis, my advisor has been emailing me about it. I feel awful about it and had several sobbing breakdowns this week 😩😩
I hope it works out man. Im thinking about ya. 
Yep. I just had a whole week on spring break to catch up on the loads of work I am behind on from my job and school. But I wasted the entire week and am now so stressed out trying to get everything done today. ugh
Same here, so much studying to do now T_T 
These days I procrastinate little by little until I get to right before the due date, then I decide I might as well not do it. Of course if it doesn't have a due date, I procrastinate infinitely.
 omg I once procrastinated writing an email for two weeks that was *just two sentences* ughhh
This is much easier said than done, but probably still true.
I think it's a habit, you have to work on it everyday until it becomes easier
I am doing this right now. Four papers due next week and I'm here on Reddit. 
Start an outline for one paper.
Constantly, though I somehow always manage to make it work. I think I might just work better under pressure.
Or the panic/worry gets strong enough to force you to sit down and do it.   You can become accustomed to that, by the way. By the time I was a sophomore is college, the 'oh crap I have to get this done' panic didn't start until after the deadline had already passed. 
Definitely. It's even worse when you try to work on those things earilier and think 'Okay, I need to work on this daily so I can get it done asap and not procrastinate!!'. And then you try working, and can't focus at all. Then you try to wrap it all last minute while stressing and you fail. And now comes the self-hate. It's a viscous cycle 
Vicious is the word I think. Unless you meant a maïzena cycle or something ;)
Yes, and also seeing this gave me just the last little kick I needed to get off my butt and bake the cake that I promised a friend for his birthday party tonight. Thank you for the motivation! I'm sure Don and his strawberry cake will thank you too! \<3
No matter how shit it is, they'll appreciate the effort 😊
What's the backstory on 'eat the frog'? 
It's a book which basically says to tackle the most important things early in the day, 'eating the frog' means face the task that's worrying you and just take it on.
honestly i think the majority of people do this.
this is a good point. Maybe more neurotypical (?) people are just more able to forgive themselves/let that shit go?
Its weird how days can feel so so long but the years fly away by the blink of an eye. Sad story.
How does that even work??
How does that even work??
hard to explain, every day feels like one of these long days that you might have had in school where you have to listen to crap you dont want to hear all day. Like these days that just dont want to end. But when you actually look at the calendar you realize the year is already over but it seems to have only really stated. Its hard to keep track of months if everything seems to feel numb and the same in repetition.
hard to explain, every day feels like one of these long days that you might have had in school where you have to listen to crap you dont want to hear all day. Like these days that just dont want to end. But when you actually look at the calendar you realize the year is already over but it seems to have only really stated. Its hard to keep track of months if everything seems to feel numb and the same in repetition.
Yeah it's really weird. I feel pretty much the same way. I don't want this year to end...
Because all the days are the same. But they all suck.
That's exactly it. I find it hard to remember much of what I do most days since they all seem to blend together given that I do the same thing everyday(which is working and not much else). 
31st December 2016 felt like yesterday. I promised myself than in 2017 I'm going to improve my grades, I'll improve myself, I'll be more social and many things which I don't remember now. I did shit in the whole freaking 2017. 
I think we all told ourselves something similar...  
31st December 2016 felt like yesterday. I promised myself than in 2017 I'm going to improve my grades, I'll improve myself, I'll be more social and many things which I don't remember now. I did shit in the whole freaking 2017. 
you CAN improve yourself 
you CAN improve yourself 
Lies. Nothing but false mirrors and smoke.
2017 by far my most embarrassing, pathetic year of existence but I also feel numb   The whole year went by in a blink and I'm in the same place doing the same thing. There's really only so long you can go without making progress.   I think it's time for me to start an antidepressant   
same bro
Absolutely worst year of my life.
definitely wasn’t one of my best either.
I'm both relieved that this shit year is almost over and disturbed by how quickly it went 
relatable 
To be fair, it seems like society is falling apart too so you're in good company
It certainly seems that way doesn't it. The world feels totally different to just ten years ago. People behave differently and lack basic manners.. it's sad.. 
Right? And all I can remember are all the plans I made at the beginning of the year, having so much hope that it would be better than 2016. BOY HOWDY WAS I WRONG
same here. it was worse for me than 2016 and i didn’t think that could be done!
same here. it was worse for me than 2016 and i didn’t think that could be done!
Dude, I just realized that 2018 could easily be a little stupid girl and make life even worse. Nooooo universe, please no.
In fact I’m procrastinating right now at this very moment. Problem is i want to care about school work yet i just can’t bring myself to do it. 
In the same boat. Finals are next week and I can't make it to class or bring myself to study.
In the same boat. Finals are next week and I can't make it to class or bring myself to study.
Don't go to class, but try going to a study hall/library to study. That has worked for me at least.  I can't concentrate in class, often because I don't quite follow along. I can't study at home, because there are too many distractions. But at the study hall I can take things at my own pace, and I feel guilty if I spend too much time procrastinating.
Don't go to class, but try going to a study hall/library to study. That has worked for me at least.  I can't concentrate in class, often because I don't quite follow along. I can't study at home, because there are too many distractions. But at the study hall I can take things at my own pace, and I feel guilty if I spend too much time procrastinating.
What if you have to go to class
I’m in the same boat as you. I’ve noticed that I’ve been procrastinating a lot more recently on school work (college) and when I was at work the other day I almost started crying doing something random because I was thinking about how much of a shoot up I see myself as, weather that be true or not. I’ve never even come close to crying in public before. 
Please know you aren't alone. When you realize how many others are out there feeling the same way you do about your school work, you can start to make sense of it as something other than just a personal flaw of yours. signed, currently struggling PhD student
Hello! Can I ask what you are procrastinating on? 
Schoolwork. Lot's of schoolwork I have to catch up on in order to graduate with a half-decent GPA.
Schoolwork. Lot's of schoolwork I have to catch up on in order to graduate with a half-decent GPA.
I’m not telling you to quit school or not to do anything but I really rather keep my sanity and happiness by not focusing on homework and exams, i’m getting by so much better without all of that.
I’m not telling you to quit school or not to do anything but I really rather keep my sanity and happiness by not focusing on homework and exams, i’m getting by so much better without all of that.
> i’m getting by so much better without all of that.   it sounds like you might have quit school?  amirite?  if I am, what are you doing now (if you don't mind me asking)?   dropping out has been on my mind for the past little bit... and the closer I feel I am to actually doing it, the more I sense it'll be a good thing.
Simplest thing I can think of, Start writing things on lists. It helps to visually see what you’ve accomplished. 
Oh I am a professional procrastinator. We like to make unrealistic plans and lists just to not follow them through at the end.
Dude I woke up this Danging New Year to see my crush post a pic with her old boyfriend. I was Danging hoping just hoping man, that this year I will finally be able to talk to her without any oppression. Now that's all gone.  Dang me man. 
Block her/him or delete Facebook altogether.      It's still 2017 in the Americas. It still isn't over.
Block her/him or delete Facebook altogether.      It's still 2017 in the Americas. It still isn't over.
I have done this before, but I simply add her back 
I agree.    I'm going to fail miserably in the next 6 months and succumb to suicide, or stand tall and reach the clouds. Let the thoughts of suicide become our strength -- if we don't desperately try to change our life than we know all too well that suicide is there, waiting for us.
Don't. This is setting up for disaster. Because clouds cannot be reached you will end up failing. Shoot for doing something that is achievable, that has many tiny achievable step and might get you to the clouds one day. Then make your goal to have done the little things everyday. 
Don't. This is setting up for disaster. Because clouds cannot be reached you will end up failing. Shoot for doing something that is achievable, that has many tiny achievable step and might get you to the clouds one day. Then make your goal to have done the little things everyday. 
How do you know his cloud goal is unachievable? As far as we know he could simply be 'go outside 4 times in a week' or 'go to crowded place and stay there for more than 10 minutes'.   Do you really think that unachievable? Or do you have so little faith in other people goals?
How do you know his cloud goal is unachievable? As far as we know he could simply be 'go outside 4 times in a week' or 'go to crowded place and stay there for more than 10 minutes'.   Do you really think that unachievable? Or do you have so little faith in other people goals?
Fair, I thought  the word clouds suggested a very far goal. If his goal is indeed a 'cloud' then my reasoning holds. If not, then he's already applying my reasoning and I wish him all the best in reaching his cloud! 
Have been telling myself that since 1998. Still alive though not better. 
This. This is life. Just one large test of endurance.
In the exact same boat. Dropped out and am back with my parents at 24. I got in a car accident a few weeks ago. Would have been nice if it had been fatal. Then I wouldn't be here, and I wouldn't be a burden. 
I am in the exact same spot. Failed out of medical school, and had to give up my apartment. No money, no apartment, a part time job which will be full time in march, and a mother whom is literally hating me for being at home, because it is messing with her relationship with her husband. I feel like such a burden. I can't get a day off to just focus about myself, without her nagging me. I am lost.
Yeah I already started my letters! 
Pics?
I've had a terrible year. I'm banking on 2018 as being a comeback year. 
Me too - I spent 2016 and 2017 being miserable, but seems like 2018 will be a different animal; I already have plans at least for January, which is super nice. I'm so excited, relaly hope this will be the comeback year!  Also, good luck, stranger :)
Dang off  idiot I’m going to kill myself then shoot time and 2018 im still in the same position im waiting for my last few options to run out and il be dead 
You’re not going to kill yourself, you’re going to be strong. I wish you the best in 2018 and i hope you keep positive. There is always a solution to a problem, so don’t think that your life will always be miserable and shit. You’re gonna be fine (: 
Do it like I do. Even if everything goes to hell, we still have icecream to live for. 
Icecream melts in hell...
Honest question, if you guys are that bad why don't you just go do whatever the shoot you want at this point? I know you have no energy or motivation but go hop on a flight to somewhere and do something? Hike some mountains? Cocaine and hookers? Whatever you want. I've never been that bad and ready to kill myself so I can't say, but isn't that liberating? 
I wish it was that simple. Speaking from my experience, the only thing I 'want' is to feel something besides pain, but I am incapable of feeling anything but pain, regardless of what I am experiencing (and experiencing things that are painful to everyone are beyond overwhelming). So taking a flight to somewhere magnificent would just give me a new setting to feel only pain in, and I may even feel worse because it would be more proof that I'm 'broken.'  
I wish it was that simple. Speaking from my experience, the only thing I 'want' is to feel something besides pain, but I am incapable of feeling anything but pain, regardless of what I am experiencing (and experiencing things that are painful to everyone are beyond overwhelming). So taking a flight to somewhere magnificent would just give me a new setting to feel only pain in, and I may even feel worse because it would be more proof that I'm 'broken.'  
Damn that's a deep trap to be stuck in. I've said this before but professional therapy with mdma/psychedelics sounds like a miracle for people who are really stuck. 
Damn! I know this is the depression thread but shit. That attitude sounds rough. Stick with the first part of the sentence and try to keep a positive outlook like Forrest Gump. Good luck!
It's not an 'attitude' and if it were that easy I would not have posted this
Yeah, both my memory and my vocabulary have gone to shit.
Funny you mention vocabulary, I've noticed that I've been stuttering a lot more
Funny you mention vocabulary, I've noticed that I've been stuttering a lot more
I get lost in what I'm trying to say halfway through a thought. I end up pausing for quite a while to try and remember what I was talking about. It's very frustrating and embarrassing. 
It's quite common with memory-loss because of depression. I don't remember exactly (haha) but it had something to do with the connections in the brain being overworked and the ones needed for memory were specifically effected somehow.  
Yes, depression is so energy consuming that our brain starts to shut down 
Is this something that can be reversed, the memory loss? 
I don't know what the actual science says, but in my own experience  (having had depression for about ten years and being better now for about three) the memories I lost haven't come back but I can create and keep new ones :)
Yep.  My memory is completely gone, I'm one step away from the dude from Memento.  You could tell me to go find two items in a grocery store, I'll say okay, I'll take three steps and immediately forget one of the items.  
I am the same way. I will always forget one thing from a list. That could a list of two, three, or four items. I will be able to remember all buy one. 
Does it ever come back?  My memory?  Not necessarily the memories, but my ability to remember things?  
Yes it definitely does.
Yes it definitely does.
It has been 10 years. Still waiting. While my depression periodically disappears and resurfaces, my memory has seemed to disappear permanently.
I work in a doctor's office. It's so embarrassing to be with a patient and struggle to find a word or remember something about their last visit. I can't even remember much about when my kids were little. I'm glad I'm not the only one who has this problem.
I can't remember a lot about when my kids were little or even things about my deceased dad. My sister remembers everything and she'll ask me sometimes if I remember big things and I have zero recollection of them. It's definitely awful. 
People think I'm joking when I say I don't remember my childhood. I worry that someday I won't remember being a teenager, and then I won't remember being my current age, and so on. 
I don't remember anything about my childhood except that I miss it. I wish I could remember more than where I lived and a few dislocated memories.
Why would our brain choose to remember pain. 
I read a book that said something along the lines of that it's to protect ourselves from experiencing the same pain again.
My psychologist told me that it's because of a weaker ability to concentrate, which can come from either the medication or depression itself. It's also why we have to go back and reread, why we sometime zone-out, why we forget things.  The brain is an organ like everything else, problems with it will show physical problems.
Oh, this is a huge thing for me but I never seemed to make the correlation I just thought it was myself   Thank you! 
Your brain is capable of millions of calculations, at once. Literally.    Do not feel bad that it happens to slip. Your expectations are high, which isnt really a bad thing.    You are not exactly flawed. You are an incredibly, self-correcting system of awesomeness. Never forget that. 
Thanks I needed this.  Everything else here is 'yea, sorry our brains are all kinda shooted now.'  Not sure I believe the opposite, but good to hear something positive.
I don't think an hour goes by when I don't think that. The passage of time combined with the lack of positive change in my life horrifies me to no end, so much so that I need prescription sleep meds to fall asleep as I am otherwise driven insane by the though with nothing to distract me from it as I lie in bed. 
the thought trains going deeper and deeper into horrific visions and you trying to come up with any imagination or memory from the recent year that's not totally negative   failing over and over until you somehow fall asleep a few hours later dreaming up nightmares
Can you juggle? Spend two or three days learning to juggle. You can pick it up quite quickly. Now that you have learnt an empirically demonstrable new skill, try to compare yourself to the person you were before. 
Did this. Was pointless. I'm still the same. 
It makes a lot of sense. It sounds like you're saying that you feel helpless to affect or change yourself, or your reality? 
I feel like my depressed self is my true self is what I'm saying. It can't be 'fixed'. It's just the way I am. 
As a 'realist', I'm struggling to understand why it is more appealing for you to stay in bed... With life being so short, what do you gain from it?
It's hard to describe.  Depression tricks me and alters my priorities.  Humans are creatures of comfort, and it's more comfortable to lay there than go out into the world (even if sometimes the world is just my kitchen).
But how do you not be a pessimist when it is so ingrained into your way of thinking?
Meditation - the medicine of the mind
Enter the Dragon.
The enemy has only images and illusions, behind which he hides his true motives. Destroy the image, and you will break the enemy.
This is the wrong use of depression. You can't choose to not be depressed. I know for a fact, as I was clinically depressed for quite awhile. I still am, but a to lesser extent. Equating pessimism to depression is like equating bisexuality to homosexuality. Both are a part of you. You can't wake up and say you choose not be pessimistic, depressed, bisexual, or homosexual, you just are. In fact, being a pessimist is the easiest thing to change on that list, even though it is damn near impossible.
This so much: I grew up with this, sometimes I hate it, but it's a part of me. I can try to think positively, but I can guarantee my next thought will be 'this is bullshit' or 'you're going to shoot up'.
Dude, I feel like I had to make a throwaway for this, and honestly it took me getting pretty drunk to read this and actually admit to this or even type this response, but this really hit me right in the feels, and is such a helpful way to look at this. Thanks so much for this. You're awesome.
Dude, you snagged up a nice title for a throwaway, I'm impressed
Wow.  Thank you.
Thank you for reading :)  Hulk hopes he can help
You have changed my life with this post.
Wow. Heavy. You've all made my day with these responses!  Peace and love.
If I could give you gold I would - this is the most helpful thing I've read here yet. 
Thanks! Seeing joy in others is worth much more than gold to me :)   Especially internet gold.
What's also interesting is that 'depression' as a clinical diagnosis is also very much so a western concept along with pills to treat it. Many countries and regions of the world simply do not even have such a word. I am someone who believes that ultimately economics in todays world is somewhat the ultimate philosophy to explain daily life so I see a large role of capitalism in these types of phenomenon.
Right? I couldn't agree more. I think it's very much due to the Western lifestyle. Capitalism promotes focus on self, and finding value in self. When someone's self value collapses, they then have nothing.
Ignoring the worlds problems will make you happy, at the cost of making future generations miserable.
Whoaaa. No idea where you derived this from. I do not in any way endorse that haha. Why else do you think I'm writing shootin essays in a depression forum when I could be playing the shit out of Animal Crossing right now
Wheres your proof? Do you have a peer reviewed scientific study reporting these facts? 
I won't claim my statements as truths. I'm not giving a diagnosis.  I've studied a good bit of Psychology, though my word means nothing over the internet. If you want to find evidence that goes against my claims, then I'll gladly change them :)  edit: I also didn't make any scientific claims. I appreciate your inquisitiveness, though I don't quite understand its intent.
There's a phrase that comes to mind: 'Fake it until you make it'  I think that says it all. Yup, it's not quite real but if you're at it long enough parts of it will become real.
While I had never come across that phrase, I would say I faked happiness and confidence. The problem was that inside, I was anything but confident. I never put in the work I should have, but somehow still succeeded. The problem is that I now feel like a complete fraud who deserves none of the success I have received. It feels fake.
I've had that feeling since about 6 years ago in college. Not a burning desire to do it, just kind of like an inevitability sometime in my life. For some reason I have this invasive thought that it'll be when I'm 29.
I have felt this way for as long as I remember, also about the age 29. Strange.
I have felt this way for as long as I remember, also about the age 29. Strange.
Friend's brother died at 29 and I want the same. That way you can still 'die young'. 
Friend's brother died at 29 and I want the same. That way you can still 'die young'. 
Ya getting old scares me. Also considered 29. I don't want to work hard all my life doing something I hate just to be treated like shit when I finally get old enough to retire.
i'm gonna try to stick around until 35, maybe 39 if i'm doing well
30's rock man. So grounded I feel, and sure of myself in a way I never was being younger. 
Then you turn thirty, then thirty-one, and you know what? The thirties are the best decade so far. Way better than teens/twenties. I say keep at it. For all I know the 60s are the best decade lying in wait, and if we give up we'll never know how awesome things might become, and how silly we'll feel one day when we look back on ourselves now.
My parents are in their 60's and they rock harder than me in my thirties. Which is also awesome! 
 I contemplate suicide daily.
Same. I’m not at risk, but the thoughts are persistent throughout each day and rather intrusive. 
 I contemplate suicide daily.
I want you to know i was in the same boat for 9 years. I care for you. 
I’ve always kinda felt this way. It’s like you know that one day you’re gonna snap. Something is gonna happen and you’ll just give up. It’s just a matter of when it happens. My advice is to just keep putting it off. In a way my depression keeps me from killing myself because it’s too much effort. 
Yup. Part of me worries that if i started getting help with the lack of energy I'd be over the only thing that really stops me from doing it.
Yup. Part of me worries that if i started getting help with the lack of energy I'd be over the only thing that really stops me from doing it.
thats actually one of the things they say to watch out for on people like us that start on meds. Suddenly you are capable of actually doing things.
I think a lot of us feel this way. It’s not like I want to kill myself but sometimes when I do something exceptionally shitty and hate myself for it, that’s when I feel like at some point in my life I’m gonna do it. I don’t normally want to kill myself but feeling shitty reminds me that I’ll probably do it somewhere down the road.
Same
I feel the same way.  Not something you can bring up in casual conversation either, so can't really talk about it with anyone.
That is the worst part. Ive been like this since before I can remember and Im pretty sure no one I know knows about it.
That is the worst part. Ive been like this since before I can remember and Im pretty sure no one I know knows about it.
Same here, I want to feel better, but I'm the 'happy guy' in my family and it makes everyone else feel better that I'm 'happy'.   To tell everyone that I've been faking it this whole time wouldn't go well.
'I love your personality, it makes me feel happy'  'Thanks'  (Is actually dead on the inside and spends most of his time thinking of how to kill himself)
> 'I love your personality'  Thanks, I just made it up, special just for you.
I think a lot of us are here. suicidal thoughts are a daily/hourly occurence and especially if you have depression from a young age it's just a normal part of life to us. what keeps me going is not wanting anyone around me to be sad, not wanting my cat to be confused on where I am and the fact that life has NO RULES. you are born and you can do whatever the hell you want. have fun while you can. 
Every time I cry, my cat comes over and lays on me while purring. Let me tell you, definitely keeps a small flame inside my heart. I don’t know what I’d do without him and I don’t want him to feel the same way(in a cat way).
I think a lot of us are here. suicidal thoughts are a daily/hourly occurence and especially if you have depression from a young age it's just a normal part of life to us. what keeps me going is not wanting anyone around me to be sad, not wanting my cat to be confused on where I am and the fact that life has NO RULES. you are born and you can do whatever the hell you want. have fun while you can. 
Cats, man. My cat has kept me here more times than I can count. 
Cats, man. My cat has kept me here more times than I can count. 
Same. Being worried about what would happen to my dog and cats has kept me around so many times. They're innocent in all this. 
I'm 2 months in on meds and I'm here to report that it's not normal to feel this way and you'll feel way better when you embrace living. 
It depends doesn't it? If it's a chemical issue or if it's just your life in general. 
I some times feel the same. When i really think about it though i only feel like that because it would be the easiest way to get away from all these feelings. Suicide is a temporary solution to problems that can mostly be solved with time and the right course of action. Stay strong! 
it's a permanent solution to temporary problems, is what i've always heard. but what happens when the problems become permanent too?
Please, please, please don't kill yourself. Please, please, please call the suicide prevention hotline if you're having fantasies about killing yourself.  I used to be very depressed and suicidal. But now I'm very happy that I didn't kill myself.  Hope this helps.
How will they help?
How will they help?
Can't speak for everyone, only myself. When I was 12 (I know, I know), I almost hanged myself before calling childline. The woman on the other end didn't say or do anything of real value, just listened patiently. What's more, she genuinely cared (I could hear her stifling sobs on the other end), which was the first time I was 100% convinced someone actually gave a shit. This helped me a lot, and while it may not help you, they're worth a go. 
If my 21 year old self met me at 28 now I think he'd be amazed that I'm still alive.  I may not have achieved anything in that time apart from going backwards but I have survived.
When I was 10 years old,I held knife first time in my hand. And I'm 21 now. I totally relate to this. That child would be amazed I made it this far.
 Bro I feel it, I've become a bitter hateful person who loves being alone more than being around even a single person 
Ya I had achieved quite a bit early on, but now I just do the minimal amount to get by. 
Ya I had achieved quite a bit early on, but now I just do the minimal amount to get by. 
Me too. In middle school I was 3 years ahead of my grade in math, in high school I was on honor roll at the highest performing public school in the state, doing sports, clubs and music on top of school. Now I'm in college and below my grade level in math (for my major), and just do enough work to get Bs/Cs, along with one club. I'm also in my 5th year of my 4-year degree haha.
Me too. In middle school I was 3 years ahead of my grade in math, in high school I was on honor roll at the highest performing public school in the state, doing sports, clubs and music on top of school. Now I'm in college and below my grade level in math (for my major), and just do enough work to get Bs/Cs, along with one club. I'm also in my 5th year of my 4-year degree haha.
This is so me. Everything you describe I was great in school top of my class, now into my SIXTH year of a four year course and doing minimum work, I want so badly to change and not feel this way, but nothing has work Meds haven't helped and all I do is sit in and smoke weed. I hate myself so much 
Being able to turn off your emotions is a great tool, but forgetting how to turn them back on is where I ran into a problem. 
and that's where I got lost
I'd tell him that when he's in college in 2011 his friend is going to talk about something he read online about a digital currency called bitcoin, and that he should spend all his money on it instead of weed and video games. 
Sheeet I’m only 20 but I agree. We’d be shootin set rn bro bro
Sheeet I’m only 20 but I agree. We’d be shootin set rn bro bro
Back in 2011 I set up a bitcoin wallet and hovered my finger over 'pay now' on a transaction for 1000 bitcoin at a cost of around £50 but changed my mind due to it being around a weeks wages for me at my part time college job.   Had I done it, they'd be worth ~£13,000,000 today. 
20 is still young af, you can always change for the better. Baby steps.
I am 20 years old but it is depressing that I have wasted 6 years of my life. In those years people normally experience things like sex and love and all I have experience is loneliness. The worst thing is that those years never get back, and my future is going ti be as dark as the past.
20 is still young af, you can always change for the better. Baby steps.
Yeah exactly.  I won’t diminish OP’s pain or feelings.  But man, 20 is nothing.  You have plenty of time to find yourself.
Yeah exactly.  I won’t diminish OP’s pain or feelings.  But man, 20 is nothing.  You have plenty of time to find yourself.
I'm 20. I hope you're right man. 
I'm 20. I hope you're right man. 
I’m 34.  In some ways, it never changes.  Everyday might be a fight, but if you embrace the fight, you’ll find happiness—maybe just pieces of it....but take what you can get. 
Maybe you and your wife could go to some boardgame meetups and meet people you have a common interest with. 
We actually just checked out the game night at the local gaming store. We are thinking of going there some nights and meet people.
Where are you located. We have a group for board games in Dallas. 
About 3 hours from Dallas lol
Try DND. You can find a local game store that might run it or you can always play online. 
That is actually something we looked into just last week.
You have an amazing and very thoughtful wife. You don't need 'friends' when you have her. I'm sorry no one showed up, people are just really shitty sometimes.   Source: my only friend is also my husband. 
I truly did luck out with her. 
It crushes you for a bit but you have to pick up and keep going. Right now it just seems harder to pick myself up. I blame old age. haha
Lol I find it easier as I get older. I stop caring a little more each year.
I know what you mean. People either hate me or love me but they rarely become my friend. It sucks.
Yea. I can get people to talk to me. But getting them to stick around is the hard part. The few people that usually do talk to me right now, they only talk when they need something and I am tired of that. I don't mind helping friends out, but every conversation shouldn't end with asking me for a ride, cash, computer help, or some other favor. They aren't friends. 
Yea. I can get people to talk to me. But getting them to stick around is the hard part. The few people that usually do talk to me right now, they only talk when they need something and I am tired of that. I don't mind helping friends out, but every conversation shouldn't end with asking me for a ride, cash, computer help, or some other favor. They aren't friends. 
People who only come around when they need something aren't friends.
I'm 16 and never had a birthday party either. Most of the time, I just went out to eat with my family and spend the rest of the day doing something I love. I made a post about how nobody ( not even friends ) cared and remembered about my birthday a few days ago and how I was finally broken because of it. Reddit helped me pulled through and I have deleted the post.  Happy birthday to you and you have an amazing wife. Keep her close.
I don't know your situation, but a little advice from me and my personal experiences. Do more in high school! I look back and wish I would have joined track or swimming or participated more with the events. They teach much more than the sport. Stuff I wish I would have learned much sooner. Plus, hard to get into really bad habits when you are too busy with good habits.  edit: almost forgot. Thanks for the birthday wishes.
I haven't progressed socially since about 17, which was 6 years ago now, I feel your pain, no changes, no love life, no friends etc
mines was my freshman year of hs (14-15), went into total isolation. cut off my friends and enrolled in cyber school. I’m now 21 and diagnosed with bipolar and not in treatment (F U American healthcare). I really feel like depression is my life and my personality is shit. 
mines was my freshman year of hs (14-15), went into total isolation. cut off my friends and enrolled in cyber school. I’m now 21 and diagnosed with bipolar and not in treatment (F U American healthcare). I really feel like depression is my life and my personality is shit. 
I feel you. It's like all I know is depression, self isolation, and being personalityless. 
Tfw you peaked at 16 ;_;
TFW you peaked at 16 but it was still shitty then.
I'm lucky enough that I'm getting along well professionally wise, i have a job, get along with colleagues and clients, enough money to rent a house alone, but none of that brings happiness 
I was just like you 3 months ago. Then one week I couldn't get out of bed. It got worse from there. I've just interviewed for another good office job & I'm feeling better about myself.   I hope the best for you. 
I'm still the same loser I was when I got this shitty dead end supermarket job at the age of 18. I'm now 31 and haven't progressed in life at all. I'm just uglier and older.  I have no money or savings at all, no career, can't drive, severely depressed/anxious, still live with parents, forever alone.... the list goes on.  I really should have killed myself a long time ago. Facing society and the outside world like this is unbearably painful.
You’re not a loser.  You work and you stuck it out which is respectable.  Many guys live with their parents.  It’s better than throwing money away on rent every month.  There is hope and joy in tiny things.
Totally understand. I was carefree in high school so ages 14-17. After being raped at 19 I'm an entire different person. My personality is so different. I feel like I have no friends and no one will ever like me. 
I’m sorry for your ordeal.  That is a trauma.  If you’re female, read and research Rose McGowan.  She has #rosearmy that might help you.  Actually she is inclusive for males too who have been raped or abused.
Hey I hate that feeling too, time flies and nothing good happens. The only thing I figured out that helps anyone is exercise. Literally all the other help like medical and scientific methods don't work at all. I think exercise is answer. I have tried several shit like mindfulness and all of that is simply not helpful.   Exercise strengthens both mind and body. There are people who are born weak or strong, but both can benefit from exercise.   I hope this helps you 👍
exercise is my escape from real life
I'm also old enough to know that taking positive action, getting yourself in motion in a direction of change, and keeping yourself in that motion does more than talking about it on an internet message board ever will...
Agreed.  However, this message board is a life saver to many.  And opening up in a safe and non judgmental zone is often all that some have.  I don’t believe in tough love.  I believe in abundant positivity and love.
Nobody's said it yet so Happy Birthday!
Thank you.
Yeah! I'm 28.
I'm 27 but at least I have a job :/
I'm 27 but at least I have a job :/
Yeah me too. Wish I had a better one though. Oh and a car.
Yeah me too. Wish I had a better one though. Oh and a car.
damn close to 40 and pretty much in the same boat.. ><  ^^^I ^^^feel ^^^old.
30, under employed hotel clerk with a Bachelor's degree. Living with parents. Recently sought help and upped my antidepressants to 40 mg.
That was the most unintentionally profound string of words I've read in long time. Thank you.
That was the most unintentionally profound string of words I've read in long time. Thank you.
No idea why -- just telling it like it is.
I was expecting 'I am now a 22yo, unemployed, kissless virgin living with my parents.'
This is me :(
This is me :(
Don't worry, you'll be 23 one day.
I got my first job today! 18 years old and I always thought I was going to be useless. I love being wrong!
Congratulations!
Me too! Where ya working? 
Local Target. Working the 4 am shift unloading pallets of merchandise. Gonna be getting stronk.
Local Target. Working the 4 am shift unloading pallets of merchandise. Gonna be getting stronk.
That seems really calming in a way, hope it goes well for you!
Living with your parents seems bad but it really helps you out if you use that time to work and save. I'm 24 and just moving out of my mom's place but I have a high paying job and money in the bank. Having your own place definitely makes it more appealing to bring ladies to. Which in turn helps your depression. 
It's true. A girl saved my life 10 years ago. Today we're married with two girls. I never thought I'd make it to 25. Today I am 35. Medicated and constantly appreciating where I've been and where I am today. I've stopped telling myself I don't deserve this life, as if there's a compelling argument to make one way or another and that there's truth to be found in all of the self-talk.
Today I received the news that I failed a life-altering, career-determining exam. I failed because I procrastinated, I procrastinated because I couldn't find any motivation, and my motivation was shit because I'm depressed. And now, the cycle restarts... 
Is this even being sick or am I just a lazy worthless shit
Is this even being sick or am I just a lazy worthless shit
I literally ask myself this question daily 
The best thing I can help you with is [this post](https://www.reddit.com/r/getdisciplined/comments/1q96b5/comment/cdah4af) that I recommend you read. Hope it helps.
Wow that is really great, I feel like doing more with my life after reading that. Thank you
Wow that is really great, I feel like doing more with my life after reading that. Thank you
Ah, the infamous 'No zero days' post.  So many people loved it I believed they opened a whole sub for it.
You have to break the cycle. And I know that's easier said than done. So, my advice is to find something small that you can do to get started. Like, maybe clean your room for 15 minutes. Set a timer. Then you can stop and get back into bed. Many times when I do this I work past the timer. But that's not required. You have to break things up into managable small tasks.
It's a little harder with studying than with cleaning, but thanks for the advice. 
It's a little harder with studying than with cleaning, but thanks for the advice. 
I hear you. Can you study for 15 minutes?   Good luck and I really hope things turn around for you. 
I hear you. Can you study for 15 minutes?   Good luck and I really hope things turn around for you. 
I'll give it a try. Thanks for your support, it means a lot. 
Right there with you! I had oversimplified my situation the point that I thought the only 'cure' for my depression was to just pony up and stop procrastinating. I had it backwards - once I started to get a system in place to take care of my depression, the procrastination started to take care of itself.
Really? I don't feel like I can just 'take care of my depression' right now. I,m glad you were able to get better thought! good for you man ^^
Really? I don't feel like I can just 'take care of my depression' right now. I,m glad you were able to get better thought! good for you man ^^
I don't think I chose the right words (and I am still a work-in-progress for sure). I just mean that I had the order mixed up - starting to take care of myself and then starting to take care of procrastination. Started opening up about my depression to a professional, and started developing better self-care habits (good sleep schedule and exercise were/are especially important for me, among other smaller things). 
Procrastinating is just the same as sleeping , either way you're shooting yourself👍🏻😬....keep pushing
Sometimes I do both at the same time
Sometimes I do both at the same time
I love procrasturbation. 
Just tried to tell this to my mom today and she doesn't understand. I can't blame her, I can't even explain it properly. I'm a failure.
Does your mom raise her voice and shout you down like mine does?
story of my lifffffffeeeeeeeeee
X2
Totally relatable.  Meanwhile I appear like a lazy fool with no ambition or talent.   
Talent is overrated IMHO. All you really need is ambition
Yep. I used to pretty smart. Fast forward a few years and I'm struggling through an electrical engineering program, have had to retake a couple of classes, and have like a 2.7 gpa. It isn't that the material is SO complicated, it's that my brain just refuses to hold on to any of the information, so I wind up spending three times as long on assignments as other people and still don't retain half of what they do. I can barely recall anecdotes about my life. I always forget everything.
I dropped out of my electronics engineering program 3 years ago for the same reason in addition to others (financial struggles, family drama, etc). I hope you make it through. 
Yes. With the depression I also have an inferiority complex, so the brain fog definitely doesn't help with that. I never thought I was a genius, but my intelligence was the one thing I prided myself in. Now I feel like the world's biggest dumbass. My ability to communicate is most affected. Can't convey my thoughts for the life of me, forget how to write, how to read numbers...
God, yes.  I used to be quite intelligent and perceptive (or at least I like to think so).  But these days sometimes I feel dumb as rocks.  There's so much brain fog, I'm slow and I have a lot of trouble finding the words I want to use when speaking.  It's horrible :(
I often forget words while speaking. 'Oh yeah have you ever...umm...What's the word....mm...' Is how most of my conversations go. And they're never overly complex words. Not to mention whenever I'm doing a task or trying to get ready for something, I often forget items I needed or the last thing I was just doing.
This holy shit! I was really having trouble socializing cause I was so self conscious about forgetting words. Isolation amplifies depression though so I have been trying to engage with people way way way more.
I was a writer, can't do that anymore because my vocabulary and creativity are just...gone  I also developed a stutter. It always happens when I try to speak more quickly. I feel like I'm talking in slow motion, and have to push myself to talk at the same speed as everyone else
oh god yes i stutter too. English teacher :( 
Yeah, with a lot of mental illnesses, cognitive function can be impaired. You feel slower, duller. Can't focus. Takes you longer to do things, and often you do things wrong. And everyone is just like, 'What the shoots wrong with you? Stop being stupid. Stop being lazy.'
I wish this was more well known and more widely acknowledged...it might make people feel more understanding, and it might make us feel better about ourselves, if only slightly....
Used to be a smart dumbo. Graduated with a STEM degree, killed the MCAT. Had a reputation for being smart. Now my memory fails me on an hourly basis- I'm a total space case. Everything is fuzzy. 
and does that make you more depressed?  Thinking about the cognitive decline and memory loss does it for me.
and does that make you more depressed?  Thinking about the cognitive decline and memory loss does it for me.
Absolutely. 
Oh man, I feel dumber everyday. Lost all my creativity too.
That was the scary thing, it's as if the colour starts to drain from the world and eventually, all you're left with is grey... 
It's gotten to the point where I can't call myself a creative person anymore.
I feel like I'll 'forget'all my skills for several months of the year, when it happens it's sudden. One day I'll wake up and my body doesn't do what I tell it and I can't make things anymore.
I feel like I'll 'forget'all my skills for several months of the year, when it happens it's sudden. One day I'll wake up and my body doesn't do what I tell it and I can't make things anymore.
Been having this to me alot recently. IV always done some freelance design work on the side, and used to enjoy building models to pass time. Now its like I can't even recreate some old work, or even stay focused. I started a model in July, worked on it for a day or two, and haven't been able to keep focused enough to get anything done on it. 
I feel it. I feel like my memory is going away,  I can't focus or concentrate, and when I try to think about specific thoughts or memories, it feels like my mind is full of fog and I can't finish my thought. Even now I can barely figure out how to word this post.
It will get better. 
I do, too. My therapist says that my brain is tired from having to overcompensate for all these years. True, the drinking doesn't help, either. I used to be able to read novels all the time. Now, I haven't picked up a book in over nine months. I'm 47. I don't know how long this can go on.
you're not alone in that. it sucks hardcore and you can feel it eating your brain
you're not alone in that. it sucks hardcore and you can feel it eating your brain
I wouldn't go that far, but I am bothered by the decline and loss of motor and memory function.  Yay disability!
Yes. I sometimes fumble words and skip them. That's the only noticeable thing other than my long term memory which is kinda shot right now.
glad im not the only one 
It's so bad at the moment I'm scared there's actually something more going on. I know at some point I was able to hold relatively intelligent conversations and form coherent thoughts. Now I'm pretty sure this comment doesn't even make sense...
it makes sense
Definitely. I looked through my old Uni thesis the other day and I couldn't stop thinking to myself 'how the hell did I do this'
Yep. Read a long-form article I wrote in university the other day and I was smiling ear-to-ear, like I couldn't remember I could write so well. Maybe in that way, it inspires a little bit of hope.
All the time.
Who were you before depression took over?
Depression brings an inability to focus. You aren't getting dumber, none of you are. We just can't focus as well because all of our energy is depleted from the depression.
Depends on how you define intelligence but I see where you're coming from.
I have a really hard time spelling now even though I know how to spell the shootin word I can't bring myself to do it. It's embarrassing as hell and very frustrating, also my memory has gone to shit
My reading comprehension has gotten noticeably worse. I often have to read sentences twice to understand them.
My reading comprehension has gotten noticeably worse. I often have to read sentences twice to understand them.
It's scaring the crap out of me, I've never really used spell check on my computer or phone because I would pride myself on never needing it. Now I can't read, write, hell I can barely speak or understand what words mean
It's scaring the crap out of me, I've never really used spell check on my computer or phone because I would pride myself on never needing it. Now I can't read, write, hell I can barely speak or understand what words mean
And everyone you met while you were depressed, that are still in your life now while you're STILL depressed, thinks you've always been dumb. Right? Anyone? 
Depression Damages Parts of the Brain, Research Concludes  http://www.iflscience.com/health-and-medicine/depression-damages-parts-brain-research-concludes/  'It’s important to note however, that the effects of depression on the brain are reversible with the right treatment for the individual.  “The hippocampus is one of the most important regenerative areas of the brain,” said Professor Hickie.'  Apologies for the ugly link; I'm on mobile. 
No need to apologize. Thanks for the info!
I'm already dumb. Depression just makes me make more stupid decisions.   I don't know why I'm so stupid.
I'm sure you're not dumb, friend. Why would you say that :( 
It very much is, I can't remember precisely but I think the pre frontal cortex and the hippocampus shrink under depression. When I started recovering the wealth of creativity and ease of thought I gained back was unbelievable. I felt like a new person.
I really hope this recovery thing happens soon. You're so right, it's like a huge pool of creativity evaporated when I stopped looking at it. Writing- or any creative projects I used to have seem almost dead, like there's no way I can motivate myself any more to do them.  It's like eating cold pizza and not smelling or tasting even half as much flavor as when eating hot pizza.
I really hope this recovery thing happens soon. You're so right, it's like a huge pool of creativity evaporated when I stopped looking at it. Writing- or any creative projects I used to have seem almost dead, like there's no way I can motivate myself any more to do them.  It's like eating cold pizza and not smelling or tasting even half as much flavor as when eating hot pizza.
*It's like eating cold pizza and not smelling or tasting even half as much flavor as when eating hot pizza.* Wow, this is a great analogy!
I don't necessarily feel 'dumber' as in less educated. But definitely more forgetful. 
Yup. Can confirm you're not alone in feeling that. My memory feels absolutely eroded. I frequently walk into rooms and forget why I came in, while I would do it once in a blue moon prior to this period of my life. And being forgetful can mimic being dumb in a lot of profound ways, even to convince you you're actually 'dumber than before' (which is ridiculous). 
intensely bad! ive just had an mri scan because im convinced theres some sort of neurological damage
Do you have results yet?
Do you have results yet?
few weeks away, will let you know. to be fair, this is just specifically testing for multiple sclerosis, cause ive had a load of stuff like muscle spasms aswell, so it might not show up if there is something else wrong.
The meds take the most out of me. Word finding issues, trouble forming sentences when speaking, that whole deal. It's like, do I want to function or do I want to feel like dying 24/7? It sucks. 
I've been feeling kinda slow like this lately and hadn't considered the meds could be causing it. Maybe it's time to try something different.
Depression does cause frontal lobe inhibition, so that makes a lot of sense.
Less impulse control wooooo!
Well, our brains have shrunk. Depression does that, I think of it as a bonus, less chance of a head injury.
Woohoo time to go jump off a bridge 
Have you tried switching to some other similar meds? That was the case with me a few months back
About 5 months ago I was prescribed a relatively small dose of lexapro to add to my daily intake. It took the edge off of any anxiety I had but did not help with any mental clarity. 
Does anyone have some links explaining  this phenomenon? 
By theory is that we have lost interest in everything, so things are hard to remember. Think about the difference between remembering to feed your dog and the color of your friends sweater. The color of your friends sweater is really not important - and now everything in life is your friends sweater. 
I think my memory is turning to garbage, but a lot of people with the same problem say it's a side effect of anti depressents, not saying your situation is correlated, but I feel the same. 
My memory's becoming garbage too but I've never taken anti-depressants...
That's because you do turn dumber in a way. Your logic patterns shrinks to oblivion, but subconsciously you know it and identify it as getting dumb.
Well damn
I know that feeling. Then I remind myself: depression IS a bad thing in my life. A very bad thing. I hate feeling bad for having depression, but it's a natural thing to feel. Unfortunately, it takes time to get out of the rut your mind is in when one thinks about how they should be depressed for a reason. There is no reason. If there was, it wouldn't be called depression. 
Mmm that's true. Maybe in a way I feel like I need the justification for people who don't have depression. Like those people that tell you 'Just choose to be happy...' *sigh
Mmm that's true. Maybe in a way I feel like I need the justification for people who don't have depression. Like those people that tell you 'Just choose to be happy...' *sigh
Those people, while they may try to be nice, aren't the smartest apples in the bunch. I wouldn't bother trying to reinforce a wrong idea in their minds. It's just not worth your time.
Yeah. I had a relatively normal childhood, except for a few things that you might call 'trauma.' But it's not NEARLY as bad as what other people have had to endure. So basically I just feel like a piece of shit who can't move on.
I feel the same way. It feels shitty.
I feel the same way. It feels shitty.
I get this. But I always to try remember suffering and pain is relative 
I feel this so much. Everyone always tells me how 'good' I'm doing just because I can barely manage to live on my own and hold a job. I also wish I could trade depression for a physical illness. At least people would understand more and my pain would be more obvious..
Preach. I often feel badly for reading or posting in this sub like, “I must not be depressed enough to really have depression, even though I do, but I can’t even talk about it to others with depression.”
Preach. I often feel badly for reading or posting in this sub like, “I must not be depressed enough to really have depression, even though I do, but I can’t even talk about it to others with depression.”
Def. I don't have any obvious reason to have terrible depression, but I still do and it's so hard to talk about. It almost feels like my depression isn't bad enough to talk about.
My friend told me.  You don't  feel Miserable, you are afraid of not being miserable. Hence you sabotage yourself unconsciously so you can be so.  She nailed every word.
Hits home for me man.
Hits home for me man.
I know right? Hurts like hell
Yes OP, I've had thoughts about terrible things happening to me to justify  being depressed, but also to have ppl pay more attention to me. It's pretty shitty but sometimes I think about how people would treat me differently if I had some serious disease (cancer etc.)
Right. I want the physical component, so I can give people something to actually see that justifies my pain.
All the time. It's hard explaining this to friends who haven't experienced this before or are very close-minded.   And by God, I hate it when people just say 'but you don't have any justification for being depressed'.
>  'but you don't have any justification for being depressed'.  When people say this, I just think 'I know I don't. Yet, here I am with a good happy life, feeling like total shit and can't seem to make anything better.'  It's not a matter on where you are at on the outside. It's all genetics and I had no input on my body/lineage screwing me over.  People like this can shoot off.
People don't understand how draining it is and how you just cannot get up. It's horrible 
I am typing this from my work computer. I shouldn't be on reddit but I needed to because I can't do anything else. Literally feels like a cold molten metal is running through my whole body weighing me down.  No-one at work understands and it feels like my boss doesn't give a damn.. so my only option is to show up to work and force myself through the pain.
I am typing this from my work computer. I shouldn't be on reddit but I needed to because I can't do anything else. Literally feels like a cold molten metal is running through my whole body weighing me down.  No-one at work understands and it feels like my boss doesn't give a damn.. so my only option is to show up to work and force myself through the pain.
That's an incredibly detailed way to describe executive dysfunction thank you so much
In my experience most people don't actually understand depression. They think it's just feeling sad and mopey, like Sadness from *Inside Out*. I have to explain constantly that depression is not feeling sad, it is not not feeling *anything at all*, including the desire to do things, like living.
I have been in denial of my depression for a long time now thanks to my constant state of contentment, thanks for this post, I know it sounds stupid but it's what I needed. I'm going to find a way to get a therapist.
I love Inside Out because it has a wonderful example of depression.  It's not Sadness, but rather when the core memories are lost and things first shut down then start falling apart. The things that once meant so much now give absolutely nothing.  Both Joy and Sadness are lost. If those core memories weren't returned, eventually everything would just shut down and die.
That's exactly what I thought when I watched the movie: Depression isn't when Sadness was touching things, depression was when Happiness was just... gone. Everything was a little less meaningful when nothing could possibly result in happiness. You fake it, waiting for it to come back, but if it doesn't, well what's the point?
That's exactly what I thought when I watched the movie: Depression isn't when Sadness was touching things, depression was when Happiness was just... gone. Everything was a little less meaningful when nothing could possibly result in happiness. You fake it, waiting for it to come back, but if it doesn't, well what's the point?
Yes, and depression loves to convince people that it will never come back and pushes people into ways of thinking and behaving that makes it all worse
Inside out was the shooting worst
I loved the movie, personally. I was using Sadness' behavior as an example of how a lot of people perceive depression incorrectly. As others have pointed out in this thread, depression is accurately represented by the loss of the core memories and Joy and. Sadness. 
We need a better word for it, like 'emotion loss' or something
'Depression' comes from the Latin *deprimere*, which means 'to press down', as in it 'presses down the spirit'. It would be equally accurate to say is presses down emotions. Too bad most people don't know that or care enough to know.
This frustrates me as well, I have little to no energy, or motivation to do and my gf thinks her telling me multiple times with frustration rising each time in her voice is going to help, when in fact it makes it worse. I don't want to be wasting away, but I can't help it. 
Please do something to help yourself or you'll lose her. I lost my boyfriend because of depression. You'll be 800 times more miserable after a breakup, please please do something for yourself
Please do something to help yourself or you'll lose her. I lost my boyfriend because of depression. You'll be 800 times more miserable after a breakup, please please do something for yourself
Thanks, I know I need to get help, but my next dr appointment isn't until the end of the month, my dr did say I could call and come see him anytime, maybe I'll have to do that TMR and talk to him about getting help for anxiety sooner. 
I can relate...but You need to say Dang it...get up and get on with the day.    Do baby steps... just will yourself out of bed and do ..something 
Damn, I want so badly to make myself do this. This is the advice I give all my friends and it seems to help them, but I can't seem to follow it myself... I can only imagine what a better place I'd be in if I had some grit.
Damn, I want so badly to make myself do this. This is the advice I give all my friends and it seems to help them, but I can't seem to follow it myself... I can only imagine what a better place I'd be in if I had some grit.
It's not grit you need, but hope.  Without hope, even the easiest tasks become almost insurmountable  Oh, and grit is something you have in abundance if you are able to even survive while seriously depressed; to keep living when your hope and self worth have been ripped from you takes a lot of strength (and is where all that energy everyone else spends on things like showering and brushing their teeth has been spent on)
That line of thinking, that someone is lazy, is one of the main reasons that led me to go no-contact with my family. 
i'm still trying to convince myself that it's not just laziness when i'm like this. Kinda hard when i still live with family and that's what they all like to tell me. all it feels like it does is add to the anxiety that keeps me from doing anything
Im not trying to attack, I am being serious.  But if thats how you want to respond.  I wish you well.  
When I have work, I get out of bed with enough time to brush my teeth and head out the door-not because I want to because I cannot get myself out of bed. I do my responsibilities, pay my bills, but with extreme exhaustion and constant worry and dread. It is one thing to be misinformed it is another to be ignorant about it. 
I had 4-5 years of this, everyday. Made all these elaborate plans. Gonna walk the dog, mediate, do homework, work on programming because I'm failing all my programming classes, call family overseas workout... then hit the bed before I do any of that stuff and I'm gone.
I fear that it's endless that's why I think about killing myself so much. Ever since I got out of the hospital I've been just filling my time with things to do. Once I run out what will I do. That's what I'm always afraid of. 
That's why I started drinking, because I would find that the hours between the time when I finished work and the time I go to bed are the most miserable. It works, but at what cost?
This is how I became an alcoholic. Currently sitting at home with a broken ankle. Nothing brings me pleasure and I can't even purchase anything to get high off of since I can't drive. It's times like this that I consider ending it.
I went out in the sun and all I got was this horrible sunburn. Ha ha ha.
Well wear sunscreen, haha
I miss the real me that died somewhere between 2010 and 2011..
Yeah, I miss all the promise that I was when I was younger. I'm nearly 30 and still have no idea what my talents are.
Well I think a big part of it is how it’s largely shown to be that in film and entertainment. It’s like when people who don’t get high think weed makes you hallucinate, or inexperienced people do really cringe-worthy things when dating. They saw it on a movie and thought that it translated to real life. 
So... what does weed do?
So... what does weed do?
It makes you feel good and hungry. All senses are elevated a little bit, but you're mellowed out. That's all tbh.
It makes you feel good and hungry. All senses are elevated a little bit, but you're mellowed out. That's all tbh.
Only makes you feel good if you felt good in the first place..
Because sadness is the maximum where they have gone, they do not know the emptiness of depression.
Wow you're right. They never know the level of negativity beyond sadness. How lucky.. 
Wow you're right. They never know the level of negativity beyond sadness. How lucky.. 
When I try to explain to a person what it's like I say my meds raise the bottom I can hit to the one they can sink to.  It's vague but it's the closest I've gotten to getting accross something that's an abtraction for them.  Edit: spelling
Depression: the final frontier. These are the voyages of the starship Depression. Her five year mission: to seek out new life and new civilizations; to boldly go where no one has gone before.
Oh your gods, I love the gallows humor here.
Deppresion feels like not being attached to yourself. A third person role playing game where you dont even cheer for the main character.
I’m lost enough I don’t even know what I’m supposed to actually feel like. The only time I realize the way I actually should feel is when I’m extremely high on a pot brownie, as odd as it sounds. Very sad. Been around 3 years now 
I’m lost enough I don’t even know what I’m supposed to actually feel like. The only time I realize the way I actually should feel is when I’m extremely high on a pot brownie, as odd as it sounds. Very sad. Been around 3 years now 
Do you have a recipe?  I'm not kidding.
I'm in a dissociated state atm.  I know I'm 'driving', so I'm being careful, but it doesn't feel like me right now.  I'm a stranger to my body.
Depersonalization. The worst symptom of all this imo
Worst thing Ive ever heard is the people who just say 'Its a state of mind and they just chose to be sad' like it has an off switch.
“Everybody is depressed sometimes you just have to move on”  My brother told me that, and while it’s true that depression-like symptoms happen to about ~60% of the population at some point in their lives, chronic clinical depression is totally different and some people just don’t understand that 
Why the shoot would anyone choose to be sad? 
They typically say something along the lines of 'Its an excuse to get out of responsibilities' or to 'Get Attention'
They typically say something along the lines of 'Its an excuse to get out of responsibilities' or to 'Get Attention'
I would rather have all of the responsibilities in the world than suffer through this hell.
I think it's because they'll say something like, 'I'm depressed' when they really mean, 'I'm feeling sad today.'
It does have two definitions.
Or the ' just be happy' comments. Like okay if it was that easy we all would be happy. -_-
/r/wowthanksimcured
Tell them thats like telling them to 'just get in a jumbo jet and fly to japan. Just do it.'
Or it's like saying 'just make the cancer leave your body'
If they’re happy and healthy how can they know the emptiness of depression?  Why would they not want to exist when their brain doesn’t suffer from illness. It’s not like they don’t want to understand, they can’t. Just like how we don’t know what it’s like to be ‘normal’ every day.
Honestly like what is normal lol. I can relate
Because they equate sadness and depression. I can be the happiest person and still have that emptyness inside. That is depression.
Yes. Even though I’m engaged and my job is going alright... I still don’t feel deeply satisfied. Like I realized that love can’t save me and so what is the answer? Is there one? Or am I just a shell permanently? 
I think depression is when your so sad you don't feel anything emotionally. 
That's severe depression. You can still cry while having depression.
That’s such a younger person thing you’ll find out that’s not true with in most people as you get older
Nope I've gotta say I know people in their late 40's that still think like this. Some people will never understand
Saw that coming. Kinda funny but I wish you had gotten over your depression instead.
Didn't see it coming, was hoping to find a solution for myself. Haha.
I just turned 20 two days ago. Life had opened its arms to me recently and just decided to slap me in the face again. Hang in there. 
What it give you sooo many presents, only to have you drop your phone in the toilet
What it give you sooo many presents, only to have you drop your phone in the toilet
Or have your brother die
Or have your brother die
Oh, I'm so sorry,  __________________l  I've not lost anyone close before, so my advice is merely conceptual, but I hope you have someone to talk to. My inbox isn't usually that full, so talk to me all you like
Wait for 24.  That's when you realize it's permanent. 
How far into being 24? I'm about 5 months 27 days 10 hours and 28 minutes into being 24, and I don't think it's hit me yet.  edit: oh there we go, just kicked in.  
How far into being 24? I'm about 5 months 27 days 10 hours and 28 minutes into being 24, and I don't think it's hit me yet.  edit: oh there we go, just kicked in.  
Waiting on the trip report.
Ahhh to be twenty again. No longer a teenager but still can't legally drink. What a rip off.
Thankfully I'm canadian
Not if u live in canada
Or basically anywhere else in the world
Happy birthday bud, you have steam or overwatch?
An /r/depression overwatch party sounds pretty fun actually.
An /r/depression overwatch party sounds pretty fun actually.
Everyone play widowmaker and shoot each other in the face
Everyone play widowmaker and shoot each other in the face
Setup Symmetra's portal so it points off a cliff and keep intentionally walking through it so the other team gets spammed with 'Team kill' over and over. 
That was beautiful.
Thank you.
...You know, this is actually a rather cool game mechanic. I'm actually half tempted to semi-steal semi-adapt it, and see if I can convince a game I've pledged to include a Cape Of Melancholy, assuming it's okay with you. Do you do any type of games development (art, programming, etc)?  If so, this could make for an interesting mini-game, or an interesting part of an RPG.
Thank you. Do what you want with the idea, I feel that this is not something I want to take credit for, since the experience itself is shared by so many people.  And no, apart from having a head full of ideas and writing some of them down sometimes I wouldn't really say I doing anything with games development.
Good job. Well put. If only the game included a magical hidden place where cape-wearers could go to be cured....
I think there will be a place and a time to put the cape down. At some point I suppose the cape-wearer will level up and realize he doesn't need the cape anymore.
I think there will be a place and a time to put the cape down. At some point I suppose the cape-wearer will level up and realize he doesn't need the cape anymore.
OAK: There's a place and time for everything! But not now.
As a gamer myself, this really is pretty accurate and nicely described as to what it's like.
Thank you.
A good point. I choose to describe it as being a god, rather than a ghost because at the beginning of the journey I've often felt like this numbness made me strong. Like I've seen a layer of existence the people around me simply cant comprehend with all their emotions getting in the way. Hell, at some days I still feel like that and I'm not proud of it.
It's a really good analogy.
A good point. I choose to describe it as being a god, rather than a ghost because at the beginning of the journey I've often felt like this numbness made me strong. Like I've seen a layer of existence the people around me simply cant comprehend with all their emotions getting in the way. Hell, at some days I still feel like that and I'm not proud of it.
>felt like this numbness made me strong  God, ive felt like this more times than I'm willing to admit. I tell myself 'hey, the world as you know it could end, but you wouldn't care, you would survive because nothing would phase you'.   its bullshit, I would kill to be able to connect to people,  i see them shooting laughing and having fun smiling, and I just want to shooting beat the shit out of them.
xpost this to /r/outside, KF2! They will love that shit!
[Done and done.](http://www.reddit.com/r/outside/comments/22k1a2/depression_explained_with_a_rpg_metaphor_xpost/)
This is very well put. I think putting things in metaphores really describes things well. Your vision on depression really made me think and it connected some dots for me. This is the exact situation i'm in. I don't really know how to describe it but thank you, you gave me some food for thought.
It was a pleasure for me.
I read this post earlier, and I thought it was probably the best way to explain what those of us with severe depression go through.  I'm hanging out with one of my best friends from HS today, fellow gamer and redditor /u/ss1gohan13, and he asked me to describe what my depression has been like. So I showed him this, because it was the best thing I could think of.  God bless.
Thank you and best of luck on your journey.
Thank you and best of luck on your journey.
Same to you, friend.
Alas, I only have one up vote to give and no money for gold! 
Thank you.
I have a question, it's really a thing of depression is like no emotions for you? Maybe I'm not really depressed, but I can feel pain, angry, irration, fear I can feel them really strong. What I noticed for me is lack of positive thougths and emotions. I never feel satisfied and motivated enough. I don't see world really as grey, I still feel the world, the people, but mostly in negative way. It's that depression too? 
i like to think of it on a scale, {happy - sad} or perhaps {satisfied - lost}, that way theres no big black line to say 'youre depressed you can stay but youre not, piss off guy whos not really depressed'.  just because you're sad/low/completely out of it, doesn't mean you need drugs or therapy or some excessive shit, but just because you're not so far lost as to feel utter apathy doesn't mean you aren't depressed :3  I'm more towards bipolar myself :D
I thank you for posting this. It just helps. Thanks.
I'm glad I could help.
This has pretty much been my life for a year and a half.
I know this doesn't do much, but my thoughts are with you.
I know this doesn't do much, but my thoughts are with you.
No, but I can appreciate the fact that you're being very active in this thread and actually care enough to empathize with people like me and other posters. It means a lot as it restores a little of my faith in humanity. You're a good person. And a great writer.  Thanks :)
No, but I can appreciate the fact that you're being very active in this thread and actually care enough to empathize with people like me and other posters. It means a lot as it restores a little of my faith in humanity. You're a good person. And a great writer.  Thanks :)
Thank you. Seeing that your work can just brighten peoples day just a bit is the greatest compliment. :)
Well-written and an interesting read
Thank you.
This is brilliant. You have an amazing way with words and have given a picture into what so many of us feel. Thank you for sharing! 
Thank you.
Sounds more like apathy to me, last part is great though.
Apathy was/is a big part of depression, at least for me.  At first you dont want to give a shoot anymore, then you dont give a shoot anymore, then you cant give a shoot anymore.
Absolutely perfect.
Thank you.
Dude that is amazing. Feel like doing mini series of things like this so i can explain it to other people?
I dont think I'd be able to come up with a whole series. I dont want to write about things I dont understand or experience, since it would be just empty. Though I try my best to write everything down that I feel is worth writing down.
->Psh, you're just doing it for the attention. Be quiet.  *1 month later*  ->Why did they kill themselves? How selfish of them! They should have talked to someone.
Dang! This! This is so shooting true it hurts! It hurts me reading this! I have been told by another depressed hypochondriac that I was doing it for the shooting attention! Just because he 'suffers in silence' he's so much better than me! But he takes his anger and depression out on his family and tells and screams at them. It's like 'no, I am talking about it because I need help, and I am willing to get and receive help' much better than the alternative.
This hit hard. I'm so scared for summer when parents/friends will ask me 'why are you wearing long sleeves??'
No one asks me that in the summer, i ALWAYS were a hoodie with a zipper everywhere i go, no matter what or when. So no one really asks why i keep wearing it :)
No one asks me that in the summer, i ALWAYS were a hoodie with a zipper everywhere i go, no matter what or when. So no one really asks why i keep wearing it :)
Yeah, I tried wearing hoodies in the summer, but I live in the South where it's blazing hot. So, people will question me.
> My reason for doing it is to 'punish' myself.  What for? 
For being completely useless, worthless, depressed, etc. The list could go on forever. So, cutting is my form of punishment to myself.
For being completely useless, worthless, depressed, etc. The list could go on forever. So, cutting is my form of punishment to myself.
I think we both know there's more to it than that.   Let me assure you, there is no rationalising self-harm. The root cause is *always* hidden beneath the post hoc justifications.   One more question. What would you say is the purpose of punishment?   
The best way I've found to confront people who dismiss people in crisis as 'attention-seeking' is to point out that what they're doing is *exactly* analogous to dismissing a starving person as 'nutrition-seeking'.  
This is gold.  I will use this next time I am confronted with such a situation.  Thank you.
Doesnt make any sense, you dont need attention to survive, but you do need nutrition. Wtf lol terrible analogy
> you dont need attention to survive  You do need social connections.    
Jesus, atleast he is an ex now sounds like absolute idiot and that he didn't really care about you that much. :(
It's not that he didn't care. He did at first. But he was depressed too and the way he dealt was being apathetic. So we were horrible for each other. I was extremely emotional when depressed and he felt nothing. And yeah he did become an ass towards the end and stopped caring. I was a crappy person, I didn't even love myself so I don't blame him too much for not caring. Not excusing his idiotness by saying I take responsibility for some of it. 
But don't you see? It's all just one big circletalking way for people to free themselves of blame.  Nobody gives a shoot about us. Whether we kill ourselves or not, they just don't want to be bothered about it.
I hate how much this is true. Life is so stupid, the only people that care are paid to care. It's so sad, mental health has become a joke in today's society and everyone is too self centred to look around and realize that other people could use their support.
Serious question: to what length should I go to offer help to someone talking about suicide? I've reached out to a friend to tell him I care and to offer help, but he is mostly unresponsive and seems to not want to talk about it. I don't want to be overbearing about it, but I really don't want him to kill himself either. 
That's usually how people with depression are and mostly want to keep things to themselves no matter how hard it is. Just say when ever you need anything or when things get unbarring I'm here to talk. 
As someone with depression. I personally have never found an interest in self harming. It sounded too painful and a cry for attention. I'd rather be alone and then be attended to. If you feel like you need to hurt yourself, better of getting help.
Neither have I, but not everyone is the same.
I just wanna say that I LOVE your username! :D
THANK YOU!! 
THANK YOU!! 
So why do they make you sign?
So why do they make you sign?
They want to make sure that the person gets the package. If they sign the company knows that workers didn't steal the package and that the owner receives it. 
Current FedEx driver here and use to have severe depression. (Still do sometimes, but I've learned to manage it for the most part) 10/10, that exchange also meant something to the driver as well. It's good to deliver to someone who brings a good laugh and convo! On behalf of parcel drivers, thank you for being you :)
Man, this is really great. Thank you for commenting I really appreciate it!
Here let me finish this comment for you...  Disclaimer: Working at FedEx as a driver will lead to depression, sadness, and a deep existential empty feeling in your stomach.  Buyer beware. 
TBH this job helped me cope with my depression lmao you don't want to know what my job was before this.. THAT was path to depression, sadness, and a deep existential empty feeling 
So you like The Stone Roses, yeah?
Of course!!
My UPS guy hates my dog because he barks at him, and I also worry about him judging my online shopping addiction. We can't win them all, but I'm glad that you won your battle today :D
The amount of times he shows up at my door makes me wonder if he's judging my shopping also. So, you're definitely not alone!
Dude, this would work great on r/havehope  If you'd be willing to post there
Wow, I didn't even know this sub existed. I'd be happy to post there!
Wow, I didn't even know this sub existed. I'd be happy to post there!
Cool, see you there.  And thank you, this will for sure inspire some people
He just wants to  shoot you.
Well, we know what type of shows you watch :)
Are you lolicon futanari?
From my google calculations I'm guessing this is Hentai so I'll have to go with a hard no.
'I don't want to go to work. If I call in sick, it's pathetic and I'll get fired.  Can't be fired if I kill myself.'
Danged up that you can get fired for being sick, whether you're pretending or not.
This is the only place where I feel like people get it.
I feel you, bro/sis. I just can't find anyone who can relate to this, as I'm the only one who's depressed af among all the people I know. It's frightening, tiring, and I too wish I was never born. How unfair is it that you're just born, and in 2 decades that pass by ever so quickly, you're expected to be successful or whatever.  I mean, what if I wanted to be a duck or something?  Damn, I'm brain-shooted  :( 
I feel you, bro/sis. I just can't find anyone who can relate to this, as I'm the only one who's depressed af among all the people I know. It's frightening, tiring, and I too wish I was never born. How unfair is it that you're just born, and in 2 decades that pass by ever so quickly, you're expected to be successful or whatever.  I mean, what if I wanted to be a duck or something?  Damn, I'm brain-shooted  :( 
That's kind of funny you mention duck, because I used to want to be a duck so bad when I was younger. They can walk, fly AND swim whaaaat
Every. Single. Effin'. Day. For everything.  Work? I should just kill myself. Bills? Kill myself. Shower? Kill myself. Go outside? Kill myself.
I'm sorry but this made me laugh, just the way you wrote it. But I think the same thing too.
That's part of the reason why it always scared me to admit if I was having suicidal thoughts.  If they committed me then they could potentially take away even the option of suicide, which I viewed as my most fundamental freedom
This. So much.
Yeah I soon as I have to put in any effort whatsoever my body just shooting shuts down and I either just want to sleep, feel ill, or want to die.
And then after a month of being in a nearly catatonic state, I woke up just past midnight last week, to my very first gout attack. Not no little attack. Both ankles. The pain I experienced unfathomable. It had no ceiling. 
Yeah, my mom literally told me she would kill herself too if I ever did.
damn bro. wtf. like i understand why but why would you tell your kid that...
It's not pathetic. It just means you feel overwhelmed and don't know how to handle it. 
I think it means that we aren't genetically built to be able to handle the problem like most humanoids.  Survival of the fittest doesn't only apply to the animal kingdom.
I think it means that we aren't genetically built to be able to handle the problem like most humanoids.  Survival of the fittest doesn't only apply to the animal kingdom.
>Survival of the fittest doesn't only apply to the animal kingdom.  I agree. Genes or not though, there is a clear push in society by the more compassionate types for greater equality and to help the disabled and poor instead of just pushing us into the gutter to die.
This is me almost every single day so you are definitely not alone in this. Anytime you want to talk or vent feel free to message me, i totally get where you are coming from, and it really very much sucks. *Hugs*
Thank you for understanding and for being there for some complete stranger. It sucks to hear that so many people are going through the same misery. 
This is me as well and it sucks I just posted in r/suicidewatch a minute ago I'm feeling better but not good
If you want to talk, I'm just an internet stranger but I know how you feel. I am here. 
If you want to talk, I'm just an internet stranger but I know how you feel. I am here. 
If you want the full story you can find it in my post history I don't feel like telling it again I'm pretty drained.
If you were like that a couple years ago how are you doing now?
I still get that feeling of, if I die, I won't have to do (this).  I'm basically always ready to hit the eject button on life.  That being said, I was unmedicated when I had those thoughts (about being hit by a car).  I'm now back on anti-anxiety medication and feel better.  
Do you end up overcoming the challenge or avoiding it?
I'm avoiding it as much as possible
I'm avoiding it as much as possible
Do you think the avoiding is more out of anxiety or just feeling like you don't have the energy? edit: sorry for the twenty-one questions.
Do you think the avoiding is more out of anxiety or just feeling like you don't have the energy? edit: sorry for the twenty-one questions.
Don't worry man. :) It's dedefinitely because I don't have the energy to do whatever I should be doing. A little bit of anxiety is in there as well, but the main part is not having the motivation. Why do you ask?
Saw this pic on /r/getmotivated the other day:  http://imgur.com/cjj4iYj  It beautifully captures the difficulty of depression. But also what it's like to eventually kick depression's ass. 
Except in reality, you get to the 'yes, I did it' stage and realize that what you just accomplished means nothing to you.
Bill Burr has a great bit about that.  
Source?
Source?
so does Louis CK in his 2017 special
I hate this attitude. 'It's a numbers game.' Why don't you actually go after people you have something in common with? Cold approaches are uncomfortable for everyone involved
Cold approaches generally don't work for me (female/university). They personally make me nervous and I don't like the idea of hanging out with someone I have absolutely no prior connections to and insight to their personality. I just don't like being caught off guard. At least for me it's not personal if I say I'm not interested/busy just a situation I don't like. 
Well genius typically you don't know if someone has something in common with you unless you go out with them and get to know them.  
Do friendships between men and women not exist in the 21st century?
Dude you have more guts than I do. Good job man. 
Gotta have guts if you wanna beat those guts..yaknowatimsayin?? ...........
....what
Because when the Penis enters the Vagina, with a rapid reciprocal motion, it is essentially beating the guts of the woman....
I think it's dangerous -- the whole line of thought that tells guys they can't be happy/successful/healthy/ok if they don't have a girlfriend. Dang that. The world doesn't need more Elliot Rodgers. I see it here all the time, and it scares the hell out of me.  But, if I'm really trying to be honest, maybe I can also admit that these posts hurt me because, despite being in a loving LTR myself, I'm still shooting depressed and deep down believe I always will be?  
What exactly implies elliot rodgers about wanting basic human needs? 
Me all day everyday. I even pretend to talk with people with what I'm doing right now.  Example I'm watching T.V and I pretend to discuss the show with someone who is actually myself and my pretend friend.  Or when I edit photos/videos I pretend to teach someone as I edit. It keeps me happy but reality sets in.
It's scary how much I relate to this.
It's scary how much I relate to this.
I've had my mom walk into my room while I was editing and I said 'I'm teaching my friend over skype'. well..... no I was talking to myself.   It sounds insane but it keeps me sane
I've had my mom walk into my room while I was editing and I said 'I'm teaching my friend over skype'. well..... no I was talking to myself.   It sounds insane but it keeps me sane
I had my aunt walk in on me once & ask 'are you talking to yourself'? Me: *crickets*  *Better to remain silent and be thought a fool than to speak and to remove all doubt.-Abe Lincoin or Mark Twain* 
Yeah. Done this for years. Think I was creating my own reality because I didn't like the true reality. It doesn't work though. It just keeps you passive and miserable. You need to work at building a good life for yourself then you won't need a fantasy.
But where do I find a dragon that needs to burn me alive to release the magic within me that I can't access right now, helping hatch the last dragon eggs -that would become my children after I rebuild my body in a way that I like- in the process? My fantasy says Canada, but I need to get kidnapped and taken there to be tortured for a year before I can escape and find it. 
But where do I find a dragon that needs to burn me alive to release the magic within me that I can't access right now, helping hatch the last dragon eggs -that would become my children after I rebuild my body in a way that I like- in the process? My fantasy says Canada, but I need to get kidnapped and taken there to be tortured for a year before I can escape and find it. 
U ok
I kinda do.   I sometimes commentate to myself over video games and stuff as if I was streaming or making a video that many would watch(typically streaming) even though I am not. But yeah, the world in my head sounds way better. To bad I'm not skillful  or talented enough to let it all out in some creative way. 
same
Yup, it's called maladaptive daydreaming and it's more common than you'd think
“Maladaptive” means it annoys other people. I can totally relate to this thread. Actually, “unproductive,” might be a better term. I always dreamed of being a writer, and sometimes my internal monologs do develop into publishable material - (mental rants have yielded short “local view” editorials for the local paper). But fleshing out a whole fictional world has always turned out to be too much work.
“Maladaptive” means it annoys other people. I can totally relate to this thread. Actually, “unproductive,” might be a better term. I always dreamed of being a writer, and sometimes my internal monologs do develop into publishable material - (mental rants have yielded short “local view” editorials for the local paper). But fleshing out a whole fictional world has always turned out to be too much work.
Unproductive is right. I have so many ideas and plots and amazing characters planned out in my head but materializing them in reality is too much work. I kinda just want the book to already be written with all of my thoughts and ideas without having to actually write it. 
I like to think i'm a competent human being who can look good and get good grades and not be a disappointment to his family.
Ohh so same. Plus I also have happy days, I can smile, and people love me. Technically, everything that j don't have in reality.
Same here. I think this is a habit of people who had very traumatic childhoods. Retreating into the fantasy realm of the imagination. Making your 'happy place' the only place you feel at home.   I also read a lot. Do you read a lot of books as well?
Used to not too long ago, but now I almost always have no energy and when I do I get way too distracted. 
I really like your metaphorical take on depression. I hope the computer somehow starts to override the virus.
The worst part is, it often feels like I don't even have 'admin permissions' to my metaphorical computer. Any advice I get on fixing the problem is useless. I keep getting permission errors every time I try to apply changes. I occasionally manage to get through and change some things. Even then, the freaking virus just undoes the changes after awhile. I'm tired of this bullshit...
The worst part is, it often feels like I don't even have 'admin permissions' to my metaphorical computer. Any advice I get on fixing the problem is useless. I keep getting permission errors every time I try to apply changes. I occasionally manage to get through and change some things. Even then, the freaking virus just undoes the changes after awhile. I'm tired of this bullshit...
[deleted]    ^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^0.3402   > [What is this?](https://pastebin.com/64GuVi2F/29902)
[deleted]    ^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^0.3402   > [What is this?](https://pastebin.com/64GuVi2F/29902)
 It's unfortunate your mom won't let you get antivirus software. I wonder if she may not have the understanding.exe program to fight this terrible virus. (no offense to her btw, some people just don't get it).  I hope that despite there not being strong enough programs, one will be created one day.
Do you find the brightness and colour settings get affected sometimes? When I turn my computer on in the morning it's often desaturated and on the lowest brightness and contrast, and it's really fiddly to fix.   I also find my computer gets stuck in loops a lot and just opens and closes the same programs over and over. And if there's a any small error in any program the whole computer crashes?  Wish I'd backed up my desktop when I was younger.
The worst thing about this virus is that it ignores *all* user commands. Want to increase brightness, close a bunch of useless tabs, or connect to the wifi to talk to others? NOPE. The computer always says it's too busy, yet somehow still manages to open up a bunch of self-loathing programs... 
The worst thing about this virus is that it ignores *all* user commands. Want to increase brightness, close a bunch of useless tabs, or connect to the wifi to talk to others? NOPE. The computer always says it's too busy, yet somehow still manages to open up a bunch of self-loathing programs... 
which then get stuck in if/else loops...
True, the computer was a gift from my parents, so I don't think they'd be too happy about me tossing it without telling them. Hell, even with telling them.  I thought about reformatting my system, but I've always worried that I'd lose all my files *and* the virus would still be there.
I've tried so many different anti-virus softwares but they all seem to just cleanse my computer of everything, even necessary files. They make it impossible to do anything other than use the most basic programs, so I had to delete them all and just let my computer run with depression.exe. I guess this is my life
Time to get a MacBook.
So essentially transcend the limits of humanity by becoming part cyborg?
I found antivirus for my virus but all it could do was quarantine the virus. The sad thing is the antivirus is just a trial version.
What you should do then is a clean install,  that could take months to years as the communication cables are all in an intertwined mess and you may need guidance from another to assist as to find the right cables by asking the right questions in reponse to the output and seeing what works and what doesn't. At the time being we are unable to replace said system as the source code was written in incompressible bio assembly language that is still beeing understood. 
Do you mind if I work on a poem with this metaphor as the premise? 
Go ahead, maybe share a link when you're done? :)
Go ahead, maybe share a link when you're done? :)
If I do do it, I'll share it with you! 
A lot of computers have a factory reset function that brings everything back to brand new. My Toshiba laptop has a clean version of Window built into the system that I can access by holding '0' on start-up. If you can do something similar, it would be worth it.  Of course, my little Acer laptop doesn't, so I lost my XP machine when I deleted some essential files by mistake.  One neat thing about doing this is that it resets my Norton AntiVirus trial.
You do know this is a beautiful, poetic take on depression itself, right? Unless you're talking about resurrection?
Cross-post this to /r/outside
More like /r/inside, amirite. 
All i want is actual friends, but being depressed makes that impossible, and then im more depressed being alone. Its a circle thats impossible to escape
If I walked up to you at the shop, or wherever you go, and strike conversation, deep meaningful conversation, what then?  Would you be intrigued? Would you want to chat more? Build a friendship?
If I walked up to you at the shop, or wherever you go, and strike conversation, deep meaningful conversation, what then?  Would you be intrigued? Would you want to chat more? Build a friendship?
It's hard to just strike up a deep meaningful conversation. You have no idea how much of a shoot the other person gives. In this cutthroat world, nobody really has the time beyond what's absolutely necessary to survive.
Person: Hey something seems wrong wanna talk about it?  Me: I actually have bipolar and depression. I feel really sad.  Person: OMG stop with the attention whoring. Nobody is going to like you like that.
I feel you dude. I low-key told my friend, that I have suicidal thoughts and he said and I quote 'Dude, stop with this shit, I'm fed up with you being dramatic.'. We rarely talk nowadays. 
I feel you dude. I low-key told my friend, that I have suicidal thoughts and he said and I quote 'Dude, stop with this shit, I'm fed up with you being dramatic.'. We rarely talk nowadays. 
They don't understand the importance that we would've given them to open up about something like this and be vulnerable and they come up with the worst response possible. You are better off being away from them. 
I know right? like honestly depression/anxiety are so bad I wish no one cared about me so that I could take the easy way out and just kill myself. life is so pointless the only thing keeping me here is how destroyed my parents would be if I commit suicide. 
Yeah. Knowing how my family and friends would react to that prevents me from doing anything. It's a pretty ridiculous thought given that I should live on my own means and aspirations, rather than relying on others
i used to feel the same way; till i realized i'm just an attention whore. i'm not saying you necesseraly are one, but make sure you are not ~forcing~ yourself to be depressed
I understand where you’re coming from, but no. I wouldn’t force this feeling at all, a feeling of loneliness and all encompassing meaningless. I don’t broadcast my depression or anxiety to anyone, I have in the past, but cannot be bothered to deal with all that comes with it. 
Oh i totally feel you. Why open up? People just think you are being over emotional or making life seem harder then it is. People struggle to understand this is MY problems and they are shooting real to me. I feel your pain and as much as i want to tell you to open up and let people in i found that it hasn't helped me. You just get judged but by all means im one case read the others comments for a broader spectrum of opnions
This can often be the case. And it is why professionals are needed. I've also been 'let down' when trying to talk to non-professionals. In the midst of our pain we unfortunately have to accept that not all people can understand and/or empathize with the kind of invisible curse that depression is.
Hey, do you want to be friends? Nothing to lose, after all (:  Anyway, I'm a single mom, in my 20s, I like video games and reading and writing. I promise I'll try not to be boring haha
I feel like this is what we need in this sub. A support group where we can just be real.
What kind of music do you like? You should try Joanna Newsom; her songs are long and easy to get lost in.
I didn't realise she was still making music.  I used to listen to her around 10 years ago. 
Gonna be 26 too soon, I am actually making a bit now, I used to be kind of homeless for a while, still depressed and lonely with no friends, but at least I can eat I guess. Happy birthday man, hope it gets better for you. 
Hopefully you can stop eating shit now.
It's gonna be a tough sell getting people who have no energy to regularly exercise when even mentally healthy people often motivate themselves to do it either. 
I don't even like exercise, and I've done some form of it for large parts of my life. It doesn't change my situation in the slightest. It doesn't make me feel any better about anything. These various things are like trying to glue back together a shattered egg.
Im 29 this year i live at home with my mum i have a job that barely pays above the minimum amount given to you from the government ive had 1 serious relationship in my life that ended with me getting cheated on. So yeah every second of every day thats pretty much my whole existence so far is feeling inadequate and irrelevant 
I understand this feeling. I'm in a similar boat, with me having a 3yo son and me being 27 being the big differences.
I understand this feeling. I'm in a similar boat, with me having a 3yo son and me being 27 being the big differences.
I wish i had a son, the thing i want most is to have a family some day but i think i need to come to terms with the fact that its not going to happen. And seeing that my younger and older brothers both have wives, families and really well paying jobs really doesn't help. Cherish your son man
Hey bud. I feel the same. People are all 'ohh no-one thinks that way about you' but I bet they definitely do. I feel like my co-workers are constantly judging me for how awkward and socially rubbish I am.  I have no friends. I'm a massive loser. I'll be your loser friend if you like. :)
Thanks dood keep on workig on urself
When I see other people in their thirties who can handle full time jobs, who graduated college long before I did (I was 29 and I only have an associates), who can drive, who have houses, who are just handling life well and don't have panic attacks in the grocery store...I think exactly that. 
For a moment, I thought It was me you were talking about. I feel the same way.
For a moment, I thought It was me you were talking about. I feel the same way.
I'm sorry. It's certainly not pleasant....
Every damn day.  I've thrown myself into lifelong debt for a college education I did not want and can get no benefit from in my area, I have nothing, nowhere to go except back to my parents place... I'm basically just worthless
hey brettf123. i am in a very similar shituation, i invested my inheritance in a belated school degree which i managed to shoot up pretty good. thank god i am not in lifelong debt, but having shooted up a school degree because you thought 'being sensible is the way' when you actually wanted to do something else....i know how that feels. i feel you, bro. 
That makes two of us. I can't even move out and get my own place because of it, and my current job doesn't pay enough, and I don't really have any other skills to get something better. 
same, EVERYONE suggests I 'just move' hard as shoot to do with no money, guess I'll find a magical 'free house'
Abso-shootin-lutely my dude. I was actually a really good student in high school and college, and I feel like I threw all that away and am now working a job that's kind of meaningless and not well-paying and I don't really see what else I can do!  Good luck getting through the semester, though!
Seems like a lot of people here have a similar tale. I am slipping towards the same fate and I don't really care enough to stop it... Although I still know that in 10 years I'll look back and curse myself.
It makes me a bit sad to read this. I would wish for a world, where you wouldn't be forced to do anything
Basic income or lottery both are ways to live both have a ridiculous chance of happening to me or us yay life.
It makes me a bit sad to read this. I would wish for a world, where you wouldn't be forced to do anything
you can go to that world, except you'll die quickly from starvation and thirst
you can go to that world, except you'll die quickly from starvation and thirst
I don't share your opinion
its the same reason why I deleted Facebook. everyone's doing shooting awesome and here's my piece of shit self with nothing new or good going for me.  its a form of torture all in itself
Haha lol I agree
Me whenever I go on social media. Me when I'm offline as well. Just me all the time actually 
thats why social media is so successful in dominating our lives. because we just cant stop to shooting look at other peoples 'better' lives - which might be totally faked.  back then it was the neighbours who got a new fence, which led to unhappiness.   we little stupid humans, we just wont learn, eh?
That's why I look at memes instead
Same :(
Honestly, one of the worst things you can do is compare yourself to others. Try to avoid doing that.
But then you become content and lose all motivation. Then you lose that 'armor' of self-criticism. 
No you're not alone I Wishe there was a place for people Like us 
It's called ''The Pub''.
It's called ''The Pub''.
Strange name for a cemetery. 
you put it into words so accurately. I hate being asked 'whats wrong?' and just being unable to answer, I want to have an answer but I don't, I can only phrase is casually as 'feeling down'  
I feel so dirty when I do that.  'I'm just tired'  'Just a rough day'  'I feel down'  I feel like I'm lying to whoever asks, and giving a false impression of myself. I feel like I'm so much more than what I'm able to show people.
I feel so dirty when I do that.  'I'm just tired'  'Just a rough day'  'I feel down'  I feel like I'm lying to whoever asks, and giving a false impression of myself. I feel like I'm so much more than what I'm able to show people.
constantly telling people that I'm 'tired'
constantly telling people that I'm 'tired'
Same. Either that or I tell them to 'not worry about it'.
'I'm fine. I promise.' 
This. Always this.
yes, even the term 'depressed' just doesn't seem to get across the intensity of it to people. its as if I had said 'I am sad', because the response is always 'why?'. and of course I don't have a reason. the low feelings just come in like the tide, and eventually fade a bit over time.  'I'm feeling really, really low' is best I can do, those who Im close to know what it means.
I've gotten to the point that I basically just say I'm having a bad day. Those who know about my depression know that I mean the depression is having a particularly powerful effect on me that day. 
I'm different, I just say 'I'm good' to avoid the topic completely. They wouldn't understand anyway.
That's definitely the reason I say those things. I don't want to deal with the questions and misconceptions, so I just gloss over it and move on. It still feels like I'm betraying myself when I do it though.
[This is also a great read](http://hyperboleandahalf.blogspot.com/2013/05/depression-part-two.html)
Seen that many I time, I love it so.
'Depression isn't an emotion. Depression is a contradiction to every worthy aspect of life'  WOW
I agree. I couldn't phrase it any better.
Great writing. I'll disagree that 'depression has no cause.' There are many possible causes that pharmacology and psychology are still trying to determine. 
I think he meant it in the 'it has no proximate cause' sense.  As in, you can't say 'if not for X, I wouldn't be depressed'.
I think he meant it in the 'it has no proximate cause' sense.  As in, you can't say 'if not for X, I wouldn't be depressed'.
This is totally what I meant.
The monoamine hypothesis, for one.  Although, you can't completely disregard societal causes of depression.
Societal causes very likely translate to biological effects/markers (that may one day be able to be used for diagnosis!).
Brilliant. But nobody can begin to understand, even those people who, like me, spent most of their lives there. Once it is gone it is inexplicable. I have a terribly depressed friend and I understand her problem intellectually but not emotionally, now that mine has mostly passed. It is an experiential state. We wonder why people do not understand. It is not their fault. To understand you have to BE there. Not even a memory of THERE will suffice.
Exactly. I am just now experiencing what you might call a bit of a 'relapse' after a couple very stable months - quite an accomplishment honestly - and it is amazing how lacking memory is in comparison to the 'real thing.'
Yes. I wish people would get this.  Depression is not an emotion itself, but it is *characterized* by intense feelings of sadness. Similarly, happiness is not a state of being. Happiness is a temporary emotion. Being a 'happy person' is really about having a state of contentment and harmony in your life. No one is actually happy all the time, unless they happen to be an animated Disney princess.
I couldn't disagree more with you.  Most people use 'happiness' to describe that consistent state of contentment.  I think 'depression' is very much like 'happiness' in the fact that they are pervasive states.  A happy person concentrating deeply on a task doesn't stop being a happy person; ditto for a depressed person.  And I can't speak for everyone, but I rarely experience any kind of intense feelings, sadness or otherwise.  Depression, for me, is deep, all-encompassing apathy.
I too believed in a consistent state of contentment. Losing that belief was the best thing to happen to me. Nobody is completely free of depression. Everyone has feelings of despair, anxiety and inadequacy in some degree. The depressed feel it more strongly over feelings of hope.  
You can have feelings of despair, anxiety, and inadequacy and still be a happy person.  It's no different from how I can have feelings of pleasure or interest or fun and still be suicidally depressed.
There's no such thing as a consistent state of contentment.  As soon as everything's OK, something isn't.
You can be content without everything being okay.
I wish I could give this to all the extremely well meaning people who tell me that I really need to just do more positive things and I will start feeling better.   Putting on a facade when I am depressed does not make the depression go away. I like the way you wrote this. 
You can! I give full permission to the free use of this writing with or without credit.
Just a few things I want to mention.   Technically depression is a state of low mood and a mood is an emotional state.   Anxiety and depression are often co-morbid conditions. Sometimes people think they have an anxiety disorder when it turns out they have anxiety because of their depression.   Depression most definitely has causes. It can't simply come from no where or be triggered nothing. There are biological, neurological, societal, developmental, environmental, etc. risk factors and causes.   
Also anxiety can lead to depression. 
>Depression has no cause  is this true ? 
I'm happily married, I have a job that I love and beyond the odd bit of money trouble I have nothing to worry about.  Despite these apparently perfect circumstances, I'm dosed up to the eyeballs on medication every day to keep my decade old depression under control, because without said medication I'm genuinely a danger to myself.  Depression, personally speaking, has no cause. It's just there to constantly shoot with me and do it's level best to ruin me one day at a time.
*Depression isn't an emotion. Depression has no cause. Too often is depression conflated with sadness or anxiety.*  I agree, but you catch a lot of flak saying that around here.
> o my boss over my depression a while ago, and though he is one of the most kind and understanding people I know, he won't mention it. He sometimes asks me how my anxiety is doing. >  >  >  > Depression, when it is present, is more like the force of gravity. It is there, pulling down on you under all   speaking as someone who fights depression and anxiety; you have a good way with words. well done. thank you.  
An unwillingness to exclude anyone, near as I can tell.
I should make it clear that I'm not saying that depression doesn't cause negative emotions. I'm just saying that depression itself is a much deeper and subtler thing than the emotions that can come out of it.
> would anyone be interested in a depression treatment/cure?
Yes, please. You offer a cure! How can anyone resist?
I find myself thinking of this often as well. Life is cruel and unrelentless it doesn't care what your wishes are unfortunately.
feel this hard 
Great thing, to never have existed. I'd erase every moment of every day. What a curse existing is.
I remember someone said 'It's such a cruel thing, to make a human being exist.' Forgot where I heard it but I couldn't ever forget it. 
I’ve thought of this “magic death button” many times.   If it’s any help to you, meds have truly changed my thoughts on hitting this button, and I’m attempting to aim for something higher. Might be worth a shot, as I was sure meds would do nothing and was against them. 
Hey mistakelord, what medication has helped you? My wife is going through bad depression and lexapro doesn’t seem to be working for her.
Hey mistakelord, what medication has helped you? My wife is going through bad depression and lexapro doesn’t seem to be working for her.
I’m on Effexor. Started at 37.5, and now on 150. Been on it for about 7 weeks, and only just felt something about a week back. 
I’m on Effexor. Started at 37.5, and now on 150. Been on it for about 7 weeks, and only just felt something about a week back. 
I'm on Effexor too. It helps with anxiety and depression, not 100% but a lot better. But I'm so empty inside. Noting is exciting, fun or interesting. It feels like I'm just waiting to die. ⏳
I remember, from quite a young age, ‘pressing’ an imaginary button like that in bed. I was a miserable boy.
:( I want to hug your younger self, and your current self too.
If it wasn't for my kids I would feel exactly the same way....I am struggling because I find myself emulating your thoughts but I don't want to ruin their lives....I'm trying to hold on. I feel like I am shrivelling up inside.... nothing is bright and beautiful anymore
Right there with you.  Are yours young? They do seem to get better as they age, but I'm pretty concerned about teenage years
Right there with you.  Are yours young? They do seem to get better as they age, but I'm pretty concerned about teenage years
Mine are heading into adolescence. Just had a couple of major bursts of testosterone anger today - feel like I've been steamrolled. Even though they can be challenging I still know that if I wasn't here it would devastate them. It's just really hard to hold on sometimes. How do you manage with yours?
Mine are heading into adolescence. Just had a couple of major bursts of testosterone anger today - feel like I've been steamrolled. Even though they can be challenging I still know that if I wasn't here it would devastate them. It's just really hard to hold on sometimes. How do you manage with yours?
Poorly, I retreat or push myself into things I don't want to do and try to ignore how I'm feeling - those are my coping mechanisms.  It means I often give minimal attention if I'm hoping for some time out (typically without actually communicating what's going on!)  I'm not very proud of it
Same. Suicide is always in the back of my mind.
Me too, but I feel like it’s more in the front of my mind and just doesn’t ever leave. My humor is even becoming more self deprecating and harder to mask.  
Me too, but I feel like it’s more in the front of my mind and just doesn’t ever leave. My humor is even becoming more self deprecating and harder to mask.  
\>make self-deprecating joke thinking it's normal  \>people look at me like the heck mate  Iktf.
\>make self-deprecating joke thinking it's normal  \>people look at me like the heck mate  Iktf.
honestly i think if it were like, more socially acceptable or whatever to make those kinds of jokes it’d help me cope better. i have to manually remind myself that i can only make morbid/self-deprecating jokes in certain company. 
yeah same, all parts of my life suffer and aren't priorities but suicide is always at the front, not an hour goes by where I don't think about it and not a single action/decision goes unaffected without considering depression. Exercise? Why i'm going to be dead. Financials? Who cares, just do my best to save for family once i'm gone. Education? No way i'm gonna finish it before I get depressed enough to die so why start. The spiral goes on and on.
It's similar for me except I don't have that inner dialogue. 
Same. I'm so 'on the edge' that I have a reference to suicide in every other sentence I say. I honestly need help, and I don't know where to start.
Do you have healthcare? If so, I'd strongly recommend finding a therapist and making an appointment immediately. A good one will hold a mirror up to you so you can identify and work on what can be improved. Don't let this stuff fester inside you. It's poison.
I've never had a day where I didn't think about it.
I have 2 min of clarity when I wake up and then my whole depression sinks into me and my mood sinks until I fall asleep again.
I have 2 min of clarity when I wake up and then my whole depression sinks into me and my mood sinks until I fall asleep again.
I'm only alright when I'm busy.
It's more like a balancing act for me, between how much I want it to end and how much I don't want to hurt my family. Let's see who wins in the end!
I relate to this.
Every single time I want to kill my self, my send guilts me into thinking of how my financially poor family would do without me, I’m thinking better cause at least with one child gone they’d be able to provide for the rest 
I've literally been ready to check out for so long but that one spark of imagining how my family would be makes me reconsider for another month each time.
I've literally been ready to check out for so long but that one spark of imagining how my family would be makes me reconsider for another month each time.
Same, I always imagine my dad blaming himself, taking his own life and the whole family gets sad and crumbles, I’m  Not all that, they can all perfectly function without me, but the guilt man
Same man, same. I don't even know what keeps me going. 
For me it's fear and guilt.
For me it's fear and guilt.
Exactly, fear of surviving or succeeding and seeing whats after. The guilt of hurting those that will be affected by it and leaving them.
Exactly, fear of surviving or succeeding and seeing whats after. The guilt of hurting those that will be affected by it and leaving them.
It can also be the fear that you might actually want to live that keeps one in such a state of ambivalence. 
It just seems inevitable. Like, even if I wasn't sick of life, the world seems to be sliding towards several huge problems which will drastically reduce the quality of life for most people, to the point that it'll probably be preferable to finish myself off. I'd rather not be involved in any wars over food, water, and oil, thanks.  And anyway, I don't remember anyone asking if I wanted to be alive. Why shouldn't a person be allowed to make that choice for themselves? 
IKR, since life is so shitty, we don’t even get to decide whether or not we want to be part of this hellhole
I’m sorry if I sound rude but who do you expect to ask you this question, and when..? when you’re born? when you’re 18? like.. technically speaking you have the choice, and you are allowed to do it, but you can’t stop the things that happen afterwards.
It's just a phrase. No, obviously nobody asks if you want to be born before you're born, but it's constantly assumed that you are glad you weren't given the choice, when in fact lots of people aren't. 
I feel that suicide is the inevitable end
I feel like it's something I got to do but I keep putting it off but one day I'm gonna have to because the deadline (pun may or may not be intended) is gonna come up and I'm just going to be too depressed not to.
I feel this is really common with people dealing with depression.. i feel exactly like this. And the thing is, you can look at my life from the outside and see how great it is. But for me it's just drifting. I realize how good i have things, but i feel so dead inside and the thought of suicide is always at the back of my head. I hate how i can't enjoy these wonderful things going on in my life. Dang depression!!!
Lol my life isn’t great from the outside or inside, I’m shooted
Lol my life isn’t great from the outside or inside, I’m shooted
Sorry to hear that. Wish i could give you my life, but without the depression. I wish my life wasn't so good, doesn't feel fair cos i can't enjoy it. 
Hang in there.
This makes me laugh sorry
How does one think positively, I don't even know where to start with this and it feels fake when I try
Bet ya reddit silver he/she’ll say something involving Jesus. Watch. 
I relate to this pretty hard. I wish I could be social when I want to be, instead of backing out of shit all the time because I'm not feeling it. 
I lost 98% of my friends because of this. I would flake a lot because of the way I was feeling. I didn't want to say the real reasons because I was just ashamed and felt like they wouldn't understand. It got to a point that I knew if I told them they wouldn't believe me because of how much of an idiot they just thought I had become, which made me not want to tell them, or hang out even more. Pretty depressing in and of itself. 
I lost 98% of my friends because of this. I would flake a lot because of the way I was feeling. I didn't want to say the real reasons because I was just ashamed and felt like they wouldn't understand. It got to a point that I knew if I told them they wouldn't believe me because of how much of an idiot they just thought I had become, which made me not want to tell them, or hang out even more. Pretty depressing in and of itself. 
I know this post is old.... But the same exact thing happened to me... It's been two years.. All I have left is my girlfriend... I used to chill every night of the week or at least game with my friends and chill in teamspeak.. It's been so long since I've done either. Even if I could I don't know how to chill anymore..
This is exactly my experience. I *want to* want to do things and see people, but I just don't. And then I feel guilty for not wanting to.
Argh, yes. I've had a few times in the last several months where friends have surprised me with a social 'intervention' and showed up at my house and we've gone out and done things, and it's left me just completely overwhelmed. I hate feeling so guilty about wanting to not spend time around people, because when I'm alone there are times where I just wish I could want to spend time around people. 
Argh, yes. I've had a few times in the last several months where friends have surprised me with a social 'intervention' and showed up at my house and we've gone out and done things, and it's left me just completely overwhelmed. I hate feeling so guilty about wanting to not spend time around people, because when I'm alone there are times where I just wish I could want to spend time around people. 
The really good friends will understand and not hold this against you.  Going out and doing things is great but it isn't necessarily essential to survival.  
Am I the only one who is sometimes thinking 'I'm better than everybody else' and then the next day ' Everybody else is better than me ?' 
Extreme oscillations between pride/arrogance and then shame are a problem with me, though lately it is just shame. Depression takes us all down a few notches eventually, which may not be a bad thing overall. I don't know if the extreme oscillation thing is particular to depression though. I think it's more something on the spectrum of narcissistic injury, but IDK. 
This is so true, and it hurts to read. When I was going through really rough depression, I pushed everyone away. When I saw them hanging out, it destroyed me. Being social is just so hard when it feels like nobody wants you around.
> Being social is just so hard when it feels like nobody wants you around.  Lol, couldn't have worded it better myself.
If someone is making you feel that way then they arn't worth being around.  Seek people who understand and are willing to let you be who you are withiut making you feel broken.  Someone in a wheel chair shows up at the party and what kind of person wouod want him/her to be uncomfortable.
I agree, partly. Sometimes it's not their fault, it's just easy to feel guilty for simply existing when you're depressed or anxious enough. I have fantastic friends who've always tried their best to include me but I'm still not always confident they want me around.
I agree, partly. Sometimes it's not their fault, it's just easy to feel guilty for simply existing when you're depressed or anxious enough. I have fantastic friends who've always tried their best to include me but I'm still not always confident they want me around.
I really relate to this.   In the back of my head I'm always wondering what I possibly offer,  or why they would want me around.  
Just like that movie 'Yes Man,' just say 'yes' to your friends. Nothing good can come out of 'no.'  
Oversimplifying isn´t the answer.
Yep, that's how my whole day is spent these days. I used to play video games but I just can't anymore.
i know what you mean, i try to play and just feel bored with it
i know what you mean, i try to play and just feel bored with it
Yep. Which is depressing in its own form because being bored and uninterested in gaming should really mean that you're ready to move on to different things and have time to truly heal but instead you just... Don't. :/ Some do though. 
I have zelda breathe of the wild and I can't seem to get into it. Sucks. I love the zelda universe and have always been able to get lost in the games. These days it feels more like a job. Video games are also something me and my partner bond over so not being motivated to play is kinda creating a distance between us. Which makes me super sad. 
me and my boyfriend used to play games together (its how we met) and now... he always plays with his other friends and not me. so im forced to play alone bc i have no friends. and today he asked if i wanted to play. and i was excited and sais yes! but his friends said they didnt wanna play w me so he left me by myself again. now im crying with my hello kittys cause i feel lonely :'( 
me and my boyfriend used to play games together (its how we met) and now... he always plays with his other friends and not me. so im forced to play alone bc i have no friends. and today he asked if i wanted to play. and i was excited and sais yes! but his friends said they didnt wanna play w me so he left me by myself again. now im crying with my hello kittys cause i feel lonely :'( 
> but his friends said they didnt wanna play w me so he left me by myself again.  You should talk about this with him. This is definetly not okay.
Does laying in bed count as a hobby?
Pfft, I'd call that an endurance sport. Although at this point I would call life an endurance sport as well.
Pfft, I'd call that an endurance sport. Although at this point I would call life an endurance sport as well.
'call life an endurance sport'   I'm going to steal and use that
Is mayonnaise an instrument?
For the last time Patrick, NO! Neither is horse radish.
All i do is play on my phone and think about nothing now. There is so much shit i would like to do and try but i have no energy for it
May I ask which games would you recommend to download?
May I ask which games would you recommend to download?
I play Summoners War, it's extremely addictive though
Props for having a psych though! I've been trying to build up the steam to actually go out and get one but it's so much easier to just zone out in my room..
Please visit one. Speaking from experience, it helped me enjoy the little things again.
My brain is nothing but a rotting heap of flesh. Barely functioning. I remember when this was new. I could swear I actually felt the brain cells die day by day. I couldn't even pick up a hobbie much less be productive. 
I remember when I started to lose interest in things that I would love to do. I would question my sanity when I didn't feel like doing anything over Videogames, drawing, or reading.
Recently I realized I'm way too addicted. I think Ima delete the YT and Reddit app. Consider doing that maybe? You can always re DL in a month or two. Sometimes you just gotta severe yourself 
I doubt that's the issue. I used to be a heavy gamer. It ate up all my time. Then I stopped only to replace it with TV and internet. I even deactivated my Facebook a while ago thinking it was the issue. But I started spending time on here more instead. It's most likely a matter of changing my habits. But that's not an easy task
Haha good one. What would you say if you played video games, browsed reddit, watched funny youtube videos and memes?
Metaphorical knuckle crackkkk...   I'm an epicurean of digital media platforms, I participate in global discussions about current politics, trends and sociological topics on a worldwide internet platform, uh.... I like watching creative amateur comedy, and I like cats.   I recently spruced up my resume.
can you build a server for the shoot of it? Then disassemble it and build a different type? That would be cool
I could flip this one and start again, or play some steam games. I'm probably going for the 2nd option.
I never figured out my hobbies or goals im 31. I just don't know what to do. I would tho.
It's never too late to experiment with hobbies 
Grandiosity (feelings of superiority) and inferiority (feelings of worthlessness) are two sides of the same coin. Feelings of worthlessness give rise to a falsely inflated sense of self-worth. It's good that you're aware of it. A lot of people struggle with this, including myself. I think it's pretty much the result of insecurity rooted in low self-esteem leading to perfectionist tendencies.
Nicely put. I never understood the perfectionist side of things. 
Hug, you're not alone !
Thanks, i want a hug so bad
thank you everybody. I appreciate your comments. ❤️
Please don't kill yourself. I'm so sorry. This is so hard and horrible and I believe everything you say is real for you, and have felt depression so so hard before (separate reasons). Please keep going and also reach out to more people for help, or find things to do. I didnt when I was depressed, and maybe you won't be able to, but those things help me. ✌️
It fails the Holocaust test. If you couldn’t say it to a Holocaust survivor, then it’s not helpful.
It's really up to you if you believe in it, i'm not starting a fight or anything about what happened. It's your belief that really matter if quote's help you, then so be it.  It just my opinion. And im sorry if i offended anyone about my comment. I dont want a fight
What a shit thing to say to someone who just lost the love of their life. 
What did he say?
What did he say?
'At least you have a girlfriend.' 
Same here. But it is mostly that I don't care about studying anymore. I want to learn but I just can't. I am dumb.
You're not dumb. It's just delusions that depression causes you to have.
You're not dumb. It's just delusions that depression causes you to have.
That's quite dumb. Of course intelligence is not a measure of potential, but of intellectual performance. It is not easily accomplished to function highly when there is no seeming purpose to it - thus dumbness results from depression. Furthermore depression rarely causes delusions, in fact most depressions stem from insight and understanding of one's own hopelessness. 
That's quite dumb. Of course intelligence is not a measure of potential, but of intellectual performance. It is not easily accomplished to function highly when there is no seeming purpose to it - thus dumbness results from depression. Furthermore depression rarely causes delusions, in fact most depressions stem from insight and understanding of one's own hopelessness. 
Not really, he hasn't really gotten less intelligent, he's just been depressed and therefore has had less energy and motivation. 
Relevant article: https://www.psychologytoday.com/blog/everybody-is-stupid-except-you/201407/how-major-depression-impaired-my-cognitive-ability  Definitely true for me...I used to have much more mental dexterity, but after a few years of chronic depression my mind feels dull and I struggle with complex ideas that I used to feel very at ease with.  Makes me wonder though, if a way to combat depression might be to try to boost your cognitive function -- like with mentally challenging puzzle games, physical activity, maybe even nootropics. How much of the hopelessness of depression comes from struggling intellectually and feeling dumber and slower?
Have you ever tried [Lumosity](http://www.lumosity.com/)? - It's been helping me clear out the 'brain fog' in the morning.   From what I've researched it is possible to relieve symptoms through cognitive training. CBT is a form of cognitive training that has the ability to change brain chemistry. It just takes a loooooong time. 
Have you ever tried [Lumosity](http://www.lumosity.com/)? - It's been helping me clear out the 'brain fog' in the morning.   From what I've researched it is possible to relieve symptoms through cognitive training. CBT is a form of cognitive training that has the ability to change brain chemistry. It just takes a loooooong time. 
Isnt there studies saying brain training apps are just a hoax?
Isnt there studies saying brain training apps are just a hoax?
Lumosity just paid a settlement in a lawsuit because their games apparently don't do any of that stuff (which they claimed they did do). 
Do you have more information about CBT taking longer? Both my doctor and counselor said that CBT is a quicker approach to combat depression (as opposed to whichever therapy is used to talk about the past to resolve the issue).
It took me about 6 months of CBT to turn my life completely around. I was also taking meds and exercising a lot. I spent 2-3 hours a day, at least 5 days a week, doing CBT homework.   Was totally worth it, but after I stopped doing it the positive effects went away. I tried to take it back up again, but I've never been able to summon that same effort. And doing 'what I can' didn't do anything. Somehow it lost it's magic for me. 
Commenting for a reminder 
Commenting to remind you.   Would appreciate if someone did the same for me. 
Definitely :( I keep forgetting things, I'm not creative anymore, can't concentrate, and my attention span is that of a toddlers. It makes me think there's something medically wrong with my brain. Like I need an mri or something
I can barely sit through a 20 minute TV show. It's like I have to multitask or my brain wanders. I hate it.   And I can barely remember things. I have a hard time hearing/processing things.   And I'm dumb. I'm slow. I don't know how I'm going to manage school.
Absolutely. It's difficult for me to grasp almost anything that requires undivided attention. Even when I try to read an article or a book, nothing sticks and I have to reread the same paragraph over and over again. I feel like an empty vessel most of the time because my memory is horrible. Just remember, no matter what, you are only capable of doing what YOU can do. Try your best not to compare yourself to others. You have value the way you are.
This made me cry because I just realized I'm not alone. I'm a zookeeper and I am so scatter brained I'm about to quit. I forget locks and I don't understand how my brain can just freaking leave the situation at hand and go rambling away. Thanks for your comment.
Can someone relate to this? I lost my sense of personality, my memory is non existent, my mind is blank and I have no thoughts https://www.reddit.com/r/depression/comments/4g54cu/can_someone_relate_to_this_i_lost_my_sense_of/
Yep, that's me as well. I have no memory of the person I was just a couple years ago. Life doesn't feel 'real' anymore, and I think it's permanent.
i hate that i can't concentrate anymore. my legs are constantly shaking and i need to be doing something that stimulates both my mind and hands to be able to take in information. i play 2048 on my phone a lot while sitting in my classes, but i only get yelled at by my instructors. 
That sounds a lot like ADHD. Depression is almost always a part of untreated ADHD, too. Maybe you should look into it - lots of people on /r/ADHD say their depression improved greatly or even went away when they were treated for ADHD.
How did you get it back? What dedicated effort?
I used the app Forest and spent thirty minutes every night forcing myself to read. Eventually I got used to staying focused and now I can sit down and read mostly whenever. 
I used the app Forest and spent thirty minutes every night forcing myself to read. Eventually I got used to staying focused and now I can sit down and read mostly whenever. 
I tried reading too, but I still feel the same? It happened to me all of a sudden I used to be an avid reader before all of this and now I can't read for long.
Yup. I was already a dumb  idiot when I was in school and now I'm 19 and I'm worse at basic tasks than kids are.
Yeah, I'm almost 19 too and I used to love reading like Stephen King and shit when I was 10 and now I can barely read books meant for 4th graders. It's too much effort and I can't understand anything. The only things I can enjoy are thin paperbacks with huge letters, makes me feel so so stupid
You may want to look into getting some high/low books. Lots of people struggle reading lower level books because the content is so dull (frog and toad anyone?) 
Frog and toad is gold.  That one where they struggle with their cookie addiction was life-changing.
Holy shit, this is EXACTLY how I feel. I used to be a gifted student and for my age was pretty talented and now I feel like I've gotten so stupid. I can barely read, I can't make good points in conversations cause they all just peter out after I realise I don't make any sense. I can only think very 'shallowly' if that makes sense and  feel really troubled about it. I don't think I'll ever get back my sharpness and it depresses the shoot out of me
Same here. I can't make good points in conversations. Thanks, I couldn't even put this idea into words on this post.
Wow. Yes. I'm very worried about this. It seems to be getting worse by the day too. There was a recently published study which indicated that anticholinergic me duplications can cause changes to cognitive functioning. The list of medicines associated with this finding include some antidepressant. Aside from this study, I just feel like I am nowhere near as sharp as I used to be. EDIT: Tere is a typo. 'Me duplications' should read 'drugs.' 
Could you link the study or article please
I don't think depression lowers people's intelligence over time, I think it makes it harder to focus that intelligence on tasks they used to be able to easily focus it on.
It's really sad and I wish it were not so. But depression does lower your intelligence.  There loads of studies showing that people suffering from depression have changed brain structure, altered white matter in the prefrontal cortex or even white matter deficits. When therapy and/or medication work well and the person feels better and better, those brain structures return slowly to normal or very close.  
It's temporary, if you get your depression under control, your cognitive capabilities will return.
Thanks, it should be higher. That's the information I was looking for.   Reading all those relatable comments is quite worrying, it's good to know it can go back to normal. 
Naaah, we just feel like we are. Purely out of indifference. In other words, we only feel that way because we don't care. If the topic was something that you were truly interested in, you would shine. I believe in you. Stay strong.
Yes, this.
The title of the book could be, 'If At First You Don't Succeed, Try And Die Again!'
Subtitled 'You only live twice' 
Can't you tell them to go shoot themselves? Im sure there is some legal case you can make against them for hospitalizing you against your own will.
Right???? If the guy tried to kill himself he sure as hell wouldn't want to go to a shooting hospital! Go to court? Unless there's some sort of law against killing yourself, not sure how it works in the USA.
Right???? If the guy tried to kill himself he sure as hell wouldn't want to go to a shooting hospital! Go to court? Unless there's some sort of law against killing yourself, not sure how it works in the USA.
there is. it's illegal, and the police will put you in a hospital against your will, and if you don't convince the hospital you are no longer an immediate threat to yourself or others within 72 hours, they can keep you there as long as they want and keep charging you for a service you never wanted and won't agree to.
there is. it's illegal, and the police will put you in a hospital against your will, and if you don't convince the hospital you are no longer an immediate threat to yourself or others within 72 hours, they can keep you there as long as they want and keep charging you for a service you never wanted and won't agree to.
Gotta love this society.
Just another reason why capitalism is shooted up. I'm so sorry to hear this.
That's not capitalism, that's shitty healtcare. Wouldn't have this problem in Europe
That's not capitalism, that's shitty healtcare. Wouldn't have this problem in Europe
The reason this problem doesn't exist in Europe is precisely because healthcare is, by and large, socialized. America has a shitty healthcare system because it is subject to a Capitalist market (i.e., the insurance industry).
I'm not sure what your options are in regards to the hospital bills. Do you live in the US? Have you talked to your therapist about the bills at all? Wondering if they have experience with this kind of thing.  Can your family help with the bills at all?
I have an appointment with my therapist in two days, will definitely bring it up. Although he already knows that finances are a major stressor for me.  My parents don't financially support me, as I'm an adult with a job and income, and I already owe them money I borrowed when I was unemployed.  Thanks for the suggestions though.
I never once paid a penny on my 66,000$ hospital bill. I have nothing so they couldn't take anything, and they never tried. 8 years of dodging daily collections calls and I finally settled for $400. You could try what I did and every time you get a bill just put your hands over your eyes and shove it into a drawer never to be thought of again....
Yeah but your credit will be destroyed :/ Not like it matters I guess. Just another way to kick you while you're down
You must not be American.
Thank god healthcare is free for me :/
If you want an actual answer to your question, whoever kept you alive did it in the hope that whatever you feel now will pass someday, and hopes your life will be enjoyable. Who knows, still could happen. They weren't the ones in charge of billing you though.  U.S. I assume? Healthcare sucks
Danging hope, freaking pandora box my ass, hope is the ultimate disaster that was released from the shooting box. Argh.
Danging hope, freaking pandora box my ass, hope is the ultimate disaster that was released from the shooting box. Argh.
I played God of War III as well.
Your country is a complete shit hole.
We're already aware of that, thank you.
It's shooting pathetic. I was told I had to pay $900 in an ambulance bill a year after it happened. Worse is that at the time I was 17 (a minor). 
I was billed $6000 for a day and a half i. the psych ward
Just wanted to say I've been in this situation, and it truly sucks. That the medical system's response to a suffering person, who already feels life isn't worth living, is to follow up with hundreds of misc. bills and collections calls, that can go on for months or years. Sigh, the irony.
For better or worse, it's situations like these that stop me from seeking treatment. I'm just thankful that I don't have it nearly as bad as some people.
U.S I assume? Surely makes me glad we got basically free healthcare in our country but I am really sorry for you.
*'but when I go to the ER in those communist countries, for my constipation, i have to wwwaaaiiittttt to see a doctor'*
*'but when I go to the ER in those communist countries, for my constipation, i have to wwwaaaiiittttt to see a doctor'*
*'I don't want my taxes to go up to help people who want free stuff'*
*'I don't want my taxes to go up to help people who want free stuff'*
'There's no such thing as a free lunch!'  'Jesus cured the lepers and fed an entire city for fr-'  'How DARE you misrepresent the bible and blaspheme the good Lord's name!! Remember, I love you.'
Were you admitted against your will? I did the same thing a little over a year ago and I didn't have to pay since I was brought there in the back of a cop car. It might be worth looking into, I don't know what your state laws are, but it is better than paying any more money. 
No, I signed the paperwork. I don't remember it at all, since I was groggy from overdosing, but they had my signature. My Dad drove me to the ER, so I'm assuming he told me to sign.
No, I signed the paperwork. I don't remember it at all, since I was groggy from overdosing, but they had my signature. My Dad drove me to the ER, so I'm assuming he told me to sign.
If you don't remember signing the paperwork that could be enough to void it. Sadly the legal costs of proving that point may be worse than just paying off your debt but its worth looking into. 
Literally that. I wouldn't pay a shooting cent if I were you. 
Then they're going to sue him.  Then they're going to take everything he owns.  Then he's going to be homeless.  Then he can attempt suicide again (plz don't OP...)  If they save him again, he can look forward to another few decades of ever-more crippling debt to pay off.  The house always wins in capitalism.
I think you should head over to r/personalfinance or something similar in order to hear what you should do about the bills and/or bills that may be charging you for some service you didn't receive. 
This. The people at PF are so helpful and kind, there's a lot of resources in the sidebar and I've never not gotten an answer when I posted a question.
This. The people at PF are so helpful and kind, there's a lot of resources in the sidebar and I've never not gotten an answer when I posted a question.
Except for the ones who suggest a person should commit suicide because of their disastrous financial situation (I've seen that before).
Except for the ones who suggest a person should commit suicide because of their disastrous financial situation (I've seen that before).
Full circle
I was gonna say the same thing! But can you even sue, is that even a legitimate case?
Well, that's basically what that dude sued Mr. Incredible for.
As tragic as a situation like this is, it's just the way capitalism works since hospitals aren't charity organizations. The suicide attempt wasn't your fault, you were sick. If someone gets any type of illness and has to go to the hospital, it's not their fault, but they're still billed. 
And that is one of the many reasons why capitalism is inherently flawed
And that is one of the many reasons why capitalism is inherently flawed
And why treating healthcare like a business is inherently flawed.
And why treating healthcare like a business is inherently flawed.
Everything is a business in capitalism
I don't know much about how the healthcare system in the US works, but can't you just refuse to pay?
because then the bills go to collections agencies that harass you legally, and then sue you. if you're sued, it's technically possible for them, through the government and law enforcement, to seize everything you have in almost any account, all the real property you own, and part of the money you will make on any future check received from a legitimate employer.
Yes, I don't even enjoy it anymore. I used to play video games a lot, but it's just too much effort now. I regulary watched Youtube, but not anymore. Mostly Reddit and discord and lying in bed doing nothing.
Are you... Watching me? You're describing my life. Except for the daily, long interval where I'm at work.
Are you... Watching me? You're describing my life. Except for the daily, long interval where I'm at work.
Literally me right now.
Literally me right now.
Literally me right now. Got off work early to lay in bed and reddit. 
Im mixing it up with some anime here and there, but yeah basically my life
Sounds basically like me too man. It's like work 4 days a week 12 hour days. Come home, eat, sleep. Watch tv on the days off, do house cleaning, youtube, reddit. I play games every now an again but like as described I feel like it's just too much effort. I get that feeling like 'What's the point? What am I really doing with my life?' Kinda felt like that since after I graduated college last year. Life is just boring and doesn't feel like it has a purpose. 
Sounds basically like me too man. It's like work 4 days a week 12 hour days. Come home, eat, sleep. Watch tv on the days off, do house cleaning, youtube, reddit. I play games every now an again but like as described I feel like it's just too much effort. I get that feeling like 'What's the point? What am I really doing with my life?' Kinda felt like that since after I graduated college last year. Life is just boring and doesn't feel like it has a purpose. 
Life feels really boring. I won't really have much time to sit on my ass the coming weeks since I work at a beach restaurant and summer is hitting so they are going to need me. But I can't wait what comes after the summer..
Yup. Only I also watch TV shows and then daydream about having a life like that for hours sometimes 
Wow. This is my life literally. And when I daydream about that I actually am a bit 'happy' for a bit, that's until I go back to reality of course.
Wow. This is my life literally. And when I daydream about that I actually am a bit 'happy' for a bit, that's until I go back to reality of course.
Same. I am always happier imaging, basically living a second life in my head than actually living the one I have. 
Same. I am always happier imaging, basically living a second life in my head than actually living the one I have. 
'it is a happiness to wonder, it is a happiness to dream' -  Edgar Allan Poe
Yep. That's me. I have no goal in life currently. Unfortunately, I'm no longer at an age that supports this, and I need to concern myself with things like bills, housing, employment, career and all that nonsense. 
I relate a lot to 'have no goal in life currently', thanks for posting that. Being at age 25, I don't know what an appropriate 'age that supports this' is. In my YouTube/reddit-induced daydreaming, I like to think that a few of the things listed like 'employment, career, and all that nonsense' would naturally generate life goals, or at least a more positive mood. How does 'that nonsense' make you feel most of the time?
Yep, deleted Facebook/instagram etc to try to stop it but here I am fully immersed in shit robot gifs and political discussions
That's at least better then some artificial profiles that suggest everybody's got a perfect life but you.
me, I play League all day. I'm honestly amazed how it's still enjoyable after five years.
You're probably pretty damn good. xD
You're probably pretty damn good. xD
I've gotten much better but problem is, everyone else has gotten better as well.
Yep. I make beats on FL studios and pretend that I made it big and that I'm friends with some of the famous people I see the shows and videos I watch so I can feel good for a couple minutes.
Pursue that. Stuff like that actually needs a lot of time until it's enjoyable. I tried FL Studio myself but got frustrated really quickly. I know you probably see things differently but try to appreciate that you have something.
I beat off like 5 times a day
Rip yourn idiot
If you want to change start small. Find one productive thing you want to add to your life and focus on just doing that every day for a little while. It could just be to exercise or meet one new person each day. That is of course if that's something you want, I was in your spot a few years ago and yeah it shooting blows.
This is a good idea. I think going for hikes in the woods daily a few years ago was very beneficial to my progress. I got outside, got some exercise, and cleared my mind. 
I wouldnt consider videogame you play with people you like and have fun a waste. The only point in life is to have fun so everythibg that s fun is not a waste
I would consider playing videogames for 12 hours a day a waste regardless of who you play it with. It's unhealthy and doesn't yield many positive results.
it’s even worse when i remember when i used to feel happy and i don’t know how to get back there.  *edit: the upvotes mean more than you’d think.
I remember when I felt a chime of happiness, went on for a while and through many reasons eventually went off.  I missed the comfort in being sad during that time. I'm still not sure I was really ever happy.
I remember when I felt a chime of happiness, went on for a while and through many reasons eventually went off.  I missed the comfort in being sad during that time. I'm still not sure I was really ever happy.
no life is happy, people are good, existence is fun. one of the few things that keep me going is the memory of how good i felt when things were going well. i know it can get better, i just don’t know how to get there right now. one of the few reasons i’m keeping on.
The last time I remember feeling happy was when I'd go over to my friend's house in 6th grade and play old school halo on his OG xbox one. I didn't care about school, my future, my job, what I wanted to be. All I knew is that I was having fun. That's what I miss. Not worrying.
halo is the best. installed it on my pc recently and it’s still as fun as ever. reminds me of the good times.   you can play it even on a cheap computer. pm me if you want, i’ll give you the details.
>I had depressions ass kicked for a long time and then I fell out of my cycle of being healthy, became seriously depressed  This is where I'm at currently. I know I need to do it but the idea of getting back into the swing of things seems like a super daunting task. 
that is a good point. i’m not lazy, i just *reeeaallyyy* don’t want to go to the gym. also, sleeping feels ama^z^i^n^g
while those two things are beneficial, i think they are only an aid to medication. antidepressants change the way the brain handles chemicals, while the temporary boost in dopamine and serotonin is only temporary. medication, exercise and eating healthy all at the same time is where the most improvements are made.
Not according to the government and a ton of medical studies that show most people just lack exercise to counter depression.  I can't recall, but it's a large fraction of diagnosis can be completely 'medicated' with a minimum of 30 minutes of exercise daily.  Of course eating healthy and feeding your brain too.
agreed  life/happiness isnt easy, sometimes i think maybe i just was never up for the task
Oh this hits close to home. It's like, how does everyone else do it? Am I dumb? What part am I missing to be a functional human being?
Oh this hits close to home. It's like, how does everyone else do it? Am I dumb? What part am I missing to be a functional human being?
Whenever i reach a really low point in my depression i notice that i compare myself to others a lot. this is very generic advice that you have probably heard before but try to not compare yourself to other people. remember that people hide their shortcomings from others and that what you are seeing in others is often the BEST version of themselves being projected.
Whenever i reach a really low point in my depression i notice that i compare myself to others a lot. this is very generic advice that you have probably heard before but try to not compare yourself to other people. remember that people hide their shortcomings from others and that what you are seeing in others is often the BEST version of themselves being projected.
it may be generic, but not redundant. i do the same and it’s comforting to know that i’m not the only one. comparing to others makes me feel like they have it a lot better than me, and if i disappeared no one would care.
Yep im getting sick of it. My death will be by my hands some day I know that much.
Same. Very much the same.
God that must be a scary feeling.
Its tragic, but also very comforting knowing that I can leave if I so choose before things get unbearable.
It doesn't need to be. I've definitely been there. Life is more than what it seems right now.
Thank you for your kind words.
What did we do to deserve this?
Some people just get the bad luck of the draw when it comes to mental health. But the best thing you can do is not victimise yourself, because victims are helpless and you aren’t helpless. You have the strength to carry on and make changes. Just keep pushing forward. 
Living is work, absolutely.  It can be tough finding the thing you want to live for, but when you do, living can be rewarding.  We just need to keep looking 🤝.
I wish this were true. I'm 26 and work in my dream job (I make comfortable money and live on my own gigging and teaching as a guitarist) and I have never felt worse in my life. Work is fun and a distraction but at the end of the day I feel really really bad. This isn't normally the case but the past 2 weeks or so I have been in a very dark place and I feel like I cannot handle life right now.
I wish this were true. I'm 26 and work in my dream job (I make comfortable money and live on my own gigging and teaching as a guitarist) and I have never felt worse in my life. Work is fun and a distraction but at the end of the day I feel really really bad. This isn't normally the case but the past 2 weeks or so I have been in a very dark place and I feel like I cannot handle life right now.
29 here. Same except I hate my job. Dread it every day, but I have no idea what else I would do. I don't have any passions or interests. My evenings usually consist of drinking and binge watching a sitcom until I go to bed.
29 here. Same except I hate my job. Dread it every day, but I have no idea what else I would do. I don't have any passions or interests. My evenings usually consist of drinking and binge watching a sitcom until I go to bed.
Well, if you ever need a buddy to talk to shoot me a PM, we can be sad together lol
I wish this were true. I'm 26 and work in my dream job (I make comfortable money and live on my own gigging and teaching as a guitarist) and I have never felt worse in my life. Work is fun and a distraction but at the end of the day I feel really really bad. This isn't normally the case but the past 2 weeks or so I have been in a very dark place and I feel like I cannot handle life right now.
Stop destroying my hopes
Stop destroying my hopes
If it helps make you feel better, work is really enjoyable and boosts my mood. A fun job or accomplishments don't cure depression though. The show Bojack Horseman actually expresses this really well and it's sort of how I'm feeling now.
I suppose that is one way to look at it.  A lot of people have the problem of not having a want in the first place.  I would say that want and desire are some of the main reasons for living in the first place whether the want is for experiences of love etc.  At that point life is it's own reward.
That makes life sound worse. Everything is just a want, sometimes a want to get into things that cause more wants, like a love relationship. How is that a reward? Where's the reward from it?
I'm convinced I've figured this all out. Life isn't about ourselves, it's all about serving others. Those who can find a way to make service their life are incredibly happy I've found. Find a way to help in anyway, it'll take the focus off of your problems and yourself. 
I feel like karma plays a part in this. You’ll get what you give. If you do your best to help everyone then you’ll feel good. You will absorb the happiness around you. But you have to remember to not take score. Don’t expect anything in return, don’t go into helping someone assuming they will appreciate it. Just help people and genuinely feel happy for them, but most of all take yourself out of the picture. Selflessness is the key to life.
👌 you looked
Ok you made me giggle  
Yes. Trying to explain to people that they dont need to worry about my suicidal ideation because its just part of who i am is all kinda of confusing for them
Omg yes.....I think about it all the time. It's just normal for me....I'm don't plan on acting on it, but 99% of my thoughts are 'how would I do it right now?'
Your dad is an ass, but you're still a kid and you can get through it. Go to your school counselor if you have one, or a trusted teacher. Get some help that has to keep it confidential.   
Thank you. But you are overestimating my courage and my teachers ability to fell empathy. I know they are human, but I've pissed most of them off because idfc..
Thank you. But you are overestimating my courage and my teachers ability to fell empathy. I know they are human, but I've pissed most of them off because idfc..
Nobody gets through this on their own, we've all been too proud or scared to reach out. It's incredibly embarrassing being open with someone. Maybe a teacher isn't an option, but maybe one day you'll find someone you're willing to talk to. You don't have to rush yourself, or think that there's some sort of deadline. It's not your fault that you feel like this, and I'm really sorry about what happened to your mother, but it is in your hands to keep on living. 
In my case I started around the same age as you, I'm 23 and I still can't handle it.
Well, you're alive right now, so I'd say you're doing the best you can.
It's just as normal as getting up to go to class.   The worse part comes when I go to class, I joke with classmates, participate, and I manage to forget depression. I come home, and I realize that, well, that was temporary, and now I'm back to feeling bad.    I don't even want to feel depressed, but depression is like my default state. 
Once a week I have two classes back to back and there's a group of about 5 people including myself who share the same two classes. Joking around with them and feeling included for ten shooting minutes is the highlight of some of my weeks.
Absolutely. Sometimes I completely forget how shocking it is that I've been severely depressed for such a long time, I just start talking about it casually as if it's normal. In fact, feeling like this has sort of become my 'normal', even if it necessarily isn't normal for other people. What's your experience?
I was reminded of this the other day at work when I mentioned that I took things one day at a time and my coworker said that wasn't normal..
I was reminded of this the other day at work when I mentioned that I took things one day at a time and my coworker said that wasn't normal..
Your coworker sounds like a jerk 
Just called my boyfriend because I actually felt up for it vs obligated to. He was annoyed because it was 2200 and he was asleep.
i.e. I wanted to share with him how I was and it's literally been years.
What does it feel like to not be depressed?
Try imagining your favorite thing times 100 and doing it without a care in the world. Kinda like that.
I'm 18 turning 19 soon and I've been depressed from 11 without knowing or caring and even now on tablet's nothing getting better and apparently I'm at a really bad level but for me its normal.
I get that, I recently turned 19 and that day is when I realized how bad I was getting because I spent most of it sitting at my kitchen table staring at a bottle of pills. It was after an hour or two I realized how shooted up I was and that it wasn't normal. Brutal birthday, but hey at least I'm legal now haha
Sometimes I think that my friends only tolerate me because I have something to give them, weather that be drives or buying things, doing favours, that if I didn't do any of those things they wouldn't want to talk to me as much. I know its wrong and it would hurt my friends feelings if they found out I feel this way, but nevertheless I feel like I'm no ones first pick
Yes! I’m the one with the car, I’m the one who makes food, and I “care enough” to buy gifts. 
I have 3 friends that I talk to regularly but I sometimes feel like they only tolerate me and stick around because we've known each other for so long.  There's people I talk to at school but I often worry that they don't actually like me and that I just annoy them.
I wonder how common this feeling feeling is....
This hits me on a personal level. It’s like i’m not “friends” with my “friends”. And i hate them all. It’s not like i want to feel this way at all.
Yeah, I know what do you mean, I experienced this type of 'friendship' and I hate that so much, because everyone included your 'friends' ignore you or treat you like s**t. I'm so sorry for you. The only way I solved that type of situation is hanging out with new people, but that's really hard, just hope you don't need to restart... Anyway, why you hate them? PS sorry for my bad English
I'm kind of relieved to know I'm not the only one who thinks about this. 
me too.
All the time. A comfortable bed, a clean environment, some nice drugs, people caring for you, I'd love it. I wouldn't necessarily want to be bedridden, but a long term hospital stay would be really nice for me right now.
I feel exactly the same way, pretty much nothing to worry about, get to sit around all day without it being frowned upon and get people's sympathy for it.
I can relate to this. I'm dealing with an eating disorder triggered by depression and I feel like I want to be in an inpatient unit but I don't qualify because I'm only slightly underweight and 'high functioning'. And I can't really starve myself to the point where I need emergency treatment because I do love food, just depression making my appetite non existent and killing motivation to make a full recovery :/
I hear you, PTSD after rape by a roommate and depression and anxiety from before hand. Dealing with all of this has me struggling with eating as well, or as I call it in jest inadvertent borderline anorexia.  If you ever would like some to talk to message me, I'd be happy to help how ever I can. 
I kind of just want to see the doctor and have them tell me it's OK to call out of work for like a week because I'm so depressed right now. I know it won't make it better but I just don't want to deal with it right now. I just want to sleep and do nothing.
Have you seen a doctor about it though recently? 
Have you seen a doctor about it though recently? 
No, I have an appointment with my primary care for follow up on other stuff next week. My next appointment with my psychiatrist isn't until May. I don't know if it's worth going in earlier. I just saw him like a week or so before it happened.
I checked into a mental hospital for the first time a few weeks ago. From what I understand, the quality of your care varies a lot from place to place. My hospital was pretty good. They don't just let you stay in bed all day though. They have a daily schedule of activities and group therapy. It's kind of nice just being told what to do and not having to worry about anything. Let me know if you have any questions about it. 
did you find that it helped a lot?  after coming out were you able to better cope with your depression?
Felt like this since I was twelve. 
Wellp, time for me to go break your legs! Ha.. Ha.. 
I really want to kill myself, just to see who would be in my funeral...
I really hope theres some kinda afterlife just so I can watch my funeral and see all my friends again.
Sometimes I fantasize about having physical wounds that bleed so I could have the sympathy and the understanding without the need to explain and defend myself while still having the same pains.  I also fantasize about being in closed ward and being restrained against a bed so I could just put my whole strength against it and let it all out. 
I was a cutter.  People hate cutters. Even nurses and orderlies in hospitals. You don't get much sympathy from them.  And restraint is nice to struggle against, but it's also terrifying to be restrained belly-up in a bed by strangers. It just feels too vulnerable.
As someone with ME/CFS, it's not awesome to be bedridden for more than half of your day, trust me
Oh yea I totally believe you. I wouldn't want to be there for long, just enough to take a 'timeout' from life as a commenter posted
Can't you take a break then? It sounds like you need to. 
As a working adult who lives paycheck to paycheck, sometimes a break just doesn't come.
I have fantasized about getting shot because I took a bullet for someone and lying in the hospital while everyone thought I was a hero lmao. Then I realized that's pretty damn stupid.
Eh, sounds like a pretty common fantasy judging by the comments 
Yes, my fantasy was falling down the stairs and breaking a leg.
Mine was jumping out a window. I realized I might die, but even if I didn't, I'd probably get to enjoy a nice ride to the hospital, and that might be like a mini vacation.  Then I remembered I'm broke, and so ended my fantasy.
Yes! Just having the people you love around while you just get to lie around and have food brought to you and gifts
Hahahah sounds like a dogs life! 
I was in the hospital for 2 weeks. Only my parents visited me. My siblings never showed up and now they wonder why I didn't visit them when they were sick. Insert shrugging smiley here.
¯\_(ツ)_/¯  Did you not visit them while they were sick out of spite? 
¯\_(ツ)_/¯  Did you not visit them while they were sick out of spite? 
Not really. Their past behaviour inidcated they didn't want to see me, so I obliged.
i think i might have some problems if this is something i wouldn't mind happening..
There's a difference between fantasizing about being taken care of for a little while and intentionally harming yourself for whatever reason.  Remember A Christmas Story where Ralphie imagines he has gone blind?  As children we get angry or frustrated and think, 'If I was sick and dying they would care!'  Or we see others getting positive attention due to an injury or illness and we get a little envious as we privately crave attention for ourselves.    Nothing wrong with that.  
I hate asking people for anything it just makes me feel stupid and childish. 
Very true, yet I'm eager to help people with their problems when I know I can help them
Very true, yet I'm eager to help people with their problems when I know I can help them
Same here... I try to help people I feel close to, I try to be there when they need me... yet I try never to ask them for any favour, or I feel like asking too much when asking them to listen to me. I feel a bit like a burden or like they are just 'forced' to pay attention to me because of what I have done for them in the past.
Same here... I try to help people I feel close to, I try to be there when they need me... yet I try never to ask them for any favour, or I feel like asking too much when asking them to listen to me. I feel a bit like a burden or like they are just 'forced' to pay attention to me because of what I have done for them in the past.
And then it just builds and builds inside you until you break 😪
Yes, all the time. It’s why I don’t confide in a lot of people. I feel like I shouldn’t tell them because I don’t want them to be depressed too.
I feel like or know for sure that they won't care. 
I feel like or know for sure that they won't care. 
Last time I opened up to someone they just said 'Everyone has problems' to shrug me off. I'll stick to writing in my journal. 
Yeah, I end up dumping all my negativity to my best friend that at this point she's all fed up with me now.   Couldn't stop talking about death. Running away. Couldn't change.   I feel so bad, and yet I wonder why she keeps coming back. 
I have a friend like that. I tell her when I am sad and when I can’t sleep and when I’m crying. It’s amazing to have someone you can trust like that. But I also get scared...what if she gets sick of me?
I have a friend like that. I tell her when I am sad and when I can’t sleep and when I’m crying. It’s amazing to have someone you can trust like that. But I also get scared...what if she gets sick of me?
I lost all my friends in high school that way. That's how I learned that you just don't talk about it with friends. Therapist/support group, but better to not even mention the word depression to friends or you become radioactive.
Thank you for the perspective, definitely helps me to understand how they're feeling. My friend shooting told me my ex as of one week would be thinking I did it to get his attention. That majorly shooted me off. Maybe she has a point because he is a selfish idiot who would love to believe everything is about him. I can't stand people right now.
People are difficult!  Good luck.
I'm sorry. I hope your organs are okay. I don't know what you're going through, but I know it's tough. If you want to talk, pm me.
Thank you very much. I'm very concerned about my liver because I've been heavily drinking for a while as well. I'll update once I get the tests done.
Thank you very much. I'm very concerned about my liver because I've been heavily drinking for a while as well. I'll update once I get the tests done.
I see. Drink shit ton of water to keep yourself hydrated. Hope all goes well. *hugs*
I did the same thing. Woke up tied to a hospital bed. Even pissed on myself b\c i couldnt move. Humiliating. I understand what you are going thru.
That's shooting horrendous. I'm so thankful I wasn't tied down, I'd flip the shoot out. Every time I go out for a cigarette people stare at me like I'm a shooting criminal because I'm always with two officers.
That's shooting horrendous. I'm so thankful I wasn't tied down, I'd flip the shoot out. Every time I go out for a cigarette people stare at me like I'm a shooting criminal because I'm always with two officers.
One time i told my counselor i was suicidal at the end of it all i ended up in jail. 
One time i told my counselor i was suicidal at the end of it all i ended up in jail. 
That is shooting cruel wtf. Don't they have strict confidentiality laws where you are?
So wait do the officers like chill with you literally all the time?  Lmao, that sounds so shooting bizarre.
Yeah haha. Had some good banter with some of them as well.
After my attempt at ODing, I remember how mad my mother was. I kind of saw it as somewhat of a mixed blessing.  On one hand, it shooting sucked because I was dealing with so much self hate anyway.  On the other hand though, she was mad because she cared and didn't want to lose me.   I'm glad you made it, and I really hope for the best for you. 
Yeah I guess they do care but you'd think they would consider being a bit nicer to the person who nearly died. 
Dang people who are so entitled they wanna sign in laws to treat the suicidal like monsters, and friends who think we're being selfish for wanting to take our own lives. Lives we never asked for. We were brought into this world by force, and they wanna keep us here.
Completely agreed. People say suicide is selfish but I think forcing people to continue miserable lives is even worse. 
Thanks for saying this! We are wage slaves, the government loses from our suicide 
Join me comrade, in the revolution.
We’re the middle children of history, man. No purpose or place. We have no Great War. No Great Depression. Our Great War’s a spiritual war… our Great Depression is our lives.
I mean, we can't say for sure that we won't live through something crazy. I'd never wish anyone harm or for a war to happen, but damn sometimes I wish something interesting would happen, to take my mind off of things.
I mean, we can't say for sure that we won't live through something crazy. I'd never wish anyone harm or for a war to happen, but damn sometimes I wish something interesting would happen, to take my mind off of things.
I don't know if you're in the US but all that's happening has just depressed me. Success feels more like luck these days, less like hard work really pays off.
Well I am also going through some worse shit of my life. And daily crave for someone to talk to, who would know this better and understands this. My gf, friends, family think I am just being lazy and moody. I don't know if I should laugh at them or cry for myself. :-(
I'm so shooting sorry to hear that. It's so unfair that those closest to you don't understand and I know how much worse that makes things. You're not alone. 
I'm so shooting sorry to hear that. It's so unfair that those closest to you don't understand and I know how much worse that makes things. You're not alone. 
They are ignorant. They don't know what depression is. 99.99% people in my country don't understand what is depression.I tried to explain my close friends but they think its frustration and laziness. I told one of my best friend 2 weeks ago 'I am depressed' He asked 'Depressed with what?' I said ' It's Nothing, leave it'. Yesterday he asked me 'Are you still feeling frustrated these days?' Me : depressed*
wait your in a jail or hospital? Here in Canada, you try something like that your going to lockdown and getting fed pills and food every 3 hours. *AHEM* How are you online RN?!?
Hospital waiting for a space on a psych ward. They can't arrest you for trying to commit suicide but if you do the police basically detain you and are fully responsible for you even if you're being actually treated by nurses. My 11th and 12th police officers of the last 24 hours just arrived. They're being replaced every few hours or so.
I've been hospitalized for a suicide attempt a few years ago. I think I posted about it on r/offmychest if you wanna check it out. Sorry you're going through this. 🖤
Just read your post. That is so horrific, I am so sorry you went through something like that so young. Reading your age broke my heart, you're so young. Hope you're doing better now <3
Just read your post. That is so horrific, I am so sorry you went through something like that so young. Reading your age broke my heart, you're so young. Hope you're doing better now <3
Thank you 🖤
Family and friends only care about the guilt that they are left with, and the government only cares that they lose a tax-paying entity.   People only care about themselves in this shooting world. The fact that you can't just opt out whenever you can't handle it anymore is shooting criminal all on its own.     I hope that you can find peace soon, with whatever it is you ultimately choose.
Thank you so much. I am so disillusioned with this shooting world. I genuinely don't understand people who think life is good, I'm happy for them, but I don't understand it. 
Glad to see that you're still around, even if you aren't. 
Thank you  <3
I'm so sorry that people are being so shitty. I've had to deal with that, too... it sucks when all you need is for someone to tell you that they care, and instead you find out that they're angry or distancing themselves.   Here if you want to talk. I've been hospitalized for suicidal ideation before so I sort of understand.
Ugh I'm so sorry you've been through a similar thing. I'm devestated by everyone's reaction. 
My buddy, I'll call him Z, took ALL his pain pills and washed them down with Bleach. He was in a coma for 2 months. I can only imagine how much pain he was in until he passed out from the pills. He's doing better now that he's had help and was able to address the shitty situation he was going through. Maybe use this as an opportunity to try to resolve some of the issues in your life? You're one lucky duck to survive. 
I don't feel very lucky right now. I just wish I was dead so much so this hell would stop. Hopefully I'll be glad it happened in the future tho.
I don't feel very lucky right now. I just wish I was dead so much so this hell would stop. Hopefully I'll be glad it happened in the future tho.
I feel you. I've had bouts of depression where people would just tell me to 'be happy' or 'be thankful for this or that.' Doesn't really help much. 
I feel you. I've had bouts of depression where people would just tell me to 'be happy' or 'be thankful for this or that.' Doesn't really help much. 
The only person who did visit me, my friend, was pretty much like this. I wish people would do some research about depression before they try to be helpful. I know they don't mean any harm but things like that make me feel like it's my fault I'm like this. 
How old are you? I hope you are doing better
I'm 18 :')
I hope everything goes well with you OP ❤️ its been really shitty for me lately as well.
Hope things get better for you as well <3
How are you doing now?
A little better, waiting for a place on the psych ward though. I'm pretty nervous about that. Thank you for asking 
I saw that they do that here but I didn't really believe it. Wtf Britain.  I really do hope you're okay. I know I'm just another stranger on the internet but you can always reach out to me if you need to. Christ knows I should do it more often.
I could understand if I was underage but why the shoot can't a grown person refuse medical treatment? It's such bullshit. Probably gonna end up being sectioned tomorrow but if I'm not I'm gonna be homeless so either way it's gonna suck ass.
I didnt know you can use the internet when youre being watched
Yeah they give out free wifi if you use your NHS number as the password. Doubt I'll get that freedom once I'm transferred to a psych ward in the morning.
That's all we are to them, shooting criminals. If I was in your position, I expect I'd be wishing some pretty grim things on those people. Lucky they seem nice, I guess. Not all of them are.
Haha I know right? Last night the combination of shit loads of pills and vodka made me seriously angry towards the police. Started singing NWA at them. They were not impressed but I'm lowkey proud of that. 
Suicide doesn't just result in you not existing, but results in others negative emotions. Don't be mad that others were worried and mad at you. Things don't revolve around an individual. Almost every action causes some sort of ripple effect to someone else. 
I do understand that but to not even ask if I'm okay? If they were angry yet still reaching out to me I might understand but to not even contact me? There's no excuse.
Honestly they are probably pissed. Everyone reacts to tragedy in different ways, and they probably aren't sure how to deal with it. They'll come around. I'm sure they care.
I do get that but to me that doesn't justify them not even saying one word to me. Dang em 
What rock band are you the lead singer for?
What does that even mean??
What does that even mean??
Referring to the recent suicide of the lead singer for Linkin Park. 
Referring to the recent suicide of the lead singer for Linkin Park. 
Oh shit yeah. R.I.P Chester :( completely forgot for a minute there as I've been so caught up in my own bullshit.
Dude I really wasn't. This is the last shooting thing I need. I didn't expect to get through the night and I especially didn't expect to be snaked by my own friends.
To add to this I understand why my friend did it but I can't help but feel slightly betrayed. Especially since its been 24 hours and he hasn't spoke to me since.
If I wasn't unmotivated, I would be:  -in shape  -attractive  -had a bachelor's degree(one that i don't even want anymore)  -a car  -friends  -a job  -a general liking for people   but no
This hits a little to close to home lol
Believing that one day you WILL be someone has often been the light in the never-ending dark tunnel for me.
Yeah something to hold onto
Wow all these comments. It really is shooting hopeless, isn't it? 
That's why I hate coming to this sub.... it's even more depressing... yet it draws me back
I'm glad you did. I'm a cat lover too. They R awesome.  And I know what you mean. I feel like I reach out to others for help but all that I do when doing so is bring them down.
> I feel like I reach out to others for help but all that I do when doing so is bring them down.  That or they reject you and ignore you
I used to. Other times I believe the personal war I've undergone will leave me stronger and more in a position to 'be someone' than I ever could've without the struggle.   When you actually feel the depression or anxiety lift, it'll be like running after shedding leg weights.
This is true. I'm told by loved ones all the time 'You could *BE* somewhere if you just *did* something..' I would feel able to agree with them if not for this weight.
Yeah. I would probably be way better at music if I didn't get random depression spells that stopped my motivation for practicing tuba. People think 'oh just take that depression and turn it into music!' Just like they say about my art but it feels so forced when I do that I don't think they know how this works.
Sure as hell they don't, people are different. I used to channel my feels through drawing and intruments (guitar and violin) which made me comfortable, but oh boy antidepresants helped me alot. Anyway, you may be a different person which is unbelievably normal. People can give advices but shouldn't force you into something. Whatever makes you comfortable
Nope, that's exactly why I haven't told anyone or gone to the doctor. I really don't want to know whether I am actually depressed or the most lazy pathetic human being on the planet. Either way, I lose and don't feel better about it. No talents, no motivation, I don't believe I am smart and I am probably the laziest person I've ever seen/met. I may or may not have depression but I don't think it changes anything for me.
This is going to sound so meta, but that feeling that it might not be the depression at all and that you actually are a worthless, lazy, pathetic human being IS THE DEPRESSION TALKING. Seriously, go see a doctor.  Besides, I think it might be a better deal to be a lazy, pathetic person who doesn't ALSO have to deal with depression than the situation as it is right now. 
lucky him. My (now ex) girlfriend instead, always told me she loved me and wanted to help me, but after one year she simply abandoned me, causing me an even worse depression which sent me near death. I'm still surviving though.
keep on keepin' on my friend!! Surviving is exhausting some days, but survive we will!
Same shit different year
Exactly how I feel.
Spent it with family, still empty inside.
I did the same. Had to get a few ciders down me to agree to join them.
To an even darker 2018 🍷
Cheers..?!
Don’t think those are very good words of encouragement 
Misery loves company 
Misery loves company 
shit im living comfortably.
Spent it with lots of people, but doesn't feel any better. 🍷
Same, I actually wanted to go home the moment I left
Same, I actually wanted to go home the moment I left
I'm not the only one... (I did end up running to the bathroom multiple times due to spontaneous sobbing)
Spent last night alone, spent today alone, and got completely dropped by the only person who was supposed to actually care about me just a few hours ago. I'm really hoping it can only go up from here, but who knows.
It’ll go up. It’ll also go down again. Up maybe for a bit, then a big drop, until expectations clear out and emotional winds will be out of the anxious to anxious-depressed until a warm front moves in from someone else….     Hang in there. No feeling is permanent. It helps me to try to remember that things just happen, they’re not happening “to me.”
You know what's great about hitting rock bottom? There's only one way left to go, and that's up!
the funny thing is though when you say you've finally hit rock bottom and it can only go up from there that dumb rock just disappears from under your feet and you fall even further down the pit and the next thing you know it's 2019 and you're still depressed   all the love though xx 
At midnight my mates were all kissing partners or strangers in a nightclub, I started the year with a finger-gun in my mouth. Suppose it could have been worse.
Same, minus the finger gun. Dead inside already. No need. 
after years and years of doing the same, this year i spent new years with the woman of my dreams who feels and comprehends everything i feel.  things get better for everyone.  all of you keep your head up this year, this can be the year you force yourself to turn around
Reading that made me feel a glimmer of hope.
Wish I was you.  The very first hour of 2018 my girl cheated on me.  When I hear people say their year started off terrible I just glare at them.
Recycle her back to 2017
Depression can time travel.  
The 1930s is here, har har
I've told myself if I cant sort this out by 2019, there's only one way to go...  But I'm gonna try my best to fight it
I did the same. Here's to us, friend 🍷 hope we make out of it somehow.
Spent it with my gf. Wish I spent it alone instead.. 🍷
I was with all my closest friends. I'm sick of acting alright 
Then don't. Try to trust your friends and confide in them. Tell them how you feel. Maybe not everyone at the same time, but just pick one or two people to share your feelings with. It helps, trust me.
Not to try to be funny but I just imagined telling my group of friends '**HEY EVERYONE, I'M FRIGGING DEPRESSED**' and they'd be all like 'whaaaaattt' with an awkward silence. Chuckled a bit.
Body: 'I'm hungry...'  Brain: 'You don't deserve to eat!'
Body: 'Time to wake up.'  Brain: 'Nah.'   
Funny thing is I have just ended up isolating myself and depression has creeped up in my life in such a hideous way. But if I try to go back and change things I simply can't. I can't basically recreate the same situations or friendships that I used to enjoy.  So basically it's like a dark tunnel, once you enter it, you jsut can't turn around, undo this choice and go back. The only way is to make it out from the other end.
Well my friend I hope that you find an end to that tunnel eventually.   Depression is a real pain. It wants you to be alone because that's when it thrives. 
It's a cycle, too. Punishing yourself for doing that thing, but you did that thing because you felt bad, but you felt bad because you didn't like yourself, and you didn't like yourself because you felt you were deserving to be punished... something like that.  Sometimes it's even like you subconsciously try to self-sabotage things you really want to do, things you really like. Or even do risky things that could seriously negatively mess with the status-quo and make things unsafe. 
I often won't do something because of my depression or anxiety then I just feel like and feel weak for not doing it
Especially when it sneaks up out of nowhere and hits you like a tank. I wanted to go to the movies with my brothers, but my brain was like nah stay home where it's safe and you can sleep...
It's like fighting a tank with a rock xD
...  A very mutual codependent abusive relationship. 
It seems neither one of us can live without the other.
It seems neither one of us can live without the other.
Neither can live while the other survives...
I *loathe* video games. I like your reasoning.
You *loathe* video games? Why?
I feel like the more I fight my depression or try to get help, the more it takes over my mind and entire body.
The more I think about doing something right, the more tense and tired I get.
The more I think about doing something right, the more tense and tired I get.
YES. My body gets very sleepy when I am faced with difficult situations, or going on a first date. It's hard to function and think clearly, and hard to recognize that you're not really tired - you're nervous. (or something)
Yes that's been my experience exactly. I've been trying lately to look at it that way - Would I be ok if I saw someone treating someone else the way I treat myself inside my own head? The answer is no, it would be abuse. Sometimes it helps. 
That is actually a good way of thinking about it. Like how would you treat a friend who was suffering from depression? With compassion and empathy? How do we treat ourselves? Like shit. It's just so difficult to practice what you preach when it comes to depression.
I think that the only difference, for me, is that I've never apologized to my brain when it goes after me. I only excessively apologize to everyone else in the real world.
Oh wow. Thinking about apologies to my brain is kinda cathartic... I feel a small weight being lifted.
Hahaha. Religion perpetuated my depression. Thanks for the warning.  
Same here. It's hard to be gay and Catholic.
Same here. It's hard to be gay and Catholic.
Its hard to be attracted to women and be Muslim
Might be of some minor help to check out /r/OpenChristian. I really don't want to preach, but might be useful. Might.
This is the proper way to discuss religion in this manner. Post on the thread in question with a recommendation, maybe even cite why, and leave it be.
on the levels of credibility of theories and hypotheses, Psychology in general is only slightly above religion IMO.
I guess your opinion is below their credibility as well.
Same here. Having overly religious lunatic parents sucks.
That feel, I know it
If I get a PM from someone claiming that religion will cure my depression - I'll laugh my way out of depression.
I'll PM you just so you can get out of your depression.
If I get a PM from someone claiming that religion will cure my depression - I'll laugh my way out of depression.
Same here. PM me, oh prophetic one.
Same here. PM me, oh prophetic one.
If you put your forehead against your monitor, I'll smack mine and yell JESUS.  That should work.
If you put your forehead against your monitor, I'll smack mine and yell JESUS.  That should work.
It's a MIRACLE!!!!
If I recall correctly, Jews in Jesus' day were legally barred from contact with Samaritans. The point of the Good Samaritan story was that righteous Jews left the victim in the ditch, but the despised Samaritan didn't.  If you recast the story to modern America, it would be a Christian mugged and left in the ditch, with a priest then a minister walking past and ignoring him, then the Christian is rescued by a gay person, who also covers the Christian's medical bills.
Let's make is a transgendered muslim while we're at it, but yeah.  
My friend who is in hospital for mental health issues at the moment is having this bullshit pushed on her by Christian staff at the hospital.  We've all told her to complain or get a family member to.  It's not doing much for her mental health, especially as she is of a different faith anyway.
I saw my GP about two years ago when I was really struggling. He wrote me a prescription and recommended I come to his church.  Long story short, got a new doctor.
I saw my GP about two years ago when I was really struggling. He wrote me a prescription and recommended I come to his church.  Long story short, got a new doctor.
Good, hope the new doc is better.  I knew a nurse who would try to deter women who came to her with unwanted pregnancies from having an abortion.  Shocking breach of professional ethics.
Edited the post with some clarification on this point.
Cheers.
Thanks for this. It does feel like they've been preying on the people in this subreddit.
Praying on the people  Ftfy
It sure is weird when my dad preaches the love of God. The 5 min later tells me if I don't go to church he's going to beat my ass like a N***er.
I am reminded of the quote that was attributed to Mahatma Gandhi during his first visit to the West.  'I like your Christ, but I do not like your Christians.  They are so unlike your Christ.'
I am reminded of the quote that was attributed to Mahatma Gandhi during his first visit to the West.  'I like your Christ, but I do not like your Christians.  They are so unlike your Christ.'
Exactly. My parents are borderline WestBoro Baptist. The things they say are just as insane as what The WestBoro Baptist church says.  
I get this all the time in real life,quite aggressively,wish I could hit block and report on them.
Like every morning when I am finally able to fall asleep and the doorbell rings. Omg, No, go away. I don't even speak to them anymore. Just slam the door in their face. I'm talking several times a week. Recruit somewhere else please. 
Like every morning when I am finally able to fall asleep and the doorbell rings. Omg, No, go away. I don't even speak to them anymore. Just slam the door in their face. I'm talking several times a week. Recruit somewhere else please. 
I suppose you've already tried getting one of those signs saying 'no admittance except on party business'?
Just some clarification please, I'm not saying that there may be a chance that my God *might* save you. I'm saying that my Gods (notice it's plural so I have more than one power acting on your behalf) **will** save you depending on how much you can paypal to his Lordship and Ladyship
You'd need to paypal me at least a million zorkmids for my definitive answer. 
HAHAHA!!! I had a doctor tell me that once. 
My current Dr. always tells me that I need to have kids. Haha, I've been hospitalized twice in the last 4 months. I really don't think that it would be wise to throw some babies on ride.
Confirmed.  Religion does not cure depression.
Religion, as a whole, doesn't really cause depression either.  It's going to depend on what religion and it's teachings, how people teach you the religion, the members of the religion being idiots, etc.  It's way more complicated than this thread is making it out to be.
Religion, as a whole, doesn't really cause depression either.  It's going to depend on what religion and it's teachings, how people teach you the religion, the members of the religion being idiots, etc.  It's way more complicated than this thread is making it out to be.
> Religion, as a whole, doesn't really cause depression either.  Know how I know you're straight?
I hope for comedy's sake someone screen capped a PM.
/r/creepypms can probably help you out there
seriously tho, there's been so much fuss about this lately, but maybe it's not even really a thing? Who here has gotten one?
The moderators have received multiple reports with proof that someone has been doing this *extremely frequently* during the past few days.  
I wish I could be deluded into believing a religion.
I don't.  Why would you want to be gullible?
I don't.  Why would you want to be gullible?
I firmly believe that ignorance is bliss.
I firmly believe that ignorance is bliss.
Fair enough, I'll let you be fed to the munchers first when the combine come
This is a idiot way to do it, but religion is the only leg ive got to stand up on now. So there's that I suppose.
I'm a religious person myself.  We're not anti-religion at all, just anti-idiotry.  
Aint we all man, aint we all.
Well, all except the idiots ;->  
I don't understand the problem. Is that religious proselytizing?
Yes, in a way that's both aggressive and abusive. 
Yes, in a way that's both aggressive and abusive. 
Hmm... yeah that's not funny. Ban the creep.
Hmm... yeah that's not funny. Ban the creep.
Unfortunately, subreddit bans have no effect on the ability to PM.  That is why we are encouraging people to report the PMs, because those reports go to the reddit admin team, who have much more ability to restrict this type of activity.  
Just playing devils advocate here, but it probably won't cure it, but it could actually help.  http://www.ncbi.nlm.nih.gov/pubmed/10480747 
As I've stated elsewhere, we acknowledge the value of healthy spirituality/religion in mental health and we have no problem with it being discussed in an open, non-coercive, non-abusive way.  But our 'ambush-evangelist' is both coercive and abusive - our concern is to warn people about those aspects of this person's behaviour. 
Doesn't work for me, but believe it or not my wife gets depressed unless she goes to church regularly.
Oh, I do believe it.  We're not anti-religion at all.  But 'ambush-evangelism' is not something that Jesus Christ would approve of, no matter how you read the scriptures.  Unless of course you just make shit up and attribute it to God ;->  
No way. You can't pray it away.
...  Uh...  So you don't try to pray it away and you don't use medicine?    
No my upbringing had nothing to do with it. Although that probably didn't help, however I have devoted my life to helping people so it's all good, why? Because it makes me happy.
If you're a good person because it makes you happy, then why would you need religion?
I never said I would go serial killer, but my illegal actions would have been much more severe. and no I knew how to be a good person just chose not to.   That was quite a leap there, sir 
No it wasn't a leap.  That person took your argument to its natural conclusion.  You choose not to hurt others out of fear, I choose not because I don't want to hurt people no matter what those up in the sky say.
I hear that all to often on here, oh you do this ? You should see a dr. You hunt? What the shoot is wrong with you?  Bunch of Pansy's I am who I am, I accept it, and if I ever found my self planing or acting out on crazy stuffs I would seek help, but I see myself as harmless. 
See, folks?  You need religion in your life, so you can be a good, moral, well-balanced individual like robomonkey here.
Haven't cut in 10 days. Small accomplishment but it's something I guess. Struggling not to though. Feeling lost. I guess that feeling never really goes away. Hopefully I can keep it up.  Edit: it's been a month and I have no intention of giving up now. Thanks for all the support guys.  Edit 2:  2 months and going strong  Edit 3: 3 months
Small accomplishment?! That's a huge accomplishment!! 👏👏👏 I am so proud of you!
Nobody likes people who complain. Nobody likes people who have problems or issues.  That's why I tried to hide my problems to avoid attacks. Wasn't good either.
Oof. That hit close to home.
Oof. That hit close to home.
And you grow up in an environment where males are supposed to be strong and never complain and solve their own problems and where asking for help makes you appear weak. And weak males are worthless and nobody likes those.   And that's one of the reasons why the first time you met a therapist was when you were 25 and you've been ill since you are 11.
Get a job. Why? To make money. Why? To, uh...pay for bills? But my bills are just rent and car payments, which I pay...so I can live close to work and drive to work. So I make money...so I can spend it so I can make money. And I'm supposed to do this for like 60 more years? I hate everything
This is how most people's lives Are, do schooling for 15 years just to work as a government slave, unless ur a rich shoot
I just got a job after being unemployed for six months. Only seasonal, at a Halloween store. I love halloween though so I'm hoping I'll enjoy it. Sometimes even accomplishments like this don't make me feel happy, but I'm keeping an open mind. I love you all even if I know none of you
I love Halloween too.  Best of luck.
Not eating means getting headaches.  Eatings means becoming tired again.  Headaches? Or feeling tired?
I would go for feeling tired. 
I will adopt a kitten this Tuesday.   I hope it will help me !
The cuteness alone could help! 
I watered the plants today.  Look, a life form is thankful that I exist.
Jesus
Met up with my mate and told him I've been feeling worthless. He suggested we check in on each other to keep ourselves in line and working toward some goal. I can't seem to get myself out of bed. Seeing a therapist for the first time next Wednesday though. 
Good luck with your therapist! Getting there is half the battle. 
Lack of all motivation. I quit my job because it was too much stress then got more stressed out because now I don't have a job and feel like a failure. 
I can 100% relate to this feeling. In the exact same job situation right now and I left and now my depression is worse BC I feel like I have no purpose.
I can 100% relate to this feeling. In the exact same job situation right now and I left and now my depression is worse BC I feel like I have no purpose.
It's so tough! I see everyone around me thriving and I feel like I can never get ahead. I hope we can work through this, I want to have a purpose. 
It's so tough! I see everyone around me thriving and I feel like I can never get ahead. I hope we can work through this, I want to have a purpose. 
Are you in therapy at all? I just actually started with a new therapist today and I feel like I finally found the one who can actually help me! Therapy isn't the end-all, be-all by any chance but it's a good place for some :)
My dog got bit by a bigger dog today. In the neck. Brought my dog to the vet,got him cleaned and was given antibiotics. Brought my dog home. He seems fine and Happy except for the gaping puncture wound that keeps bleeding and should be left to bleed, the vet said. Inside I'm crumbling. There's nothing else in life that's good except my dog and I couldnt even protect him. I'm a mess I'm sorry.
:/  I'm sorry. I can't even imagine how heartbroken I'd feel if my little yorkie had an injury like that. I hope he'll be ok.
Man I can't wait to be dead. I hate the act of existing so much. Another boring weekend filled with boring work and sitting around. Still haven't managed to plan out any dinners. Don't have any goals in life or career options.  Need something more that doesn't exist for me.
Sometimes I hope that I'll die early, so I'll be remembered fondly but never have to deal with retirement savings, my debt, or dementia or anything.
Sometimes I hope that I'll die early, so I'll be remembered fondly but never have to deal with retirement savings, my debt, or dementia or anything.
These two posts hit home so hard. I've been trying to put my shit into words for days. And you two have done it marvelously.   At least something went right today. So now I know how to explain what I feel, but have no one to explain or talk to, for fear of driving them away with my bullshit 
These two posts hit home so hard. I've been trying to put my shit into words for days. And you two have done it marvelously.   At least something went right today. So now I know how to explain what I feel, but have no one to explain or talk to, for fear of driving them away with my bullshit 
People always tell me that they're here for me whenever I need them, and to call them any time. But when I do, they're either busy or it's in the middle of the night and they're asleep. And then I feel guilty for being mad that they have their own lives, and I end up alone anyway.
I love this. Thanks for sharing. This gives me hope. Really appreciate it. 
Thanks. Your positive feedback meant a lot. 
I sucked in being a teen and I suck in being an adult.  I wasted my life, I am wasting my life, I am going to waste my life.
I absolutely relate to this. And it f***ing sucks. 
I just... want to be comforted by someone who cares and understands. I need a metaphorical hug.  Is there a sub for that? There should be.
*metaphorical hug incoming*
Sending you a big cuddly hug! (I know I could use one today!)
Well I'll send you one back then!
Been thinking lately that i should just drink/drug myself to sleep as much as humanly possible
 Done that, doing that. Makes it worse, but the blackout might be fun. I don't know cause I'm blacked out. If I'm lucky one day I won't wake up.
I don't know how to get any words out anymore. The more I work on this the more confused I am. I feel so lost whenever I walk out of a therapy session. I don't even know why I'm typing this out, but yeah. 
I can relate to this. I want to be able to express myself. I used to write loads and sometimes post it on a blog but I find it hard to even write a sentence now without losing focus and forgetting what I'm doing. My memory is shot too. I don't really know what my point is, but I wanted to say that I can relate.
I hate that I'm a burden to my parents and can't function like a normal adult. I wish my brain could just function normally. I am trying my best to get through school so I can start a career in something stable but I hate school so much and everything is so uncertain. 
Same here. :( I am just a burden for my family and everyone else.
They say I know so much.  But I am unable to understand how people can work 9, 10 hours every day without breaking down.  How nurses and doctors work 12-14 hours shifts and then just work the next day all over again.  Am I just broken? I had those questions way before I had depression. Those were always there.
I'm struggling to get out of bed at 1 pm, and can relate. x
2am. I don't want to exist.
4am. Still no.
Don't know if anyone here really cares, but... yay I don't want to kill myself anymore, though sadness will probably never leave me...
Not wanting to kill yourself anymore is a good thing 👍🏻
I write stupid poems about dogs on reddit in hopes that someone will reply and say I'm good at something when in reality I feel like a failure begging for attention at every chance I get
I think it's important you keep writing poems, they are your expressions, your hearts artwork. I think that fact you write poems makes you good at something. Sometimes we need attention, it doesn't make you a bad person, it makes you human. Keep making poems, if not for others, but for yourself, and don't put so much pressure on yourself. 
It's like I'm missing an arm or sitting in a wheelchair but nobody else is able to see it. And they just expect me to do what everyone else is doing.
I feel like no one sees me.
Has anyone been able to explain why it's impossible to get out of bed or go to the store or get food? I just cried for thirty minutes because I couldn't get up to take my dog outside. I say, 'I can't,' and the only response I get is, 'yes you can. Don't think that way.' Don't they know by now? It's not just my head.
No it's not just your head.  I think that depression often manifests psychologically much like physical paralysis does.  Sometimes it affects one area of mental/motivational functioning and not another just as paralysis sometimes affects one region of the body but not another.  So sometimes you are inexplicably unable to get yourself to do certain things, even if you can do some others.   
Facebook makes me feel like trash.
Facebook is trash :)
Somehow my work from yesterday didn't save on the website or in my documents.  That's an hour of work gone. It needs to be invoiced by tomorrow. I have so much to do for next week. So little time. So little pay. So little meaning. A dead end.  My heart hurts. I cannot focus.
The inability to focus and actually get things done is so frustrating. I used to be good at what I do. Depression has killed that. You can only have so many too depressed to the point of being paralyzed and unable to work days.
I'm really anxious about even posting anything here.  I feel lately like nobody values or cares about me. I'm always the one to reach out and I get very little (if anything) in return.  I can't even throw myself into my work (previous coping mechanisim) because we have a 2y/o that I care for during the day. I'm trapped. I feel like a part of me has died and will never grow back. I'm not me anymore. And no one cares. I don't matter.
It can be scary and also liberating realizing you do not matter in the scheme of things. Although, you do matter to those around you. Finding some group therapy could be good if you feel alone and unheard. 
I figure I should check in since I haven't before. I'm alive but I just feel so alone in that regard. I could really just use somebody to talk to at this point.
Well, as it happens, you caught me just as I was checking messages.  What do you want to talk about most?
I just need someone to shooting talk to
You can talk to me, if you want. PM me. 
I think that's kinda cute. I'm a panda too. Except people expect me to function like a human. 
I know that [feel](http://media.giphy.com/media/mql4KQroAI2T6/giphy.gif)...
I know that [feel](http://media.giphy.com/media/mql4KQroAI2T6/giphy.gif)...
But! It's so adorable though!
[:3](http://media.giphy.com/media/AVqtlKDqWwAX6/giphy.gif)
Your computer hard drive must be just... bursting with pictures and gifs of pandas.
This sub is a bamboo forest full of pandas
[We're in it together :3](http://media.giphy.com/media/E49KOgnZDmLXq/giphy.gif)
hello fellow panda(s) :)
[:3](http://media.giphy.com/media/KcmkDMTEezhxS/giphy.gif)
it's hilarious and awesome :)
[:3](http://media.giphy.com/media/GIFbrFpayHUwo/giphy.gif)
Oh my god I'm totally a panda
Nothing wrong with [that](http://media.giphy.com/media/Ai6pliUjWGOu4/giphy.gif)
This is great OP! Unofficial mascot :)  Dark humour can also be healing. I'm so glad you thought of this and I do find it funny in its own sad way, the way another panda would :) 
[:3](http://media.giphy.com/media/jenIWU63oKK0o/giphy.gif)
Are we all pandas now? Because I would really like this. 
This sub is [pandamonium](http://media.giphy.com/media/Rt5SYFNtu09IQ/giphy.gif) :3
Welcome to the club
[:3](http://media1.giphy.com/media/cnoIGnmfB3oWY/200.gif)
All i am thinking is the lions mouth doesn't fit through the bars and that is the only reason he is alive
First of all, that is a woman.   Second of all, NO WAY would Lion hurt her.  She raised him from when he was a baby.  She is his Mommy.   HE LOVES HER.  He is like, 'hi, Mommy, you are here now, and I am happy because I am Lion and you are Mommy and I LOVE YOU.'
[This bear thinks you're great too.](http://25.media.tumblr.com/tumblr_luhcc1ppDm1qeqjino1_500.jpg)
Now we just need some tigers.
Now we just need some tigers.
Oh my!
This is the best thing I've seen in a while.  Thank you!  Let me return the favor: http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=0ZIQUb-d4GQ
That video gets me every time. Every god damn time.
Aww, I want a lion to hug me.
a... a... [cowardly lion?](https://encrypted-tbn0.google.com/images?q=tbn:ANd9GcT8E_MroZhMpFphSrpukrrLMJCOX4LFnKSTbT_ystlZsajsMqs07g)
I'm so glad my depression doesn't eat my popcorn.
i wish my depression *ate* my popcorn, Popsicles, steaks, burgers...
[And the flip side](http://kafkaskoffee.com/wp/?webcomic_post=morning-routine)
Oh if only it could be that easy.
Awesome!! I totally need to clean my ears every now and then. :)
The ears are a self cleaning organ just like the penis :)  actually I find your body finds a balance. haven't used shampoo in over 3 years
Not sure I get it...
All the things in those thought bubbles are 'that little voice in your head' while cleaning her ears she accidentally crushes the source of the voice and is finally able to see herself as she really is.  
Yes yes yes. In my never ending quest for approval, I take so much garbage from people.
Low self esteem made me such a pushover :/
When I catch myself in a brutal bout of negative self talk, I ask myself if I would say those same things to someone I cared about if they were in the same situation. Always, no. I’d never be that cruel to someone else. Just stopping to think this through is a step in the right direction of greater self-compassion for me.
That is something my psychologist touched on last time. When it is about myself my use of language is very different then when I am talking to or about someone else. I'm finding it really hard to shift though. 
Depression is an illness. An illness doesn't come with a background check to your life. Nobody asks to be ill and you don't have to have a reason to be ill.
Couldn't agree more. 
I agree but environmental factors do play a role in some people's depression, at least in initiating it. And there's always a reason, it may be something genetic or some other variable(s) that's out of your control and/or not completely understood by scientists yet, but there's always a reason and eventually there will be a cure, though it may not come in your conventional pill bottle like many treatments for illnesses do nowadays.
It's similar to how money doesn't make you happy. Having too little or an abundance certainly makes it harder or easier though.  If you think you are happy with your life but you feel depressed, then there are at least two possibilities that are relatively well understood, physical health issues like thyroid problems, and simply a lack of self knowledge /mistaking external thought, beliefs, goals for your own.
I feel guilty for being so sad when I am so very fortunate. 
Please try not to feel so guilty because it is not your fault. Sadly, society still blames depression on the person being lazy or not trying hard enough. You could say that I am fortunate to some degree. I qualified for disability and I am trying to get my life better but I still feel bad.
Exactly the same. I should be dead. (really bad car accident that wasn't my fault) tomorrow is Feb 1st an I literally have to reprogram my mind. I feel I'm getting worse daily. I also think I have really bad SAD this year.
omg I have SAD so bad its riodiculous
Yep. At uni doing law, used to be attractive before I turned into a caveman and stopped leaving my room. Amazing parents, cute dog etc. Danging amazing life and it’s all going to waste.
Feels. 
I've been there before, and what helped me recover are movies and TV shows. In my experience, the culprit was the thinking process, so I had to constantly find ways to distract myself.Don't beat yourself up too much, and actively make an effort to make yourself happy by doing the things you love - playing video games, reading books, or watching movies.
Then you would end up diving too deep into the abyss of fantasy and never come out.
'Money can't buy you happiness, but it can buy you antidepressants.'
Or Heroin. But I'm saving that for end times.   
Or Heroin. But I'm saving that for end times.   
Not a great sub to joke about this in.
I fall in this category. I have a decent job and I coach high school sports with a fairly good reputation throughout the state. I'm planning on going back to school and I can talk to the opposite sex fairly easily.  I just have a fairly bad Seratonin deficiency so every day is a nightmare. 
I guess that's my problem too. It just makes it very difficult to fix. I mean if your life circumstances are the problem, at least they can typically be improved. But when it's your goddamn neurochemistry and you're already exercising and eating well and meds don't work, not sure what the answer is. 
I guess that's my problem too. It just makes it very difficult to fix. I mean if your life circumstances are the problem, at least they can typically be improved. But when it's your goddamn neurochemistry and you're already exercising and eating well and meds don't work, not sure what the answer is. 
Psilocybe Cubensis  ;)
Psilocybe Cubensis  ;)
There is some interesting research in this area that shows some real promise towards a cure for depression. 
Completely. I have everything I could ever ask for, and my existence just continually depresses me.  Drives me insane when people say all it takes is a change of mind.   Not when you already love your life but have a creeping, underlying, metaphysical depression about your literal existence.
Yes, exactly. You can love what you have and still feel the massive suffering on this planet, the way the system is very broken.
You too? I got maybe one good week before I was curled in a ball on the floor again. Sorry to hear you're in the same fix I'm in.
> You too  Hey, yeah I didn't even know that Wellbutrin was stimulating when I was prescribed it. So was amazed at how suddenly I had this incredibly energy. But it didn't last long at all and any anti-depressant effects went along with the stimulant effects. Sorry it has happened to you too. I think meds just don't work for me anymore, my brain chemistry is permanently screwed. 
Yup. Everything is going well for me right now besides my social life and that's my fault. Yet I'm suicidal and hate my life.
Pretty much sums up my situation my friend. 
Pretty much sums up my situation my friend. 
Same here... I could have a handful of great friends but I get too anxious and depressed to go out and see people. Now everyone more or less forgot about me.   I swear when watching a tv show or reading when people are all together having a good time I get so happy and makes me want to go see people. Then I realize what real life is again and never do it. I hate being like this. 
Totally understand. But you have my respect for helping sick animals. Can't think of a worthier profession. 
Thanks :) It feels really good when I'm at work. Just so... sad at home.
Yep. I even have rare moments where I recognize that the world and life are beautiful, but I am unable to appreciate it. It's like biting into a chocolate cake and tasting every drop of chocolate, but just thinking, 'meh'.   I could have a great life. I have the right circumstances. I'm just not the right person to take advantage of them, even passively. 
The chocolate cake analogy is spot on. Reminds me of when my depression first started in middle school. There were days where the sun was out and everything was bright and cheery and warm. Kids would be outside playing sports. But I'd just be sitting on the bus, looking out at such a beautiful world I didn't feel apart of. It felt just out of reach. And then I didn't even feel a need to be apart of that world. Danging terrible feeling
I have no debt.  I make just shy of $100k a year.  I have a family and friends that care very much about me.  I'm in good shape, I'm okay looking, I have decent social skills.  I can go anywhere and do anything I want.    But what is there worth doing?  What is there to look forward to?  What is there to hope for?  Nothing, near as I can tell.
This is how I feel too. I know I can do anything if I try, and I know that I can feel joy doing those things. It’s just, why do I have to? Why do I even have to be here?
>I know that I can feel joy doing those things.  I'd totally do shit if I could feel joy about doing it. 
 The thing is, the act of doing things themselves seems hopeless and pointless. Like, is that what I even want?
What is a good life anyway? Is a good life living according to what society dictates? I don't even really know what a good life is. I suppose I had one once - Owned a home, 2 cars, a motorcycle, and I still wasn't happy. 
I agree. I meant more a life that you're not unhappy with per se. As in there's nothing about it that is particularly getting you down yet you still feel awful. You could argue that means that even subconsciously you're NOT happy with your life circumstances. But I disagree and think, there are some people, who will feel terrible no matter what situation they're in. It's an illness. 
I've never known, never will know. Not really capable of dealing with people regardless. But it's stressful. Even if I go out and there's a temp agency manning a booth, I think about it and get stressed all over again. In fact, most of my time is spent trying not to think of such things, but most of the time I am thinking of such things. There's the feeling of the overwhelming onslaught of time, the inevitability of falling further and further behind...
This hits home, hard. 
those jobs are few and far between unless you become an accountant. and even thats hit or miss.
I wish I was good at math to be an accountant. They're paid really good. I know one who has his own house and a really nice car living in Long Island, NY
Had to swoop in and say there is HUGEEE demand for Japanese speakers, dude! Just keep trying. I studied Korean at uni and was always so mad because we were emailed opportunities every week by my uni... for Japanese. :\\
Maybe for English<->Japanese it's like that, but I'm not native English speaker :/ There are already too many people in Mandarin<->Japanese field, so the companies can be very picky. I'm not even good in these people so there's always a big chance I'm not going to get hired… kinda too big for me.
Maybe for English<->Japanese it's like that, but I'm not native English speaker :/ There are already too many people in Mandarin<->Japanese field, so the companies can be very picky. I'm not even good in these people so there's always a big chance I'm not going to get hired… kinda too big for me.
Huh, so what if you're not a native English speaker. Neither am I and I'm currently in the line of work that's all about communicating in English. From your posts here your command of English is very good. So you can do English, Mandarin and Japanese. That sounds like a very employable combo. 
Why would you get a degree in a language though? Besides translator what else would you use that for?
I don't know. That's a problem…
I don't know. That's a problem…
:(
I wish I couild keep a job, tried over and over, crippling anxiety shuts my brain down in the work place and I have to bail and leave to be in a room on my own. I dont see a future :/ All I do these days is stay in my room and distract myself with movies, tv, youtube and reddit. I dont know whats going to happen.
I'm on the verge of a panic attack every time I drive to work and then I get there and have to keep pushing it down to get things done. By the end of the day, I'm so exhausted I can barely finish my work.
I'm on the verge of a panic attack every time I drive to work and then I get there and have to keep pushing it down to get things done. By the end of the day, I'm so exhausted I can barely finish my work.
Sorry to hear that, mate. I can relate, panic attacks in the workplace are nightmares. Id also get mentally exhausted, by the end of the day I cant stay awake, as soon as I got home id pass out onto my bed. Im just not built for it. Im not proud of it. You ever thought about changing jobs? You think that would help?
Sorry to hear that, mate. I can relate, panic attacks in the workplace are nightmares. Id also get mentally exhausted, by the end of the day I cant stay awake, as soon as I got home id pass out onto my bed. Im just not built for it. Im not proud of it. You ever thought about changing jobs? You think that would help?
I'm an assistant manager at an independent movie theater. So, it is kind of stressful. Especially since I'm running the whole thing by myself most of the time. Customer service, projectionist, janitor and manager, basically.   I have definitely been looking for a new job, lately. Especially since I only make $9.25/hour. It's just hard because I don't have a degree. Thanks for taking the time to read my message. I hope you feel less anxious soon.
I'm on my third job this year. Everyday is like a waking nightmare where fear presides. The anxiety and depression have me on the brink.  The only reason I'm still here is because of my children. Barely holding it together though. 
Hang in there. Holding it together for your children is really strong. I hope things improve for you.
Been trying to look for a job for the past 5 months. No luck whatsoever. Now I'm stuck with my crippling depression and anxiety, just sitting in my room and staring at the walls. 
Past year and a half for me. 
Over 30, this is my life.  Couple that with already dropping out of college once and not wanting to waste money and put myself it debt if it's not a concrete decision....yeah.  Worse still, hubs struggles to keep us afloat financially, so I just feel like a burden.
I don't know if it's all that much better when one has an intrinsically useless degree(political science).
Thanks for the inspiration man. I don't mean too sound corny but because you've a lot more experience than me could you check out my work? And see if I have what it takes. I literally am good at nothing else man, I dunno what else too do. I live in the UK also. Www.500px.com/squiires 
...I like your work.  You ever done film?  Some of your stuff looks like screenshots of some really interesting cult movies. 
I have stable employment as a server, but I'm 30 years old and have constant pressure from everyone around me to find a regular salried career. I have no idea what I want, and everything sounds awful. I feel like I have nothing I'm good at, at least nothing marketable. 
Are you kidding me. Being a server requires hospitality, customer service, attention to detail, good memory, urgency and efficiency. Also balance and concentration. Organization. Well under pressure. Hard work. I've never been a server but I do admire them all. These are all marketable skills, I believe, to serve you in finding something more delectable…
Not to mention all the idiots you got to put energy into dealing with... 
Hey, they can sexually abuse me on a daily basis as long as they offer me a job. That's how desperate I've become. 
Is it worse that I end up making imaginary scenarios with a girl , as though I am in a relationship with them?  But in reality it'll never happen.
Not the only one...
I try not to have crushes anymore. I've been rejected so many times it's not fun anymore. People suck. 
Amen. 🙌🏼
Same dude, I'm convinced that I'm going to die alone.
When I die, I want to be buried with my favorite stuffed toys so that I won't 'die alone'
Everytime I see a couple I get angry and depressed on the inside and I ask myself why can't I have that? What am I doing wrong? I think I'm just ugly.
Yeah, I'm ugly and gross. Incompatible with others because I've got my own way of going about my days and compromising is too hard. Commitment, too.
check my edit, suddenly i'm not so sure i want a relationship with this person lol
oh my godkasjdf I'm so sorry but I laughed at the same time I was feeling really bad for you. End result, you don't have to keep beating yourself up anymore which is good. Also your good friend totally gets like, 5 gold stars man. They yanked you out of the water just in time!
Christ, this is so on point to how I'm feeling. I feel like I would give or do almost anything to be able to be with this person but I know it will never happen. I try to convince myself to stop crushing because it's pointless, but I can't stop and constantly find myself wishing I could be with her and depressed that I won't.
And that's a dangerous thing. To be willing to give anything can give someone a dangerous amount of power.
I feel this way strongly. I think 'Hey, this person could be someone I would love to date... but I have messed up teeth, and I have autism, and I don't want them to know how I am with anxiety...'
Are you me?
Are you me?
Possibly. Are you Minnesotan, but from North Carolina?
Braces?
Didn't have dental growing up, MA won't cover it for adults.
That's why I'm in an amazing relationship with my imaginary girlfriend.
I have 5 husbandos.
I have 5 husbandos.
We should have a double date haha
We should have a double date haha
is it still a double date when there are eight people involved?
After a while you'll find it impossible to even feel basic emotions like these. Eventually it all melds into a static neutral state with no highs and no depths.
This shooting post right here speaks volumes to me.
Oh yeah man. It sucks. I see them, such a beautiful person. And yet, I know I won't do anything. I know it would be forced because I am not okay. I know someone else will be with them. It's so saddening, to know you won't have that. At least not until you felt happy for some reason one day. When I felt happy I had all kinds of hope. Yet that didn't last long.
When I first started anti-depressants 7 years ago, I felt so damn good for the first time in years. It's amazing when you feel happy with yourself. I had a job and I was looking into getting my G.E.D...and then I let a bad break up with a very close friend spiral me down. Also I think my body got used to the pills so my depression resurfaced...but at least the meds keep my anxiety kind of manageable.
Reminds me of middle school.
Reminds me of ~~middle school high school college~~ **life** /:
Reminds me of ~~middle school high school college~~ **life** /:
And experienced human. ^5
Yeah. It sucks because I know that nobody will ever like me regardless. So I just feel bad because my feelings are getting in the way of a potentially good friendship. I accidentally hurt one of my friendships a few weeks ago when I was blackout, and I regret it so terribly. 
Have you talked with the friend? Maybe you can repair the damage.
Have you talked with the friend? Maybe you can repair the damage.
What I was just told by a different friend is that I need to just lay low for a week, but that they will eventually be able to be friends with me in the future. Which is fine, and better than I could have reasonably been able to expect, but even a week can be hard when every day hurts and feels so lonely. I am legitimately fine with just being friends with this girl, but I just wish that blackout me wasn't such a shithead.
What I was just told by a different friend is that I need to just lay low for a week, but that they will eventually be able to be friends with me in the future. Which is fine, and better than I could have reasonably been able to expect, but even a week can be hard when every day hurts and feels so lonely. I am legitimately fine with just being friends with this girl, but I just wish that blackout me wasn't such a shithead.
When you say 'blackout me', do you mean when you're drunk?
Yeah I get what you mean. I always get so shooted up worrying that im going to screw things up. After all it's not just a relationship you are going for, it's a reason to live.
> After all it's not just a relationship you are going for, it's a reason to live.  Danging nailed it
I have this problem but I've began to realize that if anything did work out, it wouldn't magically fix my problems. 
Yeah. A part of me knows this too. You can't have a healthy relationship with someone else if you don't have one with yourself.
I just read these comments here and feel.   My people💚
Aye. Sad but comforting isn't it? 
This is just my first experience with it. I shouldn't let it get me too down it'll get better. I think it would be easier if she still didn't want to be my friend
Yea, I can sympathize. I've dragged it on for years, literally, because she said she wanted to be my friend (but not more). I only could get better once I told her that I couldn't be her friend because I had different feelings. Went no contact for a year. Now we're actual friends (and I see her in complete different eyes, I have zero wants to be romantic with her, even when we've done some fwb stuff since)
Yep , even if they get a thing for me and like me, I'm still depressed , it's like I'm constantly overthinking about them losing interest in me or finding someone else 
3 years ago the most amazing friend I'd ever had abandoned me when she met newer and better people. My depression took part in pushing her away. Ever since I've been so fearful of people leaving me even before any friendship is established. 
deleted  ^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^0.6083  [^^^What ^^^is ^^^this?](https://pastebin.com/FcrFs94k/96012)
i'm 26 this is not normal  i dont drive or have a job i dropped out of highschool and I WAS HOMESCHOOLED only just last year in March did I finally start living on my own
Which one do you REALLY think came first though? The depression or the crush?
The depression. I've been depressed for like, 11 years.
Works for me, I have the same problem, I'm very shy. I don't see how sarcasm can solve your problem.  Also, why didn't work for you?
Depression usually kills people's confidence, makes them insecure and even mess up chances before something can even start. If you're depressed and this worked for you, then that's nothing short of impressive, but not everyone is the same.
why not Tinder or social media? works for me.
...no
Sorry to be that guy, I really can appreciate most posts in this sub. Though this one makes me think that op is one of these people who portray depression as another way of saying really sad. 
 When I say depression, I mean spiraling downfall of my own mental state. 'Really sad' and 'Depressed' are two different levels for me. The ending of Corpse Bride makes me really sad. Crushing on someone from afar while knowing that I can't commit to relationships because of my self doubt, shit poor self esteem, fears and paranoia makes me more depressed than I already am in life.
24 and I feel this completely. I feel like Im so absorbed in misery everything else is slowly leaving my mind.... 
Same. I'm 22 and I feel like if I learn something or try and learn something it's pointless because my brain hasn't learned anything in so long that I won't remember it. 
Yup. The thing that sucks is that I have so many jokes, am witty, and have lots of stories...but I feel like I'm forgetting all of that.
You are still you. You just lost a bit of motivation for it.  With hope and the determination you can manage yourself.
This is my least favorite symptom of depression. But you’re not broken, it isn’t permanent, you just need some TLC 
You sure? Over 20 years since my brain worked the way it used to.  In school I won the prize for French and now, yesterday, couldn't learn which of only two categories a particular tense belonged. Like, despite repeatedly covering the same thing and there being only two categories it just wouldn't click.  In the past I could *feel* the moment when I learned something. Now I feel nothing.
You sure? Over 20 years since my brain worked the way it used to.  In school I won the prize for French and now, yesterday, couldn't learn which of only two categories a particular tense belonged. Like, despite repeatedly covering the same thing and there being only two categories it just wouldn't click.  In the past I could *feel* the moment when I learned something. Now I feel nothing.
To be fair, tenses can go shoot right off (coming from a German speaker)
so .. what's your favourite?
Probably the fact that it’s helped me connect/empathize with other people. 
What do you mean by TLC? 
It stands for tender loving care 
It stands for tender loving care 
Is that a joke?
What do you mean by TLC? 
Titties, Liquor, and Cocaine
The two previous response work
Especially together!
Same. Don't even have the attention span for the things I used to enjoy. What little mental energy I do have goes into my crappy job. Otherwise, I'm just killing time until my heart stops or the universe implodes. Whichever comes first.
I know how you feel... I spend 8 hours a day looking after tax software while controlling Tourette's Syndrome.   When I'm at home my attention span is so bad I can't even take out the garbage or do the laundry without listening to a podcast.
Depression actually does shrink your hippocampus - there are real effects on your brain! It's not just your imagination! However, they are not permanent. The more you are able to fight the depression the more you will regain your cognitive abilities. 
Do the memories come back?
Do the memories come back?
In my experience yes.
This started happening to me a few weeks back, am now failing classes and can't enjoy anything anymore. I'm just drifting at this point, it's like I'm constantly sleepy. 
This is me too, I see it all slipping and I don’t even care 
Please don't take this the wrong way.. but please go get your blood work checked and try to see a therapist. My husband thought he had depression, winds up he has ADHD. I thought I had depression but had severely low levels of B6, vitamin D and Iron. Lacking supplements gave me all the symptoms you mentioned.    I'm not suggesting you're not depressed. But please go get checked out. I hope it may be an easy fix for you. Take care!
You just reminded me to start taking my vitamins again. Cheers!
So not to self promote or anything, but I find that since I started doing martial arts, my focus has increased considerably, and of course its helped with my depression symptoms. Getting away from my super negative family and working out has also helped immensely too.
Same dude, families are a huge hindrance to personal success that go unnoticed by most people
I can't ever shake the feeling that I've forgotten something or I'm supposed to be somewhere. I think it's caused by being depressed and anxious at the same time. Yay, comorbidity.
Same.... Although usually it tends to be the case that I HAVE indeed forgotten to do something or that I have to be somewhere. Depression does a number on your memory. 
Same.... Although usually it tends to be the case that I HAVE indeed forgotten to do something or that I have to be somewhere. Depression does a number on your memory. 
Urgh same it sucks
This is exactly what I go through, and it has caused me to develop a really bad habit of having to check that I have everything 3-4 times before I walk out the door (especially because I need to carry medication with me because of my health and I could need it at any moment) and then it gives me even more shame and anxiety when I do forget something because I have checked so many times. 
Ever thought about making a general item checklist that you can put into your phone so you're not gathering your essentials off of memory?
I was playing soccer with my son, feeling shit as usual irrespective of all the positive surroundings. I was repeatedly thinking 'we should be going soon', 'we should be going soon' and yet there was nowhere I needed to be nor nowhere that would have made me feel any better.
Hey- at least you were spending some quality time with your son. You're a good dad. I know he appreciates you.
Hey- at least you were spending some quality time with your son. You're a good dad. I know he appreciates you.
Thanks. I just wish I could enjoy that time too is all.
It was like literal Hell to me. I guess it is just the prism I see the world through though. 
Was? Does afterlife have reddit??
Was? Does afterlife have reddit??
It feels like it sometimes, I was depressed so long. It sometimes feels like I died and have gone to Heaven. 
I honestly just turned off notifications to not get my hopes up anymore. I either choose the feeling of complete isolation or disappointment.
And when they do text you, it's probably because they want something from you, or they have a bad news.
And when they do text you, it's probably because they want something from you, or they have a bad news.
So true I have this one friend and she only sends text messages if she has questions in either chemistry or biology and I'm just so tired of that bullshit. I'll probably just say shoot you next time..
So true I have this one friend and she only sends text messages if she has questions in either chemistry or biology and I'm just so tired of that bullshit. I'll probably just say shoot you next time..
No you won't
The only notifications I get are from group chats I’m in and they’re never for me. They just remind me  how lonely I am and it shooting sucks 
Ikr seeing other people in the group chat they send vuds of them screwing around in class and makes me feel sad and lonely. 
I just disabled my facebook account 10 min ago.
Thanks for the motivation
Those damn phones really act as catalyst for depression nowadays. 
Lets be honest, its not the phones ;/
Lets be honest, its not the phones ;/
Having the internet the whole day in your pocket is genuinely having a negative inpact on a lot of people.
Having the internet the whole day in your pocket is genuinely having a negative inpact on a lot of people.
On the other hand, imagine feeling Awful and not having this subreddit to vent on q
I have children with an ex wife.  They don’t text me either.
Don't take that too personal. My daughter lives with me and barely has time for dear old dad. Kids will be kids. 
I hate it when people say this.   I'm not depressed because of one thing. I'm depressed due to a lot of things all happening at once mixed in with a genetic pre-disposition to feel like crap for no reason.
Yeah. I'm depressed because existing is shit. That isn't a temoorary problem. 
Yeah. I'm depressed because existing is shit. That isn't a temoorary problem. 
Yeah. Suicide is horrible because of everyone that has known you, but if I could just cease to exist, wiping anyone's memories of me, I'd take that offer in a heartbeat.
Yeah. Suicide is horrible because of everyone that has known you, but if I could just cease to exist, wiping anyone's memories of me, I'd take that offer in a heartbeat.
I'd have done that years ago
Yeah, depression is not a 'temporary' problem, goddamn right. But I don't think suicide is a solution at all though. I wish all the suiciders would share my point of view on this. We are all dying of aging, just be patient and you'll get there eventually. Maybe as the time passes you'll actually find a real solution to your problem. Because when you're dead, you sure as hell won't. Why destroy your chances?
I wouldn't say I'm suicidal,  just not too thrilled with being alive.
I wouldn't say I'm suicidal,  just not too thrilled with being alive.
This is me. I don't think I'll get up tomorrow and kill myself, but if I were to die in an accident, I wouldn't be all that upset. 
Not only that, but it doesn't even make any logical sense. I mean, isn't a permanent solution a *good* thing? Like if your toilet gets shooted up, would you rather choose the solution that makes it work fine for a week then shoot up again, or would you want the solution that will make it stop overflowing for good? What is even the point of a solution that isn't meant to last?
Vulcan level logic lol
Indeed, permanency is perfection with solutions in regards to time.
I read this in Birdperson's voice 
Yeah, those are people who don't understand that you're enduring ongoing or recurrent depression.  Keep trying, it took me twenty years and four psychiatrists telling me I'd taken ALL the antidepressants.  I got to be Not-Depressed for the first time ever last year, it was confusing but really awesome once I realized I wasn't going to think about offing myself 10% or more of my waking hours.
If you're willing, could you share what finally helped?
If you're willing, could you share what finally helped?
It's pristiq and wellbutrin in the morning with remeron at night (and a good therapist).  The pristiq is pricey stuff depending on your insurance, still too new for generics.
It's also something that happens to everyone regardless so causing it to happen sooner than it might otherwise doesn't feel like such a tragedy.
Maybe I'm just a heartless prick, but I never understood why death in general (but especially a suicide death) is seen as tragic. The method or the lead-up might be, but like you said, death in an of itself happens to everything that ever lives. And if the only guarantee that life gives us is such a tragedy then maybe this whole life thing just isn't so great anyway.
Maybe I'm just a heartless prick, but I never understood why death in general (but especially a suicide death) is seen as tragic. The method or the lead-up might be, but like you said, death in an of itself happens to everything that ever lives. And if the only guarantee that life gives us is such a tragedy then maybe this whole life thing just isn't so great anyway.
It's because people are afraid of death, so much so our culture shuns speaking about it. In other cultures death is a time of celebration, there a traditions that even celebrate the dead.   I also blame religion. Nobody wants to think they will end up in hell.
Robin Williams also said that - and we know what happened to him :(
Just goes to show that clinical depression can break the best of us.
Meh I'm less in the 'persevere' mindset and more in the 'I hope this shit is all over with very soon one way or another' phase.
Persevere? If I can make it through a day without spiraling I'd call it a good day.
Believing their is a light at the end of the tunnel makes it just a little more likely.
It's hard to believe in something so empty when you see no progress year after year.
It's hard to believe in something so empty when you see no progress year after year.
Are you sure there’s been no progress? How have you helped others? When have you seen someone try and care for you?
Thank you for sharing and for your apology. It is very big of you to admit that your previous perception on the issue wasn’t correct. I’m sorry your going through this too now. I hope you are able to get through it soon.   Thank you again. Apology accepted, you are forgiven. 
i appreciate that very much, thank you 
I've sometimes described depression to my nieces/nephews as 'like feeling sad and sick at the same time.' That is also not completely accurate, but it really seemed to click with my nephew when I phrased it that way.
That is a really good analogy that might even work with obtuse, if well-meaning, adults.
Andrew Solomon did a TED Talk about this exact feeling. He said something along the lines of 'Depression isn't looking through a veil that makes everything sad, it's feeling like the veil has been lifted and you're seeing the world for what it really is.'  Below is his TED Talk. You should absolutely watch it. Honestly, it helped me understand my depression in a way that I had never felt before. It changed my life.   https://www.youtube.com/shared?ci=eiM9ULXjE60
Thank you for sharing this video. I had not seen it before and it was indeed insightful.   
I feel the exact same way. It's so weird, because breaking out of depression just involves choosing to ignore the inherent lack of meaning in everything.
I feel that. Isn't that realization sort of liberating though? The realization that everything is meaningless somewhat removes the societal pressure to do this and be that. Nothing is normal. Our lives truly are an existential product.   I think that that is overwhelming and can be processed as the futility of life. But perhaps it's also freedom to be and pursue a life that isn't as meaningless as the next.
I feel that. Isn't that realization sort of liberating though? The realization that everything is meaningless somewhat removes the societal pressure to do this and be that. Nothing is normal. Our lives truly are an existential product.   I think that that is overwhelming and can be processed as the futility of life. But perhaps it's also freedom to be and pursue a life that isn't as meaningless as the next.
I don't know. Even though depression has caused me to feel that everything is meaningless anxiety causes me to care too much about societal expectations. It kinda sucks.
I don't know. Even though depression has caused me to feel that everything is meaningless anxiety causes me to care too much about societal expectations. It kinda sucks.
We see that societal expectations are a made up cage, but we still must operate within that prison.
Yeah I have a hard time with this too. I'm pretty sure being depressed and hopeless is actually the most honest and real way to be. I don't WANT to be that way, but I'm at heart an incredibly honest person who doesn't like to have to fake anything. Reality is mostly horror.
Do you take some small amount of comfort in the fact that you at least can live in honesty?  I mean, if depressed and hopeless can even be called 'living'. I too have been an honest person my entire life, it is simply my nature. I don't view it as a positive or something to take solace in either...Though I wish I could. Wish we could all just block out reality.
Do you take some small amount of comfort in the fact that you at least can live in honesty?  I mean, if depressed and hopeless can even be called 'living'. I too have been an honest person my entire life, it is simply my nature. I don't view it as a positive or something to take solace in either...Though I wish I could. Wish we could all just block out reality.
yeah. I've gotten better at blocking out reality...or choosing a reality that I like...but then I'm like oh shit horrible people do that to justify horrible things! I try to see my.. and life's, and other peoples' positive aspects more than negative yeah, its a day to day thing.
yeah. I've gotten better at blocking out reality...or choosing a reality that I like...but then I'm like oh shit horrible people do that to justify horrible things! I try to see my.. and life's, and other peoples' positive aspects more than negative yeah, its a day to day thing.
So it's a consistent thing that involves conscious action on your part. I've always had a pattern where I can get really gung-ho about seeing the positives to change my situation...But that usually fades out in a day or less. I hope you are having better luck in that regard.
>Vending machines that sometimes give you an extra bag of chips.  Not trying to be an ass, but that might be the one bag of chips that got stuck for someone else.
Vending machines in the UK have sensors that detect whether the crisps have fallen and if they haven't they will go through another cycle and often means 2 packs are dropped.
Vending machines in the UK have sensors that detect whether the crisps have fallen and if they haven't they will go through another cycle and often means 2 packs are dropped.
That's actually cool.
Yes, happiness is just a lie. It's something your brain does to trick itself to survive. The universe is not good. But it is also not evil. It is indifferent. Not only is happiness a lie, but so are all other emotions. Our sadness is just as fake as our happiness. Hopefully that is a little bit of consolation.
Nhilism helps me cope a bit. 
How? Nihilism has only made me more disillusioned.
When nothing means anything, it means whatever I want. 
[deleted]    ^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^0.3708   > [What is this?](https://pastebin.com/64GuVi2F/02609)
nihilism is the gift that keeps on giving.
Sorry to be a douche but I don't think posts about depressive realism really belong in this thread. Depressive realism and depression are not really the same thing - you can have depressive realism without being mentally unwell. A lot of people have existential worries, fears and thoughts about the pointlessness of life without it also mentally crushing them day in and day out - and to me that's the difference between feeling depressed and being depressed. 
So you mean to say that those people who only have fears, be it true or otherwise are not really depressed as compared to the folks that really are depressed indeed?
So you mean to say that those people who only have fears, be it true or otherwise are not really depressed as compared to the folks that really are depressed indeed?
No, I'm saying there's a difference between realising the world can be a shitty place and trying to come to terms with that fact, and a chemical imbalance that results in an inability to function. People can be depressive without having depression. Many people have some levels of existential dread and worry without having a specific mental illness. It wasn't intended to invalidate anyone but depressive realism is part of academic theory. not a mental illness in itself
Coming to terms with being unremarkable weighs on a lot of people like it has on me. I tested in the whatever something percentile in high school, so I imagined that I had unlimited possibilities ahead of me. The truth is that there's so incredibly few people in this world who ever do anything individually noteworthy, and I'm not one of them. You're not likely to be one of them either. None of us will be in a 2090 history textbook.
Even if you *were* remarkable, does it really matter?
Hello, fellow nihilist.
If I'm a nihilist, it's only by experience and not on principle.  I'd be happy to find lots of things in life immeasurably important and worthwhile.  I just... don't.
I disagree. I think depression lies to you and gives you a false view of how everything works and removes all hope. Your life is the longest thing you'll ever do, it's literally EVERYTHING. I can't put into words what I mean by that but your life is literally everything, you are only aware of what is happening for 75-100 years of an infinite timeline. This is your only time to see this shit.
>This is your only time to see this shit.  Dead people don't regret things, so this is pretty irrelevant.
But you're not dead right now are you? Why not spend time doing things you like now
I do.  But there's nothing I like sufficiently that justifies the work and unpleasantness required to be alive.
Yes, but just because the world is a tyrannic hellscape of bigotry and hypocrisy doesn't mean you have to feel bad about it or that you are as bad.
where i went wrong was i didnt want to believe this as a kid. I thought everyone was inherently good and I was bad for letting them be bad in my presence
Yup. Every time I cross a street I hope the car coming towards me doesn't stop.
Me in every scenario ever.
I need to imagine myself dying to get to sleep most nights. For some reason it is comforting to me.
Wow, I thought I was alone in that one
Not that, but I have had desires of getting some sort of terminal illness. Wow - that looks terrible written down. :-(
Me too. Sometimes I disgust myself
I used to think like that for a while... Then I realized my conscience is the only thing I truly own. So I won't let anyone but me take it from me. That said, I won't commit suicide, I'll just make my death more likely by taking more unnecessary risks.
Couldn't of put it better myself. Can't commit suicide, but I'll tease death - A waiting game.
Couldn't of put it better myself. Can't commit suicide, but I'll tease death - A waiting game.
With the less pain possible if applicable, that would be perfect. I mean, the only thing that is scaring us in death is the pain. Besides that, it looks like we already made a choice here.
That's my biggest problem. I'd rather be depressed than a vegetable for the rest of my life
Correction: a depressed vegetable
Correction: a depressed vegetable
Thanks; that makes it all better.
Yes. I ride a motorcycle, and I think part of the reason why is because there is a greater chance to die. I know it would suck for whomever hit me, so I'm not intentionally doing anything. I gave up on shooting myself because when I do finish it, I need it to look like an accident so my wife isn't as crushed:/
This is one of the reasons why I want to start riding. Part of it is also that, if I do get in an accident I won't be the one killing someone. I'll be the one killed, but that doesn't matter so much.
Yes, but not only accidental. I have gone as far as fantasizing that I would be murdered in a robbery gone bad or by a genuine serial killer.  As long as my family never found my body, so they could live with the hope that I might still be alive.
Every time I watch a crime show I think about how I should be the one to die since I wouldn't mind. Not the actual victim that wanted to live. 
Yes! This is me. I'm the 'happy one' and somehow manage to have a smile on my face. I know how to work a room at parties. But I just go through the motions. Take it one day at a time. Most of it is a blur. I think that bland emptiness got worse over the years too. Definitely creates a weird duality and being intorverted is just icing on the cake.
I wish i could say I don't relate to what you've said. But shoot does that hit me hard 
I wish i could say I don't relate to what you've said. But shoot does that hit me hard 
Your post was the first one I've read that connected with how I feel completely. I wish I could say it gets better but I just started seeing a therapist a couple weeks ago. I'd be hopeful but my mind is the worst cynic I know. I just wanted you to know that you're not alone in how you feel because that's now how I feel. Hang in there.
Worth mentioning that you can have dysthymia and experience episodes of major depression on top of it. I have this and it's quite difficult to diagnose and treat. For many years I tolerated constantly being in a low level depressed state, I just thought it was normal because those times were so much better than when I had major depression going on too.
Damn, this sounds a lot like me. I was so confused because I did seem to fit with a lot of the symptoms of depression, but I didn't always feel that way. What you and the person you replied to described pretty much perfectly fits me. I almost felt like I was faking and going to talk to a professional would be wasting their time. 
Damn, this sounds a lot like me. I was so confused because I did seem to fit with a lot of the symptoms of depression, but I didn't always feel that way. What you and the person you replied to described pretty much perfectly fits me. I almost felt like I was faking and going to talk to a professional would be wasting their time. 
It's definitely not a waste of time and anyone who treats you as if it is shouldn't be working in mental health. While things may seem tolerable now, if you have dysthymia and you end up experiencing a major depressive episode on top of it it can be extremely difficult to manage (I only narrowly avoided inpatient treatment for my last two). It's smart to be proactive and treat the dysthymia. You shouldn't have to go through life feeling crappy because your brain is a bastard.
Yepp. Sleep, eat, cry, take medication, repeat. I've left my house 4 times in the past 4 months. 
ugh, i know that feel. I just stopped taking two of my medications. I've been on 5 or 6 diff medications over the course of this year and none of them seem to help. I'm just getting worse. After nearly two weeks of barely having the motivation to get out of bed I stopped taking my medication. Why spend money on something that clearly isn't helping me.  I don't know what to do anymore....
ugh, i know that feel. I just stopped taking two of my medications. I've been on 5 or 6 diff medications over the course of this year and none of them seem to help. I'm just getting worse. After nearly two weeks of barely having the motivation to get out of bed I stopped taking my medication. Why spend money on something that clearly isn't helping me.  I don't know what to do anymore....
I wish there was an easier way to find medication that worked. It becomes so hopeless when you try and try but find no relief. I'm sorry that you're going through this but keep trying, you have to have hope, even if it's all you have. 
Whatcha on?
Meloxicam, baclofen, gabapentin, tramadol, and cymbalta. 
Yep. I sleep too much, exercise too little and watch a lot of Netflix/youtube. I barely draw (used to be my favourite things to do) and I have a bunch of games I'll probably never get around to playing. Sometimes I play some mmo solo, not feeling like socializing.
> exercise too little  That's better than what I do `^-^`
I literally do nothing all day. I either sleep or am on my laptop. That's it. 24/7. Kill me. 
Whoever is killing this guy, take me with!
Whoever is killing this guy, take me with!
I could kill you both, but how would you return the favor? 
how do I make it stop? having no life becomes unbearable
I don't know what its like in russia, but here in the US there's state run vocational rehabilitation services and they help people with depression get jobs. Pretty much the only reason I finished my resume and applied to any jobs at all is because of their help. Maybe there's something like that in russia?
I don't know what its like in russia, but here in the US there's state run vocational rehabilitation services and they help people with depression get jobs. Pretty much the only reason I finished my resume and applied to any jobs at all is because of their help. Maybe there's something like that in russia?
There is nothing like this, social support is minimal overall and no one cares about depression, its not a disability. A doctor will prescribe you pills and thats it, therapy is only available for money and even that is underdeveloped.  We are in bad economic situation too and its hard to get a job at all.
I get it. Where do you live and what do you like? I'll do my best.
I live alone, in a city, I dont know what I like, Im feeling shitty about myself to go anywhere or try to apply to a job.
Not doing anything for 3 years now.   I'm 23, and I'm living with grandma and basically distracting myself with movies and games all day, waiting to die.
dude i'm basically you, i live with parents at 26 and i distract myself playing useless games that i don't even like anymore just to let the time pass
dude i'm basically you, i live with parents at 26 and i distract myself playing useless games that i don't even like anymore just to let the time pass
I third this. 19, didn't finish high-school because bullies suck. I don't go out because I don't want to see anyone I know. So I sit in my room all day, eat, watch twitch and sometimes play ps4. 
:)  I play piano so I can convince myself that I'm killing time in a less 'wasteful' way than playing video games and surfing the internet like a robot.
Yeah, same. Feels somewhat more like an accomplishment you know.  I can sit and surf the web or play video games for hours, but it's kinda an empty activity. Feels like doing nothing basically, just quite a bit more distracting :P  But with creative stuff like playing music, I get sense of pride and fulfillment, like I'm living life kinda, not just wasting it. I dunno. it's wierd, but music ftw anyway :)
I don't browse reddit for 10 hours a day, I'm not a loser.  I browse it for 8 hours only , and play vidya for 6 hours
underachiever I browse for 18 hours and play vidya for 36 hours a day
underachiever I browse for 18 hours and play vidya for 36 hours a day
Oh man I even fail at failing 🙃
Oh man I even fail at failing 🙃
or did you fail at failing so in essence you were the champion of failing and thus succeeded
Let's try not to act like this is a circle jerk positive thing guys, sitting around doing nothing kills your mind and makes you unhealthy in many ways. 
You have it sideways.   It's equally true that being unhealthy (as a precondition) leads to doing nothing and to one's mind deteriorating further, so we can infer that behavior is only an indicator of present mental health and has no real influence on it. 
I woke up at 11am, spent a few hours browsing Reddit on my phone, and then got out of bed and have been browsing Reddit on my computer for about the last 2 hours. I'm probably going to stay on Reddit, with the occasional Youtube video mixed in until I go to sleep at 3am.  This is pretty much a typical day for me.
Last night i didn't even go to sleep, for some reason i had to complete a skyrim walkthrough marathon on youtube. I shootin hate myself
Aw I wanna play that game so much... You gotta be connected online all the time tho, right?
Nope, it's an offline game, but if you have shit to accomplish please refrain from starting.
Does playing video games count as something?
Is mayonnaise an instrument?
Is mayonnaise an instrument?
Dang yeah it is. 
At least we have each other i guess
*digital hug*
Me, and I feel so parasitic. 
I'm a parasite on the government money and I'm a worthless shootwad
I've been asleep for the last 32 hours. I got up once to eat, but that's it. 
I've been asleep for my whole life, i wish someday to 'wake up'...
does looking at a computer count as doing something?
Good news, so does staring at a wall and crying!
Good news, so does staring at a wall and crying!
ayyyyyy
Days off are an unequivocally nice thing for most people, but last weekend I lay in bed for literally about 36 hours waking up intermittently to hydrate and eat dry cereal out of the box...When my coworker asked how my weekend was, I said, 'Pretty good. Relaxing.'
.
.
I guess I'm only resting from the incessant feelings of anxiety, loneliness, and shame that accompany every moment of my wakefulness...but obviously they're no better when I wake up. Sometimes I think if I could just keep myself occupied all the time I could avoid falling into these depressive ruts...but I always feel so goddamn tired.
I guess I'm only resting from the incessant feelings of anxiety, loneliness, and shame that accompany every moment of my wakefulness...but obviously they're no better when I wake up. Sometimes I think if I could just keep myself occupied all the time I could avoid falling into these depressive ruts...but I always feel so goddamn tired.
.
I know exactly how you feel. Wow, why did I think I was the only one experiencing this?
You're so far from alone, problem is there is no cure.
Going on 5 years now.   Lol @ all the people replying about 'when I'm not at work or school'. Then this isn't you. 
Yeah people commenting with work and stuff... I feel like an ass for thinking kay if you can work youre a step less depressed good for you
You see, I wish i had to go outside to work everyday because I can't bring myself to go outside for anything ever. I work from home in very tiny room and I miss going outside because I honestly can't find any motivation to leave my house ever these days
I understand that. I would love to work from home. I work shitty retail with people who tell me to smile more. I hate going out and dealing with people. 
I understand that. I would love to work from home. I work shitty retail with people who tell me to smile more. I hate going out and dealing with people. 
I used to work at a food place and I felt that too. I wanted to just sit at home all day then as well. I suppose either way it sucks now that I think about it
Do you feel like having a dog helped you though?  Does your dog bring you any sort of happiness?
Yeah, she's definitely brightened my life a lot. Especially during winter. I get hit really hard by the whole dark days, cold weather and all that winter depression stuff, but I also have personal reasons to be moodier during winter. She really makes me have a reason to get up every day.  Heck, even if I sleep most of the day away anyway, I take her out for at least three walks every day.  She's a rescue, but I think she's rescued me..cheesy I know.
It sounds like he loves you, seeing your face when he comes home from work probably makes his day worth a damn. 
I don't know, I think he'd be a lot happier with someone who's not an emotional disaster. :/
I sleep whenever I can. Just sleep, eat, drag myself to take care of myself hygienically if I have any energy left for that or places I need to be that I can't quite avoid.   No job, no school. I'm a useless waste of space. If I didn't have an SO, I'd probably be bedridden and a total pancake day and night. 
:'( I cry for us both, brother/sister.  Waste of space is the worst phrase I ever use on myself and it's horrid.   Proud of you for taking cake of your hygeine though... I took a shower yesterday in I'm embarrassed to say how long :/ ew ugh ew ew ew 
Those few times you force yourself to leave the house...do you feel better afterwards?  Do you feel like you accomplished something?  I find when I force myself to do something I don't feel I can do (like an errand) it raises my confidence...if it's just a tiny bit.
Trying to force myself to start first day tomorrow at a new job even though every instinct I have is telling me I can't do it. Reading this helps a little. I know it will raise my confidence if I can work and do something productive with my time. Plus I really want the money. I just have terrible anxiety and have been out of work for months.
Can't tell if this makes me feel better because I know I'm not alone, or if this makes me feel worse because so many other people struggle with it.
It makes me feel somewhat comforted. I don't feel like such a worthless sack of shit when I know other people are in the same boat as me. I just wish people in the outside world would realize how debilitating it is and stop accusing me of being lazy and that I should just go out and get a job.
sounds wonderful to me. i wanna sleep in bed all day but i have around 5 hours to sleep every night because school. makes me anxious and stressed asf.
when i'm doing something all i wish to be is doing nothing  when i'm doing nothing all i wish to be is doing something
when i'm doing something all i wish to be is doing nothing  when i'm doing nothing all i wish to be is doing something
that is me in a nutshell lol. when i have school all i wanna do is sleep and when i have summer break all i wanna do is go back to school.
You guys act like its not normal most people do it all the time 
Yeah... ha ha ... right, guys? ...guys?
Honest question..if you aren't in school or working, how do you survive?
I don't. The decay has already begun.
I mean like, shelter, food, bills?
Welfare system depending on your country and diagnosis.
*sighs* guess we're on the same boat 
Row, row *sniff*, row your *sob* boat...
Yea anime and video games as well.
Can you rec me a few good anime shows? :)
r/NEET
Why did i get downvoted? r/NEET is exactly what OP is describing, proving there are thousands of people with his problem he can relate to.
Can't work or drive because of epilepsy. It's my main reason I'm depressed, spend all day playing video games or watching youtube/netflix.
Is it random or can it be triggered? Just asking because of video games. 
Is it random or can it be triggered? Just asking because of video games. 
Only if I play for a long time without a break. Or lack of sleep, dehydration, stress, getting too hot, alcohol, or a combo of any of the above. 
I wish I could get away with doing absolutely nothing. Sadly I've got responsibilities and unrealistic expectations to live up to.
Just so you know, for some of us it isn't through choice. 
Is a reason partially because that gap year is ending?
Not really. I still have about 8 more months to go. I just lack the motivation to do something productive with my time. Let alone get out of my house.
Go out and climb a wall, or a rock or a tree... 
Easier said than done
Sometimes before I do anything I say to myself 'well, if it shoots up I can always kill myself!' During movies I wonder to myself why the main characters don't just off themselves when something embarrasing etc happens to them. I can't relate to normal people anymore.
This so much. Can't understand what a normal, non-suicidal mentality is anymore
I can never relate to these people in movies who get hurt and then lay in the hospital and people keep telling them 'you have to rest now' and they're like 'no, I gotta get out and save the world'. I would stay in that bed and never get out of it again. I could watch a movie about a person who refuses to get out of that hospital bed and just browses Wikipedia on their phone all day long.
Right???  I am so with you here.  
I'm so casually suicidal no one realizes how honest I'm being.
You say such blatant things to people that you'd think someone would notice. 
You say such blatant things to people that you'd think someone would notice. 
I can literally tell someone I think about jumping into moving traffic at least 10 times a day, and they laugh. I know they think I'm joking but I don't know why anyone would joke about that.. 
I can literally tell someone I think about jumping into moving traffic at least 10 times a day, and they laugh. I know they think I'm joking but I don't know why anyone would joke about that.. 
I don't know how many times a day I tell people I'm just going to go jump off a bridge. They think that's my new punchline phrase or something.  How is that shit even funny?
Have been constantly having these sorts of thoughts for the last 18 or so years. Actually came close to trying it once or twice. Right now the thoughts aren't quite as common as they used to be (Used to be all the time, even facing the most minor of problems like the store being out of peanut butter) but they are still there. And regularly pop up without much warning.
18 years...wow. I’m only in year 9 or so. 5 years ago, I never thought I’d make it this far. Now I don’t picture the future at all, I guess I can’t really imagine one. Idk. It’s tough. Props to you, 18 years and still here... cheers 
I have automatic thoughts where I say 'kill myself' or 'I wanna die'. In particularly bad times (like during a depressive episode), it will actually come out of my mouth and I feel like I can't control it. Working with a therapist helped. I realized I wasn't thinking literally it was just a pattern I got into to express embarrassment or guilt. Now I have new ways of dealing with those emotions so it doesn't happen as often. 
Hey! Same here. I'm actually just about to start working on them, spent today's therapy session talking about them. Mine are like 'you should just kill yourself' 'please kill yourself,' and 'why haven't you killed yourself yet?' When I'm embarrassed or feel guilty these thoughts happen quickfire in my head automatically. Sorry I kinda went off a bit then but it's comforting that someone else has managed to find a way to manage them. Well done and I hope life is good to you :)
Hey! Same here. I'm actually just about to start working on them, spent today's therapy session talking about them. Mine are like 'you should just kill yourself' 'please kill yourself,' and 'why haven't you killed yourself yet?' When I'm embarrassed or feel guilty these thoughts happen quickfire in my head automatically. Sorry I kinda went off a bit then but it's comforting that someone else has managed to find a way to manage them. Well done and I hope life is good to you :)
It is nice to know there are others who get caught up in these thoughts! I get how it can be comforting. I'm glad you are working on it, too, and I hope it gets better for you! :-)
Well it did, but now a lot less, luckily for me. Now I mostly think about harming myself or disappearing forever, both of which aren't very nice, but so is suicide
I found disappearing yourself is a nice alternative to fantasizing about suicide. It's like, I could walk out the door of my job, drive until my car broke down, and find some sort of manual labor job in a completely new world. 
A bill comes through 'kill yourself' I'm on my way to work 'shall I just crash my car and hope I die' I have a party to go to 'will it ruin the party if I kill myself?' 
I have an hour drive to and from work on the freeway at night. I always think this. 
I had a shitty test and I've been feeling like it- like I do not deserve anything I have, that everything from people to objects is too good for me. I feel I'm a shitty individual and it wouldn't make a difference if Iived because I probably won't achieve much anyway. BUT, that's where I'm wrong. Death is never a solution. We must recognize the problem and fight it. Remember that, my friend.
It is for some people,i am not advocating it but to take away that choice from anyone is hell in itself.None of us lives the life of another.
It is for some people,i am not advocating it but to take away that choice from anyone is hell in itself.None of us lives the life of another.
Yes, of course. It is a solution for some people and that's why we have the concept of Euthanasia. The reason why I said it's not a solution is that I don't want anybody to resort to it. I think this is hope that I have, but it further saddens me to learn that people are ending themselves because of their misery.
All my life, as long as I can remember. Used to tell my parents 'I deserved to die' as a child. A few suicide attempts: cutting, shotgun, self-strangulation, maybe IV drugs? (I was enjoying it but it certainly was dangerous.)  Being a living thing is just not what I want to do. I'm trying to fix it.
You survived a shotgun blast? 
Yep. It feels like everyone around me is doing so much better at the aspects of life I want to do well in. I can't compete. I should just fade away and stop existing. 
> It feels like everyone around me is doing so much better at the aspects of life I want to do well in.   The most depressing part is what we'd kill to have just comes naturally to other people.
> It feels like everyone around me is doing so much better at the aspects of life I want to do well in.   The most depressing part is what we'd kill to have just comes naturally to other people.
This oh my god is my life 
Exactly 100% right, holy shit this sub is scary sometimes. Did you write this? 
I just had a feeling because that is exactly me. 
I like the fact that there's an entire subreddit of people like me who can perfectly translate my feelings into words, since I'm too dumb to do it myself.
You're not dumb my friend! I will say that if you're someone that's not used to expressing your feelings verbally or in writing, you might think that you cant do it, but you can. I think for me, the thing is that I've never been someone who can keep my feelings bottled up--I *have* to get them out somehow...so I've just had a lot of practice I guess. 
I actually feel like I'm better than everyone else **whilst** feeling inferior to everyone, if it makes sense.
Inferiority complex. Crippling self-doubt and bouts of delusions of grandeur. Probably just some sort of coping mechanism to keep you from feeling inferior all the time. But the thing is, when I realise it's just a delusion, I feel even worse.
Yup I feel like one of the worst employees at my job. It's not cos I'm lazy it's because I feel I lack the talent and knowledge of others in the same position. There were interns better than me.   However there are things I like about my job so as long as they keep paying me I'll stay. 
You and me both. I tend to shoot up the simplest of tasks. Strangely enough, my boss hasn't fired me yet. Most likely out of pity.
Amen! I hate when people think someone is 'faking it.' Like we shouldn't cut the asthmatic kid some slack in P.E., just because someone somewhere might have pretended to have asthma to get out of running laps. So what if I'm faking it? Are you saying it's worth the risk that I might kill myself, as long as you don't accidentally give help to someone who didn't actually need it as badly as they said? Dang, man. That's shooted up.  End rant. Peace out. Stay strong.
I have really bad asthma and when exposed to ammonia it flares up really badly. One time at work they found me hyperventilating on the edge of consciousness in the back room at work because they told me 'no excuses' when they asked me to refill a bottle of cleaner that was mostly ammonia. Did they tell me to go home or asked if I needed help? No. They had me take a drug test after they had to help me stand up and wake me up.
I have really bad asthma and when exposed to ammonia it flares up really badly. One time at work they found me hyperventilating on the edge of consciousness in the back room at work because they told me 'no excuses' when they asked me to refill a bottle of cleaner that was mostly ammonia. Did they tell me to go home or asked if I needed help? No. They had me take a drug test after they had to help me stand up and wake me up.
Could you sue over that? >.<
Mental illness is not alone; other invisible illnesses, such as chronic fatigue syndrome and multiple chemical sensitivity, get treated similarly.
A friend in high school had chronic fatigue syndrome. She fainted constantly, had to have loads of time off school,  and eventually stopped going to school because she just couldn't make it. People were always, always accusing her of faking it. Even her own friends. I stopped questioning her when she fainted and fell down a flight of stairs and had to be rushed to hospital. Most people didn't.
It would be awesome if people took me more seriously when I try to talk to them, but whatever I'm working on it. I feel like [this comic] (http://25.media.tumblr.com/tumblr_ltqsgpVbAn1r2m5c0o1_1280.jpg) is pretty relevant. If you haven't checked out Clay's other comics, I think they are pretty good representations of what most of us are going through. [Depression Comix](http://depressioncomix.tumblr.com/)
I really love the first one comic. 
It would be awesome if people took me more seriously when I try to talk to them, but whatever I'm working on it. I feel like [this comic] (http://25.media.tumblr.com/tumblr_ltqsgpVbAn1r2m5c0o1_1280.jpg) is pretty relevant. If you haven't checked out Clay's other comics, I think they are pretty good representations of what most of us are going through. [Depression Comix](http://depressioncomix.tumblr.com/)
So, depression makes you a man?
So, depression makes you a man?
No, in the other comics she is shown to generally be the one without depression (I say generally because there is not really any continuity between comics), and it now hit me you were joking, sorry about that
No, in the other comics she is shown to generally be the one without depression (I say generally because there is not really any continuity between comics), and it now hit me you were joking, sorry about that
Ahaha. No need to apologize. I'm rather deadpan, so I prefer it when my jokes don't work due to the nature of the delivery method as opposed to the shittiness of my delivery method.
Yep.  Most people can understand that the 'faith healing' paradigm doesn't work for broken bones, or diabetes, or ebola.  But mental illness?  Even radical atheists will start talking about positive thinking and willpower and 'get over it'.  Still magical thinking.  Illness doesn't work that way.
Positive thinking won't totally cure any illness, but it'll help (for both physical and mental illness).
Well, you know that the placebo effect is one of the strongest medications medicine has to offer, do you?
No.  I know it exists.  At the same time, 'walk on your broken leg until it gets better' is not a valid placebo; neither is telling a depressed person 'think happy thoughts'.
No.  I know it exists.  At the same time, 'walk on your broken leg until it gets better' is not a valid placebo; neither is telling a depressed person 'think happy thoughts'.
No, but thinking that your leg will get better, because it's in a splint now, will help a LOT. As well as thinking that therapy or medication against depression helps does help.
'I broke my leg once, I didn't need to take ~medicine~ for it. I got over it on my own!'
More like: I twisted my ankle once. I just walked it off.
I'm never sure how to respond to 'Man up or shut up.'
'Dang off' is usually a good one. :p
Well I can tell you that going home, crying on your own, stifling your rage and turning it in on yourself does not work.
And it won't, because they really don't give a damn.
Sometimes the TV shows I watch make it worse because they deal with people having friends, lovers, talents, motivations, etc. And ....I'm just here dully looking at the reflection on my phone when the show ends.
i can recommend scrubs. its funny but as well kinda sad, so the main character jd isnt really lucky with life as well..
i can recommend scrubs. its funny but as well kinda sad, so the main character jd isnt really lucky with life as well..
i'd recommend its always sunny in Philadelphia  theyre all shitty people and nothing works out well for any of them at any point in the show 
It's to the point I'm afraid of my phone battery dying.
My phone stopped working and I nearly had a honest to God breakdown thinking of trying to get through the day without the distraction it provides..
My phone stopped working and I nearly had a honest to God breakdown thinking of trying to get through the day without the distraction it provides..
I felt the same when I had no reception. 
Me too, I've been pushing myself to listen to music more instead. It doesn't always happen. When I  do get myself to turn on my speakers I never regret it. It works similarly to Netflix or Reddit but I'm not screen-locked.  Painting also has helped me a lot with this, using a 26 minute sand timer, I can keep myself playing with color and making something so my time doesn't feel like it's rushing or crawling by.
Learning to play music and writing songs is a good way to let go of steam as well :)  Sometimes putting your feelings into words and writing them down really helps make you feel better 
I was told by my counsellor that distracting yourself can be a good thing. I've been watching Disney movies and funny programmes like Schitt's Creek and Brooklyn Nine Nine and It's Always Sunny in Philadelphia every day when I find myself getting overwhelmed in my thoughts
But you aren't doing anything to prevent yourself from getting better. The thought is burrowed within your head, leaving you vulnerable when are aren't distracted. 
Back when I used to go to school, I dropped post it notes with compliments on them every now and then.  I drop them around at both my workplaces from time to time as well!  They'd say things like, 'Hey! Thanks for picking me up, beautiful!'  'Ah, I'm glad such a nice person decided to pick me up!'  'Hope you have a nice day!'  'You're looking great today(as you do everyday)!'
It's also pretty fun to do and it makes other people happy!  You guys should try it out!
It's also pretty fun to do and it makes other people happy!  You guys should try it out!
Does it really make people happy? It's very impersonal.
Does it really make people happy? It's very impersonal.
In that case, I'm glad it's at least fun to do.
That made me burst into tears. I'm having an awful week.
You gonna be okay? I'm sorry about your week. And hope the weekend treats you better. 
You gonna be okay? I'm sorry about your week. And hope the weekend treats you better. 
I'll be alright. I'm just stressed from work. I have fibromyalgia, and I just had ankle surgery, but my Dr forgot to fill my pain meds.   I'd probably just be able to try to suck it up, but my 13 year old cat got diagnosed with cancer this week. I've been so upset, I made myself sick.
I'll be alright. I'm just stressed from work. I have fibromyalgia, and I just had ankle surgery, but my Dr forgot to fill my pain meds.   I'd probably just be able to try to suck it up, but my 13 year old cat got diagnosed with cancer this week. I've been so upset, I made myself sick.
Aww that sounds really rough! *hug* How bad is your pain? Can you take some acetaminophen in the mean time?
My first thought whenever I see something like this is usually 'How the hell do you know?' If someone is concerned over how they look, is a safety rail's opinion really going to cheer them up?
This reminds me of a documentary I watched where someone was talking about their suicide attempt. He was walking towards the bridge and decided that if one person smiled at them on the way, he wouldn't jump. Not one person smiled. Sometimes even little gestures like this can make a big difference, I always try to smile at people in the street if I catch their eye because you never know how crappy someone may be feeling. 
This reminds me of a documentary I watched where someone was talking about their suicide attempt. He was walking towards the bridge and decided that if one person smiled at them on the way, he wouldn't jump. Not one person smiled. Sometimes even little gestures like this can make a big difference, I always try to smile at people in the street if I catch their eye because you never know how crappy someone may be feeling. 
That's the thing. You never know what might make a difference, so why not try to make people's days better, however you can? Let someone into traffic. Smile when you don't have to. Practice patience in line at the supermarket. Compliment a stranger. It only has to work once to save a life, and that is worth everything. 
I always make a habit of telling strangers directly, some seem put off, but others usually smile and say thank you.
The gesture is appreciated, but I think most of us find it hard to believe that's what people really think when it seems to come so automatically and frequently. it's not certainly not how we normally function. Not everyone I see I think is beautiful, anyway.
I laid on the train tracks and a big hawk flew by and landed next to me. It was so damned pretty, that when it flew away, I followed it. The train came a few minutes later. Reminds me of this. Little things. Little things that keep you going. It's shooting hard. I want to cut so badly today, my boyfriend left me, I want to hit and cut deep. I'm trying. I'm trying so hard. Where's my hawk?
[Here](http://imgur.com/jTlqd) is your hawk :)  
Grand, I already know I'm attractive. Now tell me something that will help me come to terms with the fact that I am very intelligent and only use that knowledge to dig myself into a pit of misery at how stupid the world is and how i wish to be rid of it. Finding people to shoot is easy, finding people to talk too, not so much.  Edit: And find me a cure for my attraction to drugs and alcohol that makes me write incoherent shit on reddit.
I like your incoherent drunken reddit post. I like it a lot.  
protip: if you do decide to jump to your death you should jump from a different bridge than that one. it doesnt look to be high enough to ensure your death if you happen to somehow over rotate and miss landing on your head. just saying.
Also in respect to whoever painted those phrases... They wouldn't apperciate it.
I love little surprises like that. I found [this] ( http://i.imgur.com/NctKd.jpg) post it above a mirror in the public restroom at my daughters school one day and it made the rest of the day so much better. We have so much potential for compassion and love. It's so uplifting to see little pieces of that put out into the world. 
My girlfriend sent me a picture of a mirror that had 'You look absolutely amazing today' written on it. Same kid of thing, just a little confidence booster that makes all the difference.
Or when people ask you what you're doing with your life. What a joy.
I'm always trying to hype up whatever I'm doing. I wish one day I wouldn't have to do that, and my work is truly interesting... 
I'm always trying to hype up whatever I'm doing. I wish one day I wouldn't have to do that, and my work is truly interesting... 
All I want to do is make cool shit (airplanes and sustainable energy) *and* I know how to do it. But employers don't like the way my pee looks.   Makes it hard to find a good living. Not having a good living isn't helping my depressive state.  
At 22 I was living home, working at Walmart, and spending all my money on booze.   I'm turning 27 in a week. I live on my own in the city, work for a global advertising agency, and write commercials for a living.   Still dealing with depression (though I've had long periods where it went away). But things change if you want them too. Try to go to school for anything, ANYTHING. The only person who can change your future is you. 
What did you do between ages 22 and 27 to get to where you are now?
Can I ask where do you live? As an American it comforts me a little that other countries are like that.
The Irish countryside, a typical Catholic densely populated rural settlement. I think things may be different in the towns and cities. You would never hear of people calling it their 'parent house' it is always 'the family home'. Don't get me wrong though, it is still a miserable part of the world.
Bro stfu seriously, some people can't afford to move out at 22, making it out like its this horrible thing is actually quite insulting actually.
i know that, i'm one of those people, it sounds horrible to me because 90% of my 'friends' have already moved out either for college or a job and it feels shitty knowing i'm 10 steps behind them in everything
I feel you. I’ve shared this theory with others and the feedback was...not positive, but tbh it makes sense given how physically stressful (emphasis on a sedentary lifestyle) and emotionally isolating contemporary American life can be for folks. We’re also encouraged (and, by our capitalist system, forced) to view one another as competitors for limited resources, which contributes to poor mental health.
The feedback isn't positive because people can't handle the truth. Our lives are unnaturally and unprecedentedly detached from nature and traditional human social norms. More and more over the past hundred years.   It's the high price of capitalism. There are plenty of other symptoms, but I think highly sensitive people really bear the brunt of the mental emotional suffering caused by these changes. 
The feedback isn't positive because people can't handle the truth. Our lives are unnaturally and unprecedentedly detached from nature and traditional human social norms. More and more over the past hundred years.   It's the high price of capitalism. There are plenty of other symptoms, but I think highly sensitive people really bear the brunt of the mental emotional suffering caused by these changes. 
Agree with everyone above. Well said by all.
Yes I feel this way always. Objectively I really can't find anything about myself that I think is good or likeable.  No amount of gym, work, promotions, degrees .....nothing. I consider myself (not always...sometimes I have positive feelings about myself) as a shooting failure in ALL respects.  I truly despise myself to the point that on the really bad days I go to work without watching myself in the mirror because I can't bear it.
You're not alone. Showering/brushing teeth in the dark on some particularly bad mornings is a staple of my routine.   I always avoid going to the bathroom at work, due to the shitty lighting and cramped space making me look terrible. 
yes!! like i’m just one of those people who isn’t strong enough for everyday life. 
same here! it’s so hard just to keep my eyes open in the morning, and i can rarely concentrate on anything for a solid minute at this point. it’s like im not even living, in a sense.
Have you ever looked into medication for anxiety? Medication has helped me a lot 
I heard a lot of bad stories about meds, but at this point I think I should give it a try. Any recommendations? 
I heard a lot of bad stories about meds, but at this point I think I should give it a try. Any recommendations? 
Talk to a psychiatrist.  There’s a lot of variety and everyone responds a bit differently to the meds so it should be taken with supervision.
Medication is a temporary solution to anxiety.  It's proven that therapy alone is more effective than either just medication or both therapy and medication.  Benzo's are a nightmare to come off of. 
Do you have a source for that?
You want to hear something depressing? I introduced my best friend to the only girl I've ever loved. Told him to ask her to a banquet we had. I would have but was too afraid, and I didn't want her to go alone.  They're getting married in a few months. I still love her.  Edit: I'm humbled by the support here. Thanks so much everyone, it really means a lot to me.
I can only imagine the ache in your heart.
Do you ever think that if she found out that you love her, she would feel shitty and in turn you would feel guilty because you think you made her feel shitty ? Because i was in a similar situation and it made me go nuts on myself.
Yeah. I've never told anyone how I felt about her except Reddit though. I can't ever tell her. No matter what, at least one relationship would be forever ruined. Maybe more.  Best I can hope for is someone else to love. To make me forget and move on. 
For me it's the embarrassment. They are going places in life and have met friends and gone to other countries. I haven't done anything. I don't have a plan beyond next week. I have nothing to talk about if they ask.
I feel you. I get scared if people ask me ''what I'm up to'. I'm trying to be ok with it. It's hard.
I feel you. I get scared if people ask me ''what I'm up to'. I'm trying to be ok with it. It's hard.
Oh I hate getting asked that question so much! I feel like such an idiot when I tell them I'm still doing the same crap as 5 years ago.
Oh I hate getting asked that question so much! I feel like such an idiot when I tell them I'm still doing the same crap as 5 years ago.
Yup same. And that is actually ok! But somehow my brain warps it into the idea that I'm failing somehow. One of the reasons I don't do Facebook anymore. 
I delete Facebook because seeing the happiness/success of others is so bothersome to me. 
I did the same about a year ago and never been happier to just focus on my daily life rather than reading all the boasting and ranting of friends. 
Story of my life. It's even worse when you realize you should feel happy for them but you're just stuck in this vortex of self loathing and jealousy
[deleted]    ^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^0.4934   > [What is this?](https://pastebin.com/64GuVi2F/21455)
[deleted]    ^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^0.4934   > [What is this?](https://pastebin.com/64GuVi2F/21455)
I feel the same. Maybe there's something we're missing. It's just hard to see.
I feel the same. Maybe there's something we're missing. It's just hard to see.
I really hope so. I just think over and over again if it's only our shared past that keeps my friendships alive and they don't like the person I have become. I mean I don't even  like the person I have become.
I'm in the same boat.   Everyone else is doing just shooting great, accomplishing things, achieving milestones, being successful. And why shouldn't they? They're good people, who worked for it or just got lucky.   The worst part of it is that you're not a factor in any of that. You don't matter, and you're still shooted. 
Right. Social media especially sucks because I see all these people going on great adventures, getting awesome jobs, getting engaged, graduating etc. And of course people always say you only get to see people's bests. But shoot me right, if I was posting about the best parts of my life it would be like 'check out this box of chicken nuggets I scored for 20% off today' not 'finally graduated law school!!' So I reserve the right to be a little shooting envious haha.
I'm a med student and I am required to repeat my 3rd year. Right now I just made it into 4th year but there are still lumps and bumps along the way. My original cohort of classmates are graduating in 2 weeks time and it has made me feel such a failure and regret of not able to graduate the same time. Watching them from afar in the campus already make my heartache. 
i couldnt graduate same time as my friends because of depression and anxiety, watching them all celebrate and not being a part of it, not being in any photos etc was so sad. I will graduate on my own with none of my friends in a shittier location in middle of cold winter.. on a monday.... so no celebration after. shittttt
That sounds like envy..not depression per se
I'd say there's a difference. Envy is wanting what they have and wanting them to fail. What can happen with depression is that seeing others doing so well when you aren't is just a confirmation that you were correct when you told yourself you were worthless all those times. It doesn't necessarily have malice against the one doing well, just despair that you can't be like them.
Don't worry, soon enough they'll completely stop talking to you because they have moved on to a more superior kind of life surrounded by other successful people. 
Ouch. Trying to muster up the courage to explain to some of my friends why I've seemingly cut them out of my life and this hits close to home; seeing them around school laughing with their group of accomplished, attractive, outgoing *other friends.*
Start by cleaning your sink, that should help
Yeah I feel noticeably less stressed after doing dishes that I've been putting off
At least you got some weed man...
I know right? I've got back pain and have been making do with otc meds to handle it, and struggling to keep up with cleaning and other stuff. Sometimes depression comes just from being so frustrated that I am ineffectual and can't seem to get everything done.
>I have to explain to her over and over that lazy is not wanting to get up and do the fishes because the couch is comfy.  There's a wealth of good reasons not to do the fishes.  >Also, people don't fantasize about committing suicide because they're lazy.  I actually do fantasize about suicide when I'm lazy, haha. *Wouldn't it be great if I didn't have to finish this paper right now?*
LMAO! *Dishes  my bad. I have a feeling you knew what I was saying.  Perhaps 'fantasizing' was the wrong word. 'Planning' may have been more appropriate. Or 'intending.'
LMAO! *Dishes  my bad. I have a feeling you knew what I was saying.  Perhaps 'fantasizing' was the wrong word. 'Planning' may have been more appropriate. Or 'intending.'
Haha, I figured, but I couldn't resist the jab. Yeah, I can imagine that planning to kill yourself because you're lazy would be a non-starter.
Holy shit. I️ totally understand what you’re saying and have also felt this way whenever I get depressed. And hey maybe i am a little lazy but I’ve gotten out of those depressive slumps and I just know I’m not that lazy of a person. When it’s physically difficult for you to get out of bed ... that’s not normal and that’s definitely not being lazy. Please don’t feel that way about yourself !! 
But what if I just have sleeping problems *and* am lazy?
'Laziness' as a concept makes no sense.  I've never met anyone who wasn't willing to work for what they truly want.    Laziness is merely a word used to describe people uninterested in doing what *I* want them to do.  At worst, your priorities can be misplaced.
This is a brilliant aspect my friend.
My parents convinced me by hinting to me I might just be a lazy parasite(exact words used). My doctors did not agree.
Ugh, why is this so common with some parents.
Ugh, why is this so common with some parents.
I can imagine there are other reasons too, but with one of my parents I believe it was because a) she didn't realize that depression is a real thing and b) she has a tendency to try and convince herself that nothing is wrong with me because she cares about me and doesn't want to see me hurt. So in her mind, it was better to believe that I'm lazy than clinically depressed.
I can imagine there are other reasons too, but with one of my parents I believe it was because a) she didn't realize that depression is a real thing and b) she has a tendency to try and convince herself that nothing is wrong with me because she cares about me and doesn't want to see me hurt. So in her mind, it was better to believe that I'm lazy than clinically depressed.
That's a very nice way to put it. I hope that you're right. 
I stay up late pretty much every night. The sooner I go to sleep, the sooner I have to wake up and face another day of work, or if it's the weekend, another day of feeling like there are all these things I 'should' be doing with my time but not being able to decide what to do. I hate mornings because of that pressure to do something. The end of the day is the only time I feel like I'm off the hook.
I'm the exact same way.
I lie in bed with my brain whirring at a million miles an hour, thinking about everything, so I have to stay up late every night, until I'm totally exhausted.
I used to have problems with this every single night until I started doing mindfulness training before I go to sleep. Really helped me to organize my thoughts and go through all that happened throughout the day. Worked wonders for my anxiety. It might not work for you but it's worth a shot. 
I lie in bed with my brain whirring at a million miles an hour, thinking about everything, so I have to stay up late every night, until I'm totally exhausted.
Weed helps. 
Weed helps. 
Hm but that won't help fix the stuff that's actually wrong. Thanks though.
Hm but that won't help fix the stuff that's actually wrong. Thanks though.
You may be surprised though. Just the fact that it can help you sleep can mean the world. Getting regular sleep, even with weed, helped me get my depression under control.   I won't lie to you and say it is a miracle drug. I am mentally addicted to weed for sure but man my life has improved since I started smoking.  My memory has been effected but I take the trade off.    
I'm doing this right now. Its 1:24am here and I have to get up at 6... I can't sleep because I think too much and I am afraid of going to work... Sunday ist the worst day for me :/
It's stupid because if I could just go to sleep properly every night, I'd probably feel great and sociable at work. 
Probably going to do that tonight. I have to write an in class essay tomorrow on a book I haven't read. Dang me. 
Sparknotes.
Sparknotes.
That's the plan. Just need to get the motivation to even read the shooting sparknotes..
General for anyone suffering: If any way possible, find an occupation you will enjoy. If in school, change your major if you're not going in the direction you want. The years go by fast. The corporate world can chew people up. We shouldn't be on this earth to be miserable. 
If the rest of my life were any more worthwhile than my professional life, this would probably be really good advice to take.
Yup...school makes me worry a lot... makes my Sunday's miserable.. 
You procrastinating on any hw right now? I am. The thing is, it's so simple. Just a one page essay thing and studying but ugh. I can't get myself to do it just yet.
Yes. It's like everything resets and I have to go through all the ups and downs, stress, worry all over again and again. It hardly ever feels like a continuation of the previous week. I guess that's a sign that building and maintaining contentment and happiness is very difficult with depression.
This is exactly how I feel but I've never been able to explain it quite like this before. It doesn't help that my manager seems to reset his opinion of everyone each week too. You can have a great week but get off to a rough start the following week and he forgets all about that 
I take a klonopin every sunday evening
just took mine about an hour ago... i feel you.
Taking those exams? Take a xanny
And then before you know it you've drunken a pint of vodka and popped 3 more xanax and are trying not to succumb to a psychotic break lol  Source: am there right now, except too much of a loser for college so more like I'm just trying to tire myself as much as possible so I can sleep another 16 hours tomorrow to waste as much of the day as possible  song that helps: https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=Pn4xxA3Mj8I
I really hope you had a good day
I had a great day :) thank you 
This is very similar to my story. Psychedlics introduced me to that world and since then I've been working on clearing my depression with dramatic success.
I was introduced to psychedelics shortly after an epiphany I had last year that showed me who we really were. For so long I believed I was *just* a human who was stuck in this poor lifestyle. The epiphany showed me how death was an illusion too. Psychedelics have played a huge part in my growth since then and I'm so thankful for this medicine. 
I remember reading somewhere that this inner voice is how we were talked to in childhood.... Can't recall the literature but it was astounding....
That sounds so interesting!! 
I feel the opposite. Like it's telling me good advice and how I should do things properly, but I never listen to it and lead myself into despair.
I sometimes also hear a voice telling me good things but my inner demon is stronger. It's like, I have both an angel and a demon in my head, and the demon is just more powerful.
I sometimes also hear a voice telling me good things but my inner demon is stronger. It's like, I have both an angel and a demon in my head, and the demon is just more powerful.
I feel like the voice in my head is just me. I've been telling myself how to get back on track but I'm completely uninterested in following my own advice. I've always been really annoyed that I never listen to myself but at this point just doesn't care anymore.
It won't happen. Not because people don't care but because they are awkward and worried about upsetting you or pushing boundaries.   Please give up on being passive and work towards actively looking for help. People care I promise. Just be selective. Some people are also, for lack of a better term, 'fake' and will disappoint you.
ManiacMan could not be more spot on. When you answer “yes” it’s human nature not to goad you into an even more uncomfortable situation. Be honest with others if asked and you’re open to discussion. The weight on your shoulders only increases every time you lie and say yes. Say no and relieve yourself
I just say 'same as usual', and they assume that it means I'm okay.  Ha ha ha  Ha ha  Ha
Hey, same here. I hate lies so it works great. Chill is also a decent alternative, since you can be depressed and also be chilling about.
I just say 'same as usual', and they assume that it means I'm okay.  Ha ha ha  Ha ha  Ha
Your sad laughing made me laugh. It’s so accurate!!!
please, if you need to be honest with someone, don't make it a code they have to decipher. just be honest. 'are you okay?' 'no, I'm really not.' 
But will they actually really care? 
But will they actually really care? 
I'm not them, so I don't know. I think you want to know someone truly cares about you, rather than ask whether you're ok or not. We all want that, so I understand. I hope you find this if you don't already have it! 
This is the hardest part for me. I feel like if I'm honest asking for help... I feel like I'm just begging for attention. There's this small part of me that even when I get close to suicidal still thinks I'm faking for attention.
Yup. A friend texted me Saturday eve if everything was okay and I said yes, I'm sorry I texted so late.   I feel like everyone is dealing with stuff and it's not their job to make me feel okay. That's on me.
Yup. A friend texted me Saturday eve if everything was okay and I said yes, I'm sorry I texted so late.   I feel like everyone is dealing with stuff and it's not their job to make me feel okay. That's on me.
You have to remember that people do care about you. I deal with this too. It's the depression that's telling you you're not so important to them that they'd want to know if something was wrong, because they do. 
Why don't you tell them no? 
not op, but i've been continuously saying 'no' when asked if i'm okay. they don't give advice, or consolation, or anything at all that's helpful. They just pat me on the shoulder and flash me a smile. saying no does not get me anywhere. actively seeking help does not get me anywhere
not op, but i've been continuously saying 'no' when asked if i'm okay. they don't give advice, or consolation, or anything at all that's helpful. They just pat me on the shoulder and flash me a smile. saying no does not get me anywhere. actively seeking help does not get me anywhere
They don't know what to do either.
I do but it doesn't change a thing if I don't explain afterwards.
I understand. Well let's hope you keep moving forward towards solutions, even if it's not solutions you want. 
Are you ok?
Thank you. :) I will be.
My dad asked this twice when we had our annual family getaway.. i said 'yes, just tired' twice. I felt so cliched. Are you okay? Pm is all i have here compared to IRL
'Just tired' is my go to line too.
'Just tired' is my go to line too.
Same, people just shrug it off so I can continue to avoid confrontation.
I upvote because I can relate and have similar thoughts as the poster..
I could say the same OP.
Do you feel that way about other people's posts? If not, then it's unlikely that everyone feels that way about yours.
Yeah, that's a good point. I don't feel like that about others, but being honest, I don't really answer posts...I try to a lot of times, but I just end up deleting the message when I see I'm not gonna help the person in any way :/ I don't know... but yeah, good point, and thanks for answering :)
Nice way to get karma you ween
That wasn't necessary...
Nope, I'm just an idiot, it's how I cope
Maybe you need to be...wiped.
This is why things like 'Like', 'Upovote' and the other similar system shouldn't exist in the  internet forum or social media, because it sometimes contribute to our depression.
Thats a very narrow minded thing to say, it has its benefits for me it doesn't contribute to my depression or anything I just don't care about it but I agree that it affects people doesn't mean it shouldn't exist tho.
And?... It just happens.
I'm not understanding the point of the OP either. This is reddit in a nutshell, don't give it so much weight. All a thread is is one person propositioning a notion and others going 'Hmm, good point' and nudging it upwards or downwards. Hate to say it but if you want meaningful help you're gonna go a lot farther with people IRL
I'm not understanding the point of the OP either. This is reddit in a nutshell, don't give it so much weight. All a thread is is one person propositioning a notion and others going 'Hmm, good point' and nudging it upwards or downwards. Hate to say it but if you want meaningful help you're gonna go a lot farther with people IRL
I think OP (I might be wrong, but I've experienced this feeling before) might be a bit sad cause there aren't many people in real life to talk to so it's like screaming into an online void for help. Sometimes posting times matter a lot, and we all stay up till different weird times so maybe we aren't catching enough stuff in the rising queue at the right time, OP. Sorry if you felt embarrassed enough to delete this post, dear OP, if you're reading. I've done that a lot.
So shooting often. One day I can see my future so clearly, and the next I look around and there's nothing solid for me to grab onto. I'm lost and confused. I only have the ability to imagine, not to do
'who told you the night is to sleep? No, no, you see, the night is to destroy a life. To analyse what was already analysed a billion times. To imagine conversations, which you will never have a courage to start. The night is to create new huge plans for the future, only to forget them in the morning. The night is a headache, nausea, from imagined affections'  ~Éric-Emmanuel Schmitt, my translation is crude tho
This happens to me all the time. It's usually late at night when I feel motivated and then when I get up the next morning I feel like shit again.
Exactly.  In the mornings, I just want to go back to sleep and not deal with anything for a few hours.  Night time is much better.
Good on you! Showers for me can be hard to get into, but damn near impossible to get out of.Good luck on your walks next week. It's crazy how much better you can feel after getting some fresh air.
'Walks do wonders'
I have a clear memory last year after having gone through a lot with my psychiatrist, i woke up the next having feeling energised and cleaned my room, decided to message an old friend to meet up some time soon. It was going to be my week. He saw the message and didn't reply. The next day i felt the energy leave. No reply. Downward slope back to normal.   But those peak days are great for my house at least.
Nice username! 
My good feeling days last at best like a week. But then my bad days usually lasts like a month. I don't know about you guys, but my worst periods are always spring time. That has been past 3 years now
Same here. It builds up over the winter, but spring always seems to be the worst for me. I'm not sure why. But my guess is that it's to do with my birthday being in May. So it's the approach to the marker of another year of feeling like I haven't achieved anything.  I was aware of it for the first time (though it could have happened before) before my 24th birthday. I turned 30 this year.  I don't know what to do about it.
I'm so sorry for your loss. 
Thank you. 
I'm sorry for your loss. When people are depressed, they can convince themselves that the world is better off without them and that they are helping others with their death. You've been there for her through her tough times, and I'm sure she appreciated it. Time will make it less painful for you, and I'm glad that you don't see suicide as an option. You're also a good man for trying to understand your wife, despite what she has done. I wish you the best and the ability to cope.
Thank you. Just starting to learn how to cope now. I'll have to learn quickly I guess. 
Thank you. Just starting to learn how to cope now. I'll have to learn quickly I guess. 
You learn as you go.  Grief and coping with loss is different for everyone.  Don't put a timeline on yourself, don't try to cope 'quickly.'  Whatever your grief entails, just hang in, reach out, and ride it out.  Both you and your wife deserve that.  Don't try to make any feelings you've got go away.  I am so so sorry for your loss.
good luck. It broke me.
I'm sorry to hear that. I expect the same. 
The next time I spiral down and start to believe that my boyfriend would be better off without me, I will try to think of you and your story. Thank you for sharing. I'm so sorry for your loss. I hope you can continue to be strong. 
Thank you for saying this. I hope my side helps for the future. It makes me feel like there is hope. 
I'm sitting in my car in the parking lot of my new job. Crying. Just like I do every day on my smoke breaks.  I lost mine to suicide last July. The regret of not saving her is too much for me. I hope you fare better than I have.
You can't save people. You can only love them.   I am very sorry for your loss. 
I'm sorry for your loss, but you should see a therapist it might help.
Yes. I'm looking for one now. 
I don't know you, but I want to help you in any way I can. If you need financial help, I'll assist. If you need a friend, I'll be one. No one should have to go through this.
Thank you, but I am financially stable and my friends I believe will be there for me. I'm not looking for anything really, but I appreciate the sentiment. 
Thank you. This was good to read. To know that it does get easier is something I need to hear. Probably repeatedly from many different people. I am trying to push myself to communicate. It's only been 36 hours so we'll see how it goes. 
With just 36hours behind you, you may still be in shock but thankfully you found some strength in the above thread. You have some good advice there and remember to reach out for help. People are here for you. 
I feel terrible for doing it but I often tell my partner that I want to kill myself. Hearing something like this makes me really think about what I'm saying to him. I'm very sorry that you are going through this, and I'm sorry that she felt there were no more options.
I don't know what I expected to get out of this post, but if just you decide to make a change then I think it is worth it. I can only say that this is the worst place I have ever been and your SO would be in the same place I imagine. Good luck. 
I don't know what I expected to get out of this post, but if just you decide to make a change then I think it is worth it. I can only say that this is the worst place I have ever been and your SO would be in the same place I imagine. Good luck. 
Thank you. And I know, it would absolutely destroy him but sometimes I think I'm only ruining his life by being alive. Sometimes that feeling is so overwhelming.   But yes, your post has made me think and I thank you for sharing. Again, I'm so, so sorry for your loss
As a wife who finds herself in a similar position I am thankful you shared. I have been having a really hard time and I have been hiding it as much as I can. I can hardly keep the house clean and I feel like I'm letting my husband down. I constantly think how he would be happier and better off without me. I am so sorry for your loss and I hurt for both of you. Your in my thoughts.
Please don't hide it. My wife was always very secretive. Her friends are only just finding out now about everything that has been going on and they all have the same response. 'I wish I had known so that I could have done more.' I can't say people won't judge, but more people will be supportive than you realize. No one will be happier if you commit suicide. 
I'm sorry, but I can not respect her decision. I don't mean to start a fight, but I don't think she made this choice in the best state of mind and I can't accept (at least for now) that it was the best option. Maybe one day I will learn to see things differently. 
I completely understand. I am so sorry for your loss. 
Oh wow, sometimes Reddit is such a confronting place.  You're not being selfish at all. Take very good care of yourself the coming period in your life. I wish you all the best and lots of strength. Do you have people around you that you can talk to? Talk a lot; throw it all out. Take long walks. Cry a lot. Eat well, sleep well. 
Thank you. Im lucky that all of my and her friends have come out to support me. I have a strong group of friends and I just need to remind myself to rely on them. Eating is hard. I feel sick all the time. 
Why is it not a solution?
I think this depends on perspective. To the person suffering ,suicide is a way out. To the loved ones everything is much, much worse. As I said, I believe she did it partially to free me, which is ironic because that will never be the case. I will always carry this with me. 
Is this true? I just want to be sure considering what today is.   If it is true, my condolences...
Yes, this is unfortunately true. 
Ha he doesn't know anything yet, give it a few years kid then you'll know for sure it is the hardest thing there is
Charlie Brown certainly found that out.
I liked All Grown Up. It's Rugrats in their teen years. 
I thought it sucked.
I’m extremely sensitive. I take everything as a personal insult, if someone dislikes me then I take it very seriously! Depression removes the joy with life and makes us mindless zombies, I’m like a soldier who follows orders but is breaking on the inside.
I see only 1 stuff here wich is actually changeable : taking all as personnal insult and this kind of stuff.  You can be sensitive without this part !   I mean, before taking all for yourself, you had probably rich internal world wich have been replaced by bs. Your choice to try to reconstruct it, or not like the majority of shooting population.   Don't be mindless zombie
I see only 1 stuff here wich is actually changeable : taking all as personnal insult and this kind of stuff.  You can be sensitive without this part !   I mean, before taking all for yourself, you had probably rich internal world wich have been replaced by bs. Your choice to try to reconstruct it, or not like the majority of shooting population.   Don't be mindless zombie
I don’t want to be an mindless zombie but that’s my situation now. Depression makes me feel like an mindless zombie.
I fully believe humans have broken the 'survival of the fittest' rule all other life follows. I would've been one of those weak runts left to die by the group.  I feel defective. I totally understand. 
This. I wouldn't even be alive now without modern medicine saving me after birth and then during early childhood. And it would have been better that way.
The fact that people actually enjoy this world and find some desire to be alive in it makes my suicide all the more easy. Leave the world to the people who want to be here, they can fight for this stuff I don't even care about and be very happy about it. This is not our world, we are errors, and we should stop trying to make it something other than it is - I'm happy to leave.
Don't worry, 'normal' is a show, like Facebook vacation photos.  A lot of people are just as miserable, and in surprisingly different ways.  To live is to be unsatisfied.
Don't worry, 'normal' is a show, like Facebook vacation photos.  A lot of people are just as miserable, and in surprisingly different ways.  To live is to be unsatisfied.
Exactly, so then if life is just a continuous cycle of searching for fulfillment/satisfaction but of course never finding any, then what's the point of everything? I hate reaching a point of enlightenment so deep, that it becomes nearly impossible to become part of the illusion of life/society again. Realizing there truly are no limitations, makes the act of being forced to 'work' for your satisfaction impossible to understand and relate to.
Exactly, so then if life is just a continuous cycle of searching for fulfillment/satisfaction but of course never finding any, then what's the point of everything? I hate reaching a point of enlightenment so deep, that it becomes nearly impossible to become part of the illusion of life/society again. Realizing there truly are no limitations, makes the act of being forced to 'work' for your satisfaction impossible to understand and relate to.
When I get caught in this, I pet my cat or play with my dog.
Birth is a genetic lottery. A lot of what you described early on seems to be extrovert traits. There's a lot of research and writing out there on this topic if you're interested.
not just genetic but also lottery on the type of parents you get and socio-economic status, culture etc.... they make so much importance on who you are. 
not just genetic but also lottery on the type of parents you get and socio-economic status, culture etc.... they make so much importance on who you are. 
True. If I grew up in a refugee camp I might not know what reddit is. 
Just yesterday I found myself thinking that it’s as if I have no skin and all my nerves are exposed. But with my emotions. I feel everything so deeply and more often than not those feelings are agonising. I am tired of being in pain. 
i really really relate to and love the way you phrased that feeling. that's exactly what it feels like.  i wish you endless love and comfort.
i really really relate to and love the way you phrased that feeling. that's exactly what it feels like.  i wish you endless love and comfort.
Thank you so much and I wish you the same :) it’s amazing how much kind words from a stranger can affect you. 
The problem isn't you, it's the world that's shit.
Who would a thought that the universe, in all its glory, would have developed life in some random and miniscule area in the milky way galaxy, only to have everything dwelling there be hostile towards everything else that exists there. What a shooting joke
Yes that's how I feel exactly. I can't assert myself. I can't protect myself. The smallest criticism sends me into tears. My boyfriend gets so pissed off when I cry and he calls me a crybaby little girl. And I cry more. And he tells me to shut the shoot up. That I'm just doing it to annoy him. But I can't help it, when I'm upset, I cry. I feel so pathetic all the time.
Your boyfriend sounds abusive, you are allowed to cry, it is a normal human emotion to release our feelings through our tears, your boyfriend doesn’t sound like a good person at all 
I just wish somebody would miss me...
*hugs* 
I feel you. People talk to me about losing someone they love, and i always think it would just be nice to get to experience loving someone enough to miss them, or for them to miss me
Ive been on vacation for about 5 weeks now and ive gotten texts from maybe three people. Nobody really gives a shit that im gone. Nobody will give a shit when i come back... Same as always. 
Ive been on vacation for about 5 weeks now and ive gotten texts from maybe three people. Nobody really gives a shit that im gone. Nobody will give a shit when i come back... Same as always. 
It was my birthday yesterday. One person outside of the family congratulated me... Hurray, right? Not to mention New Years Eve - I sat by myself playing video games.
This hit me pretty hard, because my name is Matt and I've felt exactly like this...
same here, i know that feel bro
The part where he types but never hits send...
or the part we all just stare at what we wrote and backspace it all and write something trivial.
or the part we all just stare at what we wrote and backspace it all and write something trivial.
tears 
or the part we all just stare at what we wrote and backspace it all and write something trivial.
this^
I miss you, Emily.
I miss you Kate, even after everything I did and you did. 
I miss you, Emily.
Miss you, Frederick.
I miss you, Emily.
Ugh. Can I try that?  I miss you so much, Meg.  Keep searching the obits for your name. Hope yer okay. 
since i havent ever expressed outloud, i miss you michelle.
I miss you Zephyr...thank you for the 3 years of happiness...
Too late for me to comment? I miss you Alyssa. Thank you for making me happy as short lived as it was.... 
never too late.
What's the source of this? If you did this, it is pretty amazing.
not sure of the source, just saw it a while ago. :(
not sure of the source, just saw it a while ago. :(
ah, no problem. Thanks for sharing, it's quite resonant with how I feel sometimes.
This is truly powerful. It captures perfectly how so many of us feel but don't want to admit. On a side note am I the only one not named matt on reddit?!
im not, so that makes two of us. :)
Does anyone else like talking to people more so through IM than in person? 
i wish people still used IM so I could talk to them. now its all this newfangled expensive ipod stuff that i dont use.  like when people say 'text me' the only text i send is 'can i call you?'
Did you draw this?
no, i did not.
I am so relieved to hear I am not the only one that has gone through this exact situation, however, I hit send...feelsbadman
that feels
Why are depressed guys always depicted as having that same goofy haircut? 
dunno, maybe says something about being disheveled? 
I don't miss anyone.
im jealous. i sincerely hope this continues for you.
im jealous. i sincerely hope this continues for you.
Why do you miss people, I can't even comprehend why I would miss anyone.
Why do you miss people, I can't even comprehend why I would miss anyone.
I don't miss anyone in particular but I do miss the idea of having someone to miss.  I do miss some human contact and interaction.
This is escape number three for me. I'm thousands of miles away from home with little intention to return.  Running away didn't solve the problem. The newness fades. You'll fall back into the same old habits. I might as well still be home.  Don't give these escapist fantasies any power over you. Instead, make an honest, rational plan for how to live an easier, more interesting life using what you already have.
> Instead, make an honest, rational plan for how to live an easier, more interesting life using what you already have.  This honestly makes me sad as shoot, because I know I can't achieve that. Can I just disappear and go to NYC?
> Instead, make an honest, rational plan for how to live an easier, more interesting life using what you already have.  This honestly makes me sad as shoot, because I know I can't achieve that. Can I just disappear and go to NYC?
A darkness carried in the heart cannot be destroyed by moving the body from one place to another, change comes from within primarily.  
Wherever you go, there you are.
ain't that the truth
I did it instead of killing myself...guess what...IT WORKED. Just give it a chance not every day is going to be pizza and blowjobs no matter what. Have a positive outlook if you can too. 
How bout pizza and handjobs?
Stop believing the images of what u think people think u should be.
How can i discern them from my 'true' self. I dont really even know what that is
I've done it twice, and I think about doing it again all the time.
how did you do it? I don't want to kill myself I'm just bored with this society and want to get away. Not sure how to do it.. Gotta eat after all.
how did you do it? I don't want to kill myself I'm just bored with this society and want to get away. Not sure how to do it.. Gotta eat after all.
I have done it as well.....let me just wherever you go there you are. That warning withstanding there are many places in the world that are cheap to travel:  passport & 10 year visa to india: $260 NYC to DEL one way: $672  So for ~1k you can get somewhere. For $15 a day or around $500 a month you can roam around, sleep and eat.    
I was literally just fantasizing about leaving when I happened on this thread. In a year and a half I'm out of here. Forever. Be it by death or by Boeing 737.  Edit for spelling
>by death or by Boeing 737  That may be a good movie or book title.
>by death or by Boeing 737  That may be a good movie or book title.
Remind me to sue when some lurker copyrights it first. 
Everyday.  But no matter where you go, there you are. 
Run from your problems but you can't run from yourself.
Why not  start a new sub about this? It seems there are enough people interested in the idea of starting over.
r/iwantout
Yeah, kinda. I try to numb my mind as much as I can so I can survive through it without thinking bad stuff. I watch a lot of shows and sleep a lot just to turn my mind off and I hope that tomorrow is a better day for trying to put my brain in the right place. I do what I can, never losing hope so that I can try again whenever I feel a bit more confident that things can be better.
Yeah, I'm the same. I end up doing things that I don't even enjoy just to pass the time and distract myself from all the depressing thoughts, but especially in school I feel helpful, I struggle to speak to people, even my friends, because the things they say can trigger my sadness, so I just end up listening to music by myself. I struggle to even do work because it isn't distracting enough to stop the shit thoughts.
Yes and very,very empty.
Yeah I feel very little on those days, but I suppose its better than wanting to kill myself.
yeah, having non-functional/severely depressed parents is hard as hell. 
yes
Well i guess I'm going one step further and not have a partner? So I don't drag him/her down with me
Same here. I can’t even fantasize about someone putting up with me or loving me. 
Same here. I can’t even fantasize about someone putting up with me or loving me. 
I’m in the same boat. I’ve never really had a relationship before, because how can someone love me when I’m such a sad broken person? Hell, I don’t even want to be around myself and I am myself.
I’m in the same boat. I’ve never really had a relationship before, because how can someone love me when I’m such a sad broken person? Hell, I don’t even want to be around myself and I am myself.
Same here. 
I was talking to a 70 year old guy about this. I’m a 25yo not married and am happily single (mostly), enjoying my life and traveling. The dude was happy for me that I was out living my life for me, and somehow the convo changed to mental health. He told me to figure out if my potential life partners had mental health problems early on, so you can know what to expect for yourself and your kids.   I think we deserve things and partners. 
That's a fair approach.
I feel the same, but i think i will not be alive to actually have then anyway
I don't expect to live, but if I do, I don't expect to have anyone.  If I have someone, I don't expect to have kids.  If I have kids, I will do everything I can so they don't end up like me.  But they will.
I don't expect to live, but if I do, I don't expect to have anyone.  If I have someone, I don't expect to have kids.  If I have kids, I will do everything I can so they don't end up like me.  But they will.
Exactly, i feel you 
I find it so cruel to bring more people into this horrible existence, when there's already so many children suffering who are living in horrible conditions and need help. People love to say that suicide is 'selfish', but I can't imagine anything as selfish as creating another human being who has to go through all the horrible things that come with life, just because you wanted to cum inside your wife. 
I've always thought this way too. But not even just for the desire to have unprotected sex. Just having kids because you want to be a parent is insanely selfish, because life is a shooting nightmare and making your own innocent, unsuspecting offspring face this world is a horrible thing to do, and all because you were lonely and wanted to make a family.   I'm not against families, I just think the entire thing is out of selfishness.
Dang the responsibility of it too. I don't know how anyone struggling could raise kids and still be happy. It'd just be another thing that needs tending to. 
Bloody expensive, too. Rather spend the money on myself and loved ones.
Yep, that's one of the reasons not to have kids for me too. Other is- I would be not capable to raise them. I have a hard time managing my anger, crying babies just makes me want to kill somebody. It doesn't matter if the kid is mine or not- the sound is still annoying. I'd rather not risk it.
I'm glad I'm not the only one that's filled with murderous rage when I hear babies crying.
This is quite interesting. When I hear babies cry it makes me emotional and on the verge of tears. It's a little embarrassing though so I try to hide it. I am not sure where it came from.
I just get jealous. I wish I could express my dissatisfaction for situations so openly. 
People are different, people go through different things in different ways but not all people with depression can be good parents especially if they situation they find themselves in is less than favorable 
I understand where you’re coming from. I agree that not everyone with depression should face kids. I inherited my mom’s mental illness, which shows a possible downside of having children.  However, if someone with depression really wants children, I don’t think they should give up on that dream due to their illness. It’s ultimately up to the individual not the disease. It makes me a little upset, when people say that mentally ill people shouldn’t have kids, because I don’t like when people stigmatize it. 
Join us  r/antinatalism
We have cookies! And more importantly, no little kids to leave them half-eaten and slobbery for us!
This is totally true.  If I were to have a kid going through depression I would feel more qualified than anyone to help them navigate it.
Yea depression can be dealt with or navigated but it's better to not have it at all. If you're depressed and you want a kid, do what OP said and adopt a child that's already here who needs a home rather than risk bringing a new life into the world that frequently wishes he/she were never born
Is your depression genetic? There's also the new technology that allows you to change the genetic makeup of your child, which could be used to screen for and remove anything that would give them a predisposition to depression. Also, not having kids can be a big contributor to depression. Ultimately, you are young and have time to think. It's your choice in the end. Good luck.
Both sides of my family have a long history of depression, so I’m pretty sure it’s genetic. I’m not sure how I would feel about changing my kid’s DNA, that just sounds wrong to me 
This is completely anecdotal....but food for thought.  Having children completely changed my sister’s life.  She also suffered from depression but having someone else to look after gave her a bigger perspective on the world.   And my niece and nephew are great, happy kids.  
But if that doesn’t happen and the added work is overwhelming you can never go back 
Honestly, I have had sex with my bf since we first met, even though he was a pretty depressive guy (he's a lot better now btw). So I don't think you're completely right. Of course, we prefer to be around positive people, but love is just too complex, and sexual arousal is even more, so don't be so simplistic.  
I shared my own experience and experience of people I know IRL. Your experience is different and your point is 100% valid.  > …I always ask **myself** why even bother with such thoughts.
I think you should at least try to adopt a child. That way, even if you feel depressed, there's still something that'll make you feel better about yourself.
That’s horrible advice! 
I find over sleeping only makes me more tired. Set an alarm for 8hrs of sleep.  Edit.  And do something in the morning if you don't have shit to do all day.  It will build up momentum for the day.  Walk around a store or something.  Idc, get up and dressed for the day. leave the house.
saying 'just do something' to a depressed person :p 
saying 'just do something' to a depressed person :p 
Meh.    I'm more of a functional/reason for being depressed person.  If i don't keep on keeping on and fulfill my responsibilities, bills, food, water, etc I might as well just pull the trigger now and avoid the descent.
Drinking coffee may be a viable alternative, unless you're me. Coffee gets rid of my exhaustion and wakes me up, but then rewards me with extreme anxiety. It's like being tired and depressed serves as a defense mechanism against anxiety.
Same here. Shitty tradeoff, would you rather be mentally and emotionally exhausted....or have that same level of exhaustion turned into crippling anxiety for the next few hours. Ugh
I sleep a lot when I can. Dreams are the only time I'm happy. Honestly dreams feel like real life and waking up is the nightmare
Can you lucid dream?
Can you lucid dream?
No, but I tend to have recurring dreams where I'm in a fulfilling relationship. It just sucks to come out of that and know it's not real.
No, but I tend to have recurring dreams where I'm in a fulfilling relationship. It just sucks to come out of that and know it's not real.
Try learning to do it if you dream often there's a few things you can do to learn, it's cool I don't dream enough to be able to. Try getting out into the real world and fulfilling the dream, it's hard believe me I know that. But no ones gonna put it on a plate in front of you.
sometimes i just end up unlocking my phone and closing out of the app lol feelsbad
Alarmy won't let you
And sometimes you just too tired even to sleep.... and it is PAINFUL!
yes...I need to sleep badly, I have a headache I know is from sleep deprivation, but I can't really sleep  
Yup. The last few years that I lived with my mother (who is a very toxic person), I slept about 12 hours each night and always woke up exhausted still.  Now I go back and forth with sleep. Sometimes I sleep a lot, other times I can't sleep at all, even though I'm tired. I feel tired all the time.
Soon (and I mean VERY soon) I hope your circumstances allow you to move out. I know exactly what it's like to have toxic energy around you constantly.
Soon (and I mean VERY soon) I hope your circumstances allow you to move out. I know exactly what it's like to have toxic energy around you constantly.
Fortunately I don't live with her anymore and haven't for a few years. I do still live with another toxic parent, but that's my own fault. Hopefully I'll get off my lazy ass soon and can move out.
Fortunately I don't live with her anymore and haven't for a few years. I do still live with another toxic parent, but that's my own fault. Hopefully I'll get off my lazy ass soon and can move out.
I wish you the best friend.. life is HARD and often sucks more than we can handle.
draining to live with such people. im sorry
Yup. People suck.
I have a sleeping disorder that long predates my depression. Sometimes I can't tell how much of my exhaustion is from the disorder and how much of it is from my depression.
what disorder is it?
As someone with a crazy sleep cycle, time slept simply doesn't matter. It's making it consistent that counts. I've slept 15 hours and then had to take a nap due to exhaustion. It sucks and it's hard to fix, as I've personally been in sleep limbo for nearly a year. Try to get it under control before it goes all out, because it just makes you feel worse
I have kept sleeping later and later every day until the point where I go around the clock once every 2-2,5 weeks. I share your frustration, and can't drag myself out of bed to attempt to fix it either. 
Yes to this. Although I was starting to wonder if my brain was telling me I was exhausted just because being awake is so awful sometimes. But now I see it's not just me. 
Definitely not
Absolutely, the other night I took an ambien in an Attempt to get a full nights sleep.  Ended up getting up in the morning for an hour and going back to sleep for another 6 hours.  
While depression was still a new thing to me I would do this every day. I didn't understand anything as I've never been in touch with my emotions all that well. So I kept trying to motivate myself every morning to go to class, only to fail and go back to sleep every day. 
Omg me to I can't go a day without a nap...I could sleep all day but I force myself to get up. 
Where do you find the motivation? I find myself struggling to get out of bed - not because I'm tired but because it's my safe space.
Where do you find the motivation? I find myself struggling to get out of bed - not because I'm tired but because it's my safe space.
I have a 2yr old so that's my motivation. There's times I wish I could just stay in bed though haha 
I always get a headache if I sleep too long, but I'm still extremely exhausted every day
People never understand what I mean when I say I have a 'sleep headache,' but yeah, I get a headache if I sleep too long too. It's different to a normal headache and leaves me feeling a little disoriented. 
Idk about you but I've found depression to be more like apathy on steroids than actual sadness. I don't get sad about everything, I just stopped caring about anything. 
It's more of ripping your ability to be happy from you.   You're right -- not everyone is sad, some just don't care. I fit in both categories. I'm never really genuinely happy, but if I'm not upset, I just don't care about anything.
I read on a (supposedly) legitimate medical website the other day that 'severe depression can last from 6 months up to even 2 years'. It was the best laugh I had all week. 
Hahah...haha...haa...ha. heh. :(  Mine is tied to PTSD, but I've had it for at least 20 years now... I feel you, friend.
Hahah...haha...haa...ha. heh. :(  Mine is tied to PTSD, but I've had it for at least 20 years now... I feel you, friend.
I'm sorry to hear that, PTSD is such a shitty, unfair situation. You've had the trauma, surely that would be enough for the universe! But no, let's make sure that it continues to shoot shit up for the next '6 months up to even 2 years'.   *Two of my sisters (7 & 12) have suspected PTSD. PTSD just really pisses me off*
Met the only friend I've had in college last Saturday and I showed her my cuts. She said: 'OMG are you mentally unstable? Don't do that, people will think you are crazy!'  I just laughed. But deep inside me it hurts. Why can't people understand?
Because people are clueless unless they have been there themselves. Sometimes I wish people could experience it for a day but I wouldn't wish it on anyone so I guess they will never understand.
Because people are clueless unless they have been there themselves. Sometimes I wish people could experience it for a day but I wouldn't wish it on anyone so I guess they will never understand.
Don't you wish everyone on this board met up one day and were able to talk and relate to others about their depression
'Man, the professor gave me a B, I'm so depressed'   'Man, I can't find my jeans, life is so depressing'    'The other day I went to DQ and it was closed, Feeling suicidal right now'.
God I can't stand that. Especially the suicide stuff as it makes me doubt whether wanting to is even anything serious.
God I can't stand that. Especially the suicide stuff as it makes me doubt whether wanting to is even anything serious.
To be honest, I've been so desensitized from my suicidal thoughts that they just feel like part of my personality. 
To be honest, I've been so desensitized from my suicidal thoughts that they just feel like part of my personality. 
Same, joking about suicide to friends is somehow comforting. When they laugh it feels like we are both talking about it, but disguised in laughter.
True but you have to think...most of the people who make suicidal jokes are really suicidal but like to play it off and make jokes about it
Yeah I'm fine with that tbh. I don't mind joking about it either with someone who is too.
Completely. I am one of the ones who lies in bed all day and it seems like everyone is depressed but they still manage to get on with life and go to school/work and have friends/relationships. Just makes me feel like such a defective human.
I can get on and go to work and stuff. That's why most people don't believe me
Honestly I do. I hear a lot of people throw depression and anxiety (esp. social anxiety) around like a baseball. It feels like everyone has it and mentioning that I do too would just be equivalent to me being a rain drop in an ocean, like complaining about having to get a job. *Everyone has to deal with it so what's your problem?*
EXACTLY you described it much better than i ever would have been able to put into words.
I wish I could up vote this 500 times. Depression is a serious game changer, it is a medical issue. There are chemicals involved and everything! (That last bit was a joke, kinda). 
I love it when depressed people crack jokes.
be careful with people who will accuse attention seekers though, i got accused of using it to be an attention seeker.  i was desperately reaching out for help because my brain wanted me dead, so if thats attention seeking then shoot anyone who thinks its a bad thing.
amen to that
I'm not an attention seeker..but I do listen to depressing music and I sketch a little...to me...depression doesn't help my creativity...it makes me less motivated to create...I have a hard time opening my sketch book anymore.  I do wish people would listen to my music but I didn't make it...sometimes I wish that someone I know would hear a song I listen to and realize I'm suffering...but that would never happen since most of the songs I listen sound happy but have depressing lyrics.  but whatever...
Totally feel you. When I'm low I just can't make any artwork. I don't know how people have these sparks of genius in there dark time.
Totally feel you. When I'm low I just can't make any artwork. I don't know how people have these sparks of genius in there dark time.
haha ikr...I feel like everything I make sucks when I'm depressed
I'm in no way saying people that aren't diagnosed aren't depressed  just most people I've met that told me they were depressed haven't ever talked to anyone and clearly aren't depressed. just personal experience
That's fair. My counseling was through my university, so I was never actually diagnosed with anything. In the next couple weeks I'm going to be seeing a therapist and asking if medication would be right for me. The way I figure is that it can't go on for this long and not be something, you know?
most that say they have it arent actually diagnosed from my experience. theyre having a bad couple weeks and tell people theyre depressed.
I feel like this some times. I went to a therapist for about a year, and got an anti-depressant prescription from a psychiatrist. And I still sometimes feel that I'm just lazy and looking for an excuse.
Yes. I've even started doubting myself if I'm really depressed or not. Partly why I don't want to see a psych. 
i'm always questioning myself. i see a therapist but a lot of time while i am there i just feel like i'm taking the therapists precious time away from someone who really needs it. 
similar thing happened to me! i went to a new therapist and i was particularly stressed with relationship issues that week and she blew me off saying that i'm not depressed/anxious, i just am having boyfriend troubles and its a rough patch and i'll get over it
holy shit... a therapist told you that?? wow... I hope you found a better one!
holy shit... a therapist told you that?? wow... I hope you found a better one!
yeah that was the first and last time i saw that lady. left me feeling totally invalidated though.
Sometimes. I've wanted to post to here for awhile now but I don't want to seem I'm looking for pity. I just need someone to talk to sometimes that won't judge me. 
my inbox is open for anyone who wants to talk to someone who can empathize <3
can you expand on this?
Yes. Some part of my depression circles around a defense mechanism that tries to keep me 'safe' and it's very seductive. I rarely leave my house and in a way I feel 'happy'. This leads me to stop showering and brushing my teeth. I feel miserable but glad
I know exactly what you mean.  I feel like I have to justify my depression.  Like it's genetic. My mom has it, my brother has it and my grandma had it. I'm not making it up, but sometimes I feel like people think I am. 
yes exactly this. but i feel like if i told my family they'd just tell me im stressed out and have nothing to be depressed about or i'm just sad or i need hobbies. 
I have no social skills. Everything I do is awkward and forced.
Exactly. It's like I'm too self-aware sometimes. Like I closely monitor every movement, facial expression, and tone of voice in social situations. 
Exactly. It's like I'm too self-aware sometimes. Like I closely monitor every movement, facial expression, and tone of voice in social situations. 
Me too. Why are we like this
I'm known for being bubbly and cheery. It comes naturally to me around other people, I can't turn it off and it is exhausting because I'm putting on a face. I end up avoiding social situations because of it, sometimes I'm too tired to pretend
Same. I end up avoiding people because I just don't want to show them this side of me that would be completely foreign to them. It makes me feel like all my interactions with people are fake and after a while it can take a toll when you're starving for months or years without a real, genuine connection with someone.
100%. I think it's because I desperately crave approval and positive reactions. If someone around me isn't feeling their best or finds my presence off-putting, it sends me into a shame spiral. So, I have to make sure everyone around me is happy and also perceives me as a friendly person.
Ahh I also need external validation to feel good about myself. I never thought of it like this but this absolutely makes sense
At least depression isn't as stigmatized as it was like a decade ago when they'd just label you straight up crazy
Yes it's fortunate that we were born in a more empathetic age.
Keeping up a believable facade is exhausting. Recently receiving comments like 'I wish I had your confidence' and 'you're always so cheerful' has left me feeling disjointed/guilty of deceit. It's surprising how others fail to pick up on the artificiality of it all.
This. People will say I have 'confidence' but the truth is I'm too depressed to pay most social conventions any mind. The reality is I'm an insecure wreck that doesn't care about things like other people do.
I switched off my birthday notification on FB because I didn't feel like having to muster some semblance of gratitude once a year just because people took 3 seconds to say 'happy birthday.' Although now I've realized that the only people who even know when it is are my immediate family members.  Also, my response to people commenting on the sternness of my neutral expression is to say I have a condition called 'RBF.' It's good for a chuckle and helps dodge the bullet. 
I did the same thing. And irl ive asked my family that if they must give me a present please let it be that i have no party. I cant deal. 
I'm so sorry for your loss. I can't imagine...
:( 
My condolences.
Thanks mate.
You handled that like a champ. Thank you for not downplaying what happened and taking her to get the immediate care she needs. As someone who has worked in crisis mental health minimization of actions or feelings does nothing good for a loved one. I feel for you right now, and applaud you for not judging and supporting her through her hard times. Not every person can do that, and she is a lucky lady. Take some time to do some self-care for yourself, okay? 
Thank you.   I spoke with her on the phone this morning. She told me she has had zero thoughts of self harm or anxiety today. I call that a victory! 
I am so sorry, but glad she's okay. Hopefully, she won't try again. You sound like a great boyfriend by the way.
Thank you.   I'm probably not the worst. 
This brought tears to my eyes. I worry that I'll be going through something like this with my best friend. She's untreated and her husband doesn't understand depression at all. I hope your SO sticks with the treatment, for both your sakes.
That's rough.   My ex-wife never understood my depression and I went untreated for years. It's very hard on both parties when one of the people don't understand what's going on, nor do they care enough to educate and support. 
Wow I can relate. I've been suicidal before and my boyfriend was the only one who supported me through those times, he essentially saved my life. I hope things turn out well for you and your gf, though I know how much of a struggle it is to get out of the black hole of depression. All you can do for her is give her support, which is already what you appear to be doing. Love saves lives. 
Without love I would have been dead years ago. 
This is gonna come off harsh and it's a really risky thing considering your emotional state , BOTH of you, but I feel it would be best if you'll stayed apart. People with disorders like this are just too volatile with each other it could be detrimental to both your mental health to keep doing this together. 
As long as it's from a good place, advice is always appreciated. Just to add some healthy debate.. my s/o and I both suffer from depression and I think having someone close, who understands what you're going through, to work through the issues is important. Two people absolutely shorten a road, even if it's a long, long road to start. @CarpetPuncher - stay strong and lead by example!
So proud of you!!
GO NIGGA GO
we're shooted either way boys
Time to hire a hitman   ^/s
Time to hire a hitman   ^/s
Y-yeah haha '/s' totally
God damn right.  They treat you like shit until you 'take yourself away from THEM'
Sometimes it feels like we all are prisoners, watching each other to thwart the jail break.  If paramedics abort your suicide attempt and put you into another 20, 30, 40 years of misery - wow, how kind of them!  Or if a condemned criminal tries to kill himself the night before the execution - the guards would bring him back to life and when he's healed - execute him. How fair!  
> Get busy living or get busy dying.  I hate this saying. It's the most useless, nonsensical expression.
This saying is perfect for how I'm feeling. I feel like I need to either start living a healthy productive life or stop consuming things and shooting things up(aka dying). I feel like I'm incapable of doing the former and I really don't want to do the latter. 
This saying is perfect for how I'm feeling. I feel like I need to either start living a healthy productive life or stop consuming things and shooting things up(aka dying). I feel like I'm incapable of doing the former and I really don't want to do the latter. 
> I feel like I'm incapable of doing the former and I really don't want to do the latter.   Exactly why it's so useless. It's a vast oversimplification of a complex problem.
Yeah, Not even trying to help myself anymore. Im just waiting for the courage to kill myself. Im already preparing my notes for them. 
You left funeral money? 
You left funeral money? 
Should he?
Should he?
It's just what I'm going to do. I don't know why the downvotes.  Was I too callous? If so, I'm sorry.
What are the obstacles keeping you from helping yourself?
Energy, focus, persistence
I hate knowing I'd never kill myself, knowing I'll be forced to ride this wave till my (hopefully untimely) death
Wow, that's amazing that someone else feels that same way. I hate myself for being too much of a coward to kill myself.
Wow, that's amazing that someone else feels that same way. I hate myself for being too much of a coward to kill myself.
You're not alone, there's quite a few of us 'lucky' enough to know we'd never be able to do it, and we're stuck here suffering until our time to go.  Much love
Currently I am thinking about leaving my boyfriend since he is the only one holding me back. We love each other but I believe he could do so much better without me. I can't fix myself and I don't want him to suffer because of my depression. I don't wanna be in a relationship anymore and I don't wanna have family in the future because I know that I will end up committing suicide. 
Ask him if he feels that way.  My girlfriend seems to irrationally believe I would be better off without her, even though she is the best I've ever had and we get along almost perfectly.  We don't want kids either.  It's not a requirement by any means.  I think only chronically happy people should have children.
I also sometimes feel this way but it’s not the right mentality you should help yourself up from the ditch eventually it all comes down to you and it should be you who should help yourself up it might take some time and effort but in the end it’s al worth it and you will look back at this moment and say I’m glad I got help
What makes it worth it? 
I used to, until I got a girlfriend. I recommend getting one, no matter how hard it might be for you: it is worth it in the end. She prevented me from offing myself.
I feel like your intentions were good, but seeking out a significant other as a means to bring stability and hopefully peace to your mind isn't healthy. Especially not when you're aiming to begin a relationship. I say this as someone who has been fortunate enough to find someone whose love and presence in my life is one of the only things really keeping me happy. However, I didn't seek that out. It happenned organically.
No you aren't, you aren't putting someone down. That is based on an assumption.
You are, you haven't realized it. But eventually unless YOU fix YOURSELF you'll only drag them down with you. Somebody else can't give you meaning. Somebody else can't give you purpose. Somebody else can't give you stability. You can't live for others. It's codependence and you'll bring her down with you in the long run. 
I tend to agree with OP. Some people (like me) don't have good people in my family or group of friends, or I wouldn't be on /r/ depression. In desperation, if I go to the point of posting on reddit to complete strangers to try and get some weak from of validation, the least someone can give back is a small amount of empathy. and if not that, then you can just not post.
Yep, I mean.... I think that's why most people are here in the first place, they don't have strong, offline support.  Tough love can work if someone is totally deluding themselves.  If they're depressed, it is not good at all.
Thank you for posting this, OP. The most important thing for anyone with depression or any other form of mental illness is support. And tough love =\= support. 
You're very welcome. I've also PMed the mods asking for more protections against tough love trolls. In the mean time, I would urge you to report tough love trolls to the mods. Moderator skyqween says in the comments above that they welcome us reporting trolls to them. Please go ahead and do so. These trolls are zealots and fanatics. It's very difficult to reason with them.
I think a lot of people here are aware that their behaviours are destructive. If someone isn't openly asking for advice, that kind of thing is just unnecessary. Maybe they're just ranting. Let them rant.
Strongly want to support this. I posted here once and 'you need help' is absolutely not what I needed to hear. I know I do, pointing it out just hurts.  I think for most people, they just want someone to listen. Unless someone asks for advice, don't give advice. Help has to be wanted, otherwise it won't be helpful.
Agreed. Tough love only ever made me feel more suicidal.
this.
You are awesome for posting this.
Aw, thank you! I appreciate it.
I think even the 'positive' version, which isn't really considered 'tough love', belongs in this category.  The whole 'you just need to choose to be happy' Oprah bullshit.  It's presented as an empowering thing but it always comes across (to me anyway) as just shaming people for being ill and not 'snapping out of it'.  
'you just need to choose to be happy'  - man that is some serious horseshit, people really say that?
So telling them they need help and should see a therpist because a subreddit isn't the best place to find help is wrong.. .why?  I know for a fact that it took a huge slap in the face by reality for me to start getting my poo together.
Baby steps.  It is incredibly hard for some people to even get broken down to the point that they admit they need help.  If a subreddit is the first step to help,  that is better than stewing about it alone and doing nothing at all.  You can play Mr tough guy all you want,  but we all know what tough guys on the Internet really are. 
I don't see how people have enough soul to hate people who are experiencing tough times... it's just sad.
Yeah, unfortunately it seems to have become a national characteristic. Spewing contempt at the poor for not working hard enough, at the homeless for being lazy, at minorities for being too politically correct, at women for being too damn sensitive, at mentally ill people for not cheering up...you're right. It is very sad. People experiencing tough times need support, not put downs.
You got a point. They should just take the down vote option off.
There is no way to actually disable downvotes. At most, we can hide them, which we're not comfortable doing for a number of reasons. There is a sticky post  up explaining this right now. 
What's that do? 
Its an addon for reddit.  http://redditenhancementsuite.com/
If anyone feels like they need some tough love, they can always go to an AA meeting.
Wow I had no idea that AA meetings were about tough love crap. I was told that they are full of warm, welcoming people and what not. Is that not the case?
Wow I had no idea that AA meetings were about tough love crap. I was told that they are full of warm, welcoming people and what not. Is that not the case?
Depends on you. If you're the type of Christian they cater to, it's very supporting. Otherwise, tough love.
Depends on you. If you're the type of Christian they cater to, it's very supporting. Otherwise, tough love.
Wow, what type of Christian do they cater to, then? Is this like a denomination thing?
My father told me, at the bottom of the worst depression I ever had, to 'Just get over it and be happy,' It was the last of many, many demands that I just quit feeling bad. I did, right after I excised him from my life like a tumor and found the right medication.
Had an almost exact situation. Hospitalized for depression, was really embarassed and ashamed, dad drove down to columbus ohio where I was living from cleveland to yell at me for 30 seconds about how I was 'thin skinned' and acting out like a little kid. I just laughed and told him to get the shoot out. Right then and there I realized my family was full of shooting lunatics and just let go of them emotionally. Best feeling in the world. 
Had an almost exact situation. Hospitalized for depression, was really embarassed and ashamed, dad drove down to columbus ohio where I was living from cleveland to yell at me for 30 seconds about how I was 'thin skinned' and acting out like a little kid. I just laughed and told him to get the shoot out. Right then and there I realized my family was full of shooting lunatics and just let go of them emotionally. Best feeling in the world. 
If there's anything positive about the 'tough love' approach, it helps you to see who you should tell to gtfo of your life.  edit: sweet, thanks for the gold :D
I've heard so many, many times 'Just get over it' that it makes me go from being depressed to ridiculously angry.  I've tried medication and therapy, and realized that the only way I could 'get over it' was to have people in my life that wouldn't tell me such things, and to have people in my life that wouldn't treat me like a leper because of my depression.  Still have yet to 'get over it', but I'm doing better, I guess.
I wish more people understood that depression is a 'proper' illness. You don't tell diabetics to 'just get over it', so don't tell depressives to do that either!
I honestly believe tough love doesn't work on anyone.  Of course I could be wrong, but I feel like the only reason people APPEAR to get better with this approach is because they have no choice.  They just learn not to care about the person who is giving them the 'tough love' and to hide how miserable they still are from them.  
Yeah... it's kind of like how people believe they're motivating overweight people by telling them how fat they are, how they should stop eating, etc. It doesn't work that way; you're usually just making it worse. :/
but in that same breath you could say that the OP would be looking out for a negative comment, and whether something is dubbed 'tough love' by the sub's community or not makes no difference, the OP will still view a positive or negative message as negative (from depression, of course...not just cause). So maybe some more realistic advice for someone who is perceiving the world THAT negative might actually be useful...
Realistic advice =/= tough love.  You're just arguing for the sake of arguing. 
 Went to my therapist and had a similar form to fill out. I filled it out honestly, and she goes, 'According to this, you should be hospitalized. Go ahead and pick a different answer.'  Umm... ok....
Wait did she actually say that?!?!  That's not shooting right man, if she's telling you to pick different answers just so that your test doesn't say you should be hospitalised.  Sadly, I feel like this probably happens in a whole lot of places and much more often than we'd like to admit.  :(
Wait did she actually say that?!?!  That's not shooting right man, if she's telling you to pick different answers just so that your test doesn't say you should be hospitalised.  Sadly, I feel like this probably happens in a whole lot of places and much more often than we'd like to admit.  :(
Dude she was trying to help him. I dunno about you but being trapped in a room on shitty drugs for a unknown amount of time doesn't sound fun (plus if you have a job or important plans that shit could REALLY shoot you up). If he wanted to be hospitalized he could be hospitalized, she was basically giving the chance to say 'I'll be ok for the short term' so he didn't get shooted. 
gotta agree, rly sucks wanting to be hit by a car each day 
Suicide has become as casual a thought for me as, 'I want a soda.'
Suicide has become as casual a thought for me as, 'I want a soda.'
Honestly the moment when suicide comes to my mind the most is when I'm kinda 'happy' cuz I know it will end very soon and I go back to my sweet depression ;-;
Honestly the moment when suicide comes to my mind the most is when I'm kinda 'happy' cuz I know it will end very soon and I go back to my sweet depression ;-;
That is one of the biggest dangers for meds alone. They can take you out of the 'I can't do anything' to the 'I want to do things' but the thing you are first thinking of is suicide.  
Is this not normal? I just started lurking here and this exact feeling has been my way of life for 10+ years... I figure the world is a depressing place and everyone must feel this way... do they not?
Surprisingly, there are billions of people who don't feel like we do.  What a bunch of shooting weirdos, right? (Humor doesn't help so much as poorly mask the pain).
> It makes me realise how truly blind and oblivious non-depressed people must be (no fault of their own)  I have thought this on occasion and felt pretentious everytime. It's like it's unbelievable how they just don't notice some of the stuff I see
Yeah ngl I felt a bit pretentious, like referring to normal, happy people as 'them'. But I can't help but feel how much better life must be.
I constantly wonder how people without depression feel. Like I don't understand it. 
I can remember not being depressed.  It was pretty great.
My internet friend said to me recently 'I am happy every day, I can't remember the last time I was sad'.....Oh the things I'd (probably not due to anxiety) do for that. 
Damn they must be lucky. Or on some really good drugs
What was this for
I guess for any survey or assessment screening for depression. 
What happens if someone is depressed for let's say 50% of the days, but over a time period of years? Would that still count as depression?
Yes. Also look at 'chronic depression.'
A wild guess would be bipolar disorder?
How come lately I keep seeing people on this sub throw out bipolar disorder everywhere? It perpetuates the myth that people with depression are sad 100% of the time. The comment you are replying to didn't sound like bipolar at all. 
Oi guys. Hang in there.
We'll be hanging soon, don't worry
*checked* shoot dude, I need a hug or something
[Here you go!](http://www.somethinghauntingyou.com/assets/images/site-logo-A.png)  Hang in there! I know that feeling... 
[Here you go!](http://www.somethinghauntingyou.com/assets/images/site-logo-A.png)  Hang in there! I know that feeling... 
That gave me a sensible chuckle, which I really needed.
*checked* shoot dude, I need a hug or something
*Hug, hug, hugggg* :) 
So everyone after me knows. This link is garbage. Don't click it.
I took your advice on board but I still clicked it.
Thank you for the reply. I'll have to reconsider how I interpret that phrase. I tend to phrase things more in line with how I mean them (no one is perfect though), and I suppose after hearing that line so much, I've lost sight of the forest for the trees.
My therapist tells me this is one of the key reasons people get lost - taking things too personally or invalidating the many reasons people may have for caring about you.
My therapist tells me this is one of the key reasons people get lost - taking things too personally or invalidating the many reasons people may have for caring about you.
I can definitely understand that. 
What saddens me about Robin Williams is that he was truly beloved by everyone.  Look at all the outpouring of love directed toward him now.  That if someone like that can't get over severe depression and chooses suicide instead, what chance does the rest of us (who don't have that support) have?
I think those with 'everything' are forced with dealing why they're unhappy more harshly, there's nothing left to do but evaluate themselves.  When you don't 'have everything' you can still dream.  'If only I...'  When you've seen all the grass, and you know it isn't greener on the other side, it's a lot harder to keep going because you know you can't escape yourself. 
Can confirm,  I've fought with severe bipolar disorder all my life and literally knowing one person who cared for me kept me from suicide. 
Living with bipolar is the worst. Especially when other people don't understand it.   I'm glad you had that one person there.
SO much this...he was the father I never had.  I never met him either, but yet he made such an impact on my life and helped me cope when I needed it.
I am sorry for your loss.  Both of you. 
i remember reading one post that said 'A permanent solution to a temporary problem isn't the way to go.'  But the chronic depression I've had sure feels like a permanent problem, and most treatments have only been temporary 
Unfortunately, depression is a bit like cancer...  There is only treatment.  There is no cure.  This is really the only response I have for this argument that seems to 'get through' sometimes.
Unfortunately, depression is a bit like cancer...  There is only treatment.  There is no cure.  This is really the only response I have for this argument that seems to 'get through' sometimes.
This is an interesting way of looking at depression - as only treatable but not curable.  However, we who are plagued with it need to realize that treatable illnesses are indeed treatable, and not terminal.  It's like the flu virus. The flu is treatable, but the virus never goes away in your body.  Your body learns how to keep the infection at bay.  We can eventually learn how too.
I feel you. I went off on facebook last night about how hypocrisy doesn't help anyone. So many people now shouting about awareness and support for depression while they blithely ignore the regular people around them every day with the same problem Robin had.
And in a week they won't care. Everything will be the same as before, unaffordable mental healthcare, ineffective healthcare, stigma, misunderstanding etc. It's like any other news story, people won't give a shit in a week.
And in a week they won't care. Everything will be the same as before, unaffordable mental healthcare, ineffective healthcare, stigma, misunderstanding etc. It's like any other news story, people won't give a shit in a week.
I agree. In no time at all it'll be back to 'Just think positive!'.
What was the response like to your 'going off'?  I try very hard not to go off on (real life) folks about depression, because, like you I assume, the folks around me don't believe it exists or believe it exists as a wallowing self-pity that immobilizes one in bed. So kudos to you. 
Actually the response was very supportive from the people that care about me. Of course the hypocrites I was referring to and didn't name for decency's sake didn't respond at all.
Actually the response was very supportive from the people that care about me. Of course the hypocrites I was referring to and didn't name for decency's sake didn't respond at all.
Why are they even facebook friends then?  Serious question.  If they're that toxic woudn't it be better just to cut them out of your life.
dude my 'happy light' was completely ineffective yesterday. Mom wanted to keep watching the news about it and stuff but I couldn't handle much more and hid in my room to cry, at least this time I had a reason to cry.
If you cry, you have a reason. Just because others don't understand that reason doesn't lessen the validity of yours. Hell, YOU don't even have to understand the reason, but you have one.
If you cry, you have a reason. Just because others don't understand that reason doesn't lessen the validity of yours. Hell, YOU don't even have to understand the reason, but you have one.
I have bouts of tears every now and then that occur for no reason, its a reason I bought my happy light because it happens most often when I'm at work in my cube or at night after dark. Its helped a lot but it hasn't taken care of all the lingering effects of depression.
What does it for me is that he had money to see the BEST doctors, yet still committed suicide. If he couldn't beat it, how the hell could I? 
That has been my thought since I heard this news.  Honestly, I feel even more hopeless. I'm tired, and there seems to be no end in sight.  If anything good can come from this maybe the stigma of mental illness will end.  Personally, I think the headlines should read 'Robin Williams lost his battle with depression'. Then people view this as a legit illness instead of weakness. 
That has been my thought since I heard this news.  Honestly, I feel even more hopeless. I'm tired, and there seems to be no end in sight.  If anything good can come from this maybe the stigma of mental illness will end.  Personally, I think the headlines should read 'Robin Williams lost his battle with depression'. Then people view this as a legit illness instead of weakness. 
Exactly. I have no motivation to do anything. I don't want to be miserable forever. All I can hope is that this brings mental illness into the light. 
It can be difficult for people who have never dealt with depression to understand it. And being patient with them isn't easy. I sat through a friend's rant last week that there's no such thing as depression. I wasn't in a mood to argue so I just held my tongue but I did lose some respect for her.   Folks are going through the grief phases and now that the initial shock has worn off they are angry. Not an excuse. Just a reason.  
Thanks for the reply. Little anecdotes like yours are nice to remind me that I'm not alone in my struggles.
I actually hate it when people tell me they care because I *believe* it. For me, it's that I feel horrible for making people care about someone who will only ever let them down, disappoint them, and quite possibly hurt or damage them emotionally.
Very well said...it's like 'Why should you care about me? I'm only going to let you down and disappoint you.'
I’ve done nothing other then just come home and lie in bed after I get back home from school. And I’m ignoring all my school work and studying for midterms because I have no motivation to do anything else and I know I’m just piling on the work for a later version of myself. I just don’t know how to get out of this rut but I need to do it soon.  How did you force yourself to stop?
I deal with depression, and the urge to do those things. When I was in undergrad, I found the fear of failure, homelessness, and starvation to be powerful motivators lol.  When my options were to finish school to get a good job, or don’t and be homeless (I was at the time), I felt I had little choice.
Depression doesn't suck energy , it sucks the whole life out of you.
This isn't me currently. I don't even wanna try anymore I don't care. I want to vanish.
Your reality today will be different than your reality in 3 years, 5 years, etc.  Realize what you're feeling today isn't the way it will always be. Just have to get through this period.
Yes! That is the hardest thing to believe, because it is difficult to feel it. But it is so important. 
Go and see a doctor, friend :)
he can't even leave his bed, friend. he needs to feel a little bit better before he can decide on his own to go see a doctor. 
he can't even leave his bed, friend. he needs to feel a little bit better before he can decide on his own to go see a doctor. 
Sorry if that sounded condescending, I have depression as well. OP really needs some medical attention, be it pharmaceutical or otherwise!
Sorry if that sounded condescending, I have depression as well. OP really needs some medical attention, be it pharmaceutical or otherwise!
No problem man I'm not upset at all with your comment. People can be a little vicious with downvotes lmao. I'll work on myself and be more honest with my doctor next time I see him. Take care yourself.
I was the same way. I never learned much either. I was always the dumb kid that was behind and now I feel like the adult that's behind. I'm still trying to figure out now how I'm going to make changes. There's a lot of things in life I want to do. 
Ahhh same here. Its like I’m alway mentally 5 years behind. It’s a struggle to try a play perpetual catchup. Things are still a struggle and even tho I was a sensitive kid and never took risks, those habits have followed me as an adult and are now eating away at me. 
I also never learnt to ride a bike because it was scary, I still don’t know and it’s very embarrassing.
I took lessons. My instructor said learning to ride as an adult is different to learning as a child because your brain works differently. It was pretty embarrassing at first. I had a few moments where I was like [Frasier Crane careening towards a tree](https://youtu.be/EYTb06bDtMc?t=23s) but it was worth it. I ride to work now. 
The more I think about the more I realize I never really was happy
Same here. My responsibilities were simpler, but my childhood was rough, and I don't miss it. 
I miss it so much, I still escape into Pokémon but ehh it isn't the same.
I do every now and then. I hype myself up to play it for a few days and then when I get around to playing it, it's not the same :/
I do every now and then. I hype myself up to play it for a few days and then when I get around to playing it, it's not the same :/
I still enjoy the games but the teeniest bit of the magic is gone, probably because now I actively try and complete everything whereas before I'd be like 'LOL MY DEX AIN'T FULL AND I DON'T CARE'
My journey away from depression has been somewhat a shedding of those traditional 'adult requirements'. I gave up a 'good job' I hated for much more frugal life. I'm building a van to live in, my own little dream castle to travel and say shootoff to rent and mortgage contracts. I see my life right now as reclaiming some of my childhood dreams, and I am happy.  What are the things you think you've 'failed' at? Are they really important to you?
My social relationships have failed, I’m passive and non assertive, my career is going downhill because of it. Parents have given up hope on me because of mental weakness. As the oldest son I have to care for them when I old but I can’t even care for myself right now. 
My social relationships have failed, I’m passive and non assertive, my career is going downhill because of it. Parents have given up hope on me because of mental weakness. As the oldest son I have to care for them when I old but I can’t even care for myself right now. 
If they've given up on you, maybe you don't need to take care of them either.   At least that sort of attitude would make my love go very cold indeed. I'm worthless and useless and please take care of you? Haha. No.  It will make your life a lot easier to bear if you allow yourself to stop being responsible for the wellbeing of others. They're adults, let them figure out how to take care of themselves.
Now you're missing your childhood. After some time you'll miss these days. That means every time is a good time. I hope you are getting me.
Or it means it's always getting worse. That seems more reasonable, considering those times never felt like good times.
This. Nolstagia is only recognizing beauty in life. Remember that you are the patterns you keep. And all it takes to change is to deny emotion and embrace physical action as its substitute
Not that any of us are good at denying emotion lol
Not really. My dad abused me and mom. Lucky you.
I feel you.  My dad was schizophrenic and he really messed me up, which at 52, I'm just coming to grips with.
I feel you.  My dad was schizophrenic and he really messed me up, which at 52, I'm just coming to grips with.
52 years? Wow. I'm just 20 years old and i feel like i have a huge hole in my heart. Everybody had happy lives filled with friends and families that they never stepped back to percieve the bigger picture. I have a hole in my heart that would never be filled no matter what. I'm empty.
I miss my childhood desperately because it was before I ever had to worry about my parents dying. I know I'm only 19 but my childhood seems like worlds away from where I am now. I struggle to come to terms with it.
Same. The older I've gotten the same worries you have are getting worse.
>That sucks in its own way too--being academically intelligent but emotionally retarded. Smart enough to know precisely how bad you've got it but not mentally healthy enough to do anything about it. lol  It's deeply frustrating. I know what problems I have and how to fix them, just no energy to do so. Days pass and I just sigh imagining what I could've become with 'all the potential I have', as others have told me.
There's this girl I went to highschool with. Same personality, same body type, accepted to the same college, hell I got even slightly better grades than her.   Then my depression hit. Hard.   She's halfway through her phamd at that top public school and engaged.   I dropped out and am a year away from *entering* nursing school at a run of the mill local college. It's hard to watch someone else fulfill my dreams. 
Dang psych clinics
They're the only reason I try to stay on point, the one I went to was horrible, I was there with people who suffered from schizophrenia, anger(and aggression issues) and meth heads. It only made me feel worse and terrified 
>doing all of the above and STILL not feeling proud of yourself or accomplished because there are a hundred other small things you're avoiding or flat out ignoring just to keep from feeling like your life is spiraling down the drain.  This can also include anxiety on top of depression. I have chronic cases of both anxiety and depression. This life is a shooting joke. 
And even when you do the things, there is always something more to be done.. And the list of things to be done just goes on and on and on... And you just want to curl up into a ball and hit reset... Because you're so tired... But when you look back, you haven't really done anything so you don't know how you could be so exhausted... And there is still that list of a million tiny things that need to be done... 
You should try and grab and adderall prescription, can be prescribed for shit like this. I was literally doing the exact same shit as you, adderall helped me out. Still depressed, sure, but a much clearer mind because I can actually get shit done on time and even ahead of schedule
Adderall has allowed me to get out of bed instead of lying around everyday. It won't do anything for depression, but t will at least have you functioning before you can make your life worse.
Oh my god.   I get this so hard.   I have OCD/panic/GAD/social anxiety and ADHD & depression. It's been such hell until I found a decent antidepressant & stimulant to help me get by.   I feel for you man. 
I found that it gets easier if you pour love into yourself. Nobody is as hard on you as you are, and nobody can love you as much as you can. Stay strong friend.
>>I'mma  Not trying to take away from anything you said, but wouldn't 'I'm a' be easier and quicker to type?
'I'mma' also sounds more like me, than 'I'm a'. Accents, dialects, personalities, idiots - we all have 'em.
Today I was running late for a job interview and decided not to go, then decided to go, then decided not to, and finally decided to go because I'd regret it later if I were still unemployed this time next month. I went, somehow got there on time, and it went well.  I still feel like shit because I should've gotten out of bed on time so that I wouldn't have been running late in the first place, but my anxiety attacks kept me up until 4am. :^(
Jesus Christ did we have the same exact day today!? 
That's every month for me. It's not like I don't have the money. I can even do it online by signing in and clicking a few buttons. But even that's a challenge. 
Right? Even the miniscule amount of effort required to input a phone number and rattle off a few codes to get the payment taken care of is just... too much. I KNOW I have plenty of money to cover the payment, all I have to do is authorize it. And yet.  Dang depression.
I feel you. I am about to graduate college this weekend. I barely scraped by these past 2 semesters. Even though I passed, I don't feel proud of myself since every other aspect of my life is falling apart. My mom wants to throw me a big graduation party but all I want to do is come home and be alone. 
College is hard man. Congrats on making it through
I've been laying in bed for 5 days, flunking college. Well done for getting shit done 
Same. Call me tiredaaron.
My oil change light finally came on today, been putting it off for 2000 miles. I feel the car-trouble-pain, friend.
And then the mechanic finds new problems that also need fixing and all of a sudden I am -super- glad for the OT I've been working lately, weeeeee
I love this. This is how I am. I pushed myself through hell and back because I knew I *needed* to do things, even when I'd rather stay home and mope. 
In defense of all lower functioning depressives... we don't have that choice. Both high and low functioning depression can be equally severe; the difference is in symptoms not willpower. 
My husband pesters me if I sleep too much....but yeah kids would make that so much worse. 
Yeah there's really no over-sleeping with kids. I used to be able to sleep in when my oldest was 7-8, he'd get up for a bit and amuse himself. With a toddler? Nah.
I'm high functioning as well but mainly cause of edibles. 
Amen to self-medicating, brother
This is accurate. There was a guy on here a few weeks ago, that I still have messages from, (I can post screenshots if anyone wants to see how horrible he was). He basically told me I didn't have depression. I've been told that a couple of times, but  because I'm in college, I have to function, even though sometimes it feels like I'm walking on nails. 
Sounds like an idiot ex-friend of mine. According to him I don't have depression, either, and seeing a therapist is no good because 'Our grandparents had to live through the war and they didn't need no therapist!'. Dang you, Valerio.
Yep. I'm a stay-home mum. I still get 90% of shit done daily because... I have to. I also get out with the boys regularly and take photos. Still feel average more often than not.
Being that I know how depression works (unfortunately) I don't expect that this will help, but I'm going to say it anyway:   Massive respect to you and all the other stay-at-home moms. Y'all have a tough job and don't get much appreciation for it, but y'all are also the glue that holds a family together. So... from someone who's probably never met you and probably never will, thanks for being awesome.
When I was 20 I got depressed and basically lost my personality.  All I enjoyed was drinking and thinking about suicide. 6 years and a bunch of mushroom trips later I'm once again happy and now sober. It's like they relit the fire inside me. Look into them. Plus they domt show on a drug test!
great for you. I did tons of acid/shrooms in college, which I think is part of why I'm so shooted up now. You start to see existence and humanity for what it actually is: a writhing, shooted up virus of self-conscious beings striving for one more breath of life, all while heading towards certain destruction.
I feel you. I’ve been struggling with depression now for 14 years. That’s exactly half of my life. I barely even remember who I was before I was depressed. So sorry you’re going through this as well 
On a similar boat but slightly more than half.  I don't remember how it felt like before being depressed, but I remember how I was like and would do anything to go back to that.
Same except they dont know about my depression and never will
And that's why I didn't get credit for my Sophomore or Junior year. It's a shooting miracle and a half that I'm graduating at semester.
And that's why I didn't get credit for my Sophomore or Junior year. It's a shooting miracle and a half that I'm graduating at semester.
Honestly, it got to a point where I thought my feelings were normal because my parents just convinced me I was just being a lazy shithead then I talked to someone who understood.
I don't really have anything of substance to say other than I'm in the exact same boat as you mate, you're not alone
Same here. Started off the semester with five courses, dropped two, now I'll be lucky if I pass one
Same here. Started off the semester with five courses, dropped two, now I'll be lucky if I pass one
The biggest player in my mental state is my school work for sure, and it's going downhill very quickly
The biggest player in my mental state is my school work for sure, and it's going downhill very quickly
3 backed up papers, 4 backed up article responses and a book review (haven't started reading) due in 12 days. My plan for tonight is to eat and sleep. 
I’ve talked to a couple teachers and my school councillor. They’ve spoken to my parents about it and they’re trying to help me in my situation by taking me to a psychologist and just trying to understand what it is I’m going through. 
Ah, that's good - I'm glad you've got supportive teachers! I really hope things get easier for you.
Ah, that's good - I'm glad you've got supportive teachers! I really hope things get easier for you.
Thanks :)
I hate getting yelled at. 
worst feeling, right?
worst feeling, right?
It's not fun. Brings back a lot of times where I've been yelled at for really no reason.
It's not fun. Brings back a lot of times where I've been yelled at for really no reason.
For me it reminds me that everything wrong with me and my life is my fault and that I'm a piece of shit. Cue visions of me shooting myself for the rest of the day.
I can't stand people yelling around me, not just at me. 
Same for me. I just want to curl up and disappear when that happens. I feel myself start panicking and my adrenaline kicks in. Not fun.
Same for me. I just want to curl up and disappear when that happens. I feel myself start panicking and my adrenaline kicks in. Not fun.
Hmm, I guess it is the adrenaline feeling that I couldn't identify.
I hate yellers with a passion. If I could, I'd grab and pull out their voice box and hold it upward like Sub Zero.  Fataility. 
***FLAWLESS VICTORY***
Why are people yelling at you? That's not normal. They are bad people and don't feel bad for being upset. You deserve better
a lot of it is customers at work that stress me out or get angry with me for accidentally messing something up. it’s also sometimes with my bosses or just knowing i did something wrong within one of my friendships 
a lot of it is customers at work that stress me out or get angry with me for accidentally messing something up. it’s also sometimes with my bosses or just knowing i did something wrong within one of my friendships 
I wish I could say it will get better. But I really don't know. 
I'm a shoot up too. Yesterday I had to backup security footage of a guy who scammed my dad but I accidentally formatted the security system hard drive and deleted all of the footage. I still haven't told him and I couldn't sleep last night. If he finds out I'm going to probably kill myself because I can't handle being yelled at when I'm always such a screw up.
Immediately stop the record and unplug the harddricw, try to use any recovery software to get it back, usually the computer just remove the pointer to the sector but not replacing sectors with null data, it is possible to recover the data
God, who doesn’t or wouldn’t get triggered by being yelled at?? It literally triggers our fight or flight response.
i’m not saying it doesn’t trigger me with adrenaline. it triggers my sadness
Dan Harmon is a depressive alcoholic. I think much of his personality went to create Rick. Rick feels so real because of that even though he is a mad scientist that can do anything
Also, Justin has spoken candidly on a couple occasions about how he'd likely end up killing himself if he wasn't so afraid of not knowing what happens after you die. Most recently he talked about this on his last Harmontown appearance. (#143 - Retardinol)  I can certainly relate to the sentiment. I hate to jump to the idea that being funny, smart and desperate to escape existence are somehow intrinsically linked... but the anecdotal evidence seems to crop up over and over and over again.
Also, Justin has spoken candidly on a couple occasions about how he'd likely end up killing himself if he wasn't so afraid of not knowing what happens after you die. Most recently he talked about this on his last Harmontown appearance. (#143 - Retardinol)  I can certainly relate to the sentiment. I hate to jump to the idea that being funny, smart and desperate to escape existence are somehow intrinsically linked... but the anecdotal evidence seems to crop up over and over and over again.
Higher intelligence is correlated with depression. I don't know if you have a higher chance of having depression the smarter you are or if it's some other kind of correlation.   I am more intelligent than average. Not by that much, but enough that I score reasonably high on most intelligence tests. 
That makes sense. So many people in the comedy business are depressed. Maybe it's because we're used to performing. Or because we need to have a strong sense of humor. I've also read about how children with depressed parents often end up learning to act like comedians, because they've spent their childhoods trying to cheer their parents up. The times you could make your depressed parent laugh would have been some of the greatest moments of your childhood.
I've heard from one depressed  comedian (famous one, but I can't remember who) that there's something about having to get up on stage and make people laugh when you're feeling down that takes a serious toll on you. You have to pretend you feel different than you actually do so often. You could be dying inside but no one takes you seriously because people can't reconcile your humorous nature with sadness.
I've heard from one depressed  comedian (famous one, but I can't remember who) that there's something about having to get up on stage and make people laugh when you're feeling down that takes a serious toll on you. You have to pretend you feel different than you actually do so often. You could be dying inside but no one takes you seriously because people can't reconcile your humorous nature with sadness.
I feel that way when I was in customer service. That fake smile on my face emotionally drained me.
Rick and Morty is a truly amazing show. The creators manage to create these glimpses of real emotion and humanity in an otherwise insane and unrealistic universe.  That being said, best of luck with your struggle.  Wubbalubbadubdub.
I was tempted to make Wubbalubbadubdub my facebook status and seeing if anyone would ask why I was in pain and how they could help. ;-P
I was tempted to make Wubbalubbadubdub my facebook status and seeing if anyone would ask why I was in pain and how they could help. ;-P
Do we nominate Rick as the new [Bad Luck Brian](http://i.imgur.com/5A8kI1j.png)?
What episode was that? The true meaning of 'wubba-lubba dub-dub'?
It means I'm in great pain please help me in Bird Person's language 
I love this show for similar reasons. Same for BoJack Horseman. Funny, but also sad as hell and full of broken people. Makes me feel less alone.
Bojack Horseman is really great. It's especially insightful into this American obsession with celebrities and the emptiness that comes from worshiping image over authenticity.
Thanks, man.  Yea, I do all that little stuff. It kind of bothers me when people say it will help. It doesn't help. I also constantly apologize and thank my husband and my family for the shit they do.  I know killing myself won't make anyone feel better, that's why I don't do it. I can't feel happiness or affection or joy 99% of the time, but I can feel guilt, and that keeps me from doing it.
I understand. I am so sorry. I really hope things can get better for you. It's so hard to hope like that, I know. And it's useless to say 'just be happy' and all that, because you can't just do that. It's like you're in a prison cell. I hope that if you hold on, one day you will finally be free without having to pass away. I wish you all the best.
I'd forgotten that Rick was supposed to have depression. It only comes to light slowly, 'cause he just acts like an angry drunk. Then as you start to figure it out, it's like 'Oh yea, that makes perfect sense.'
lucky you can still use marijuana, nowadays whenever i get above a 6 i start to get really bad thoughts and always have a bad trip.
lucky you can still use marijuana, nowadays whenever i get above a 6 i start to get really bad thoughts and always have a bad trip.
Meh, I used to use marijuana A LOT. I went to it for everything then i realized it didn't fix my depression, it just made me ok with it.
The US remake of Wilfred did it pretty well in the opening episode, too. A little too well..
Wilfred, Rick and Morty, and BoJack Horseman are all great and hugely relatable to anyone who's ever been depressed/suicidal 
Wilfred, Rick and Morty, and BoJack Horseman are all great and hugely relatable to anyone who's ever been depressed/suicidal 
Wilfred was so shooting good. For a show as easily dismissed as Wilfred - person sees neighbor's dog as man in dog costume, no one else does, wacky hijinks ensue! - it went deep and dark. I was and am rather disturbed by how much I could identify with what was happening on screen.  But, yeah, the end of that Rick and Morty episode hit me pretty hard too. 
That episode hit me so hard, and I was depressed for almost 4 days. And to think because of the infinite timeline, in another timeline, Rick did suicide. And the discussion on this episode was so deep I could barely be happy for a few days.  Man, the show is just amazing.
Lots of Ricks have probably offed themselves. He's not a stable guy.
Bojack and Rick and Morty get me more than anyone in my life gets me 
Oh yea 100%. I used to be the 'happy goofy guy' of the group, no one knew it was a front i put up. I just hit 20 recently and i have to say i don't even care enough to hide my depression anymore. 
Morty cares
Judging by the season finale, they all actually do care about him. (except for Jerry. Dang Jerry.)
Rick Sanchez is a good depiction, as is Bojack Horseman. Will Arnett does such a damn good job of conveying how broken that character is.     
Oh man I forgot about Bojack Horseman.  He definitely embodies that trait of perceiving the world a bit more realistically for a depressed person than a random other person, and a lot of the ultimately narcissistic negativity of depression.
Oh man I forgot about Bojack Horseman.  He definitely embodies that trait of perceiving the world a bit more realistically for a depressed person than a random other person, and a lot of the ultimately narcissistic negativity of depression.
You know, during my adolescent years, I sort of knew I was headed down this route. Meaning, I always had the feeling in the very fibre of my being that I would probably end up like similar to Bojack Horseman as I grew up. Dissatisfied, jaded, cynical and a complete misanthrope.
You know, during my adolescent years, I sort of knew I was headed down this route. Meaning, I always had the feeling in the very fibre of my being that I would probably end up like similar to Bojack Horseman as I grew up. Dissatisfied, jaded, cynical and a complete misanthrope.
Yeah. Mine's a bit different.  When I was 14 I was in emotional pain all the time, and the people I turned to would say, 'Well, that's just puberty.  Once you are no longer a teenager it will get better.'  It took a few decades to convince myself I wasn't somehow going to stop being depressed all by itself.
I'm going to watch it...  I thought it was just a kids show but apparently not. 
It's definitely not a kid's show, it's on adult swim and has Justin and Dan behind it, both have very adult senses of humor. It might be the funniest show on TV in a very long time.
Oh shoot no it's full of swearing and sex.
yeah, I didnt mean it like that.  what I meant was, I like it when shows whether acted or animed have some deeper meaning and serious undertones.  Shows that are constantly happy and cheerful get boring.
'cause that's what everyone wants at their suicide: an audience'  I have to disagree but people are different, in my case if i'd suicide but i won't is because i dont want an audience and it would just cause harm to other people
read the /s between the lines
this is exactly what I'm going through right now. 
Are you getting professional help?  Do you at least have anyone you can trust?  Old friends, maybe?
Are you getting professional help?  Do you at least have anyone you can trust?  Old friends, maybe?
not yet, but I will be soon hopefully
What resources?
A lot of Universities offer free counselling, at least a lot of the ones in Canada do. I know Australian ones that do too.
I just went through this really bad with an extra class I took in the spring semester at my university. I had something like a breakdown during the exam, and in the long answer section just wrote about how I'm so sad and I can't do this and then handed it in and went and cried.  I feel so pitiful.
Oh friend, I am so sorry. I, too, have taken some harrowing exams. Please know that, to me at least, you are not pitiful. It is not an easy thing to go through, and those who have not gone through it simply cannot understand.
This was almost painful to read. I also suffered with depression during school, for around 5 years, before knowing what was wrong. It was impossible to explain how I has gone from an intelligent girl who loved school to someone who could barely make it to class.  I hope things are better for you now. This is lovely, and you have a wonderful way of communicating those feelings.
Thank you, you are very kind. I am so sorry you went through something similar. But it is heartening, isn't it, to find we are not alone? You would have thought the schools would be more aware of this sort of thing.
I quit college because of this. Now I can't get money for studying anymore since I only have about 15 of 90 points, I need at least 60.
The same thing happened to me, but was lucky enough to go back to uni and graduate. Hold on! Life is filled with opportunities and people are here to help!
This is year of school have been abseloutely *terrible*, and depression was a pretty big factor, which have been manifesting itself an unusually lot this year. Thank god the year is over, hopefully I'll learn to counter my depression somehow by next year.
Are you getting professional help?  Or do you at least have someone you can trust?  Old friends, perhaps?
yup. took me until the end of my 4th year of university to realize I had depression and that it can be treated. year 5 was brutal, so many feelings, opening up to the depression, I am ready for year 6 now. I think.   I'm definitely going to print this off and put it on my wall. 
Goodness, I am honoured. I wish you the very best of luck, friend. Sixth time is the charm.
And it sends regular push notifications that look like they come from legitimate apps that say things like:   Why are you such garbage?   Goddamn you're ugly.   You could do this if you weren't such a retard.   You have a 97% chance of dying alone and forgotten!
This. Mine is 'Umm no, you don't have access to that. Ever.'
Except you can't simply delete it :(
It is often a 'hidden app'. Hard to delete those.
https://www.reddit.com/r/AskReddit/comments/5ybtyt/if_your_life_had_a_background_app_secretly/
Yes that's exactly where I got it from, my bad should I edit it and credit that post?
Yes that's exactly where I got it from, my bad should I edit it and credit that post?
oh no sorry that wasn't my intention, I thought you two had the same thought separately :D 
oh no sorry that wasn't my intention, I thought you two had the same thought separately :D 
Oh lmao nahh I wish I was this good at anologies ahaha, just saw that and thought it described my feelings towards depressions perfectly
taskkill /f /im cripplingdepression.exe   Access Denied!
You're gonna need to root yourself first. 
My nightmares start when I open my eyes.
Sometimes the monsters are everywhere but under the bed.
Sometimes the monsters are everywhere but under the bed.
Sometimes the monster is you. 
Sometimes the monster is you. 
The real monsters don't tend to self-reflect. If they did, the world would be a better place.  People make mistakes, monsters never do.
Same 
I was going to coment that haha. Small world. 
I was going to coment that haha. Small world. 
Sometimes I just want someone to talk to. But I just put them away.
That feeling when you wake up and you can feel your heart pounding immediately. Which is the opposite because your heart supposed to be resting after all the sleep. The thought of reality is truly suffocating. I know the feeling too well, man. I still get it every now and then. 
Or drenched in that cold anxiety sweat you get from your brain knowing you will have to survive another today. 
When I woke up I count how many hours left to go back to my bed again 
especially when you can actively watch your life spiral downward
I think prison in Norway would be a good place for me....
... when some of the best times you had were when you did stationary therapy because there were people around to talk to all day, who understood you. A structured day and meaningful conversations...
And we lay here knowing that the only way to change all that is to get up and try. 
> the only way to change all that is to get up and try  Eventually you run out of the energy you need to keep failing.
> the only way to change all that is to get up and try  Eventually you run out of the energy you need to keep failing.
Yes. Energy. The only thing I need. 
That's all my mom ever texts me or says to me, 'God Loves You' 'Believe in him'  'Give yourself over' and right when I'm gonna chuck my phone threw a window, she ends it with 'I love you, sweetheart'.   Parents are weird, but hey, they're here 
I feel you. Honestly I do believe in God and still get annoyed or bitter when my mom tells me stuff like that. Feels like theyre just pushing it out there and not really considering what’s going on.
I feel you. Honestly I do believe in God and still get annoyed or bitter when my mom tells me stuff like that. Feels like theyre just pushing it out there and not really considering what’s going on.
yup same for me, its really dismissive the way people keep pushing it.
Yes. I wouldn't really care about her preachiness if it wasn't for the fact that she knows how I feel about Christianity, so she tries to push it on me even more. Every time I'm going through something she says, 'I don't care if you don't believe in god, but he exists and loves you anyway.' and 'You wouldn't be taking things so hard if you had god to fall back on.' At this point I don't even say anything anymore, but it continues to annoy me. 
> 'You wouldn't be taking things so hard if you had god to fall back on.'  Funny thing is God sent her to be support and she's failing at her job miserably.
> 'You wouldn't be taking things so hard if you had god to fall back on.'  Funny thing is God sent her to be support and she's failing at her job miserably.
lmfao, perfect comment
That's probably the only way they know to help you. Obviously it's not helpful at all but they probably mean well. Some parents just arn't that diverse when it comes to finding workable solutions for helping their kids. 
Exactly, it's what she knows.  She's not doing it to insult or anger you, she genuinely wants to make you feel better.  
Exactly, it's what she knows.  She's not doing it to insult or anger you, she genuinely wants to make you feel better.  
The most hurtful things I deal with from family always come from genuine attempts to make me feel better. Whether it's telling me I'm depressed because I don't pray enough or because I sin, or telling me I'm suicidal because I let the devil get inside me. It's not okay. Parents should be held to a higher standard than 'It's just what they know'. That's not good enough. You choose to bring a human being into this world, you need to know more.
There's a time and a place for this stuff, this isn't it.  I say this as an agnostic person.  Please leave if you have nothing constructive to contribute.
As an Atheist, I second that. 
How is depression a small thing?
I'm going to give them the benefit of the doubt and say they probably didn't mean that. People use the idea of an instant fix God for everything, from something as small as grocery shopping to something as complicated as mental illness
I'm going to give them the benefit of the doubt and say they probably didn't mean that. People use the idea of an instant fix God for everything, from something as small as grocery shopping to something as complicated as mental illness
Ohh right, I misread. I agree. My family does the same things when things go right.   Found the perfect crockpot? Praise Jesus  House got painted quickly by Jose and Pedro? Thank you God  Parking spot open next to the entrance? Hallelujah.  On the other hand...  Phone fell out of their pant's pocket and into the toilet? SATAN!  Lost their name tag? SATAN!  Slipped and fell on ice? SATAN!  *I'm not trying to shit on anybody's religion.*
A lot of wisdom in this post. There are reasons religion works for so many ppl, and I think this really outlines why. 
A lot of things I've learned as a recovering alcoholic in there. 
A lot of things I've learned as a recovering alcoholic in there. 
And mostly from other people in recovery. 
This is a great way to put it, and the way I perceive the quote. However, i'd rather people just secularize the sentiment. Because it often comes across as 'just put your faith in God and it'll all get better', which isn't necessarily a bad thing but it's infuriating to someone who feels so hopeless.
Very true. A lot of people also really believe that 'God' helps them through when it's really the mindset. 
I went to the ER for suicidal ideation a few years ago. The social worker was a 40+ year old ex-marine who told me I wanted to kill myself because I “wasn’t strong enough for the real world” and started pushing Christianity on me.   My urge to die went through the roof.
Time to get a new social worker then.
Its not that they don't understand. Its that almost no body in the world does. I doubt you can find a single person on the planet who fully understands Islam and could answer all of your questions. Everybody understands according to their own intelligence and imo majority is just wrong. 
I wan’t talking about islam i was talking about depression, which my parents should be understanding of and get that it has 0% to do with religion seeing as how one of them “my father” has been suffering from depression for over 30 years.
oh man you got me... i know, i keep getting talks about how i stay in my room all day on the internet... ughhh I guess im sucking at hiding it.
Yeah now they just joke on how i'm addicted to videogames while the real reason is much worse. Atleast I can hide it well enough.
Yeah now they just joke on how i'm addicted to videogames while the real reason is much worse. Atleast I can hide it well enough.
Are you me? You sound like me.
Are you me? You sound like me.
Does it? You poor thing
Me too everybody says that i play all day.
i have video games that im not even playing i just lay in bed and stare at my computer
That's clever...but that's not me in life. Can't recall the last time I put up a brave, happy, smiling face. 
Same. I feel like I'm the only one who can't hide my depression at all. The first thing you notice when you see me is my depressed nature lol
are you my lord Sheepy? or is this a different sheep?
Probably a different sheep.  Bahhh.
Yes  I had a bright future and was very happy. Loved life. Got so much joy out of the experience. Wanted to be a lawyer. I had so much energy and always felt alive. Now I'm just...here...floating aimlessly in the abyss 
If I may ask, why did you not become a lawyer?
If I may ask, why did you not become a lawyer?
Never really applied myself in school. Didn't have the grades to make it into law school and lost all motivation
I can't remember. I'm 16 now. It was official when I was 13. But I remember asking my mom when I was 8 if I needed therapy. Is that sad??
No, that's smart.
No, that's smart.
It really is
Originally I wanted to do something like be a physicist and hopefully discover something great. I eventually started to give up the more I was told I wasn't good enough for that which is a reason I've devolved into this
I wanted to become a physicist. But now, I have lost all motivation to study it. I majored in Physics though. Now, my brain doesn't seem to work as fast as it used to. I loved reading before, now I even gave up that. I loved learning languages too and now, can't even do that. What seemed pleasurable before has become a chore now.
And, did it help?
Well, im still alive and breathing, so i guess it did :)
I used to have many friends, I am the joker of the group, I am the leader, I am the chad if that's what you want to call it.. but now I am nothing
Obligatory 'shoot Chad'
If anyone wants to keep each other on track message me. I'm trying to move upwards right now from a severe low. Maybe we could help each other
Let's do it !! We should make like a group me or something. 
Let's do it !! We should make like a group me or something. 
I am down for it.  All this is really uplifting to see.  I wasn't expecting this. Maybe something like that will keep us going.
Yes, for most people, it does seem like a small victory, but for those of us who have experienced clinical depression firsthand, we know how hard it can be.  Great job and keep up the good work!
I had not taken regular showers in at least a year.  I really had to force myself to take that second shower, as silly as that sounds.  Thank you!
I don't remember last time I showered. One week ago probably. I hope to shower this weekend. I actually promised my boyfriend that I would shower twice a week at least, but since we see each other two times a month I didn't keep my promise. But I feel bad, I feel like I betrayed him. 
I understand completely. My bf never really addresses my depression, but he will poke fun at me sometimes to try and motivate me to shower.  Start with small goals, hopefully you can stay on track.  I'm rooting for you!
I have been wondering if showering and other things are a result of feeling less depressed or a small step towards being less depressed (or both). I noticed I only really consistently shower, brush my teeth, etc when I already feel better. 
I think it's both.  I take better care of myself when I'm feeling better.  I started feeling down and forced myself to shower and almost didn't.  Even when I was standing under the water it took effort to actually wash my hair and body.  I almost changed my mind, but I felt better afterwards.
I can relate so hard on a minuscule level that it is ridiculous.... just to even fathom mustering enough energy on certain days is a big challenge.. there would be days where I would go a week or two without taking a shower... but I've gotten better.
I'm glad to hear that, hope you keep it up!
Hello darkness my old friend. 
I've come to talk with you again?
I've come to talk with you again?
Because a vision softly creeping?
Because a vision softly creeping?
Cheap trees around the corner?
I was looking for a job and then I found a job, and Heaven knows I'm miserable now. 
Pretty sure I would be dead by now if it wasn't for The Smiths and Morrissey. He understands the human condition and how fragile it is. Thanks Moz.
Pretty sure I would be dead by now if it wasn't for The Smiths and Morrissey. He understands the human condition and how fragile it is. Thanks Moz.
Name checks out
Damn, I thought the body text was going to be positive :(
Expect the unexpected.
Expect the unexpected.
But it was kinda expected.
It's been the opposite for me. I found a job while I was really into shit. Now it keeps me occupied during the day, I enjoy my work too. And pays me enough to survive, and even indulge occasionally. I will always be grateful. It gave me some dignity at a time when I needed it the most.
Same. Although i don't enjoy what I do at all, it's an 8 hour distraction that forces me to interact with people. 
Same. Although i don't enjoy what I do at all, it's an 8 hour distraction that forces me to interact with people. 
Yeah. Boring job and still causes some minor anxiety but I have no time to think about my life or anything negative. Plus it helps with social anxiety.
What kind of job do you have?
I work on artificial intelligence. 
Hold out for one over those 'over-paid and under-worked' jobs!
Aren't we all... 😂
Lmao, what kind of job? Like a career type job or a part time job?
Shit part time job while I'm in college.
Shit part time job while I'm in college.
Well at least it's just a part time job. You'll find a career you love dude and all the hard work will be worth it. 
Well at least it's just a part time job. You'll find a career you love dude and all the hard work will be worth it. 
Tfw there's nothing you love so it's impossible to do that
I'm sorry for you. I can't even say anything either, I might end up at home too, never did this shit in my life before as my parents always provided the resources for me, and me having to do things on my own I never thought I'd come close to at such a small age is quite new to me.
Just remember shit doesn't always go how you want it, but also nothing is ever as bad as anxiety or depression makes it seem. I wish you good luck with whatever you choose to do, and hopefully ypur depression won't get in your way.
Not even service jobs? What kind of area do you live in?
Southern onterrible halfway between windsor and london. No way Im driving an hour for some shitty 8hour shift work at min wage. Im a trucker by trade.
r/jokes maybe?
Nah this is actually funny tho
I work in mental health, and when people have trouble with understanding depression, I like to compare it to diabetes.  You can't see it, but it's there, it causes limitations, it often requires medicine to treat, and sometimes a person just doesn't feel well enough to participate in normal activities.  
lucky me i have diabetes too. lol- i know what you mean though.
Favourited this one. Thinking of sending it to my 'friend' who just dumped me for being an isolationist in my depression... Funny enough, she works in mental health.
She should be fired if she can't fully comprehend the condition. I'm sorry by the way; I know what it's like to lose a friend. I have a feeling my isolation scared them away as well. I've been feeling a bit better lately and have even made a few efforts to want to hang out with them but they just blow me off or ignore me completely. 
Where can I read this comic? :)
[direct link to comic on source](http://www.akimbocomics.com/?p=573)
Right there above where the thumbnail is, you can click that thumbnail or the title text next to it and start reading!
I think he is asking for the source.
I think he is asking for the source.
Did a search of the name  in the picture along with, 'webcomic', and found [this](http://www.akimbocomics.com/) site. The art style looks really similar, so I'd say this is it.
The papercut bit was my favorite. I get that a lot.
Dear God, yes. 'I know how you feel, I had the worst week of my life when I found out my ex was seeing someone else.' 
Haha Scumbag Steve makes a slightly colorless cameo in the 5th panel.
Who kicks you when you feel down?  Scumbag Steve, Scumbag Steve!
Could have written this myself. For me the lead ball is more in my throat, too big to swallow or spit back up.
Yeah I know that sensation as well, its usually when my body and mind want to cry but nothing ever comes out. Its also a horrible feeling, that feeling of being on the brink of some emotion but never ever getting there.
Same here. Sometimes I almost feel angry at the people who reach out to me because I just think 'What are you talking to me for? Can't you tell that I'm not going to be able to give you a good conversation? Go talk to someone who deserves to be talked to.'
I get angry, and all I hear in my mind is my voice saying: 'Go away. Go away. Go away. Go away. Go away. Go away. Go away. Go away...'
I feel similarly often. I think this is because I desire people to be interested in me personally to the level I am with them, and this almost never happens. Same with people being interested with me physically/sexually. No one seems to be interested in me to the degree I am with them, so I end up desiring companionship/intimacy but wanting people to leave me alone because they will inevitably disappoint me.
I feel the same way. I don't want anything to do with people that don't take a personal interest in me. 
That's actually pretty common in depression, could have to do with irritability. If you're an animal person, what helped me when I was really depressed a few years ago was volunteering at an animal shelter.
Oh man you hit the nail on the head. Animal shelter provides a chance for connection that isn't verbal.
Oh man you hit the nail on the head. Animal shelter provides a chance for connection that isn't verbal.
My dog is the only person I need in my life 
Relatable with strangers. Yes the weather is nice, now let me wait for my bus in peace. 
You'd like Scandinavia then. They don't small talk at all. 
You'd like Scandinavia then. They don't small talk at all. 
moving to scandinavia
Quiet your mind. Don't allow anyone to speak, not even your inner dialogue. Sit and focus on your breathing, pull your attention to the moment. If your attention wanders, simply go back to your breath. It takes practice, practice that will calm your mind. Ask yourself what is it about others that makes you angry? Write your answer down, do not ruminate on it. Breath. Journal. Sleep. Eat. Stretch. Safe and happy travels
I tried this same exercise while listening to 'Meaningful Meditation' by Sam Harris. However, when I'm at my worst and I need this the most, I won't ever do it, because the worst part of me inhibits me from doing anything helpful, it just pulls me down, like a riptide, drowns me, swallows me up. So this is why I've never found meditation really helpful in the long-run. That's my fault though, always is huh?
I tried this same exercise while listening to 'Meaningful Meditation' by Sam Harris. However, when I'm at my worst and I need this the most, I won't ever do it, because the worst part of me inhibits me from doing anything helpful, it just pulls me down, like a riptide, drowns me, swallows me up. So this is why I've never found meditation really helpful in the long-run. That's my fault though, always is huh?
Mm, daily practice is difficult, and I can't attest to doing it as well. Because like you said, when we're at our worst, it goes by the way side, we're distracted. But meditation, for myself, is better than any foreign substance. Happiness, just like love, must come from within.
What makes you dislike ppl talking to u
anxiety- I feel trapped when people try to engage with me
What about the opposite sex?
I feel very nervous when a girl talks to me with the intent of getting to know me. I don't want to be in a relationship, and I'm intimidated by practically everyone.  So, *especially* the opposite sex.
Do you ever talk with anyone?  Relatives, friends, etc?
Yes, but I'm rarely the one starting conversations. I stay quiet for the most part.
Ok, when and what time?
here, right now
You are missing out dude, having both problems at once is even better
I can't with y'all haha. Love you my depressed irrational family <3 
Dude I laughed so hard reading this I cried. It's great how even through depression people can have sense of humour and see some positive in their suffering. Hang in there friend..
Thanks man. Humour has a place in everything, even during bad times. It’s what keeps me going. Glad I could make you laugh!
This sums it up.  I feel like there are two me’s.  One me spends all his time dreaming up and making lists of all these great and fun things I’m going to do.  The other me has the motivation to do zero of those things.  
I lost that first “me” a loooong time ago
Have you tried geocashing?
What do you do for it? Looked it up and it seems interesting  
What do you do for it? Looked it up and it seems interesting  
Basically you use multi-million dollar satellites to find bits of tupperware in the woods/urban jungle. Download geocashing app, set up an account and go on a little treasure hunt in your area. Great alone or in groups.  It was a great help to me especially when I had a hard time even wanting to get out of the house. 
Basically you use multi-million dollar satellites to find bits of tupperware in the woods/urban jungle. Download geocashing app, set up an account and go on a little treasure hunt in your area. Great alone or in groups.  It was a great help to me especially when I had a hard time even wanting to get out of the house. 
Does it cost anything to do this and what do you do with the thing you find? Let's say you find the piece of tupperware, then what comes after that?
Have you tried geocashing?
Lmfao 'have you tried going places and expending energy?'  No.  No I have not. 
Lmfao 'have you tried going places and expending energy?'  No.  No I have not. 
You know how hard I worked for this fupa? I ain't wastin no calories, boy.
I completely feel that. I stopped playing video games for months to a year. I don't have the energy or will power to get out of bed and do it. It's less that 10 feet away and I still can't bring myself to do it. 
And there's no shame in that. Take your time to it. But remember that life is still put there whenever you are ready to win.
Same deal over here. Literally nothing interests me except drugs. 
I never tried any drugs before I became depressed. Then I tried LSD and had a really bad trip the first time, but at least I felt something. Other times it can be really therapeutic. MDMA is amazing but the next 3-4 days I feel even more depressed because of the lack of serotonin.
I never tried any drugs before I became depressed. Then I tried LSD and had a really bad trip the first time, but at least I felt something. Other times it can be really therapeutic. MDMA is amazing but the next 3-4 days I feel even more depressed because of the lack of serotonin.
With LSD you really have to be in a positive state of mind to experience a good trip. Never tried MDMA, but it's on the list lol. 
It cured my alcoholism too!  
Dude. Same. You’d think that all depressed people become alcoholics. I used to go out and get lit at clubs and bars all the time and now all I wanna do is sleep.
Dude. Same. You’d think that all depressed people become alcoholics. I used to go out and get lit at clubs and bars all the time and now all I wanna do is sleep.
When I'm not depressed...  I love to drink and watch youtube videos or Netflix .. sometimes even go out to random bars and talk to random people.  I used to drink anywhere from 3-6 times per week.    Now, drinking just leads to me being sleepy and feeling even more miserable about my situation.  I don't need that.    I can't wait until the day drinking is fun again...if that ever happens.  
I built a top of the line PC with 1080ti to play top of the line games on max and run VR. I've just been toking and blocking out reality bc nothing seems to entertain me anymore...  I have picked up on reading some philosophies though and it helps me from time to time. 
If your PC ever needs to be, you know.. touched and stuff, I'd be happy to touch it lmao 
Dark Souls helps my depression for some odd reason. Maybe it’s the concept of the game, fighting off all these creatures and darkness and trying so hard to overcome obstacles. Then you finally get that unique feeling of accomplishment when you beat that one boss you’ve been trying so hard to beat. Idk just kinda putting that out there for others struggling.
I love Dark Souls. I've only completed it once. What boss is your favorite? What area is your favorite? I think mine is Anor Londo. It's beautiful.
I still play games but I just do it to pass time. The only thing I can say I’m interested in is films and that’s because I can escape reality for a while
I envy this. I can’t pay attention to a 22 minuet tv episode, much less a film. I shooting hate this bullshit. Used to be able to binge Netflix, now I rewatch old shows as background noise. I can’t put focus or attention into anything new. 
Everyone I have ever known who wanted to commit suicide were selfless, giving people who just didn't want to burden the world with their problems.   That being said, of the one's that succeeded, I wish they were still here.   The world needs more people like them..not less. 
I'm so sorry for your loss.  Stay strong.
Those are typically the same people who will only show they care after you're gone, and they have realized they missed their chance.
Most don't realize they 'missed their chance', they're just virtue signaling to show others that they're good people.
Most don't realize they 'missed their chance', they're just virtue signaling to show others that they're good people.
You are absolutely right. This is more of what I was wanting to say, thank you.
A thief thinks everyone steals.  Selfish people think suicidal people are selfish.
Vast majority will steal if they believe they can get away with it, and how many steal by accident (not pay for something) and then take it back?  
This is a place where people give their honest opinions and most inner thoughts. And some people who believe their last resource is to end their lives, when they feel overwhelmed they come here and say what they believe, like a sort of diary entry. So this is not a place where we defend suicide like its some amazing thing, it's a place where broken people (me being one) come and feel connected on the basis of sharing mutual pain 
Listen, I am broken when I say this... but sometimes people get swept up in the fact that we all suffer depression in this sub and use it to enable each other.  I generally try to just move on when it gets that way, but let's face it it happens.
Listen, I am broken when I say this... but sometimes people get swept up in the fact that we all suffer depression in this sub and use it to enable each other.  I generally try to just move on when it gets that way, but let's face it it happens.
Thank you for saying this. Sometimes it feels like people here get shamed for posting opinions that express genuine hope.
Kind of both really, some people get depression from selfish people like bad family or friends, some people get depression for other reasons. I see your point though
My opinion so don't get triggered here.... but we need to own our depression and stop blaming others for where we are. To get better, we need to accept our part in it. This isn't about blame. This is about loving oneself for better or worse.
it's not selfish its just pointless. As Camus says, Suicide is meant as a statement from the self to others or at the very least to the world. once you've made it, you can't make it again, but those who bore witness to it will eventually move on, and the whole point of the suicide would have been for nothing. 
Camus was full of shit.  It is not a shooting statement to end suffering.
'It's just that the pain and suffering created from someone killing themselves IS far greater than the pain experienced by the individual'   What are you talking about? The moment of killing yourself? Yeah not much pain in that probably but the whole point is to get away from the pain of daily living which is much more than normal people experience.
I'm talking specifically about the pain experienced by the people *around* the person that kills themselves.   I know and have talked with MANY people who have had family members and friends kill themselves. It creates YEARS of pain, confusion, deep sadness, depression, guilt, remorse and sometimes reciprocal suicide.  
Can totally agree, I feel like the person I used to be and could have been is completely gone. Makes it really hard to be in touch with any pre-depression friends.
Danging exactly this. Just Sunday morning I logged in to facebook for the first time in about 8 years. Saw all my friends seemingly happy and advancing their careers, and here I was a bum with nothing to show for myself. I had a few posts every year or so saying I was missed, not ironically as if I had died, but I couldn't bring myself to contact any of them. What could I even begin to say when asked, 'how've you been', such an innocuous question for most.
Danging exactly this. Just Sunday morning I logged in to facebook for the first time in about 8 years. Saw all my friends seemingly happy and advancing their careers, and here I was a bum with nothing to show for myself. I had a few posts every year or so saying I was missed, not ironically as if I had died, but I couldn't bring myself to contact any of them. What could I even begin to say when asked, 'how've you been', such an innocuous question for most.
Oh yes, 'how are you' is the shooting worst question of all times. 
I took an adderall and i feel like the adderall version of me is the real me. I act just like i would when i was younger and was very outgoing. You took the words right out of my mouth
Yeah, this! I'd recommend when you feel that way affirm yourself with positive thoughts and like run and do the things you can't force yourself to do when you're off of it. I've been doing this for the past week and have made a lot of progress actually. Very very tiring but well worth it.
I'm too depressed to make or keep any sort of relationship with other people  can't even keep in touch with my family
This is me as well. I’m even married but can no longer function in that capacity. 
This is me as well. I’m even married but can no longer function in that capacity. 
I feel you here man.
Yup. 26 and not a soul to talk to.. 
Are you me? Was just about to write this >_<  
Are you me? Was just about to write this >_<  
34 here.
34 here.
same
Yeah, same with no friends. I feel totally isolated. Sorry you're feeling that way too - I know it's horrible. I talk to myself for hours. Been talking to myself in my room almost non-stop for like 12 hours now. 
Do you want to talk to me?
Do you want to talk to me?
Thank you! Very kind of you to offer. I think it's probably best I don't though, because I will just cause undue stress to you. 
Thank you! Very kind of you to offer. I think it's probably best I don't though, because I will just cause undue stress to you. 
I can honestly say you wouldn't bring me a lot of stress. It's good to have someone to talk to and have someone to give you a different perspective on things
I have people to talk to, but I never talk about depression. It's a different kind of lonely. I wish I can tell someone without them freaking out or trying to drag me 'into the light'. 
This is more my situation. i struggle to connect even with close freinds sometimes because they don't see the other side to me. The me when i'm alone.
If it helps, online friends don't make much of a difference unless you're *very* close and/or you meet in person regularly. Most of the time people you meet online have real life friends as well, so you take a backseat to them.
Ouch. This is all I have really, I really can’t say I have good IRL friends I can hang out with. So, it’s almost like I have no friends at all. 
Ouch. This is all I have really, I really can’t say I have good IRL friends I can hang out with. So, it’s almost like I have no friends at all. 
The fact of the matter is that friends won't make you happy. They sure help, but ultimately you're responsible for finding peace within yourself. Which is intensely difficult when you're fighting yourself the entire way.
I have people around, and people who say they care about me. However besides family? I have learned that 99% of people don't really care and say what they need to say to get what they need out of you.   It's hard to find another person to just be able to be yourself around. I'm sure it's out there, though it's probably just something you luck out with...
This is so true. How can it be that you may be in a room full of people and still feel alone
i'm 25 and i have no friends... I used to had a best friend but we had a fight so i'm literally alone. Sometimes I try to talk to myself but my head is a mess so i just distract myself with music or books or whatever. And thanks to depression i can't even have online friends... i've tried but it exhaust me in the end. 
Same 💁🏻‍♀️ Best friends are hard to make in the first place, replacing one is exhausting just to think about. 😒
Same 💁🏻‍♀️ Best friends are hard to make in the first place, replacing one is exhausting just to think about. 😒
yeah, especially when you're between 20s and 30s and everyone you met in high school or college are having families and actually living. I think it's more difficult to make real friends after that age range bc everyone is busy and doesn't have time to keep up with depressed people. sorry i'm just venting.
I haven’t said a single word in over 21 hours now. I think I’m gonna go for over 24. Possibly 36. 
I wish I could do this sometimes.. My throat hurts from talking too much some days. But my 6 yr old doesn’t know what silence is so I have no choice. 
I have no friends or know anybody with the same beliefs I have. I'm alone surrounded by a herd of sheep who love and follow all of the societal norms like holidays, birthdays, weddings, procreating, family events, funerals, anti free legal euthanization and anti right to die legislation. I don't give a shit about most of the societal norms and the sheep around me don't like it. Without the internet I'd be truly alone.
Hi, I dislike all of those things!  ^Except ^Holidays ^because ^Hallowe'en ^is ^pretty ^fun...
Happy birthday bro. ♥
Thanks homie 🙏 
“Happy Birthday” Bit ironic seeing as this is the Depression subreddit...
I also def see the irony lol
Damn. I needed to read this. Thank you.
You're welcome. I try to give back to the lovely people on this sub.   Go eat some cake for me, and I know i'm late but happy belated. 
Hey man, it is my birthday today too. Happy birthday!
I hope you are having a happy birthday! 🎈 
I don't celebrate my birthday if I can help it anymore. I don't like smiling and pretending to be haply. 
The pretending to be happy part is the worst. Along with the whole stupid: “Oh nice! It’s your birthday? Got any plans for later!?”  Nope I don’t have any plans cause it’s a shooting Monday and I don’t feel like doing anything.
I totally feel you. You're not alone. *Happy birthday* even if I don't know you. You and I are worth it, and we will beat the shit out of this depression, it may just take some time. I know I'd appreciate it too if it was my birthday. 
Dang yes we will beat this shit. We are worth it. Dang depression. 
Did you tell people it was your birthday? If not, don't feel too sad, birthdays are really hard to remember. I don't remember my best friend's birthday (have to note it down somewhere ) but that's just because I'm bad at dates, not because I don't love her to bits. And happy birthday 🙂 x
It’s so dumb but I have this ridiculous war in my mind about how I want to see who knows my birthday to check to see who cares. But simultaneously I know that’s dumb because i forget people’s birthdays all the time. It feels so awkward to tell people that it’s my birthday...
You described my day. Except struggling to even want to play any games lately. 
Games are great as a release from much more boring activities, but when they are the main activity, it becomes a drag.
Games are great as a release from much more boring activities, but when they are the main activity, it becomes a drag.
When im depressed video games become a chore
When im depressed video games become a chore
I agree, feel exactly the same
How do you learn to program? I like to learn by reading .. can you recommend any books? 
/r/learnprogramming   Any book will do, honestly. The first book on programming I've read was Head First JavaScript. It's the worst book ever, but it worked.
I just turned 18 and I used to play sports, workout, hangout with friends, and I was generally happy. Now I’m out of high school, don’t have my license, and I just sit in my room and play video games. It sucks because my parents get mad at me for not doing anything because they don’t know I’m depressed. Just wish my life was normal.
My parents know I'm depressed and they still get mad at me. 
My parents know I'm depressed and they still get mad at me. 
Amen. They've stopped getting mad and have reached the point of just letting me wither away 
Amen. They've stopped getting mad and have reached the point of just letting me wither away 
I'm sorry to hear that. My mother is trying to help but she has depression herself on top of PTSD and anger issues. She's the one who messed me up. All my life I received her twisted version of 'love'. I won't get into details but let's just say once I move out, I'm never interacting with her in any shape or form again. It's hard but we can get through it. Think about it like this: if you don't attempt to stand up, you never will. Keep trying. 
What happened that caused the change? I’m in the same situation, minus the parents not understanding, I’d like to know if the change was caused by the same thing.
Many things went into what’s wrong with me today. I started to become insecure about the way I looked so I stopped going out much. Nobody has ever told me I’m actually ugly, but I can’t even look at myself in the mirror. Whenever I go to get my license I feel like people are looking at me weird 
Wake up at 3pm. Stay in bed. Look at my phone. Get up to get a drink. Go back to bed. Look at phone some more. Eat maybe one meal. Nap several times. More checking of the phone. Play an audiobook. Fall asleep at around 6am. Repeat unless I have work that day. 
Sounds like my weekend routine  (No seriously, it really does)
Add some meaningful activities in your life. Read a book for an hour. Go take a small walk while listening to a good podcast. Learn a new thing. If you do these things you will feel much happier when you go to sleep.
I have been trying to replace video games/internet with reading books as my main hobby. I have read a couple but 'The hobbit' by tolkien is my favourite one so far. The Lord of the rings universe is just so magical. 
I have been trying to replace video games/internet with reading books as my main hobby. I have read a couple but 'The hobbit' by tolkien is my favourite one so far. The Lord of the rings universe is just so magical. 
please please try reading Wilbur Smith..you will love it! my fav author and the most epic adventure novelist
I have the Hobbit sitting unread under my desk. I might just need to get around to it.  
It’s amazing
>If you do these things you will feel much happier when you go to sleep.  I do those things.  Plus I go to WORK every day and I still go to sleep miserable every night.    What the shoot is 'meaningful' about taking a walk and listening to a podcast?
I also struggle with thinking of anything as meaningful. It's all just so grey and bland. 
Don't knock it until you try it. Just take a stroll, listen to the sights, watch the people. Look at how the sun reflects off of things (and as a side bonus, get some much needed vitamin d).   It doesn't make sense that it's meaningful, or that this helps... but just getting out and moving can do a world of difference. 
I've done it plenty.  It doesn't do anything at all.
If you couldn’t walk then it would certainly be meaningful don’t knock the small things. My husband would love to be able to take a walk but can’t 
And a person who can't breathe unassisted would find it very nice to be able to do so.  That doesn't make *breathing* a meaningful activity for the rest of us.
Wake up, play Runescape and browse the internet, order a dominos and drink vodka, sleep. Rise and repeat. Pretty much the same
Hey, I used to play RuneScape a lot (spent 11 years of my life on that game). Which version of the game do you play? You can message me any time if you’d like someone to talk to :) 
Hey, I used to play RuneScape a lot (spent 11 years of my life on that game). Which version of the game do you play? You can message me any time if you’d like someone to talk to :) 
Hey both :P, I play osrs and rs3
My daily routine is about the same, just add the odd job every now and then. Oh, and the futile attempts to read some books on occasion.  Statistically, there are only around 47 years left of this, and it will finally be over! =)
Can't wait.
I know how you feel, I've had depression for just under 20 years and I thought it was my personality but it isn't. Once medicated I realised that depression was like ear protection and the noise is your personality. It muffled it and makes it hard to hear.  In other words, your depression is suppressing your personality. There's a wonderful, bright person in there and receiving help is the first step in bringing that person out. You won't regret it!
i really needed to hear this today. Thank you for your comment.
I generally think this is why depression and anxiety go hand in hand.  Depression = how shit usually is  Anxiety = wow things are good right now, something bad has to happen.  Like when I start getting happy I figure something terrible is right around the corner.
Depression is being concerned with the past.  Anxiety is being concerned with the future. 
And finding that balance can feel like climbing a mountain.
Big time. Not only that, but identifying it in the first place is like finding the mountain without a map. But, it's possible. I'm still depressed and I'm still anxious, but I can help steer myself back even if slowly..
Depression is merely a symptom of my problems, not the source.  It's anxiety that shooted up my life and destroyed my personality and my inner voice. 
Anxiety IS your inner voice, get rid of it and you'll lose everything that's you... at least that's what it wants you to believe. Everything will be okay, you're not alone.
Anxiety IS your inner voice, get rid of it and you'll lose everything that's you... at least that's what it wants you to believe. Everything will be okay, you're not alone.
Someone send me this article about [social anxiety recently.](http://waitbutwhy.com/2014/06/taming-mammoth-let-peoples-opinions-run-life.html)  I don't agree with everything. And some parts **don't** fit at me at all. Others _sound_ promising but I'm unable to accept help atm.  It deals with the inner voice thing.   For me it's I listen into myself... and there is nothing. What to do. What to like. How to act.   And _beside_ of that there is the SA that subliminally or consciously trys to influence me.  Edit: Fixed a few words.
i personally think that mental illness just shrouds our personality- it blurs the line between the illness and our personality. it's scary to think of not having depression, though. god damn.. i wouldn't know what i'd do, either. 
Stephen Fry made a documentary about mental illness in which he talked about a button which would end it. Most of the people (including Robbie Williams, Carrie Fisher, Rick Stein, Tony Slattery) he asked, including himself, would not press it, because they believed they would not have achieved the things they did without it.   It's an interesting idea.
You can't be creative without sadness?
You can. I am a painter and photographer and at first I thought I could only make meaningful work when miserable. When I got a little better I actually learned I can think clearer and have more control when I feel good/happier. It takes a few years, though.
I've been trying to go to therapy and any time they ask me about myself my only answer is 'I don't know,' and I feel so bad. I don't know who I am.
I feel like after years my personality just became hollow and empty just surviving and escaping in some form.
It's just another example of how people treat things if they don't know how it feels. I'm depressed and have anxiety. Where the shoot am I living then?
Omnipresent apparently.
Omnipresent apparently.
That's what I'm going to call it from now on. I'm not depressed and anxious, I just live in the 4th Dimension.
That's what I'm going to call it from now on. I'm not depressed and anxious, I just live in the 4th Dimension.
/r/fifthworldproblems, here we come!
What he said has some truth ive found, but it doesnt begin to explain the entire problem.
What he said is basically a very impatient view on everything.
It's ~~sad~~ upsetting how ignorant people are.
I'd like to say that he is stupid as well, but that might gives others the impression that I am ignorant. I don't like people like this douchebag.
This is a gross simplification, but it IS somewhat true that living in the present makes one happier.  That being said, living in the present is different than 'seizing the day' or 'living each day like it was your last' or any of those cliches.  I would say that living in the present being a factor of happiness means just *existing* without putting everything into an endless trap of internal dialogue, self analysis, and circular thought process.
True, I was really surprised hearing about the benefits of meditation for the depressed, but it makes sense because it's basically focused on mindfulness -- stop paying attention to what you're thinking, and just pay attention to what's going on around you. It really is very soothing.
True, I was really surprised hearing about the benefits of meditation for the depressed, but it makes sense because it's basically focused on mindfulness -- stop paying attention to what you're thinking, and just pay attention to what's going on around you. It really is very soothing.
Yeah, I'm a practiced Vipassana meditation student and I find that meditation will help treat most problems that relate to anxiety or depression
So, if I'm both depressed and anxious, does that make me a time traveler?  At least that's one good thing..
The Doctor's next companion?  'Where do you want to go today, hmm? Ancient Greece? Jupiter 2? The Horsehead Nebula?' :D  'Eh... whatever's fine.' :P
The Doctor's next companion?  'Where do you want to go today, hmm? Ancient Greece? Jupiter 2? The Horsehead Nebula?' :D  'Eh... whatever's fine.' :P
'Back to bed. :('
I don't know, I'm pretty depressed about my future and the present. Less so than the past, but still.  And this guy is a huge douche.   [Wiz Khalifa](https://twitter.com/#!/WizKhalllifa/status/203722908734992387) is further confirmed for douchiness.
Who is that guy?
Who is that guy?
Words cannot express how happy I am that someone does not know who Wiz Khalifa is. Anyway, I won't tell you.   For when ignorance is bliss, 'tis folly to be wise.
I don't know, I'm pretty depressed about my future and the present. Less so than the past, but still.  And this guy is a huge douche.   [Wiz Khalifa](https://twitter.com/#!/WizKhalllifa/status/203722908734992387) is further confirmed for douchiness.
Except that the account you linked to is a parody account.
I've found that it's best not to take potheads seriously.
This is Wiz Khalifa. He's a *famous* pothead. Everything he says is serious.
This is like the r/atheism circlejerk.  Can we please be better than that?
Listen, every day we are surrounded by people that dont undersatnd and this causes us daily and enduring pain. Quit it. 
lol this guys right 
lol, this guy's high.
On a related note, [this picture](http://imgur.com/7WMtb) usually helps to cheer me up as well.
Thanks, that made me smile.
It's hard to believe that Bob Ross was ever sad. I love this guy. 
He was in the Vietnam war. He killed men,women, and children. I'd be depressed too.
He was in the Vietnam war. He killed men,women, and children. I'd be depressed too.
Well that escalated quickly. 
Well that escalated quickly. 
IIRC because of his position in the military he had to yell at people all the time and after he was out he said he'd never raise his voice again.
No, he wasn't. He spent his Air Force days stationed in Alaska, and never saw combat.
Pretty sure he was a drill sergeant though, so maybe he was sad because he had to yell at people.  And even if not, I miss the guy.
>I'm waiting on the good times now.  If only we could all feel that hopeful. Thanks, Bob.
They'll come eventually. In this life or the next.
Made me smile.  Thanks.
I hoped it would help someone. :)
I love this guy, but for some reason i always wondered if he'd make a good rock star
...dude
...dude
come one man, as if you wouldn't pay to see him Bob Rossing some early 80's chicks
come one man, as if you wouldn't pay to see him Bob Rossing some early 80's chicks
You made me smile for the first time today. Thank you. <3
Sometimes I just sleep because my dreams are more tolerable than reality. 
I so agree with you. Reality sucks, but you can make yourself into anything you want in your dreams.
I so agree with you. Reality sucks, but you can make yourself into anything you want in your dreams.
My dreams are filled with having a great life and friends. So my dreams are great until I wake up and realize my friends are never going to want to be my friends anymore so what's the point of even getting out of bed.
My *nightmares* are more tolerable than reality. People are horrible...
I’d rather have a nightmare.
Yes. I haven't been sleeping much. 3 to 5 hours a night for the last few weeks. A voluntary coma sounds pretty great right now.
I thought I was alone in this! I always tell my therapist, I don't want to die. I just wish I could be in a coma for a few months to get a god damn break from myself.
Yes!!! And during hibernation, our body heals itself, like all organs repair itself. That would be awesome! Too bad it’s not possible😒
I will pay the man that comes up with a way to induce some sort of coma in humans so we can take a long break
I will pay the man that comes up with a way to induce some sort of coma in humans so we can take a long break
I mean, doctors could put you in a comma with the right choice of drugs, it's just they won't do it just because you want. But I understand what you mean. 
I mean, doctors could put you in a comma with the right choice of drugs, it's just they won't do it just because you want. But I understand what you mean. 
This actually exists: narcotherapy (I considered this choice when younger)
Oh god yes. Eat like a pig for a week and then sleep for 3 months and lose all the weight without having to work out. Sounds like heaven to me.
Wow thank you you have put my inner desires into words
I just woke up and all I wanna do is go back to sleep forever 
Me too thanks 
but if we all go to sleep, who will run things?
That one guy that keeps the electricity running 
Does anyone else sleep too much? I can't bring myself to leave my bed. I'm off sick atm cuz I feel so shit. Hate being conscious. 
My partner's depressive states usually end up this way. They end up sleeping the entire day for a few days and wake up occasionally. This goes on until the mood passes or I can catch them when they're awake to love the shit out of them and try to push the bad brain away. 
My partner's depressive states usually end up this way. They end up sleeping the entire day for a few days and wake up occasionally. This goes on until the mood passes or I can catch them when they're awake to love the shit out of them and try to push the bad brain away. 
You are a good person 😊 I think I must have made it hard for my exes to deal with me when I feel bad. It sounds like you guys have a groove you have formed. That has warmed my heart. 
You are a good person 😊 I think I must have made it hard for my exes to deal with me when I feel bad. It sounds like you guys have a groove you have formed. That has warmed my heart. 
It works for mine, too. When I feel really low, it helps to be reminded that I'm loved and not alone. That and a little patience goes a long way.   I'm glad it could warm your heart though!
You can if you were born lucky enough that your parents are rich or midle class and you are still younger than 21 society will pperceve you as a piece of shit tho   I know it because i am living it its better but no tê best still it can be welll life is bad And i just know that i cant do this for ever so each day is a freaking blessing but tê future is shit 
I’m 40. True. I miss my mom. I used to confide with her when I have problems. Now I have to solve it on my own. Adult life especially parent life is full of responsibility. It’s tough. 
Somewhat.. But I know I need more than sleep. Sleep just helps me sustain against my overwhelming thoughts temporarily. 
What have you been thinking? Care to share?
Yeah, I've always disliked summer. I'd rather bundle up to be warm than strip down to be cool.
Like I always say ' You can never truly appreciate the heat, without loving the cold first.' Nothing better than a hot cup of Joe and a fuzzy blanket draped over my shoulders like Palpatine!
I hate summer. It's too hot and my skin burns very easily. Winter is my favourite season, the snow, the coldness and darkness, I just love it. Winter nights are the best.
I totally agree with you! I've got sunshine allergy so I actually hate summer... I love sipping some nice herb tea in winter night. It is really cosy and comfy. Can't wait it's getting colder!
All about that fall time 😍😍
Spring 💯
I don't feel anything. I just ask people endless questions about themselves because I have nothing to say about myself. People like talking about themselves so it works I guess. 
It totally works. I do this too. Often I wonder whether they think it's weird that I'm asking all the questions and they never ask me any questions. Which is fine because I have no answers, but the imbalance does strike me as odd.
It totally works. I do this too. Often I wonder whether they think it's weird that I'm asking all the questions and they never ask me any questions. Which is fine because I have no answers, but the imbalance does strike me as odd.
Ya it makes me think that non depressed people really have no empathy. It seems like you need to lack people who care about you to  care about other people
Ya it makes me think that non depressed people really have no empathy. It seems like you need to lack people who care about you to  care about other people
Sometimes it really does seem that way. 
I feel like I've pretended to be happy so much that I don't know who I am anymore (not that I ever did) it's so draining as well. I've mimicked so many people that I feel fake when I'm 'happy' around others.  
this 
I no longer feel like the person I used to be. I was so socially awkward in my teens that I one day decided to become a different person. In the sense of fake it til you make it. And it worked to some degree. I have some friends and a partner but I question if they would even like me if I hadn't faked it all.   The last time I felt real happiness from the inside was about six years ago. 
That's almost exactly what I did. I put on a disguise to attract people. I have a husband and some friends now too but I also question how much they would like or love me if they know how fake it all was.   I don't remember the last time I felt real happiness. :(
That's almost exactly what I did. I put on a disguise to attract people. I have a husband and some friends now too but I also question how much they would like or love me if they know how fake it all was.   I don't remember the last time I felt real happiness. :(
I'm sorry that you feel the same way but it's also somehow comforting to know I'm not the only one.  Sometimes it's so strange to me to look back at older pictures or even my old room at my parents house. It feels like it belongs to a stranger, who is still stuck there and I became the disguise. 
Same. Just that I can't look into the mirror for a longer period of time, because I HATE my face and hair. Dang deceases like acne and hair loss
I know the feeling. I found the more I willed myself to embrace the image I saw in the mirror the more I have learned to accept myself. Its subtle, but I think it has helped, like a meditation of sorts. I'm certainly not a therapist so take that with a big grain of salt, but if it somehow helps you I would be thrilled.
I pretty much base my emotions on my favorite TV characters because I just dont feel anything inside.
That's similar to what I do. I just mimic behaviors I see in others, either real or fictional, and apply them to the proper social settings.
Thanks, sweetie. I actually love young people and love hanging out with them. Moved to a college town thinking I could make that happen, but none of them wants to hang out with an old lady. 
This is injustice! You sound so nice and sweet. I'm 17 and I'd love to hang out with you!! Pm me if you want to talk :)   Edit: HAPPY BIRTHDAY!!!!
I know it might not make up for anything, but here's a card. Sadly I don't know your name, so your username is in its place.  Happy birthday. I wish better days for you :) http://imgur.com/xftVlqg
That was a very sweet thing to do. 
Happy Birthday. For what it is worth, I am 31 years old and I go through the same thing.  No one cares much when it's my birthday and I can't imagine that will be any better when I am your age.  Donating your body to science is incredibly useful and something more people should do, so thanks for that. 
Thank you.
Happy 65th Birthday. It's a milestone. 
Yes, it is, which is what makes it even more lonely not to have anyone here to share it with.
Happy Birthday!
Thanks!
Happy birthday.
happy day of birth
Happy birthday! 65 is a pretty big one, woohoo social security right!!
Thanks. Well, Medicare at least. I've been on SS benefits for a couple of years now. 
Happy Birthday!!!  I've got one coming too and I'm not looking forward to it for much the same reasons you didn't care for this birthday.  I'm sorry you had a bad day, on today of all days.  
Thanks. It wasn't really a bad day, except for being very lonely.
Thanks. It wasn't really a bad day, except for being very lonely.
If it's any consolation I'm in the exact same boat.  I live alone, no close family.  It does get old.  Drop me a line anytime.  We can commiserate.  :)
Happy birthday :)
Thanks!
Happy birthday, we all care about you immensely, just know people are careless and distracted these days but you're noticed greatly by our community! =[) congrats on 65!!!111
I'm 99% certain OP is a woman based on context within the post.
I'm 99% certain OP is a woman based on context within the post.
Sorry about that, let me correct my comment. I'm a skimmer and just missed the 'daughter' part of the original post. Thanks for pointing that out.
Happy Birthday!
Thanks!
I have one son who loves me, one who is a selfish prick who only loves himself. I used to have a very large and close extended family, but we all went our separate ways and they are states away. We never even talk anymore. 
Have you thought of going to meet ups? Never too old to make friends! 
Sure feels this way sometimes, dogs will lick your face regardless
And this is what truly matters in life
Or your cat will nom on your hand. He’s a silly boye
My cat eats my food off the stove because she’s a shithead, but I still love her.
Pretty much.  Btw. Stop smoking ;)
Why? Edit: genuinely curious, not deliberately trying to be contrarian.
Why? Edit: genuinely curious, not deliberately trying to be contrarian.
Related to the username. Sorry for the confusion.
Related to the username. Sorry for the confusion.
Haha oh. Thank you for clarifying.
He's drunk not high
r/woosh
r/woosh
Wouldn't expect that on r/depression 
Stopping to drink would also be good, since it is known to make depression worse in some ways. The smoking bit is just about the username tho. Sorry for the confusion.
ah stop with this bullshit. yes drinking will change how you feel about yourself but drinking does not change what you think about life in general. I've gone long periods sober and it did not help my depression, in fact it has made it worse.
Pessimism == Realism
I'm depressed and I don't even remotely agree with that. Pessimism is always looking at the negatives and having negative expectations while realism is being able to look at the positives and/or negatives of a situation. They're not the same.
I'm depressed and I don't even remotely agree with that. Pessimism is always looking at the negatives and having negative expectations while realism is being able to look at the positives and/or negatives of a situation. They're not the same.
Practical Pessimism is thinking the negatives usually outweigh the positives, which is in keeping with practical realism, in most cases.   
Objectively no, cause good things still happen lmao. Just dont expect anything, and be grateful for the things you have
pessimism is also equal to not having high expectations for anything. 
pessimism is also equal to not having high expectations for anything. 
i would say pessimism is having negative expectations for anything, expecting bad things to happen, instead of not having high expectations. 
Those are good questions to think on. I’d say you have to decide those answers on your own 
If I could decide things on my own I wouldn't be on this sub.
Things started getting much  better when I stopped drinking. 
what do you use for an outlet now?
Can I order you a pizza? 
At first I kind of giggled at how ridiculous your comment sounded - and then I realized - you're probably dead on with what OP needs. Any kind of creature comforts (food, dog food (they are undoubtedly depressed as well) even toiletries). The things the rest of us take for granted but, when depressed, are so very hard to find the energy to get.   If we can find out where OP lives, I, too, would like to help out in some way. 
I sometimes go into whole conversations hearing only a few words, responding accordingly and smiling on que. it beats the silence I guess.
Me too. I'll hear minor sentence fragments, but somehow still have an 'appropriate' response at the correct times,  and no one would know that I didn't really understand a thing that they're trying to tell me. 
Me too. I'll hear minor sentence fragments, but somehow still have an 'appropriate' response at the correct times,  and no one would know that I didn't really understand a thing that they're trying to tell me. 
I do that too. Its odd how it happens so naturally. Afterwards I don't even remember what anyone said, and everyone is happy to see me smiling and joking like always. 
I do that too. Its odd how it happens so naturally. Afterwards I don't even remember what anyone said, and everyone is happy to see me smiling and joking like always. 
It is odd. It's like an automatic mechanism that kicks in.
My fake smile has became so good, I can keep it up for 3-4 minutes, until my cheeks pain. Even I am sometimes unable to identify if I was legit happy or not in the photos.
I feel you on this one. I sometimes owned why my jaw and face hurts, and it's because I smiled so much. And I can't remember being happy or cherish for even a second.
I've been told I should do this, and I've been too paranoid about having to explain why I look unhappy. how have people reacted?
I haven't been 100% successful, but some days when I don't crack, I have a sweet co-worker that asks what is wrong. It feels more genuine to not have a fake smile.
Related to this: I'm INCAPABLE of answering the questions 'How are you' or 'How are you feeling?' with anything but 'Yeah I'm fine, thanks' 
Yea. “I am an empty shell of emotions how are you?” Is a bit to intense lol.
Yea. “I am an empty shell of emotions how are you?” Is a bit to intense lol.
Dang me empty shell of emotions is so accurate. How are you feeling OP? 
Does this kind, thoughtful boyfriend of yours have any single friends? ;)  In all seriousness though, sounds like you have a pretty great dude there. And I totally know what a lifesaver it is to have someone else help dig you out of your hole. One time my wonderful mother came to visit for the weekend and literally spent the entire time deep cleaning my apartment with me. Happy Birthday, I hope you continue to have a great day celebrating.
It made me more motivated get out of bed and get moving, do some of my homework early, and plan some errands. You're right, having help and being given that push really brightens your week. And thank you!
Good guy. Give him extra long hugs and some lovin. Okay? 
ok!🙆🏻
You should look into 'Unshoot Your Habitat.' It's a system for housekeeping that takes into consideration the mental and physical barriers we have to cleaning. I just got the book and the iPhone app, and I love it. The author really gets it. 
I will definitely have to read this! Thank you!
Happy birthday! This brightened my day. He is such a wonderful person. Your apartment looks really nice.
So sweet of you
Woah your apartment looks so nice. Best wishes to both of you!
Thanks! It's pretty cute when I'm not in my Depression Hole™
Thanks! It's pretty cute when I'm not in my Depression Hole™
> Depression Hole™  No room left down here. You're not welcome back. Stay away.
Thanks! ❤️💚💛
Great job on the place and keep at it! Who's your favorite pokemon?
Great job on the place and keep at it! Who's your favorite pokemon?
Chansey & Togekiss wbu
Happy birthday! Nice guy to do that. Nice of you to let him do that for you (not everyone would). The little things add up, so keep it going!
Thank you!
I've done that a million times. I used to have a bucket list of stupid shit I would have to do before I go. It's a great way to keep going.
No joke, I told myself I would never kill myself without me playing and finishing Half Life 3 first. I know it wont release any time soon so i guess im safe, lol.
No joke, I told myself I would never kill myself without me playing and finishing Half Life 3 first. I know it wont release any time soon so i guess im safe, lol.
You might end up living to immortality with that promise 
Yeah, but there will be times where even video games and TV couldn't even make you feel better. I've been there.
I am there...
I am there...
And this is a regular  /r/depression  conversation...  Damn our heads are shooted up!
The worse feeling is getting bored of a video game, it feels like you wasted money and you can't escape anything now
Yeah, doesn't help when your friends are all busy working and you're playing games. It felt like literal shit.
Yeah, doesn't help when your friends are all busy working and you're playing games. It felt like literal shit.
I find it bad when I am just playing video games and I think about people outside doing stuff with each other and having actually lives while I am here wasting supposedly the best years of my life.  ugh...
Even Walking Dead has gotten crap. Only stuff i can watch probably Netflix Daredevil and F Is For Family.
The Walking Dead has kind of gotten crap for a long time now, don't you think?
I actually think it's pretty normal to do things like that. It's good that you enjoy video games and TV enough that they give you a reason to keep living.
it's not an enjoyable reason for me to keep on living as much as it is the only thing that distracts me enough from actively planning suicide.
Agreed. I think I would have killed myself already if the internet never existed...
or maybe you'd be happier? :)
Matrix welcomes you!
i don't know why everyone dislikes cypher in the first movie, he's perfectly justified.
I'm in that situation now. I just powered through yet another situation where I 'under performed' as usual, only this time I was able to maintain a positive attitude. Here I am, an hour later, and it's starting to sink in about how bad I did and how it feels like I'll never improve. On top of that, I also just learned people who were watching were talking about how bad I was doing.
 Ignore them, the only reason people comment on how shit someone is behind their backs is to make themselves feel better. What matters is that you know you can improve, put on some upbeat music and maybe work on the shit u just underperformed on till you feel satisfied with yourself  (a lot harder than I make it sound)
This was my day today. 
Yep. :( Had two days of complete bliss, got a shitton of work done, felt awesome.  Now I'm laying in my bed. Blinking takes all my energy...
That's why I sabotage myself so that I never feel good. Sucks, but at least I don't have to deal with that crash from happiness to sadness. Just sadness all the time.
Yeeeeeees! Exactly. Today was a feel good day so I destroyed it with a caffeine overdose into extreme anxiety. 'Destroy yourself before someone else does' - me, sometime in the past.
It's like when you get an interview and you're like 'YES!' but then ur mind starts saying, doesn't matter you're going to shoot that interview up so hard 
totally. with other people for me mostly. like things are going really good, they like me, ok how long is this going to last before i somehow manage to mess it up
Same, others sometimes seem shallow mentally as they have never been through anything   
Might explain my inability to be attracted to anyone mentally healthy. I struggle to be friends with people who haven't had some sort of issues. 
Might explain my inability to be attracted to anyone mentally healthy. I struggle to be friends with people who haven't had some sort of issues. 
It just seems like people without issues can't communicate on any deeper sort of level a lot of the time :(
It just seems like people without issues can't communicate on any deeper sort of level a lot of the time :(
I really don't want to end up on /r/IamVerySmart but... Yeah. That matches my experience.
The first person I told about my depression when I was a teenager (she was 23) asked if it was all in my head. I don't have the energy to deal with that ignorance.
I would lol and say yes but we're just wired differently. But yeah the ignorance gets old. 
21 feeling like I'm 50 sometimes. 
I'm 22 and my hips are going too, high five!
I'm 22 and my hips are going too, high five!
It's my back for me lol. 
It's my back for me lol. 
I think it's due to my scoliosis so...like how many more shit body parts before I get a new one for free?  Seriously though, ow, that sucks. Backs are important for most things.
People like us travel the road less traveled by. 
By definition a lonely path unfortunately 
By definition a lonely path unfortunately 
I don't know, the things I have experienced have irreversibly changed me. I want nothing more now than complete isolation from the world I inhabit.   Books and film keep me company aside from the people I care about. 
I don't know, the things I have experienced have irreversibly changed me. I want nothing more now than complete isolation from the world I inhabit.   Books and film keep me company aside from the people I care about. 
I told my counsellor, that I could stay at home for the rest of my life and never speak to another human being. She said that was a form of mental illness. But interacting with people is too stressful for me. I have always been a loner, no one wants me and I am cool with that. Just give me a bed and a radio.
We walk a lonely road. Excuse me for the Green Day reference.
It's a good song! 
Me im only 19 but I feel like Ive lived for too long. 
I'm 15 and i feel like that
I got this from a school mental health advisor when I was going through a major depressive episode. She said I seemed too mature, independent, and ahold of myself to be as depressed as I was claiming. Dumb lady only put me on 10MG of Celexa when I knew I needed 40 and some xanax
Yeah, you're mentally mature without any of the benefits said maturity has to offer, IE: financial independence
I'm 32, so old compared to a lot of people here, but not old in the grand scheme of things, and I feel ancient. I feel like I've lived at least 3 lives. Being a child, being a shooted up and poor teen to mid-20s year old, then trying to get my shit together in my late 20s to early 30s. And now I have a career, I'm married, but I still don't feel like I have my shit together and I still suffer from depression. Sigh. 
Hey, I'm 28 and don't have my shit together. Your story gives me hope. I'm an all around nice person. Maybe too nice. But I've suffered deep loneliness and depression for years. I simply lack the drive that most seem to have. I am fit, I body build, run, hike, eat healthy, meditate, read a lot of psychology and philosophy. I feel like I should be a much more successful person. Own my own home somewhere peaceful. Instead I work a terrible minimum-wage job. Not sure.
That looks really good and depicts it perfectly
Thank you, I'm glad you like it :) 
Thank you, I'm glad you like it :) 
I used to draw well as a kid, but I lost the skill growing up. Looking at your drawing just made me sad again.
I used to draw well as a kid, but I lost the skill growing up. Looking at your drawing just made me sad again.
Eh. I get a noticeable drop in my drawing skill if I don't draw for one week. You not doing it for years just amplified it. But don't worry, you didn't lose your aptitude, you're just rusty. Start practicing and it'll come back to you faster than you expect it. It's like riding a bike.
really great expression of how it feels.  especially like that it's kinda creepy.  depression feels like some sick creepy creature controlling me at times.  you should make this a painting.  would be really great on a canvas.
I was thinking the same thing, such a creative, well done, and accurate representation of how it feels for me. Would make a great painting, I think a lot of people would relate to this piece.
I drew it a few weeks ago. At least, I think it's depression. Anxiety is probably also there. It's gross and sticky and disgusting, slow and cruel and always changing shape. It seems impossible to get rid of it.   http://imgur.com/Xxaaosj
looks like the Pokemon Muk :)
looks like the Pokemon Muk :)
I don't even know Pokemon...but looking it up, I suppose it does!
I don't even know Pokemon...but looking it up, I suppose it does!
Challenge. Get a Pokemon game. Get the pokemon Muk, make it your partner and beat the game with it.  Might be fun for you. =)
The way the monster is forcing the guy's lips into a smile reminds me of the [recurring motif](http://www.depressioncomix.com/posts/005/) in depression comix where a guy holds a 'smile' mask over his face whenever he's in public.
This comic made me cry. Every time I visit here it's a tear trip. I just saw that your name is Satou...I know that name from somewhere. Is it Rurouni Kenshin?
very nice, I like it
Thanks:) 
thank you.
What ever happened, you're welcome. :) 
I can relate... For quite some time know, I 'like' to draw people who hang themselves... It definitely is not making me feel any better, but I gotta do something when I'm bored.  Your drawing is good :-)
Thank you:) 
Awesome picture.  It reminds me a lot of [this one](http://www.flickr.com/photos/mikrotom/3902910307/in/set-72157612435132994), which I have always felt was a really apt depiction, too.  It's by Sandra Ranja.
I really like this, but I don't quite understand it. Is there any kind of symbolism going on here or is it just supposed to be a depressed looking monster?
I really like this, but I don't quite understand it. Is there any kind of symbolism going on here or is it just supposed to be a depressed looking monster?
I think the monster is sitting at the dinner table, an unwelcome and impossible to ignore guest who is sucking in the light around him like a black hole.  But maybe that's just me.  :-)
You might be interested in looking into art therapy. Nice drawing, thank you for sharing with us.
What is art therapy, exactly? 
Shouldn't it be a frowny face instead of a smiling one?
Well, yes and no. Again, this is just my personal interpretation. I feel like I can never tell people what's going on when they ask how are you doing, are you okay, etc. Like it makes me try to look happy for other people.  
Mhm. I feel the exact same as you do.  That feeling where...you wonder what happened in life that made you so flawed and shooted up beyond redemption. Even to the point where you know your parents kind of gave up on you. And while you know they still love you, they kind of know you're a failure.  God I wish I never had to feel like this. I wish I could turn back time and undo everything that I regret. I just wish I would just [censored].
Don't forget that your parents are people too. They have their own problems, insecurities etc. What you take as having given up on you may actually not have you at the root of it as all!  Talk with them! If you can't, Im here to listen. Here or PM 
Hollllyyyyyy shitttt I just had this talk with my mom today. Cried on the phone while she told me I would never be a burden. But after years of being depressed, not being able to hold a job, and all of he other shit that comes with mental illness, I told her it was hard to not see myself as a burden. I feel you OP. 
Hits so close to home  Specailly when they go out the way to help with money or even answer phones calls at the worst time just to calm you down:(
This is what hurts the most. I'd probably be content to spend the rest of my life laying in bed and rotting my brain with TV and internet if it didn't mean leeching off my parents. They're not even judgmental or pushy about it, they're really supportive, but I just hate being a burden.
I could relate so much. I'd be ok to spend the rest of my life playing video games, watching tv, and using the internet. Instead, I am in this shithole of a university in a third world country, studying a major I don't have an interest in for 3 more years (this is my 4th year in university btw).
It's more of a mixed bag if you ask me. On the one hand, depression does allow you to view certain aspects of the world more accurately than people who tend to be positive and optimisic. On the other hand, however, depression can also cause people to view the world from a distorted perspective in which the negatives are highly exaggerated and the positives are very much downplayed. It's more of a trade-off in the end of the day.
Agree with everything. 
It's normal. In fact a lot of people with depression don't feel like they got a sickness or anything. It just feels like you finally see the world how it really is. That it's the others that are wrong. Took me a while to simply understand that I was actually sick, and had depression. That's what depression does with you, it warpes the perspective without you knowing it. You can be realistic without going all lalaland happy go lucky. It's about balance. It's about getting a balanced perspective. 
What if depression was a personnality type ? what if it's actually not something to treat ? what if we are employing all the wrong method for treating it ? what if ppl don't apreciate other is the problem ? what if ppl trying really hard to not understand what other ppl is doing the problem ? what if ?
What if depression was a personnality type ? what if it's actually not something to treat ? what if we are employing all the wrong method for treating it ? what if ppl don't apreciate other is the problem ? what if ppl trying really hard to not understand what other ppl is doing the problem ? what if ?
I drift toward treatment because without it the depression is going to kill me.  It will absolutely kill me.  So that little pill I take in the morning, whether anyone understands how it works or not, is sometimes all I've got.  If better treatments are introduced I'll be first in line to try them - I applied to participate in ketamine studies but wasn't accepted.   
This is known as [depressive realism](https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Depressive_realism)
!!!
I often think it's the other way around. That people who can see things for what they truly are and how the world works are subsequently depressed. 
Could be.  Either way, ouch.
I read a study a long time ago that showed pessimists predict future events more accurately than optimists. Apparently that heightened ability does not lead to increased happiness.
A pessimist is what an optimist calls a realist.   I kind of buy it. Murphys law anything that can go wrong will go wrong. 
I think it comes from jealousy of 'normal people' who seem to be able to just pull happiness out of the air.  I don't mean to demean your perspective, I just get so exasperated with my mood swings that my phrasing follows suit.
I see. Not saying you're that way at all, just mentioning the risk. Thanks for explaining.
Yeah, that's what ive experienced for a while.  Think it's a symptom of dissociation (feeling separate from yourself, feelings, your body, other people, in your head all the time).  Its so frustrating cause just when I think i actually want to spend time with people, i realize its a terrible mistake 5 minutes into the conversation and then im trapped for another 20 minutes, minimum.
Damn this is really true
Do you hate how people act or do you hate the feeling of people around you?
Both. I get a lot of anxiety about how people think of me. Do they think I’m being weird? What if I tell a stupid joke? But they expect me to participate in the conversation.. better say something quick... oops it was a weird joke
Both. I get a lot of anxiety about how people think of me. Do they think I’m being weird? What if I tell a stupid joke? But they expect me to participate in the conversation.. better say something quick... oops it was a weird joke
If you don't mind me asking how old are you?
If you don't mind me asking how old are you?
Almost 30. 
*gets compliment*   *argues it's validity*   I'm with you, OP. 
yep, me irl shooting arguing with the person who just complimented me because i'm positive it's a roast in disguise
i just say thank you! but in my head im like 'if they only knew what a piece of shit i really am'
This is exactly what I've done my whole life.
I literally can’t fathom believing what they say, I just figure they’re too dumb to see me for the walking confused garbage I am. 
People always say I’m nice and how I’m sweet   People are dumb. People thought Jeffrey Dalhmer was a nice guy   People don’t know shit 
Everytime I receive a compliment, I always think that it is fake and they just want me to feel better. 
This or, worse, they are actively making fun of me. That was drummed into me from school when that actually often was the case. I even had a couple boys asked me out as a joke.  I realise that most adults have grown out of that kind of cruelty but my paranoid instincts remain. 
This or, worse, they are actively making fun of me. That was drummed into me from school when that actually often was the case. I even had a couple boys asked me out as a joke.  I realise that most adults have grown out of that kind of cruelty but my paranoid instincts remain. 
I did that to a girl in middle school with a couple friends of mine and I instantly regretted it.  As a highschooler now I still see that girl and feel really bad.  I feel so bad for anyone this has happened too.
I like this euro parallelism. 
I am glad u did. I hope also that I was helpful.
everyone here feels that way. No one is nice for no reason. 
I'm nice for no reason. I know what it's like to feel like shit and I don't want anyone else to feel that way.
Woahhhh! Keep it up, for the both of you. I'm betting you hear a lot of 'do it for the baby' because that's what moms get... but do it for yourself, too. You deserve happiness. I wish you the best. 
na
na
Exactly. Thank you.
Im waiting for this to happen to me.
It's just like one day it hit me and I woke up out of a fog and realized I needed help. I found what worked for me, the problem is I had to want it. I think that's the hardest part. Wanting it. 
If I'm not at school, literally the only thing I do is lay in bed. Maybe I look at some memes on my phone or get up to eat, but nothing else. I can't bring myself to do anything else.
Do you have a job?
Nope
Ahhh well
I don’t enjoy my free time either. At least while I am at school I can occupy myself with stuff. At home I feel numb and tired. I want so badly to play the guitar but my depression has sucked away all my energy to do so. I feel like a zombie all the time but it’s worse when I’m having free time. It’s like torture, I can’t even relax and it’s getting worse when I get extreme urges to fap. 
> fap.  It's only now that I realizes how strange and dirty of a word this is for sleep.
Really? Why?
Ever hear or say a word that hits you in a certain way that hadn't before?  It's kind of like saying a word several times. It loses it's meaning and then it sounds strange.
Too many of us rely on motivation to get us going when what we actually need is discipline. I waste a huge amount of time avoiding getting started, and waiting for the motivation.. but i always find that once i start, i enjoy the activity and i am thankful that i did it.. work enforces a routine, you can too. 
I absolutely agree.  Routines are one way to help with discipline.  Another thing I do is set a timer for fifteen minutes and tell myself that I have to at least spend 15 minutes making progress on whatever it is I'm procrastinating. Like you said, usually once I get started, I want to keep going.
Yup! I work ~45 hours a week and my days off are horrible! I spend most of it in bed wondering what's wrong with me and how I can fix it. Either that or I take drugs to try and numb myself. It's been working the past 8 years of my life but now it's actually causing problems of its own...  Back to the drawing board.
>my days off are horrible! I spend most of it in bed wondering what's wrong with me and how I can fix it.   Literally how I spend all of my time off by myself lol
I can’t get anything productive done on weekends. I’m a teacher, and I’m out of the house for 10-11 hours per day during the week. I love my job. My house is a disgusting mess. I can’t muster the motivation to do anything about it. 
I’m doing the minimalism challenge right now. Day 1 I asked myself “What is one thing you could live without?”. Found a piece of trash and threw out. The next day I did two the third day I did three etc. I’m on day 16 and I’m starting to see a difference. 136 unnecessary things or simply trash are out of my room. 
Damn man you must really enjoy your job, which is great. I typically drink the night before then tend to my hangover on my day off. I don't do much either but browse the web. But I see it as solace compared to being at my job. I wish I was more like you and more motivated for work but everytime I'm here I'm empty and want to die. 
Its not so much that I love my job, its that its a job where I can zone out for a bit and feel useful and suddenly, the voices in my head are gone. I take solace in being alone, it can be nice sometimes, but then I read something, or see something that just reminds me that, 'hey, you aren't normal, you are a shooting subhuman, look at your life, does any of that scream well adjusted?' 
The things that haunt me the most are things that I should have done but didn't.
Same.
It's the things you don't do, that you regret later in life.
Yeah, in the end you regret the things you didn't do rather than things you have done..
Yeah, in the end you regret the things you didn't do rather than things you have done..
I always get a deeply unpleasant feeling remembering some of the things I have done, especially the things I told wiser people when I thought I knew everything.
Every Friday/Saturday/weekend has just become a blur to me as all are so monotonous and exactly the same. I never thought I would miss being in work but at least during the week I'm doing something rather than wallowing in pity in my room.
No one ever make plans with me. I have to do all the work. I gave up after awhile
Every Friday/Saturday/weekend has just become a blur to me as all are so monotonous and exactly the same. I never thought I would miss being in work but at least during the week I'm doing something rather than wallowing in pity in my room.
get a dog and go to the beach on wkends orrrr the park. 
get a dog and go to the beach on wkends orrrr the park. 
Walking my dog is the only time I leave my house to the weekend.
This is the exact thought I dwell on as i both feel anger and missing out, and despair knowing that I'm missing more as I'm dwelling
Missing out really makes you feel like complete shit.
Is painfully, it sucks. 
Yup. Danging blows.
Oh boy, my memories are about raging on league of legends. I still remember the argument I had with another player, completely pointless and unimportant, but those are the only memories that I made recently. 
I spent most of my teen years isolated in the middle of nowhere playing cod. Wasn't even much fun.
it's saturday night and I'm sitting at my computer, wondering why nobody is online. then, I realized that it's the time of the week that it is, and wondered no more. i am that person that nobody wants to hang out with, or plans to hang out with. nobody gives a flying shit about me. 
I would hang out with u. I feel the same. But knowing my luck we ain't even in the same country 
Do u have any demons u wanna let out? I'm always ready to hear about it
I'm mentally ill. Not many people want anything to do with me. I can't blame them. You can pretend to care and say postive things to me and feel good. I'd rather not talk.
I'm mentally ill. Not many people want anything to do with me. I can't blame them. You can pretend to care and say postive things to me and feel good. I'd rather not talk.
Now you are making assumptions. I'm bipolar. I hate my life because i cant think of any valid reason to be sad. So i need you to help me feel sad. I also enjoy the feeling of someone opening themselves. I also think i am partially insane. So don't be afraid to message me :)
Now you are making assumptions. I'm bipolar. I hate my life because i cant think of any valid reason to be sad. So i need you to help me feel sad. I also enjoy the feeling of someone opening themselves. I also think i am partially insane. So don't be afraid to message me :)
I got diagnosed with bipolar at the mental hospital recently. I have lots of other issues. Best to stay away from my shit self.
I just wanted to say I think you're a good person.
I am not a good person.
I feel you. I had such an amazing life. An amazing partner, amazing out of this world friends and amazing job. I remember never wanting to be in my room. I had an amazing social life. Now I’m all alone in my room as everyone’s life has moved on to now families and new careers. 
At least you got those memories I guess.
Yes, but you did most of those things with out someone by your side right?
No I was surrounded by coworkers and colleagues. Depression will lead to your isolation even when surrounded by those who say and genuinely do care about you. 
How does one get through this? It's such a toxic way to just survive.
It's just that, surviving. This is not living, just casually waiting for death. Welcome to existance
It's just that, surviving. This is not living, just casually waiting for death. Welcome to existance
Some days I'm tired of waiting for it. 
Same, me too. High-five! :*(
It shooting sucks.
>please know this too shall pass. It will get beter  How do you know that things will get better for those suffering from depression? It could, and it has for many, gotten worse. 
It's just a platitude normies like to give. My life has sucked for nearly a decade.
I was with you until you said 'being their for you'
whoops. Was a simple slip on my part, but I do know the difference. Fixed. 
It's bcs words are easy and actions are hard. Nobody wants to actually put in the effort to help someone. Sad thing is, I get it.  Bottom line, don't expect other ppl to help you, cause they probably won't.
words aren't easy for me
words aren't easy for me
I guess I meant the happy go lucky normal person who throws around empty phrases.
Just like with the suicide hotline.  They don't care about you, they care about you harming other people.
don't care about other people either, just doing their job
Ugh yes I shooting hate that. My husband's cousin just posted a copy and pasted bs status on facebook telling people you shouldn't kill yourself because it'll affect everyone you'll ever know, and even went so far as to create scenarios like 'girls you went to school with will develop eating disorders and teachers will quit their jobs.' Then she threw in a tiny postscript of 'Even if we've never talked, if you're suicidal message me!' which I know knowing her and just people in general is completely shit. Ugh.
You should take her up on her offer and msg her just to see her squirm or make an excuse and blow you off.
How are you still FB friends with her?
Family and stuff.  She's young and sometimes posts things that are well-intentioned but a little shitty.
seek professional help.  'people' ain't pros and are not capable of appropriate care  get help
Tired of this being the goto answer. As if anyone has a clue about what 'professional help' is. 
Tired of this being the goto answer. As if anyone has a clue about what 'professional help' is. 
A psychologist or a psychiatrist is professional help.
HAHA?  and after a few years you are STILL here.  hang in there lad.  so much of our misery fades as our brain continues to develop and we realize 'life is difficult'.  that doesn't make life easy, it does help us build empathy for others and their burden.  stick around long enough to help others.  eh? 
Life is difficult is a understatement when you dont fit in anywhere, seems to me it would be best to go to sleep and never wake up.
Someone worth having as a best friend is rare
Yeah but when we have fun it's soooo good but then I have nights like this. 
Most people who do not suffer do not understand! They can't understand and don't know what to do to help! It is a very lonely life.
I'd venture as far as to say that everyone - regardless of mental condition - suffers, but no one ever *understands* each other. Every person's reality at any point of time can be so different. It makes no sense for someone to attempt support with: 'I understand how you feel.'      Being able to relate (empathy) is another thing, and I think that is what usually helps when trying to support. It is a lonely life indeed, I'll agree.
This is what happened to me. Now I'm alive with no friends. Dang everyone.
exactly. How do people expect me to feel now? 
exactly. How do people expect me to feel now? 
People don't understand, man. People don't understand that it's not like we wanna be depressed. People don't see suicide as a valuable option. Those shoots put people like us on the backburner and they get mad at US for wanting to turn the goddamn flame off? I'm definitely not saying kill yourself, cause if I can still be alive, you can still be alive, but FUUUUuuuuck them. 
helping folks is hard
Not offering what you have no intentions to give, however, is a very easy thing to do.
Thats what ive been thinking... if existence is pain, then why do we do it?
Because unlike what some people say, killing yourself is really difficult. Your body will do everything it can to stay alive and you have no control over it. Survival instinct is a very powerful thing that everybody has.  It's easier to live and suffer.
Because unlike what some people say, killing yourself is really difficult. Your body will do everything it can to stay alive and you have no control over it. Survival instinct is a very powerful thing that everybody has.  It's easier to live and suffer.
Over the years of suicide attempts, i feel as though im getting closer everytime
I don't want to hurt the people who care about me.
I have been alive for years for the same reason, but am coming to the end of that as a useful excuse. I am not strong enough to live for other people when I can't even live for myself.
Yea I feel the same way. They tell you to just be busy and you won't be sad. You can try, but I'm pretty sure it doesn't work like that.
-follow advice and find a hobby  -3h you've been practicing woodburning and feeling nothing  -suddenly the crippling depression hits and you forget why you even started this  Good thing your friend is such an expert!
Dude everybody hurts ,sometimes, don't quit on life some of us actually give a shit, you are actually unique and one of a kind and i'm sure there's something awesome about you!
chilll guys they were just trying to help.. but for future reference, prshs70, that commonly used saying isn't really appreciated because we hear it all the time
Sitting in the shower, hmm... thank you for giving me an alternative to skipping a shower! I can't believe I never thought of that.  I've been skipping lately and this seems like a great way for me to baby step my way back to daily showers. I can't thank you enough, emilyyrrr.
you are so welcome! I am so happy to see the love and encouragement in this thread that happened while I was at class :)
[As someone who understands how hard it can be](http://i.imgur.com/CbW6N.gif)
[the highest!](http://imgur.com/FTe9S)
Wow, that's awesome! I understand the showering thing. During depression, even showering or bathing is absolutely exhausting. It feels so good to get productive things done; you've inspired me to be productive today. :)
yay! it's the little things that add up :)
Good for you, I also won todays battle. Went to the gym, first time this year (of many hopefully)
Thanks :) that's so awesome! I definitely know how hard it can be to drag yourself to the gym but the exercise is so great for the mind (and body too), keep it up!
Congratulations! I'm in a similar place as you are, where doing the basic things to take care of myself is a challenge. It feels so hard sometimes. But I like to think that for each day, or for even a minute, when we are able to fight our depression, we are taking a big step in a positive direction, no matter how small it may seem to someone else. 
You'e absolutely right. Those who thing this is small, are not ones who truly understand the battle. It's not their fault. But never let them get you down or belittle your struggle.
I thought I was alone too but glad I'm not! I just didn't let myself sit this morning and standing wasn't as hard as I thought it would be :)
You have inspired me to try and remain in an upright position when I shower tomorrow haha
You have inspired me to try and remain in an upright position when I shower tomorrow haha
haha wonderful! it's not as hard as your brain tells you it is :)
I've been in a funk as to say for a couple of months and today was the first day that I went with a friend to the gym, I can't recommend it enough, I immediately felt better and went straight home and actually put 4 hours into my online course I've been doing, which before I was putting off and off, keep up the good work bud :)
I'm doing an online course as well! It's far too easy to put off :(
Congratulations!! That's so wonderful!  And no matter what, remember that you always have today's precedent.  You did it today, it'll happen again (even if you have setbacks between now and then).  Awesome job!!!
thanks! I am determined to do it again tomorrow... and maybe get some dishes done too
Awesome, this post has inspired me to actually get stuff done tomorrow. Keep it up!
:) I love that this thread has turned into inspiring words and inspired smiles
You did good :) keep it up!  I think the occasional sitdown shower is allowed, specially for drunk/hungover mersh_perderder.
haha definitely ok for drunk/hungover times! We don't want anyone falling down drunk in the tub
haha definitely ok for drunk/hungover times! We don't want anyone falling down drunk in the tub
*thunk*   *glug glug*
I'm an AP student in high school. My classmates love to one-up each other on how little sleep they got the night before.
Ahhhh, those were the days. Wait until like 3 of them transfer to your major and your 'I took 8 AP classes' types realize they basically paid CollegeBoard $1000. Never mind all the time they lost stressing out instead of enjoying high school.
Ahhhh, those were the days. Wait until like 3 of them transfer to your major and your 'I took 8 AP classes' types realize they basically paid CollegeBoard $1000. Never mind all the time they lost stressing out instead of enjoying high school.
Even better is when they transfer to a major that doesn't accept any AP credits and it was all for nothing. Had a bunch of those in my classes (at my university for STEM majors you couldn't use AP credits at all). Then they have to re-take Calc II and they don't try because they 'already passed this class years ago' only to realize that the hardass actual math professor is just a wee bit harder on the grading scale and covers a lot more material.
I feel the same way. It's like an olympics of suffering. Who can be more stressed. Who has the busiest schedule. It's bullshit. I know I could be making more money, but working until I have a breakdown is not sustainable. I need to take care of myself, especially mentally.
'Olympics of suffering.'  Accurate and made me laugh :)
Protestant work ethic makes me sick.
Or capitalism.  Same thing.  Like fingers on a hand.
Or capitalism.  Same thing.  Like fingers on a hand.
Agreed
Or capitalism.  Same thing.  Like fingers on a hand.
death to capitalism shooting when.
The average human life is garbage. 
Nearly ½ of humanity lives on less than $2.50 a day. If you live in an advanced country, even a poor existence is far better than the average
This is my dad 100%. If I make any mention of struggling to make ends meet (3 kids and stay at home mom). He gets on to me about how I never stay late or work weekends. I'm sorry I don't want to have to work ridiculously long hours and weekends to make life easier for me or my family.
I hardly see my dad, and we don't really struggle economically thanks to that. But I'd much rather have to fix up a junker with my dad than have a nice car for myself.
You're not alone. /r/LateStageCapitalism
I looked over that sub and it raises some good points at the horrible things that a unregulated capitalist society has done in the western world. But I truly believe capitalism is a good thing, when properly managed. The sub is way too negative for the likes of me, but interesting posts none the less. 
I looked over that sub and it raises some good points at the horrible things that a unregulated capitalist society has done in the western world. But I truly believe capitalism is a good thing, when properly managed. The sub is way too negative for the likes of me, but interesting posts none the less. 
deleted  ^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^0.5584  [^^^What ^^^is ^^^this?](https://pastebin.com/FcrFs94k/34287)
I only work 40-45 hours a week at my job but it's an extremely toxic work environment so I come home exhausted and depressed most days. I'm really trying to get another gig.  :(
40 hours can drain you, different people have different energy levels.
I remember reading somewhere about how nowadays, the mark of status is not money or possessions, but anxiety.
Well I imagine a lot of people here are royalty
Isn't that what our life basically is? Being constantly exhausted? 
Well, that's certainly what *I* find.
It's actually a pretty good indicator of a lack of quality in other parts of life.  Its similar to 'oh I got so drunk last night'.
All I've got is, 'oh I slept for 24 hours yesterday'.
Would this line work after ghosting someone for more than a month? 
I've had success
I've had success
Do tell? 
Do tell? 
It was either facebook messenger or text message.  I told them I was sorry I didn't reply after seeing their message but I fell asleep and forgot. So aside from the forgetting part, it was true.
Does anybody get so depressed they just don't reply or talk to anyone? 
Yes. All the time.. It's ruined friendships for me, sometimes before they even start.   Some people take that shit real personal, and I guess I understand why to some extent. But I really don't think those particular people understand what it's like.
Yes. All the time.. It's ruined friendships for me, sometimes before they even start.   Some people take that shit real personal, and I guess I understand why to some extent. But I really don't think those particular people understand what it's like.
Thankfully for most of my friends it doesn't seem like a big deal if we don't talk for a long time. However there is one person who reacted to it so strongly that I'm actually scared to talk to again in the future.
Is it a friend you're replying to or some random person? I don't even have a friend that I could text that to :( If I had a friend... I don't think I'd send that to them
You could always hit me up! I'm down to listen and my PM box is always open so don't hesitate!
I leave in 25 minutes and I want to cry and am telling at my So for no reason   I might just jump into traffic on the way there,
When I was younger I got depressed for a couple of years but then it got better and I like my life now. Think that it could be a phase. Hold on. Good things could be on the way for you. You'll never know unless you stay here with us.
Working 9/10 hours a day is 9/10 hours i dont sit there thinking about the bullshit that depresses me.
Interesting. Work IS what depresses me.
Interesting. Work IS what depresses me.
Personally, I like to diversity my portfolio of misery.
Personally, I like to diversity my portfolio of misery.
Can I short stock in anxiety-creating actions?
This right here, work helps believe it or not. Just keep plugging away until you can go somewhere else, until then enjoy the grind my friend. We are all on it, and the only thing you can do is learn to love it.
Only works if you can feel productive. I've fallen into the trap of feeling unable to do my work, which leads to me redditing on my phone, which leads to less productivity, which leads to me feeling depressed, which leads to me redditing on my phone as a coping mechanism. And so the cycle continues. 
Serious question here, can you learn to love it? Im afraid I'm not adjusting quite as well as my parents hoped.
You can not like it but love where it might take you.   I was in a minimum wage kitchen job last year and based off my chefs recommendation am in a Union job making a good wage and on my way to marry my girlfriend and start our lives together.  You never know where you may end up, the only thing that matters is making it there.
'Everyone has to work, that's just life.'  What about the rich? They don't have to do a damn thing.  '...'   I'm tired of the competition. Everything is competition. Work is competition, relationships are competition, social status is competition. It is one of the top reasons that I find humans truly awful. It doesn't have to be like this. It's sick.
 What the shoot I thought of this too earlier
Maybe because we are scared of the unknown. You seldom hear stories about people quitting their jobs and going travelling in a trailer.   How many of us could bare to do that? The uncertainty and the idea of leaving your comfort zone (natal town, relatives, friends) is too much to handle.  Guess they hamster wheel is the best we can manage and that is beyond sad.
True. I don't even think it's the unknown sometimes. Once you get to a certain age or get a certain amount of responsibility, being in the hamster wheel is the safest choice since it allows us to do what we have to do (eat, pay bills etc) even if it's not fulfilling in any way. The more responsibility you get, the more trapped you become so the hamster wheel isn't the best....it's the only choice sometimes. Least it feels that way.     
The worst is having to work 8+ hours per day and receiving a shitty ammount of money. Gods I really hate my country.
At least I can always pretend laugh at r/2meirl4meirl after work :/
Idk, I hate work, don't have much of a choice in the matter. It's depressing, soul crushing,  demoralizing, I can't even support myself, but work hard. You get looked down upon by people. Get treated like shit. I had a customer go around the store saying all sorts of racist stuff about me. I've had people insult me, and you just have to take it. One day I feel like I won't.  
Dang, I don't know how you deal with racist pricks *on top of* the double shit-drudgery of work *and* being depressed. Hang in there, stranger. If anything, at least there are some of us out here who know this isn't how life should be. We might not be able to change it, but we know we're right, and maybe if we keep the discussion going, keep the knowledge, some good will one day come of it.
Dang, I don't know how you deal with racist pricks *on top of* the double shit-drudgery of work *and* being depressed. Hang in there, stranger. If anything, at least there are some of us out here who know this isn't how life should be. We might not be able to change it, but we know we're right, and maybe if we keep the discussion going, keep the knowledge, some good will one day come of it.
Apparently she thought I was middle eastern, and a terrorist. I am not middle eastern, no one from my family is from the Middle East.  I think it bothered me that she went around talking to my co workers about it, if she said it too my face I could tell her to shoot off. Because I am mixed, I am not really accepted anywhere. 
Felt kinship immediately reading the post, and I was actually psyched to get to the comments section to see if there were any magic bullets to solve the problem.  (Nope).  So just back to the usual then - thinking about the small stuff and why it makes the rest worthwhile? Sorry OP I wish could offer more help but this is the overarching all-reaching problem of my life too.
Maybe we won't have to suffer through this much longer
I don't necessarily want to kill myself. I just want the pain to stop. But it depends on the job you get. I have a job where I deliver auto parts to people. I'd say at least 80% of my time is spent alone, in my vehicle. It's not bad at all.
I have the same job :)
I just finished school and I'm so utterly worried the 8 hour a day is going to seriously drive me to suicide finally. 
I'm worried the work I'm going to invest 8 hours a day into is not going to be worth it. We will spend 30 years of our life in a 9 to 5 job, it should be something worth that time. Something we can at least partially enjoy.
Same here nothing interest me anymore. Droped out of university and now living with my parents. 
me too :/ :(
Well it's most likely a big part of the reason depression is so prevalent in this Capitalist world. 
Would Socialism help us?  The elites hold the power no matter what form of government you have.
The hope of overthrowing the bourgeoisie and seizing the means of production keeps me going  
Petition to merge /r/depression with /r/me_irl
The hope of overthrowing the bourgeoisie and seizing the means of production keeps me going  
wut
wut
Rich people own all the factories and workplaces. They dictate how long we work, how we work, what we're paid, etc. If we want to use these machines to work and produce, we have to go through them and work on their terms (not our own). Workers/the 99% should organize and fight back against the firm grasp that the capitalist class has on the economy.  /r/socialism_101
Rich people own all the factories and workplaces. They dictate how long we work, how we work, what we're paid, etc. If we want to use these machines to work and produce, we have to go through them and work on their terms (not our own). Workers/the 99% should organize and fight back against the firm grasp that the capitalist class has on the economy.  /r/socialism_101
Soon. 
I do wanna kill myself.
Me too
How?? I've asked myself this since I was a teen. Every minute feels like hours, every hour like days. The moment you get home you already start dreading the next day. 
Yes and your days off you are left so tired and drained that you don't have the energy to do much of anything but recover only to start the cycle all over the next day..I often wonder if there is an actual point to all of this
For anyone that cares I ended up going home half way through my shift after spending half an hour crying in the bathroom. After composing myself I went to tell a supervisor and ask to make it up but was immediately told to go home if I'm not feeling well. I did.     That was 7 hours ago and I'm so worried about tomorrow I've been drinking 
Feel guilty about drinking after already losing out on a day's pay   Fuuckk
I used to...until it drove me to the razor's edge.  For good or bad, I walked away from it to save my sanity (and quite possibly my own life.) Now, 'wage slavery' sounds every bit a fate worse than death so...I refuse it. Period.
What does this even mean? How have you beaten the system?
Jobs blow. They make me want to shoot myself....Even if it's a 9/80 schedule. FML. Want to retire.
I think the reason is because everything is so forced and fake, its all about money and the product/service and often feels a bit surreal and goes against our fibre of what we think we should be doing with our lives, it seems to lack substance as it's just playing into the hands of capitalism and greedy ceo's etc...could go on and on..
I think the reason is because everything is so forced and fake, its all about money and the product/service and often feels a bit surreal and goes against our fibre of what we think we should be doing with our lives, it seems to lack substance as it's just playing into the hands of capitalism and greedy ceo's etc...could go on and on..
Tell me about it. I work in the service industry and part to my jobs is too be as fake and possible and lie where I can to benefit the Company. it is sickening. But I have to do it for the money... but inside it eat away at me. with our economy doing south there is no other alternative 
da money
It's not even worth the money.
Money is good.
aye
Calm down fight club, I wish I took high school philosophy. Life isn't that deep.
What is with that whole 'fight club' thing that people like to throw around?  Or the constant insinuation that only highschoolers can dabble in philosophy?       You're right, I guess I should go back to being a delusional adult who tries to find meaning in pointless endeavours.
Yeah, tell me about it. Social anxiety just makes the ride even more fun.
Ugh god, social anxiety is a truly nasty affliction..so damn hard to treat effectively ..I've been fighting it for too many years
I'm glad I work 9-7 because it takes my mind off of depression and work is the only place I can act and feel normal.
Yeah. I hate working, but in reality I'm really good at my job and it's probably the only facet of my life I excel at.
Get a job where you are too busy to think. Working 8 hours in a busy restaurant goes by quick and you don't have time to think about all the shitty parts of life. Of course you come home and have time to think but for those 8 hours you are just making money and living life, idk when I'm unemployed I get depressed as shoot because I have so much time on my hands, which leads to drinking which is another story 
Busy jobs are way too stressful for me, slower jobs just make me feel like a prisoner in my own mind.   I've tried both.  I miss having all the extra time on my hands 
Busy jobs are way too stressful for me, slower jobs just make me feel like a prisoner in my own mind.   I've tried both.  I miss having all the extra time on my hands 
We all want a bunch of free time on our hands but it's not reality..I don't want to sound negative but if you expect to find the perfect job that engages your mind without taxing your body while paying you a nice salary, then you are going to be very disappointed..I know because I expected something similar in my 20s and didn't come close to finding it
P.S. I would love a girlfriend and a dog.  How is that not helping?
That moment when you realize you can't be there for your girlfriend because you're too screwed up. Or you hurt her because you're a ball of irritability. Or that inevitable time when she leaves you because you're always unhappy.  The only time having my cats gets to me is when I think about suicide and what would happen to them. Or when I'm too broke to afford good food for them and their complaining meows make me want to cry.
That moment when you realize you can't be there for your girlfriend because you're too screwed up. Or you hurt her because you're a ball of irritability. Or that inevitable time when she leaves you because you're always unhappy.  The only time having my cats gets to me is when I think about suicide and what would happen to them. Or when I'm too broke to afford good food for them and their complaining meows make me want to cry.
My girlfriend left me a month ago and that's pretty much how it went. Too close to home man.
If you are depressed those things do not necessarily help. They are not a magic cure. You can have both those things and still feel as bad as you did before, with the added guilt of lashing out at them. 
I didn't say the words Magic Cure.  You are also assuming that everyone lashes out at their girlfriend and dog.  Where is that stated?  In what psychology book?  My comment was directed to the OP.  Thanks for playing.
I kinda had the same problem, I worked 14 hrs a day for 6 days a week and I hated it. Then I got fired and I havnt been able to find a job since. My savings lasted 6 months but now I'm living with my mom hating life even more so just stick with it, it can get worse. BTW I do have crippling depression and at least I had money for the things I like
What's not to hate about 14 hrs a day of work? Thats pure slavery and torture. We are mentally healthy. There's nothing wrong with us. The problem is that the system we live want to exploit us hard to make profit for a restrict group of elite people. We are seen as expendable tools for this people
About 20 years ago, I went into a depressive cycle during which I did not want to speak to anyone for almost a year.  I was in grad school, so I literally worked for 100+ hours each week.   So, I worked instead of killing myself.
How do you work 100+ hours a week if you're depressed? I'm curious of how that could possibly work. I mean what about the immense fatigue, the sleep issues, just constantly not wanting to do anything? How do you get past that? What exactly were you feeling as far as symptoms? Maybe I'm missing something.  
How do you work 100+ hours a week if you're depressed? I'm curious of how that could possibly work. I mean what about the immense fatigue, the sleep issues, just constantly not wanting to do anything? How do you get past that? What exactly were you feeling as far as symptoms? Maybe I'm missing something.  
It keeps you from noticing, it's like running away.
My question here, is how do people skip out on work and other things that keep you busy? Nothing sends me into depression more than getting lost in my own head. I need to keep busy. 
Even cool jobs become mundane after a while. I program CNC machines and it became pretty boring to the point where I am working on auto pilot. I started listening to podcasts at work. Combing through hard core history right now. 
Even if it sounds completely crazy, even if it would never work out, what is it you want to do with your life?
Do something creative.  I love building stuff in games like The Sims, Minecraft, RCT, SimCity.   If only that was a realistic and comfortable way to make a living 
What do you do for a living?
Work as tech support for an evil/major isp
like he's trying to talk about himself why are you just sharing your schedule with no useful conjecture
It's almost as if providing an optional work schedule might be a better balance for OP
Yup, definitely saw the downvotes comin bahaha
I dont get why ppl down Vote you. You offered a solution to the poster's problem and if it worked you save a life, you save a son, a Bf a person who is loved. You're a realist. The way I see it is Depression is  a disability. When that point hit you can't walk talk or even want to eat. You can't do the thing that you're supposed to be able to do. If that isn't the definition of disable I don't know what is.
You need to travel.  If you're going to be stuck doing menial labour, do it on your own terms, in amazing and beautiful places.  Head over to /r/solotravel for advice.  You can definitely do some work under the table, if not officially teaching English or something.  Work, explore, quit, travel someplace else, repeat.  In the process, you might even discover a passion for something.
That's a funny suggestion   I don't have the money or means to travel. Even if I did I definitely don't want to have to scrape by doing odd jobs any more than I want to be a wage slave
You could look into seeing a counselor and/or psychiatrist if you have some decent health insurance. If things don't improve you can have talk about depression and anxiety as something that is keeping you from being able to work. In such a case you might be able to qualify for disability and only work part time, if you even still wanted to.
I've looked into disability and its not much money at all unfortunately..plus, it could make some of us feel worse in the long run..working gives most people a nice feeling of being productive and satisfaction from being able to support ourselves..when I wasn't working anywhere, I felt even more miserable..op may feel so bad to where disability is better than working though but he wouldn't know until he tried it, that's the rub
You could always do something like r/EtherMining if you have low power cost. That's what I plan on doing.  You could also just go skate in the Navy which is pretty chill
Ask all the suicidal people in the military that stand a 6 hour watch, then have a 6 hour workday, then have their own chores and stuff to do, and then they get to go to sleep maybe, if there isn't some bullshit training, or drill, or ceremony. And that is after possibly having to be on night shift, so you have to force your body to change its sleep cycle to nocturnal instead of diurnal, which is unhealthy. It sure was easy to skate...
You've worked 6 days a week for 2 years and are going to be able to spend all your money in 2 weeks? Wtf?
It's totally possible if you live in super high cost areas like the Bay Area or aren't willing to compromise on living in a smaller apartment, etc.
8+ hours is nothing. If you think it is you need help. I get depressed if I work less than that. I always need to be doing something. 
Everyone is different. Not everyone lives to work and they don't necessarily need help if they think 8 hours of work is emotionally taxing. They may just need another job, or some shooting support.
I mean, I've never been diagnosed. I have no motivation ever and I always want to die and my forearm is cut up a bunch but I've never been diagnosed. 
You certainly have all the symptoms. I would recommend you try to reach out to a psychologist, if possible. I personally didn't find therapy very useful, but medication has helped a lot. However, even if you want medication you need to be referred to a psychiatrist (the only person allowed to write prescriptions) by a psychologist (aka the 'How does that make you feel?' guy).
I love it. I can constantly say 'I wanna die' or 'I await the sweet release of death' and everybody will be like 'haha what a funny guy'
I told my mom I wanted to die and she yelled at me and thought I was joking   :(
i just use memes as a defence mechanism  in reality i shooting hate living
same   not even ironically this time 
same   not even ironically this time 
yup      id rather memes than alcohol but atm im using both
yup      id rather memes than alcohol but atm im using both
Moderation, my friend. Have a great Christmas Eve though :)
and the buzzfeed-type bullshit when you start googling for help. '10 easy ways to beat depression!'
Tip 1: Talk to your SO/friends
While it works as a coping mechanism for some people, I know tons of people who I know for a fact are not depressed who do make jokes like that. It blurs the lines between a warning sign into a a meaningless joke and I don't know if i'm okay with that.
I completely agree. Like other people have been commenting, I do find some of the dark comedy quite funny - at the same time, I think it has brought a lot of dismissive and negative attitudes to depression and mental illness.
Agreeing with /u/8u11etpr00f, it's a great chance to laugh at yourself and this shitty mental illness. Of course there are the people who use it as an identity, but I laugh at myself because if shit isn't getting better, might as well have a really dark/morbid laugh out of it!
Me too. I have depression and suicide episodes and sometimes I enjoy this dark humor suicide memes the most . Honestly I feel like if I were not depressed or suicidal I wouldn't find them funny . .. 
i understand and commiserate. especially this time of year. the memes and shitposting are cathartic in a way
  >i understand and commiserate.  In other words, 'me too thanks'
  >i understand and commiserate.  In other words, 'me too thanks'
you saw what i did there...
I feel the opposite. Depression memes comfort me more than any of my friends can, and I'm not just saying that.
I feel the same
I like it. Then people don't ask too many questions.
Yeah self-deprecating jokes have become some normal I be honest around people about wanting to be dead without scaring them or them knowing I actually want to be dead.
Yeah self-deprecating jokes have become some normal I be honest around people about wanting to be dead without scaring them or them knowing I actually want to be dead.
Exactly like no one even realizes that I hate myself, it's just a joke to them.
Exactly like no one even realizes that I hate myself, it's just a joke to them.
That's both the best and worst. On one hand everyone compliments me on my always happy demeanour. On the other hand I'm constantly sad and down.  Are you ok day has started to be the toughest day for me. People ask, and I want to say something, anything to get human connection. But it's always said with a hint of joke and a chuckle. 
Man it's like some people use comedy as a tool to cope with crippling mental illness or something.
That's not his point.
People mix up sadness with depression.  Personally I'm glad to see the 'me too' posts.  It's means they've never had to deal with this.  On the other hand, people don't understand depression, so it's easy for them dismiss it as an actual problem.  
Honestly this r/2meirl4meirl sub seems pretty real
Yeah... I totally get this. I've suffered from Depression/BP2 for almost 5 years now and have some friends that really mean well when they try to relate and tell me that they know what I'm going through and they've felt like that as well... and I'm just doing my best to keep my mouth shut rather than telling them they have no shooting idea... oh well, better than ruining the few decent relationships I have left following the aftermath of my struggles with depression...
One of my best friends never stops jabbering on about how she cured her 'depression' with meditation and quitting work to be supported by her parents...); I don't even talk about it with her anymore, shooting worlds apart even though she assumes we're discussing the same thing.
It honestly makes me feel better makeing jokes about depression. Not suiside though. I hate jokes about suicide. Why would anyone think that's funny?
I personally find them funny and find myself contemplating (or at least imagining and not wanting it to actually *happen*) twice a week.  Some people use humor to cope.
LOL me too XD
ME TOO THANKS
The internet has turned everything into a meme and I hate it.
brb, gonna go turn your comment into a meme...
I hate this because now people act like you're an SJW if you so much as mention depression and anxiety. 
Hell, the anxiety and depression don't even have to be yours. Bring up the stigma and automatically you're labelled an SJW. 
I agree. I personally enjoy the memes when they're only used in context and because sometimes the darkness of them can bring a little light-hearted humor, but overall it's awful because it's basically saying 'depression is a joke'.
Right? 'LOL I feel like killing myself!'  vs.   Yeah, I actually checked myself into the ER so wouldn't perchance decide to hang myself one night.
Why do you even bother? Who cares about what others say
I think that's his whole point. He wants others to care for support.
*hugs* 
Thank you 💕 hugs back to you
I used to love christmas, now it just hurts
Same
I used to love christmas, now it just hurts
Same. I have all of this family but I feel so alone. We were opening presents and I was just in a daze not paying attention. while everyone else is in the background laughing and smiling. 
I agree with you. I hate this time of year, it just makes me feel more alone than ever. 
Same. The holidays always impart a resounding emptiness with me.
The whole month of December is ruined. Halloween is where it's at give me a bong and a bunch of candy and scary movies please
Halloween is great for sure. My boyfriend and I ate a whole family tub of popcorn this year and stayed in watching Stranger Things and ripping bongs. One of the only days this year I've not felt like ending it all! It's the little things that remind me I can still feel happiness.
Christmas is my reminder that I’m the least favorite in my huge ass family. 
Same here. Seems like I'm the only quiet introvert in a room full of loud extroverts. My cousins definitely prefer my sister over me as well. Makes me feel like shit.  
Agreed.  It's my annual reminder of how I ruined everything by not being a good little straight Christian girl and thus have deserved the last 13 years of miserable spiraling depression and couch surfing
Oh, you grew up in *that* situation. ._. Sorry to hear that.
What is 'that' situation? 
Probably being a 'good Christian girl' that one's parents expect one to be obedient, but then you disobey the religion and/or parents and you become nothing to them perhaps
If only I could get any kind of happiness, artificial or not.
Artificial happiness isn't really happiness. It's just some M&M character wishing you season's greetings or Little Orphan Annie reminding you to drink your Ovaltine. It's just advertisement after advertisement, seeping into what should be a genuinely happy holiday.
I hate going on social media during Christmas. Everyone is posting happy shit, family shit... and I get to see their nice houses and clothes and it makes me want to commit mass murder.
Same.  
another Christmas alone. Crying. Stuck in the past. Memories are like poison. I can’t find joy in anything anymore. 
same here..
Nah, Christmas is awesome
I love Christmas season, just not the marketing aspect of it. Other than advertisements getting shoved down throats, it's a nice time. 
No one got what I wanted. I wanted a TV and a 3DS.   Instead I got a crappy pair of headphones (Beats), a $10 iTunes gift card, Star Wars pajamas (that I don’t want because I don’t care about pajamas) and an Apple Watch [with a screen that has a crack in the top half](https://i.imgur.com/1d09lxN.jpg) (its $230 to repair it, my moms making me pay for it all because she claims that she doesn’t have any money left.)
My parents asked what I wanted, and I was just happy with spending time with my family. You sound like an idiot. 
Same for me. I only look forward to sleep at this point. Anything to escape reality.
It's weird cause as much as I look forward to it I slightly delay it cause as I'm falling asleep I think about how shit I'll feel when I do wake up again...
It's weird cause as much as I look forward to it I slightly delay it cause as I'm falling asleep I think about how shit I'll feel when I do wake up again...
I feel ya. Then I procrastinated getting out of bed, because then i have to deal with the day.
The worst part about sleep is waking up the next morning and realizing that you are alive and all of your problems are still here.
It makes my mornings unbearable. 
I just hope that my heart stops while sleeping so everything will be over
That's the saddest thing I read all week.
That's the saddest thing I read all week.
Know exactly how you feel
Every day I wish for that, sometimes I pray for that.
If we were lucky, we wouldn't be here, would we?
Grab some melatonin from your local walgreens/cvs or wherever else you can get it.  DO NOT NAP!   Take melatonin 30-60 minutes before bed and you'll sleep great.
Any pill advice for wanting to sleep forever? ;P
I don't want to live like this.  I just want things to get better.  I just want her back.
There's a her you want even more. Just have to find her first
Sleep itself is fine. It's when I have a happy dream that hurts the most. Do you ever get the feeling that once you wake up, your chest hurts and you just want to go back to your dream? I wake up to reality and more often then not, I'm always crying. I'm crying because I never wanted to leave my dream. Crying because I couldn't face realty just yet. 
I've had happy dreams where I wake up, instantly forget what happened in them, only remembering how I felt in the dream and feeling instantly miserable because I'll never be able to recapture that feeling in real life.
deleted  ^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^0.3938  [^^^What ^^^is ^^^this?](https://pastebin.com/FcrFs94k/10846)
I really wish I could lucid dream... I would look forward to sleeping everyday knowing I can do anything in my dreams
I really wish I could lucid dream... I would look forward to sleeping everyday knowing I can do anything in my dreams
It's worth learning!! Took me a while, but I did it on the regular. Then I just got lazy but still get lucid involuntarily a few times a month. 
deleted  ^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^0.3938  [^^^What ^^^is ^^^this?](https://pastebin.com/FcrFs94k/10846)
Yeah... Sometimes I'm happy in a dream. Sometimes I even fall in love with a character in a dream... Sometimes it's just a different reality that I want to stay in. 
So true!  Don't you feel like you hate to wake up because you will have to face the same mess again the next day?
Yeah. :(  I wish I had dreams more often. And good dreams too, not ones about my mum dying. :(
my dreams are far more interesting than real life. 
I barely dream anymore. :/
I barely dream anymore. :/
i basically couldn't dream (maybe once a year or so) until i started taking olanzapine a couple days back (i'm currently in a psych ward because i was willing to starve myself to death ... and did so for a week before comming in) ... now it's like i can wake up briefly and go back to reenter the dream.   this morning i hugged a lion, it was ... unexpected, i thought he wanted to eat me.
Until you're depressed and suicidal in your dreams as well. 
ikr that's the worst
I've been doing this a lot lately. My sleep schedule isn't even a schedule any more.
Same here. I tend to only fall asleep at around 5/6 am, and then wake up in the afternoon. (Not working right now. On a break.) It's also difficult to get out of bed, because there doesn't seem to be a point, and my dreams are way better than reality.
Posts like these make me bitter because I can't sleep. Either that or I'd end up with sleep paralysis with hallucinations and nightmares. No quality sleep. Don't want to keep relying on meds. Tired. Can't escape. 
It's awesome waking up feeling more tired than you did when you went to bed, isn't it?
It's awesome waking up feeling more tired than you did when you went to bed, isn't it?
It's fantastic! Having to power through the day at school feeling tired not only due to depression, but sleep deprivation as well!
Im always astonished to hear someone knows me or was talking avout me.
I do the same.  
Just remember that you're at work.  It's super cool that you've made a connection, just don't jump to any conclusions.  Be open, be calm, be casual, be you :)
Best answer.
Proof that you are much better than you think of youself.   May be she is on r/depression too? 
Oh my god...my worst nightmare. If she is she'll definitely see this
Oh my god...my worst nightmare. If she is she'll definitely see this
She'll be like 'I know this is crazy but are you golden dash antlers on this site called reddit by any chance?'
Dude, be careful. You might be training your replacement. 
Oh no that's not it, we work under a union so I think I'm safe lol
Oh no that's not it, we work under a union so I think I'm safe lol
Sorry for asking, but in the US? I'm just really curious about the union situation there
Sorry for asking, but in the US? I'm just really curious about the union situation there
Yeah, I work at a grocery store in California
Remember: all reasonable people are somewhat scared, somewhat lost, and suffering something. Depression has the curious blessing of drawing those people needing to explore that in stark, unvarnished honesty to those of us perceptibly reconciled to that reality.  When you find yourself emotionally outside you're usual pond, you look for another outsider ok with swimming alone. And swim together.  Don't panic. It's a good thing. 
Wow this is really sweet and makes me want to find someone to swim with. Its just so hard getting over that feeling of no value so why bother. 
Relax, don't get carried away with anything. Keep your eyes and ears open all the time, and do not over step your professional boundaries.
Lol shoot it, go all in
Nice man! Do you think your boss deliberately tried to pair you up? :D
Can't say it didn't cross my mind... she's (my boss) really cool too
do not shit where you eat
If you spend your days eating shit anyway, then you might as well go for it.  I'd gladly shoot up my job for a decent relationship.
If you spend your days eating shit anyway, then you might as well go for it.  I'd gladly shoot up my job for a decent relationship.
well that all depends on how easy he can find a new job if he has to.
Don't trust your first impression of her. Like with all humans you will soon discover who she really is and you will be disappointed. 
bro wtf. GIVE IT A CHANCE 
bro wtf. GIVE IT A CHANCE 
Username checks out
Sounds like my daily too, except I don't watch much anime, I'm into Mr Robot at the moment though.
I wish I had a drug dealer to bang too tho.
same. for some reason the holidays always bring me down the most. Final Fantasy XV is keeping me up though
I used to like Winter but now it makes me even more depressed. Awesome. Getting that myself for Christmas looking forward to playing it.
This is me, minus the Anime. I do have my dogs, but I really hate how sometimes I get so down, I forget to take them outside all the time. They are probably the only things keeping me alive right now.
Yep, I'm with you. I worry that no one would love them the way I do (even though it's a shitty, lazy love at times) and I fear for the distress it might cause them. At least you can (try to) tell people the why. 
Never had this many upvotes ever and my first Reddit gold. Wow. Pleasant surprise. Thank you for reading and commenting everyone I'm going to try and read them all!
yep... i get into a similar cycle. Slowly trying to dig myself from out this  grave. 3 more years till 30 and i haven't done shit with myself.
How in the world do you make money?
If you live with your parents, you don't need to. You fall into a very comfortable rut and wonder why you should put yourself through the stress and effort to move out when the rewards aren't worth much anyway.
do i have a life, or am i just living
Don't let anybody fool you to think you're missing out on anything. life is shit. Depression just lets you know life is shit.
Add working out and that's me!
i found that working out really helped with my last bout of depression. kind of let me distract myself from everything else and was really the only thing i looked forward to in the day.  i remember being so impatient waiting for the next day to come along so i could workout again just to have something to do.
Since you do have time, you should try doing volunteer work instead of doing those things. See if helping others lifts your spirit. 
volunteering helps only the first time, then you keep doing it, your depression comes back. that was the case for me at a food kitchen.  im going to see a psychiatrist when i get back to campus. OP should, too. Living with depression is not living.
Get a job? I know it's hard or nearly impossible with depression but it will give you a sense of purpose and independence in your life that you're probably lacking.
I have a job and my life is basically the same as him except the part I'm leaving home to work.
Take a psychedelic. Mushrooms or LSD. Quickest method to spring clean your brain and get you thinking differently and out of the rut.
I would advise against that. Psychedelics tend to go along with your mood. If you are not in a good place emotionally you are likely to have a very bad experience.
First Happy birthday. Second we are here for you.  On my birthday the only person that wished me 'Happy birthday' other than my mother and my sister was my cousin which i haven't seen in over a year. And my 'dad' called drunk and thought i was turning 18...
The only person who acknowledged my birthday was my old friend from year 8 who felt sorry for me. Nobody called me or texted me. It’s a lonely world :,)
Happy birthday for you :)  Today I make 27 
Happy Birthday!!!
Happy Birthday!!!
Thanks ;)
Happy birthday 
Thank you very much ^^
At first, I thought we were born on the same day and month  - 16 of Feb. I was stoked!  And then I forgot that it’s probably 15th of Feb at your place now. It’s the 16th of Feb, 3 hours past midnight here.  Oh well...anyhow, happy birthday! I know it sucks but I just wanted you to know that you’re not the only one who feels that life sucks.
Mine's Feb16th (1 1/2 hours time) too... happy birthday, I hope it's kind to you. :)
Mine's Feb16th (1 1/2 hours time) too... happy birthday, I hope it's kind to you. :)
HAPPY BIRTHDAY TO EVERYONE.
My birthday is Frebruary 16th!
Happy birthday pborski!
The level of talent it takes to turn something as dark as this into something as beautiful as that is astounding. 
Its something I'd expect to see at an art exhibition. Absolutely beautiful
I had this happen during my major depressive episode in college almost 20 years ago. This is a major symptom. I'd advise you to talk to your gp for a referral. 
how did you stop it, what was your strategy?
I'm like it everyday. Not sure if it is because I'm tired though, if I force myself to push through I can stay awake. I just have to stay busy which is difficult. I soon as I get a second I realise how drained I feel and head to sleep. Accidentally 3-4 hour naps. Sometimes two a day on top of regular 8 hours of sleep. Not sure if it's the medication or I've developed the worst avoidance tactic to deal with how bad I'm feeling. 
a little pickmeup i do is caffeine pills.  i take 300mg with a coffe that is half sweetner creamer.  you can get the jitters and the sweats but caffeine gives a small bump of euphoria.     but do plan a day to just sleep. too much prolonged youll develop a tolerance.     honestly, nothing wrong with sleeping for 9 hours. i think the body needs it and to have your brain shutdown.  just regulate it to 1 day.
Recently lost my job and my car broke down so feeling quite helpless. My daily routine is to wake up, feed the animals, fill out 15-20 job applications, then lay in bed in the dark for the rest of the day. So, I feel you.
Are you me?
Are you me?
:(
I feel the same.. Wasting my life.. I don't have anything to look forward to or like any excitement or anything to wake up the next morning for..
I completely understand, I want to break the habit but at the same time what is there to be awake for. I'm happier when I'm asleep and don't have to feel so awful. 
Yeah I'm the same i even take sleeping tablets in the day to fall back asleep. It's terrible waking up and being in so much emotional pain that I want to fall back asleep
God, I do that.  Nyquil, myself.
God, I do that.  Nyquil, myself.
Quetiapine or mirtazapine for me. Never tried Nyquil 
I've never been on any meds or antidepressants, but my sleeping schedule is shooting shooted up hard. One day I'm literally sleeping for 20+ hours, and most of the other days I don't sleep at all. It's taking a toll on my body since I've gained around 8 kg. Additionally I begin to feel like I'm getting stupid. I have difficulty speaking and thinking of words/phrases I want to use. 
See a doctor and ask about a sleep study if that's possible for you. This kind of messed up sleeping can actually trigger mental health issues or make them worse.
Get your thyroid checked, please.💕
I'll mention it next time I have an appointment, thank you for the advice 💖
I'll mention it next time I have an appointment, thank you for the advice 💖
Also have your vitamin D levels checked. Low vitamin D levels can mess with your energy as well. Wouldn't hurt to have your iron checked too.  Source: I have depression, hypothyroidism, and vitamin D deficiency. If I could do nothing but sleep, that's all I'd do.
Are you in medication that makes you feel sleepy? If  not maybe speak to a docter about it if you haven't already . 
The medication I'm on at the moment was actually keeping me awake at night for a while. I've switched by doctors orders to taking it in the morning to avoid this, so if anything I should definitely be wide awake during the day. 
The medication I'm on at the moment was actually keeping me awake at night for a while. I've switched by doctors orders to taking it in the morning to avoid this, so if anything I should definitely be wide awake during the day. 
Strange defiantly something up if you need to sleep so much and feel tried after an hour of being awake. Go back to docters because that can't be fun fighting to stay awake or struggling to get through day because you feel so sleepy. Are you like that everyday? 
Yes, this happened to me for like 3 months one summer.  My day was literally, wake up, work, go home, eat, sleep.  I would sleep to escape life.
That's how I feel. Like being awake is too much so I sleep to get through it. 
Thank you very much that's definitely something I'll look into 💖
The antidepressant I took was Wellbutrin, but it's definitely not for everyone. I hope you find something that works 😊
Wow! Thank you all so much for the positive feedback. I'm happy to hear that my illustration resonated with others. I've never made prints of my art before, but it's something I will look into. PM me if you are interested.  
love it, great job
I would love a print of this 
Hi HampeMannen,  Unfortunately, I'm all out of prints and it's not really profitable to go to the shop to have just one print made. If it helps, I give you permission to download the image and make a print yourself.   Hope you have a great day. :)
Dear god you are talented! This is incredible where can i buy one ;)
I would srs purchase a print of this. I love it, the human condition in a nutshell. The fractured sky, the isolation from nature, it's portrayed in such just beautiful way.
I would srs purchase a print of this. I love it, the human condition in a nutshell. The fractured sky, the isolation from nature, it's portrayed in such just beautiful way.
And the water doesn't flow but keeps going round... i love this picture 
And the water doesn't flow but keeps going round... i love this picture 
Or the water ring is a tear dropped by someone else in your lake of sorrows and causes ripples that you are seeing, while being unable to do anything...  I would also be in for a print of that, the last one that carried such a deep feeling for me was a print of this [image](http://c1.glitch.bz/img/sad_glitch_girl_124041.jpeg).
He feels trapped in a vast, beautiful world
That's exactly how I interpreted it too. Everything looks so amazing besides him. Awesome work.
Thoughtful, skillful portrayal. It seems as if the layers of rock could be climbed up on....
and that this climb may lead to another painting of a less depressing nature?
and that this climb may lead to another painting of a less depressing nature?
I think it represents hope. I don't find the painting depressing at all. 
i love how the whole sky looks like a heavy weight over him. Feels accurate
Interesting... I saw him at the bottom of a dark cave.  Great art usually has different interpretations... None right or wrong.
Anxiety is what gets me out of bed and into work on the morning. 
Same here, Just the thought of 'Oh god I don't want to deal with all these people judging me for not behaving normal' is enough to force me through another day.
Same here, Just the thought of 'Oh god I don't want to deal with all these people judging me for not behaving normal' is enough to force me through another day.
What do you do if you suffer from both plus OCD and don't have the job and can't bring yourself to leave the house to find one because you know you're going to fail? I'm at my wits end.  
Oh god I relate to this so much. Every time I think seriously about suicide, I think about my parents and friends and that they would be upset and the hospital bills and the price of my funeral and how my parents would have to pay for it but they're already so poor...  but hey at least i'm still alive, i guess
I think the thing your parents would care about the LEAST is the price of your funeral; they're your parents and they'd be devastated by your loss, regardless of what you may believe.  You matter. You do.
God, this is the truth.  I nest in my bed for hours. Sometimes food happens, sometimes not. It's a battle to get up and do the most mundane things. I started the suicide contemplation and then the anxiety cancelled it out. I know what you're feeling. I can't fix it, but at least you know someone else is out here suffering with you.
It's so good to see we are not alone in this :)
In it's own way, yeah it is. I hope that you seek out help -- either in the form of a person that you trust (and who will listen to you) or professional. I know that I want to. I'm just pretty terrified about doing it because I don't want to end up with the same results again. But this whole thing is like being trapped in an infinite loop; and I'd like to get out of it. I hope you can.
I hope you find that person, too. It's so scary to be stuck in that loop, especially since in a way, it's comforting? I mean our lives are well balanced in a weird way. Or maybe it's a matter of being used to it. 
If anxiety is the only thing that is keeping you from hurting yourself then I say, Hooray for Anxiety!!!! If you are unable to do anything else, and I know where you are coming from, get the telephone book, call ANY physiologist or local mental health office. Tell them the same thing you shared here. They will tell you what to do. Then show up when and where they tell you to. That's all you have to do.  
I totally understand, but anxiety is pretty much keeping me from doing this as well. Especially since now I'm in a foreign country. Even though everyone, especially professionals, speak English, it is still terrifying to deal with such an 'important' problem in a foreign country. I did send a message to my previous therapist though. 
During the time that you read that note, she'll still be doing something in the world.  Communicating to you through that note will probably be the last thing she does in the world.  I can understand if you want to wait for the right time to do it.  It may be that the note is just some selfish bullshit.  But let her have her last word.  It might be good for you to let her have it.
I agree with this, even if it's years and years from now. Only you will know if/when it will help you to know what it says.
Ask your mom or something to read the letter, tell you what's important. And have her throw it away.  You don't need to hear the bad stuff, and you can have a memory of her leaving something nice behind. 10 years down the road ask the truth when it won't hurt you.
Idk, I disagree, especially with throwing it away. People commit suicide when they feel sooo low. To throw it away seems like a slap in the face. I struggle with depression myself and the idea my loved one would throw away the letter without reading it...that's devastating. It feels like an insult to her memory. If OP doesn't want to read it rn, maybe put it somewhere safe and read when ready to. 
I love sleeping. It's the waking up part that sucks. Do you ever feel better when you get enough sleep? I'm generally a wreck but if I don't get enough sleep it's even worse.
it makes me feel worse. I get the most depressed when I skip sleep or stay up too late. but I do it anyways because I my brain is irrational.   i want to savour the moments when i'm alone and comfortable at home. It's so depressing to rush out that front door every morning and go through the same BS every day. i'm sick of people.
it makes me feel worse. I get the most depressed when I skip sleep or stay up too late. but I do it anyways because I my brain is irrational.   i want to savour the moments when i'm alone and comfortable at home. It's so depressing to rush out that front door every morning and go through the same BS every day. i'm sick of people.
I understand that logic. I have been known to stay up for days simply because waking up is just so painful for me. And for the same reason of wanting that time at home alone too. I get immediate panic attacks every morning I wake up, without fail. But usually, I get so depressed that falling asleep is the only relief I can get, and when I do sleep it's for 12 hours or more sometimes. Ahhhh, to be normal again.
Night time is the only time where i can feel peace.   I hate waking up the next morning because i'm too scared of what's waiting for me the next day.
i know. every day brings new pains (and sometimes joys), but the  joys are rarely ever worth it.
I do the same thing. I stay up for two or sometimes three days at a time. I have nightmares every time i sleep, so i just don't very much anymore.
Nightmares are an issue for me too. :/
I feel the opposite and want to sleep to escape reality and sometimes I dream about having my life in order as well but when I wake up I feel worse thanks to the dream.
I hate my dreams. They're almost as shooted up as me.
I do sometimes, but then i also dread that time of dreading tomorrow and the rest of life, so sometimes i also go to sleep early
Ah, the old depression fast-forward  :(
Every day feels like someone has strapped me down and is stretching open my eyelids while pictures go by. Each less stimulating than the last.  
yuck, that's a terrible thing to imagine.. but sadly it's reality for some of us.  reminds me of that scene from Clockwork Orange where the main character is strapped down and forced to watch terrible pictures on screen with his eyelids stretched open.
yuck, that's a terrible thing to imagine.. but sadly it's reality for some of us.  reminds me of that scene from Clockwork Orange where the main character is strapped down and forced to watch terrible pictures on screen with his eyelids stretched open.
That's exactly what I was thinking of when I wrote this!
I always used to think I had insomnia, unable to fall asleep for hours. Though it's probably not the best solution, I've found that smoking a bowl of indica can hold off my depression so I can pass out. It's not healthy but neither is not sleeping. You win some you lose some.
Would not recommend because if you start smoking every night before you sleep that's the only way you'll be able to fall asleep. 
Reminded me of this http://imgur.com/NQ4ElXW  Hope you're doing okay. 
The secret to happiness is to fill your life with unimportant nonsense, and then eventually you'll be dead.
The secret to happiness is to fill your life with unimportant nonsense, and then eventually you'll be dead.
You can always do opiates. 
You can always do opiates. 
tbh hoping America becomes Huxley's Brave New World and I'm supplied an ever-steadily-increasing dose of opiates to keep me satisfied.  pretty sure i read the book wrong (jk Huxley's wrong, you guys and >muh individualism). but yo fr, i feel like society would be at its peak if we were just given that sweet sweet soma.
I think this is why geniuses are usually depressed. They see through the bullshit. 
I'd think it more likely to be a case of loneliness. Being too much of an outlier makes it difficult to find people who can truly understand you.
The secret to happiness is to fill your life with unimportant nonsense, and then eventually you'll be dead.
I just don't believe that at all. I think all of us on here could achieve happiness. Don't get me wrong, it is extremely difficult and can take what feels like forever. But I still think each of us have the ability to live fulfilling lives.
I just don't believe that at all. I think all of us on here could achieve happiness. Don't get me wrong, it is extremely difficult and can take what feels like forever. But I still think each of us have the ability to live fulfilling lives.
I don't know about you, but I plan on getting high and yelling at loved ones to feel happy. 
You gotta do it everyday. It's hard at first, but everyday it gets a little easier, but you have to do it everyday.
Bojack Horseman is a masterpiece.  This scene made me break down
Just wondering, what show is this from?
Bojack Horseman
Maybe just a day without internal shootin pain would be nice.
I hear you on that. I have acid reflux, and it really frustrates the hell out of me, the way that the pain it causes can get in the way of literally everything, and can cause me to hate life even more than I already do. (And yes, I do take meds for it, but they don't make the pain go away completely.)
So true. You know what I did on my last 'good day'? I cut snowflakes out of printer paper and taped them to my windows as a Christmas decoration. That's the sort of thing that children do, not a 28-year-old adult. Danging hell, I'm pathetic.
I'm 21 and that sounds amazing. Don't ever think that just because something is enjoyable to a younger person, it can't have the same effect on an adult. Colouring in books are one of my favourite past-times :)
I'm 21 and that sounds amazing. Don't ever think that just because something is enjoyable to a younger person, it can't have the same effect on an adult. Colouring in books are one of my favourite past-times :)
Thanks. :) I just wish that the rest of society could see it that way. I mean, if I told a person without depression that I once spent a day cutting out paper snowflakes, they'd think I was nuts. (And, I mean, I am nuts, but I don't want others to think of me that way.)
Thanks. :) I just wish that the rest of society could see it that way. I mean, if I told a person without depression that I once spent a day cutting out paper snowflakes, they'd think I was nuts. (And, I mean, I am nuts, but I don't want others to think of me that way.)
I know right? I feel like if i find one thing enjoyable, the rest of the world will consider it stupid. Like my love for pillows that have frills around the side or flavoured candles. I tend to find though that the people who don't enjoy simple things like you and I, are the people who won't truly enjoy life.
Snowflakes are pretty fun to make. I found that out at my last job. Don't feel bad about it!
Thanks. And they are pretty fun to make. Sure, it took a lot of concentration for me to make them (cutting and folding paper tends to be difficult for me due to my fine motor issues), but then, I got to decide what sorts of shapes I wanted to cut out of them and it really caused me to be creative in a way that I don't often get to be creative anymore.
Hey, I just want to let you know that you brightened my day with this idea. I actually made some of these snowflakes and it brought me a tiny bit of joy.  [Proof](http://i.imgur.com/hsAqqCn.jpg)
I can see kitties sitting.
I feel like I just need to give you a hug. I think you need a hug, so this is an internet hug from me to you. 
Thanks! You are very astute. Hugs are what it is all about.  I must emphasize that I am a lot better now. Don't get me wrong, the world is still a horrible place. But three years ago I met somebody who was also depressed and sees the world the same. Both of us thought we would be forever alone (neither of us are young), and now we spend a lot of time hugging. However bad we feel, having somebody who unconditionally loves us and understands makes a HUGE difference.
A while ago I had several 'very good days' in a row: wanting to do things, planning activities because I wanted to and not because I'd spend all day in my room otherwise, feeling optimistic about my life in general. One day I thought 'so this is how normal people feel all the time', and dared to hope I was cured. apparently not...
It's ok, the road to recovery is bumpy. It's a really good sign that you had those days, even if they didn't last. Hopefully that means they'll happen again in the future, for longer and longer each time. 
It's ok, the road to recovery is bumpy. It's a really good sign that you had those days, even if they didn't last. Hopefully that means they'll happen again in the future, for longer and longer each time. 
I'd like to say I hope so, but I'm not sure I want to get better anymore. being happy seems so weird now. maybe I'm just scared
I recently had a whole week or so of 'good'.  I was afraid to tell anyone because I was afraid they'd tell me I 'must not be depressed' or that it was all just a phase (thankfully that wasn't the case).  The whole experience was so unsettling for me.  I found it very uncomfortable being 'happy' :/
And that is actually a prime reason why getting out of depression is so difficult. After a while you associate depression with your personality and anything different (such as happiness) is uncomfortable since it's essentially **not who you are** . Of course that isn't true but that's what is cemented in your thinking. 
Well, when depressed... Little things can actually have much value  Such as cleaning your room, taking a shower... Maybe go outside once  Every little thing is for depressed as an adventure... I can't say it's an adventure like you see in the movies  But what for the happy is 'normal' for the depressed it's 'special' and something to be proud of  I just tried to give this a positive twist... I know how you feel and I experience your pain... I understand you
I never feel more pathetic than on my really bad days when simply taking a shower is a big accomplishment for me.
I spend over a week planning a half hour bike trip. Went yesterday feel a lot better now!
Awesome! 
Awesome! 
Thanx!!! 
And for a happy person they know their bad days are temporary
Whereas we know our good days are temporary.
Whereas we know our good days are temporary.
Everything is temporary.
Happy birthday! I don't have a whole lot to give but do you have an Amazon wishlist? I would be happy to get you a gift :) 
What's the Amazon wish list? I'll get you a gift too!
What's the Amazon wish list? I'll get you a gift too!
hey its ok. You don't really need to. :)
hey its ok. You don't really need to. :)
I would love to if I knew how
Just checked his post history. He's into airsoft and PC gaming. I'm gonna PM him for his address.
hey its ok. You don't really need to. :)
hey its ok. You don't really need to. :)
Dude, seriously. No one deserves to be alone and giftless that young. A 10-15$ gift is no biggie for me personally. I'd be happy to.
hey its ok. You don't really need to. :)
Think about how giving you some happiness on this day would make us feel? I think we all need this so just give in.
Good advice. I would say however, that trades are not the only thing people could get into for good money.   What if the kid was good with computers? Maybe he could become a dev and take over the world? The most powerful people in the world have something to do with tech. 
hey, At the age of 7 I started doing PC hardware and software repair and still do it. Now When I turned 12 i started doing Game Dev and Programming. Still doing it to this day. Pretty fun being honest when i have free time.
Happy Birthday to you, happy Birthday to you, happy Birthday dear u/XeXGuys, happy Birthday to youuuu... *singing* All the best for you and try to enjoy this age. It can be really cruel but also really awesome. On your 18th birthday just get up, pack your stuff and run! (Get a job and a flat before ;))  Where are you living?  Best, u/antennasmiley  Edit: can't write my own username.  Edit2: as some others already mentioned, give us your amazon wishlist. :)
hey its ok. You don't really need to. :). Ha, ive tried packing my stuff up, called an aunt who actually cares. Nope, parents hate that. and no job available for a kid my age. hah, ive been doing PC Software and repair service since i was 7, Also been doing game development and programming for 2 years. still get paid $0 for my repair service. Anyways have a good day. :)
One day you will be independent, which is something I didn't think about enough when I was your age.  It really is amazing how good it feels to be on your own and not under anyone's thumb.  Be patient, keep your head down, work hard, and HAPPY BIRTHDAY!  Though they can be cruel, the years will fly by before you know it.  You have friends, even if you don't know about them, wishing you well from afar.
I have to tell this to a friend of mine often. His parents really don't appreciate him and myself and a couple friends keep reminding him that as we begin to get our driving licenses and he gets older, one day he'll be making his own decisions.
/r/raisedbynarcissists
I just commented this.   Op, I'd try to fight to go live with your aunt. Convince your parents it would 'benefit' them. They wouldn't have to pay for you/deal with you, etc. It might work. I wouldn't wish this lifestyle on anyone. It's caused so many of us a plethora of mental health issues.   Anyways, happy belated birthday. 
Dude, I'd be happy to get you something for your birthday. Anything from a drawing to a video game, just let me know what you want.
hey its ok. You don't really need to. :)
Although you may not think so, you have tons of Reddit people that truly care about you. Like me. Happy Birthday friend. I love you 
Seconded, buddy. Happy birthday!
Happy Birthday ! You deserve it ! :) Nobody told me happy birthday since I was 12 years old. I never did anything on that day, nobody said anything, so I just decided not to care about it and to not think about it, because it'll just make my day worse, since I'd be thinking 'Is anyone going to care about me ? *Nothing happens that day* Well shoot everyone. Nobody cares about me' and I'd feel worse. I don't even want to know when my birthday comes, honestly.
Hey, i know how that feels. This 'Birthday' has been like this for the past 5-6 years. I felt the same, like no one really did care. Which was true because the actually did say that. I also don't really want to know when it really comes. but as the same time im like 'Ok, hopefully something good happens this year'.
You need to get out of that household, they will be the death of you. Happy birthday.
Happy birthday OP, and yes, you really need to leave your family. It's borderline neglect and they obviously don't deserve you as a kid. You're around middle school age so maybe try talking to a school counselor about your problems 
Sucks, buddy. I got you a birthday updoot. Sorry it's a day late.
yo get the updoots[^*](https://www.reddit.com/r/tmsbmeta/comments/5xnirl/about_thankmrskeltalbot/)
That sucks and I'm sorry. But big birthday hug all the way from South America, dude!
Two hugs from South America!
I seem to notice a few people mentioning narcissistic parents. Where did you guys get that from?   /u/XeXGuys would be great if you could possibly expand on why you think you are being treated this way? It doesn't sound like your parents are just straight up mean parents because they are nice to your other brothers.    Why do they have so much resentment towards you? 
God i don't know why they are treating me this way. I was abused alot as a child. Don't know if that affects anything. They just started doing this when I turned 9. (that was the stage where depression started).
That's the saddest thing I've read all day. I can't imagine losing two of the closest people to me at all, but Especially in one tragic accident. Shitty father aside, I'm really truly sorry you went through that and I hope you've found some kind of peace.  
Thank you, but not really.  My life sort of ended when theirs did.  We do the best we can.
Wait so obviously they don't buy your brothers 500 dollars worth of stuff everyday. So they made it a point to buy your brothers hundreds of dollars worth of stuff specifically on your birthday and not to get you anything. How is this possible. Do you act up and they're punishing you? Do you not perform well at school and your brothers do? This is a clear message they're sending you.
> I was also called the problem and interference between them.  My guess is that his parents are shitty and blame their child for their marital problems. 
Not OP, but I really needed to hear this right now. Thank you.
Ditto
Ditto
right here with you guys on this one. 
I’ve resorted to prayer. I’m not even religious. I want this depression to stop. I saw my psychologist today and were switching my meds. I asked “are these pills gonna work? Am I going to feel hopeful ever? Am I going to get the spark for living?” She replied very enthusiastically “Absolutely” . I just don’t know how. I’ve been on about 15 antidepressants over the years. How can a pill make me enjoy living?
How many years have you been on antidepressants/therapy?
Hey, just a quick question, I couldn't quite understand,  but do you want this to stop? 
shoot u dude 
[Deleted]  Thanks for the upvotes and support guys, but I unfortunately can’t leave my comment up.
Sound just like me to be honest. 
But those people stop existing to you when you do commit. You never get to answer for them. It doesnt really matter. And why put the happiness of others infront of your own?  Also, think about it this way. Aren't you putting your own happiness behind everyone elses most of the time? Isn't that the same thing that makes you unhappy in the first place and the same thing that starts that vicious cycle?
I get what you are saying but this is enabling suicide/saying it's okay. While we can commiserate with and share our feelings on the topic, talking directly to someone who has these thoughts to convince them of it...its not good. You probably didn't mean it maliciously, but a lot of people can be on the edge, we don't know. 
I get what you are saying but this is enabling suicide/saying it's okay. While we can commiserate with and share our feelings on the topic, talking directly to someone who has these thoughts to convince them of it...its not good. You probably didn't mean it maliciously, but a lot of people can be on the edge, we don't know. 
That sounds a bit ironic to me, since the top post on this thread is about their knowledge that they can end their own life.  Countless people on this subreddit (and even this very thread) express how nice it is to be dead - and how it is something they long for, yet when someone mentions that suicide is an option it is a big 'nonono - you can't do that.'  I don't get it.
Same. I’m not suicidal anymore, as in I don’t actively think about killing myself. But I can get through life a lot easier reminding myself I have a way out if I need it. That way, no matter how hard something is, it can always end. 
This.
I can't. I have to live for my dog at least. He loves me and he wouldn't be able to survive if I did that.
One of my greatest regrets is that I cannot have a dog where I live. Dogs are the truest of friends xxx
One of my greatest regrets is that I cannot have a dog where I live. Dogs are the truest of friends xxx
why can't you have a dog? also, what about getting a cat? they can be pretty great too! 
why can't you have a dog? also, what about getting a cat? they can be pretty great too! 
I work at factory. I spend a fair amount of time there and the poor thing would be on his own too much. My ex-wife keeps talking about a cat. One thing I do do is I go up my local pub and play with the dogs that people bring in there. Really positive experience, but I'm also an alcahol and currently in rehab with detox looming ahead so...
Sometimes when I am laying in bed trying to fall asleep, I shut down my brain, and pretend I'm dead... just a dead body laying there. It brings me a lot of comfort.
I use alcahol for that. Roll on detox week x
My fear of the pain of death is pretty much the biggest reason why I don't go through with it.I am a coward when it comes to pain.I go back & forth in my darkness depending on the time of year.I actually don't care about my family...their pretty worthless.I just think my death would give forces working against me a reward they don't deserve.
I feel the same way. I’m too scared of how painful it will feel. And I’m scared that afterlife is much worse than my life now. 
My fear of the pain of death is pretty much the biggest reason why I don't go through with it.I am a coward when it comes to pain.I go back & forth in my darkness depending on the time of year.I actually don't care about my family...their pretty worthless.I just think my death would give forces working against me a reward they don't deserve.
A coward is someone who refuses to face the fear. You face it every day. You are not a coward. You are one at war every day with yourself. You have survived thus far.....keep fighting xxx
A coward is someone who refuses to face the fear. You face it every day. You are not a coward. You are one at war every day with yourself. You have survived thus far.....keep fighting xxx
Exactly, we're all in this together, fighting each day
There is a Nietzsche quote something along these lines. Someone here might know it well enough to add it below. If not I’ll find it and add it here later.
Please do.
Please do.
Ok lemme find it quick. But my point was that you’re in good company so it’s probably not stoopid.
Ok lemme find it quick. But my point was that you’re in good company so it’s probably not stoopid.
Here you go.. It’s from _Beyond Good & Evil:_  “The thought of suicide is a great consolation: by means of it one gets through many a dark night.” 
To live is to suffer, to suffer is to find a meaning in that suffering.  
Such empty platitude. There is no meaning in suffering. If you are trying to imply otherwise, it's clear that you haven't experienced actual suffering.
Is there a name for this? Sometimes I drive myself crazy writing a post/comment/text. (Almost did it now)
'Think before you talk'... but remember to talk.
For sure.  Have had a few people here tell me I don't understand depression. Makes that feeling of whining much worse.   But I come here because talking & sharing really helps. Decided let those few whove judged me go ahead. I know I'm not 'whinging', none of us are. 
You gotta ignore these people. This is a community to help each other. Not tell people that they are wrong in this and that. If you can't post your frustrations on an anonymous site, where else should you do it?   Don't simply listen to people who are depressed. Listen to the ones who are, but want to help. Not the ones that indirectly confuse their anger with knowing everything there is to do with depression. Everyone should be learning here.
You gotta ignore these people. This is a community to help each other. Not tell people that they are wrong in this and that. If you can't post your frustrations on an anonymous site, where else should you do it?   Don't simply listen to people who are depressed. Listen to the ones who are, but want to help. Not the ones that indirectly confuse their anger with knowing everything there is to do with depression. Everyone should be learning here.
I really appreciate you taking the time to write this down for me. I very quickly let the voices of a few weigh down the voices of those who have and continue to be supportive and understanding. I think that's why I'm still on this sub, I won't let those experiences mar me from doing what I want. Workin' on not listening to the negative. Thank you Canuck ☺
I've done that. This is my depression alt account so I don't feel too bad posting here. Worst case scenario, everybody ignores it. 
Don't ever feel ashamed of your depression. Own it. Share your experiences and help others. In doing so, you will help yourself and feel better. 
**SKYRIM BELONGS TO THE DEPRESSED!**
Exploring Skyrim was so much fun. I think the most fun I've had in a single player game.    I wish Bethesda would release a new Elder Scrolls game. 
yes but I don't even enjoy them as much anymore, everything is boring
I only get bored because I can't focus long enough to enjoy playing. Dang depression!
Video games have pretty much become my life. They're the only reason I go on, to be honest. 
I hate that I relate so hard to this.
I do. Unfortunately sometimes I don't even have the motivation to play a game
Yepp. I understand this completely. Don't even have the energy to escape
Yepp. I understand this completely. Don't even have the energy to escape
It sucks so much when this happens 
Video games is a popular form of escapism probably because of the agency the player has. It's easy to think of the character you play as you and it's much more immersive to actually have some control in the story.   It's not necessarily bad as long as you're aware of what you're doing. Dark Souls is great for escapism because, at least gameplay wise, you can overcome any challenge with enough time. Just don't think about the really depressing themes.
Or Bloodborne. Adrenaline pumping combat. And an beautiful environment.
Or Bloodborne. Adrenaline pumping combat. And an beautiful environment.
The only downside is that now I am horrified of child birth and the moon.
This question is like 'Does anyone drink liquids because they are thirsty?'
Yeah, asking a bunch of socially stunted and depraved males (all of reddit) if they play video games to escape is a pretty obvious question.
I know this sounds pretty horrible to say, but I probably would not be around if not for the internet and video games. Its an addiction to me, yes, but it offers crucial things to me that I just did not find in life... Short term goals, a sense of purpose... Enjoyment, self esteem. I'm sad about my addiction, but its better than the alternative.
Why be ashamed of something that helps? It's not horrible at all, imo. Video games keep me from totally sinking into the dark shooted up place I know I can easily reach if I let it happen. I find it is a nice balance. 
That's the very reason I've been playing Skyrim all these years. I love the game to death and getting lost in the world really helps me out.
I started playing it for the first time a few days ago. Loving it so far.
I started playing it for the first time a few days ago. Loving it so far.
That's good, I hope you really take a liking to it. Six years and three different platforms later and it has brought me hundreds of hours of joy. :)
Yes.  Though,  it's working less and less.   
I wish it wasn't this way
I wish it wasn't this way
Me too.  It's not the games though.   Just my ability to stay interested. 
Why I keep going everyday. I keep thinking about 'I need to grind for X armor tomorrow' or 'I cant wait to reach max level'. Games are the only excitement I have and my friends there are more emotionally supportive than my family. 
I'll play the games, but get bored very easy on anything but grinding in world of tanks. Don't know why that one game does it for me. 
Sure. is healthy. like reading a book or listening to music.  Too much is only bad when the rest of your life suffers. But spending $40 on a game you play 300 hours is cheap and keeps you out of trouble.
Playing video games is a lot more addictive than listening to music or reading a book. A lot harder to put down.
Playing video games is a lot more addictive than listening to music or reading a book. A lot harder to put down.
But better than drinking.
But better than drinking.
Which is better than heroin.
Yes, but it doesn't always work.
Here, here! Depression has made gaming hard to do. I just can't focus anymore.
Same. Sometimes I'll get really into it, and then some days I'll sit at the desktop, looking at all the game icons, and none of them seem appealing.   I'll try to play but just can't continue, when really I just want to go sleep at 3 in the afternoon. 
I get that part time to time.  Sometimes I'll just end up moping around in the game like i do in real life, wandering to some remote corner of a map and  sitting out in the wilderness of the game..  Or i'll just stare at the title screen for three or four hours and then turn off the computer/console and go to bed.
I get that part time to time.  Sometimes I'll just end up moping around in the game like i do in real life, wandering to some remote corner of a map and  sitting out in the wilderness of the game..  Or i'll just stare at the title screen for three or four hours and then turn off the computer/console and go to bed.
Oh yeah for sure on the moping around. I don't really want to play the game but just moving my character is entertaining, traveling in an imaginary world. I like to get lost in thought when I do that, and let my mind go on auto drive for the game. 
Mine is mostly music, but video games too. I'll sit for hours on end just listening to music. Thinking. 
Hexic HD is great for that. Very chill, relaxing music with a puzzler of almost infinite playability just try to focus on the task at hand.
nope, never been on the WOW page
alrighty....someone posed almost the exact same question using the same wording yesterday. You must have a brain twin somewhere :)
I used to but they stopped working :(
I shooting love video games, and oddly they are slowly not working for me too. Sad times ahaha maybe I need to start playing something new 
Yup, thank you runescape
That game single handedly got me through middle school, at least until I got my dog
I have been escaping to the land of Hyrule since I was 6.
BOTW is just building on to this escape for me
Not exactly a video game, but I play animal crossing constantly. It's really nice to feel like I have a perfect little town that's all mine. (And all my villagers are so kind to me) 
animal crossing gives me life 
animal crossing gives me life 
When I'm doing good in the game it's like I'm doing good in real life 
When I'm doing good in the game it's like I'm doing good in real life 
seriously. There is never a more fulfilling experience than when I have completed part of the museum, or opened up a new shop. 
What is a book that you would recommend to someone who wants to transition similarly? 
Not op but I would guess it depends on what your interests are. Just like how different people like different games.
What do you play? I like Overwatch and TF2, but I occasionally dabble with management simulators as well. 
csgo and overwatch
csgo and overwatch
Cool, what heroes do you main?    I like playing Sombra, Torbjorn, D.Va and Mercy the most. 
Cool, what heroes do you main?    I like playing Sombra, Torbjorn, D.Va and Mercy the most. 
Hanzo (i know im terrible ahhaha), Genji, Mcree, D.Va, Zen, Roadhog and Mercy they are the main characters I play. I don't play comp, it turned the ppl I used to play with toxic. now I can't help avoid it cause everyone gets angry and it doesn't help my sanity.
What game is that?
It's Discord, a chat platform used for gaming that you can use for voice com and messages. It shows you what games your friends are currently playing and all that.  That's what the friends panel looks like when you have no friends online
Yes. The game that helps me escape the most from reality is Minecraft. I can get lost in a world for hours.
Or build a world that sucks less...  
I don't know what is happening in your life and causing you so much pain and mystery and I am sorry it is. But just from that act of kindness which you described, please know that you are so worth being on this earth. I hope you stay for a long while and things get better. Hugs. 
things WILL get better...just hang in there!!!
Same. Many years ago it seemed unthinkable to see suicide as an option for this. But like you, I have also had the same thoughts. Sometimes it’s so hard to see myself graduating and I’m just wondering why I’m trying to avoid the inevitable.   But on the other hand. I still enjoy being alive. I realise that for me it’s just the stress getting to me. I hope you feel better soon. Depression sucks. But it’s something we battle. It does not define us. 
This is exactly how I feel. I can't even imagine myself graduating at this point.  I don't feel suicidal overall, but at the same time I feel like it's coming soon I might as well get to it.
Community college is a thing too! (Glad to have it so if I need to drop a class it won't wreck me like a university would)
I have a friend who barely graduated community college with a two year AA degree, and she's still in like 20k of student debt.  Danging hell.  What is wrong with this country?
Wow sounds like a severe over reaction. As someone with depression this makes me really angry. 
I’m sorry I make you feel angry.
Me for the last 4 years. Went from straight As to trying not to fail. I'm too tired and miserable to care  Sad thing is I'd have gotten so far if i wasnt depressed but oh well
Apparently Reddit thinks because we're high achieving (or used to be) we're bipolar. 
Apparently Reddit thinks because we're high achieving (or used to be) we're bipolar. 
Yeah idk why so many people think it means bipolar. It doesn't. 
This is similar for me as well. I was above average before, but am now just trying to pass most of the time. When I get into a low mood, I tend to just give up.
I tend to just shut down and not do anything.. and it quite literally hurts my head to try :(
I can relate. At work and school people praised me for being a good natured and hard working person. Deep down, I say to myself that I don't deserve it. When I'm alone, I can't help but beat myself up and curl up into a ball in a small dark room. 
I was the girl everyone wanted to copy off because I just understood.. even now sometimes people just let me go through things for them because things can click easily when I'm 'normal'  I'm pretty much useless though :(  You do deserve it, I bet you're a wonderful person
Yes. I've been lucky to have some natural talent, especially academically, and normally have a solid work ethic, but the depression is terrible for all of it. When I'm doing better it's not mania- I'm not abnormally energetic or working excessively when this happens. I'm just functioning at the level I would be at if I was never impeded by depression. 
For me, I never needed a work ethic because up until high school, everything was pretty easy. And by the time I realized I needed to work hard, I was too depressed to care. I'm trying to work on self discipline to develop a work ethic, but it is really really hard.
Yep. Straight A's in high school, went on to UCLA for neuroscience, became so depressed and anxious I couldn't handle classes, and dropped out. 
Same except I took dentistry.
Absolutely.  I have been very successful professionally, but I always feel I'm just one episode away from losing everything.  When I'm in a depressive episode I often can't get out of bed for days.
> I have been very successful professionally, but I always feel I'm just one episode away from losing everything.  Yes, so much, to this. Although I wouldn't say that I'm great professionally, just that I have seen success at one particular thing I enjoy doing (and usually only when I'm not totally depressed). I always feel as though I can never actually genuinely celebrate an achievement because it's not achievement so much as it is my justification for existing.
Math BS finished at 19, chem BS/physics minor at 20. Dropped out of grad school when my depression got worse 
Dang dude. I should've been the same. But my depression got bad in highschool, and only got worse until I was 19. Now it's better, but it's not good enough for me to even see the point or have the energy to finish my first BS. 
Everyone who is depressed is broken and non-functional.
I have to disagree. People can be functional in many ways and still be depressed. You can be as functional or even more functional than *regular* people (who can be dysfunctional in some ways due to things other than depression).
Everyone who is depressed is broken and non-functional.
I'm pretty functional, I get a decent amount of stuff done, I play in a band, I write music, I hang out with friends regularly.  I do all this while being dead inside :)
I wouldn't know, been self-medicating for almost nine years now.
i know its wrong but same. beer helps
what if one can't/doesn't get shit done regardless?
I'm the same. I have very little motivation for school or anything else. All I do is play video games. I've achieved more on that world than I ever will in real life. And somehow I'm okay with that.
if i dont take my pills I literally feel like murdering children.
Keep taking your pills
Pat yourself on the back right now; you're a much braver person than I.
It's really not worth it to keep it bottled down, and you seem to know it. Just go for it! You legit have nothing to lose
It's really not worth it to keep it bottled down, and you seem to know it. Just go for it! You legit have nothing to lose
There's not 'nothing' to lose if you're friends with her 
There's not 'nothing' to lose if you're friends with her 
I mean, is it worth it seeing her everyday knowing you can't be honest about your feelings with her? Is it even worth it knowing that it can only be so embarrassing and for so long? Everyone dies one day
I recently asked my friend out. It was a no, but it was the first time I'd asked someone out in person, face-to-face. It gave me a confidence boost even if it was no, I feel like I can do it again. And good thing is, we're still good friends, as if nothing happened :D
It's good that you guys were able to stay friends afterwards that's the most important thing. Yeah rejection sucks but losing a friend is even worse.
I told a female friend my true feelings and it all went horribly wrong.
Story time!
Shoot all your shots... right now is as good a time as any to do so.
( ͡° ͜ʖ ͡°)
The first thing I feel every day when I open my eyes is frustration. I just don't wanna be awake. 
I'm actually ADHD and always want to do do do something.  But nothing seems worth actually doing;  I think 'What's the point?'  And I'm always lonely and want to have friends, but have this weird mental or psychological problem that prevents me from making and keeping a friend.  It's like I intentionally (though subconsciously) sabotage any new potential friendship.  It must be about fear of having someone 'know' me.
I'm actually ADHD and always want to do do do something.  But nothing seems worth actually doing;  I think 'What's the point?'  And I'm always lonely and want to have friends, but have this weird mental or psychological problem that prevents me from making and keeping a friend.  It's like I intentionally (though subconsciously) sabotage any new potential friendship.  It must be about fear of having someone 'know' me.
I'm the same!! It's so sad ;_;  Just today someone said to me: 'I hope you meet someone that you can fall in love with. But no one's going to just come to you when you're sitting in the house.'
Holy shit this has been me everyday of college. I literally have no time to do anything but schoolwork and exercise.
Man good on you for exercising regularly, I know how hard that shit can be
Man good on you for exercising regularly, I know how hard that shit can be
An hour a day  I'm less fat but still dead inside
So you have nightmares regularly?
Yes, PTSD makes sleeping sometimes as scary as reality. 
I hate work/my job so i'm the same, just want to escape or go to bed.
what do you do for work ?
Fuuuuck. If I call into work again they'll fire me.
the only reason I keep going haha 
I know this feeling exactly. So many people care until you need them to... I've pretty much given up having 'friends' anymore as a result
Hi, I don’t have depression, but I have multiple friends that do. I really want to be there for them, and I try to be, but I feel like I don’t do a good job. How can I let these people know that I care for them and how can I be a good listener for them?
Hi, I don’t have depression, but I have multiple friends that do. I really want to be there for them, and I try to be, but I feel like I don’t do a good job. How can I let these people know that I care for them and how can I be a good listener for them?
Thank you for this. You are being a good friend by thinking about them? Reaching out to them and listening.
Friendship and love is the one tool against your dark thoughts.  Not opening up to people will just have your heart rot. And your heaert contains memories of something beauiful. 
Oh I've opened up... Only to have them distance themselves from me. Many I have called 'friends' have shown they're not trustworthy or are toxic. I've stood up for my boundaries unlike in the past and I've lost a lot of people for it but it's what I have to do so I don't keep getting hurt
Oh I've opened up... Only to have them distance themselves from me. Many I have called 'friends' have shown they're not trustworthy or are toxic. I've stood up for my boundaries unlike in the past and I've lost a lot of people for it but it's what I have to do so I don't keep getting hurt
Have you heard of the 'hedgehog's dilemma'?It's a metaphor about human loneliness. The hedgehogs seek togetherness to get heat during the winter. But they fear that the quills of others will poke them, and so they stay apart.  The prupose of it is that the root of all isolationism is the fear of pain. What you must remember is to not fear the quills and do what  you feel pride in doing. These things may be small, but they matter. 
This. Is. Everything. Therapists for the win.
It helps a lot to preserve friendships. Even if it doesn’t “cure” you, having been tired of explaining your problems to therapists days beforehand radically changes the amount of time you will burden your friends.
Post this to Facebook. Let them see it. I'd remove the suicide ending though to avoid the Facebook support from reaching out to you 
I have in the past said similar things both relating to my anxiety and my depression. The response you get is a terrible mixed bag, much like here.  Some people really nail it.  However after you get some of the 'support,' you'll wish you said nothing.  
Right? Like ugh it sucks but I mean if you kill yourself it's like...not taking a shot in basketball. Maybe we won't make the shot (have a great life) but it could happen. 
I say to myself every day 'nobody will ever love you' since i'm trying to get rid of the one thing I think is worth loving for: love and affection.  I'm scared that if I die someone (who obviously doesn't love me) will come to my funeral and say that they loved me. Then i'd have no reason to die. There's a 99.99999999999999999999999999999999% chance i'll never be loved, but it isn't zero and that's what hurts.
I say to myself every day 'nobody will ever love you' since i'm trying to get rid of the one thing I think is worth loving for: love and affection.  I'm scared that if I die someone (who obviously doesn't love me) will come to my funeral and say that they loved me. Then i'd have no reason to die. There's a 99.99999999999999999999999999999999% chance i'll never be loved, but it isn't zero and that's what hurts.
The good thing is that some one will love you. I know strangers will say 'well i love you.' But i know its not the same. Some one out there is looking for someone exactly like you. Thats the good part. So imagine that you get that person so unique that they are the 1%  and then you never take it for granted once you have them. That's a good reason to live
The good thing is that some one will love you. I know strangers will say 'well i love you.' But i know its not the same. Some one out there is looking for someone exactly like you. Thats the good part. So imagine that you get that person so unique that they are the 1%  and then you never take it for granted once you have them. That's a good reason to live
Yeah, like that post about a redditor finding a girl he really liked but never dared make a move on and then she killed herself because she thought nobody loved her. It may have been on this subreddit. 
The thing that worries me the most lately is that even if I had everything in the world, I would be still unhappy inside. A very shattering thought that doesnt give much for a positive lookout. And I cant shake it off.
This 100% this. Therapists and doctors family friends whatever don't shooting understand. It's not like I created a life to be miserable with and it's not like I wake up everyday determined to feel like shit. I just do, all the time. No matter how much therapy or meds or whatever the shoot I've done. It still feels the same on the inside. And I'm so done with feeling this way.
I've been waiting for 4 years now. It doesn't get better. It just keeps getting worse and worse, and I feel like if I had just ended it then and there, I could've prevented quite some trouble 
Yea I think the same. It makes sense why I would. I'm pretty good at seeing a realistic future 
If there's an Angel in Heaven, my life will get better like yours did.
I've found angels on earth. They're the people who listen. The ones who care. And there are more of them then I ever imagined. Not to say I am one. But I'm always here for anyone who wants to talk. Message me anytime.
It's almost become obsessive for me. Reddit has become more of an escape to avoid my own thoughts. It doesn't make me feel any better about myself but its just a way to numb myself from the broken record of self loathing that is my mind.
> just a way to numb myself from the broken record of self loathing that is my mind.  Ugh.  This whole thread is like looking in the ugly mirror.  Ah well, it's at least a small comfort that we're not alone in these things.
> just a way to numb myself from the broken record of self loathing that is my mind.  Ugh.  This whole thread is like looking in the ugly mirror.  Ah well, it's at least a small comfort that we're not alone in these things.
I don't know, I'd much rather have noone else feel like this. 
Same with me. Also, since i got depressed my attandence at shool is perfect.
Well, at least you're going to school. A lot of people seem to drop out when they have bad depression.
Well, at least you're going to school. A lot of people seem to drop out when they have bad depression.
Yeah I missed 2 months because I couldn't even bother to get out of bed. 
Yep, reddit is one of the few things in life I actually find enjoyable now. Its like I'm searching for some type of happiness that doesn't exist.
> Its like I'm searching for some type of happiness that doesn't exist.  I totally get what you mean. I spend hours on Reddit for 'that one post' which will restore my faith in life and motivate me to do something. Of course, I don't think Reddit is the right place to find that. The closest post I've found is the 'Today you, tomorrow me' post, but all that did was make me want to read more posts like it.
Indeed, I do.  Reddit is what has kept me alive the last year and a half.  I have been suicidal and it distracts me from the perpetual feeling of wanting to die.  My doctors and therapists are all pretty unhelpful.  I basically work and come home and lay in bed and surf Reddit.  My depression doesn't let me get much else done.  Reddit, I wish I knew how to quit you.
I'm glad you're still with us.
Yeah, a lot of posters here feel the same way. At least we aren't alone.
I guess in theory, that's what we're here for.  But for so many of us (I'm just going out on a limb here), who crave SOME sort of human interaction,  I almost wonder if an r/depression chat room might be beneficial?  
Yes, i am doing this. I'm always reading in subreddits that should help me, like getmotivated, or subreddits with things i want to do. But in the end i'm just sitting here and do nothing. It even feels like an achievment to progress in a video game instead of lurking on reddit.
Yeah, I feel that Reddit is pretty insidious, in that it lets you talk about what you want to do, but in doing so, you're less like to do it.
Yes, also youtube and twitch. Time is passing too fast when I am on the internet doing nothing.
I know, I had a whole month off from uni, and I've wasted it on Reddit.
My girlfriend got arrested last night for bullshit traffic charges from 8 years ago. We haven't spent a night apart in almost 2 years. She's going to lose her job, we might lose our apartment. I am utterly drained, all I can do is browse reddit and cry. She won't be home for another week. I understand.
I'm so sorry. =( I hope it will somehow be ok.
That last line made me smile. Thank you :)
You're welcome :)
'I'll outlive you, you stupid piece of shit.'  That's the spirit. I would've never actually thought that thought, but thats right on the money. 
'Living well is the best revenge.' - George Herbert.  Let her see you happy without her and be jealous.
'Living well is the best revenge.' - George Herbert.  Let her see you happy without her and be jealous.
That's deep.
That's deep.
It really is the best revenge.  After all, someone who says hateful and hurtful things wants an negative response from you, right?
It sounds like a very toxic relationship and she doesn't sound all that supportive. Personally I think you should just distance yourself for awhile. Until you get things sorted out.
I think OP needs to distance themself from her altogether, and find someone who isn't a pain
I think OP needs to distance themself from her altogether, and find someone who isn't a pain
I speak from experience that sometimes this is the only thing you really can do.  The analogy I give is that assume you have liver cancer and cemo isn't working.  Your choices are to have surgery or die.  Neither is pleasant, but one is significantly more pleasant than the other.  IF you don't want to die, what's your choice?
That's cool. A lot of the time bullies grow out of that behavior.
Tbh I don't think people realise what they are doing is bullying and actually has an impact on people, I think about times I was excessively mean or that, you think you're just having a laugh like most kids do, takes a lot longer in life before you realise it was perhaps a bit more than that for them.  Ps I wasn't a bully not bullied but I been both sides of that stick and I assume most people have without realising how they might make someone feel.
Tbh I don't think people realise what they are doing is bullying and actually has an impact on people, I think about times I was excessively mean or that, you think you're just having a laugh like most kids do, takes a lot longer in life before you realise it was perhaps a bit more than that for them.  Ps I wasn't a bully not bullied but I been both sides of that stick and I assume most people have without realising how they might make someone feel.
Yeah but just because they don't realise that it does affect people it doesn't mean they aren't shitty people.
Kids just don't understand how meanness and bullying can affect others yet. I remember a couple of times when I was an outright bastard to my peers. I carry those loads more than any time I was bullied. It's hard to look back and realize I chose to be mean instead of kind.     Really happy for you. 
A lot of adults don't seem to understand it either....
awesome
I think the thing that bothered me the most is when I would tell people this story and they would say 'well he's working at Arby's doesn't that make you feel better about yourself?'  No, I don't feel better than anyone over what job I have. I don't care if someone works at Arby's or McDonald's. That doesn't make me any better than them. They are still human just like me and we are going through the same struggles.
I think the thing that bothered me the most is when I would tell people this story and they would say 'well he's working at Arby's doesn't that make you feel better about yourself?'  No, I don't feel better than anyone over what job I have. I don't care if someone works at Arby's or McDonald's. That doesn't make me any better than them. They are still human just like me and we are going through the same struggles.
exactly, feeling a superiority towards someone still means you're bound to them and have your worth based on them. being able to see the bigger picture is very freeing, hopefully he'll pass on the goodness you showed him to others, customers, etc.
The times I was mean as a kid give me more anxiety and haunt me more than all the times others were mean to me.     And I never considered myself a bully. But 20 years later when I look back I realize how inconsiderate and rude children can be.
Indeed. Even teenagers too. I've never thought of myself as a bully, but I went looking through an old phone a couple months ago and saw some downright mean texts I sent to one of my best friends. Nicest guy I've ever known, great friend. And I was just being a totaln idiot to him. I don't know if I've ever felt so bad. There's nothing he's ever done to deserve how much of an idiot I was being.  Apparently he doesn't remember so I guess that's ok.
That's the thing about depression. It makes you want to be alone and then that loneliness makes the depression worse. Talk about a terrible vicious cycle. I've had depression and doing little social things really does help, despite the fact that it's almost impossibly difficult. 
It's so draining.
It's so draining.
I have came to find most things uninteresting and that's a scary thought. Like I literally do not find pleasure in 99% of the stuff i do.
I have came to find most things uninteresting and that's a scary thought. Like I literally do not find pleasure in 99% of the stuff i do.
That's actually the scariest thing. Cause you know I got half of my life left to live. I don't know what I'm gonna do. I can't seem to find any purpose. I'm trying, but failing. 
Same. I've found even just going out to eat and reading a book helps me not feel so lonely. It feels so stupid that it helps so much.
Not really that stupid, simply removing yourself from isolation, mentally or physically, is good. At times I would go out for a coffee and just soak in the crowd until I got anxious and left. 
Not really that stupid, simply removing yourself from isolation, mentally or physically, is good. At times I would go out for a coffee and just soak in the crowd until I got anxious and left. 
Thank you, I appreciate that. I know it's not stupid, but it really feels that way at the time. The more I work on my depression through therapy and self-improvement, the more I realize that doing things that I don't like is the key to feeling better.
Life is a shooting joke for some
But why me ? Why it choose me to be in this way ? Why can't I be normal ? And what did I do to deserve this ?  Is there any answers for any of my questions ?
But why me ? Why it choose me to be in this way ? Why can't I be normal ? And what did I do to deserve this ?  Is there any answers for any of my questions ?
This exactly. Why was I condemned to the life I live?
But why me ? Why it choose me to be in this way ? Why can't I be normal ? And what did I do to deserve this ?  Is there any answers for any of my questions ?
There is no such thing as 'normal'.
There is no such thing as 'normal'.
and there's also no such thing as 'deserve'. it's a whistling void out there folks.
When you most need to get up you've got no energy 
I can't even eat. Eat feels like a chore and most of the time, I just don't feel like that I deserve to eat and be alive ! I'm exhausted all the time, depleted and used up. Everything is a list of things to do to survive. Nothing makes me happy, nothing makes me go - yes I wanna live and be happy.
I can't even eat. Eat feels like a chore and most of the time, I just don't feel like that I deserve to eat and be alive ! I'm exhausted all the time, depleted and used up. Everything is a list of things to do to survive. Nothing makes me happy, nothing makes me go - yes I wanna live and be happy.
I would love to tell you it gets better but I wouldn't want to lie. I know what it feels like to feel how you feel. I guess my advice would be not to worry when you don't eat or look after yourself properly you just need to try again tomorrow. For me finding a few decent friends and a lot of good distraction pieces (games, music, movies and books) has helped me come to terms with being here. Hope you're OK. 
I would love to tell you it gets better but I wouldn't want to lie. I know what it feels like to feel how you feel. I guess my advice would be not to worry when you don't eat or look after yourself properly you just need to try again tomorrow. For me finding a few decent friends and a lot of good distraction pieces (games, music, movies and books) has helped me come to terms with being here. Hope you're OK. 
I tried, friends - never worked. Then distractions - one by one everything lost meaning. I was into music, then I wasn't. I used to watch lots of movies and TV shows, then I just can't anymore. Then I thought, hey I've always liked to play games, right. Something I'll never get bored of. Wrong, I can't even do that now. 
I got a blue light filter for my phone now I can chill and read my phone in the morning without hurting my eyes. It helps me wake up quite a bit. 
Why are mornings blue tinted? Ever since I was a kid I've noticed that. 
Why are mornings blue tinted? Ever since I was a kid I've noticed that. 
That's your vision rather than the morning. Try closing an eye for a few minutes, then open it, your vision through that eye should seem more blue.
That's your vision rather than the morning. Try closing an eye for a few minutes, then open it, your vision through that eye should seem more blue.
It's the [Blue Hour](https://en.m.wikipedia.org/wiki/Blue_hour#/media/File%3ASeascape_after_sunset_denoised.jpg)   'The blue hour (from French l'heure bleue)[1][a] is the period of twilight early in the dawn each morning and late in the dusk each evening, during the nautical twilight phase, when the Sun is at a significant depth below the horizon and when the residual, indirect sunlight takes on a predominantly blue shade. This effect is caused by the relative diffusibility of short blue wavelengths of light versus the longer red wavelengths.'
Why are mornings blue tinted? Ever since I was a kid I've noticed that. 
Cause waking up sucks. My PTSD makes mine extra bad, but depression doesn't help either lol. 
Sleep apnea?  Snore much?  I felt the same way, got a sleep study done.  Been sleeping with a Cpap machine and felt better right from the get go.  
Maybe but that costs money. 
Insurance should cover it. I agree with the above comment. I have sleep apnea and my cpap has definitely made a big difference... 
I don't have insurance. 
Have your thyroid checked. 
My brother has something with thyroid. But could it be because I have no sun exposure?  
My brother has something with thyroid. But could it be because I have no sun exposure?  
Could be low vitamin D levels causing fatigue! You could consult a doctor about taking Vitamin D supplements.
Yeah it's because certain things don't process when a depressed person sleeps, leaving us to never feel satisfied with our sleep
This seems like an really interesting point of view, which seems 100% true.  Do you have any relateable source of that or pure instinct?  Because I think that could be really an cause, that the brain tries to resolve with something which isn't resolveable, leaving the other things out which could've been resolved when the unresolveable didn't exist to begin with.
This seems like an really interesting point of view, which seems 100% true.  Do you have any relateable source of that or pure instinct?  Because I think that could be really an cause, that the brain tries to resolve with something which isn't resolveable, leaving the other things out which could've been resolved when the unresolveable didn't exist to begin with.
[https://www.ncbi.nlm.nih.gov/pmc/articles/PMC3181772/](https://www.ncbi.nlm.nih.gov/pmc/articles/PMC3181772/)    [http://www.why-we-dream.com/depression.htm](http://www.why-we-dream.com/depression.htm)    Basically to sum it up is you don't get enough rem sleep so your brain hasn't fully rested, 
EXERCISE A LOT SO YOUR TIRED AF AND WAKE UP CHARGED IN THE MORNING 
I TRIED THAT AND IT DIDN'T WORK, I WAS JUST MORE TIRED ALL THE TIME 
Are you eating enough? Taking multivitamins? Sometimes you are just lacking something little in your routine :)
Eating plenty. No multivvitamins. Probably due to not going outside no Vitamin D. 
I know that feel. It doesn’t help that my bed is super comfortable ;-;
Lying in bed for as long as possible is so appealing. I wish I can find something to get me out.  
Lying in bed for as long as possible is so appealing. I wish I can find something to get me out.  
No one can bother you in your dreams~
No one can bother you in your dreams~
Wish i still got those, it's been a while since i least had one.
I'm the same bud. I start work late in the afternoon so I could stay in my bed for a long time after waking up, but the only reason I get up is so my parents see me and don't think I'm a complete waste of life. However, I still get out of my room around 2:30 pm these days. Do you exercise at all?
Wow, I think you are great for being able to get up and work. I can't bring myself to find employment because of anxiety haha. I am trying to exercise and go for a run, but I always choose my bed over exercising and I don't know how to overcome this. 
Hey I recommend you to watch the video '7 ways to maximize your misery' (or something similar) it really helped me a lot.
The video is so self-aware, it gave me a good chuckle. Thank you! 
The video is so self-aware, it gave me a good chuckle. Thank you! 
Yeah its kind of relatable 
This helped me a lot. Thanks, like for real.
No problem, glad I could somehow help you at least a little bit :)
Thanks for sharing your story and I'm glad you are getting better! You are really very strong and courageous. I would like to see a therapist, but I don't want to let my family know and it's a problem. It's pretty complicated. I'm not turning to anything such as drugs, it is banned here haha and I don't like things like alcohol and stuff. Thanks again for the thoughtful reply, and I hope you see improvements too! 
Tell your family. Even if it's one member. They know you better than anyone else. You grew up with them after all. And telling your family first is much easier than a stranger, even if that stranger is a doctor. I can't push you, and I don't want you to think I am. But it's an option. Weigh your options, choose what is best for you. We're all different after all. And thank you for your kind words, they go further than you may realise!
Not only does it hurt to be out of bed, but it hurts to be awake. 
It really does. Everything seems like a pain. I hope you find something to be awake for.
I know exactly how you feel. I dont even look forward to my weekends anymore because i have no one to share my time off with. This is the most alone i ever felt in my life. My life feels so empty. 
I don't know how to make you feel better because we are in the same boat. Knowing that many of us feel the same doesn't reduce the loneliness if there's no one around you. I just hope that someone will come your way soon. You have my best wishes.
Weekends are hard. At least work is distracting. I don't envy the people who are more depressed than I am and are confined to their bed. 
I was like that until i found meditation. That gave me control over my life again however sometimes i still deal with the struggles but realistically speaking my life is so empty and i just dont see it changing.
Imagine not wanting to get out of bed and your whole family is depending on you
Hey, I hope you find strength somewhere. Just wanted to let you know are doing a great job of providing despite the battle inside of your head. Keep fighting, sending lots of love. 
The best thing I ever did was get a dog. You have to get up and take care of them. Sometimes it’s easier to help others than yourself.
I've found that doesn't always work. I actually feel kinda bad for my dog because I'll make him wait for me to walk him for hours until I'm 'ready'. It just feels like a burden
I have been having difficulty getting out of bed lately too. But I have responsibilities and I have bills to pay. So up I go.   But on days that I don’t have to work, I do stay in bed for as long as possible. Not sleeping. Just lying there doing nothing. 
Really proud of you that you get up and deal with your responsibilities. It is so very hard. The bed is enticing but hopefully you can find something to do. 
I'm reading this after laying in bed all morning. I hate where I am but it's so hard to change. I think baby steps is the best way to look at it. I'm going to try to do just one small thing towards self improvement today. It's not easy and I just want to lay back down on the bed but we have to fight! You can do this!!
I understand you so much. I also really admire your positive thinking and I hope your one small thing leads to many small things. Eventually becoming big things :) You have the strength to fight the temptations and you can do this too, thank you! 
On days where I have no school I rarely see the morning I feel you
Try to fix your sleep cycle, alright? It's a good step forward in taking care of yourself. 
Having struggled with depression of varying degrees over the years I believe I've found a solution: diet.  You know how people always say you are what you eat?  Look at your diet and ask yourself if it's the diet of a healthy happy person.
Oh I have a good diet. I barely touch fast food, sweet drinks or the likes. I only really eat ice cream haha. I don't eat too much carbs, have fish, herbal soup, stuff like that. 
For years. The majority of my 20's are all blurred together.
I sometimes seem to forget I'm not as old as I used to be. Then I do the math and think where would I be on my next birthday and the year after that.   Age is a terrible trigger.
25, thats how i feel about the past 5 years. 
27, and it's been like that since the tender age of... ever? At least since the days of school.
Does anyone else feel a tad bit relieved when they read the comments and see that, at the very least, they aren't alone? 
It is comforting knowing that we are not the only ones feeling this way. But then again it's also depressing seeing how many people are feeling so sad. a vicious cycle haha  
Internet, video games, TV, food, weed, sleep. Same shit every day. I really need a job.
Minus the weed, and i am exactly the same as you lol 
Minus the weed, and i am exactly the same as you lol 
I'm surprised there aren't more people mentioning self-medication around here tbh
I'm surprised there aren't more people mentioning self-medication around here tbh
For me it started out as an 'off-switch' to depression but that quickly diminished 
And when you get a job, it's the same shit again.   The only thing that gets me out of depression is traveling.
> And when you get a job, it's the same shit again.  And, objectively, it is only going to increase someone's bank account, at the cost of so many other things that are worth preserving.
> And when you get a job, it's the same shit again.  And, objectively, it is only going to increase someone's bank account, at the cost of so many other things that are worth preserving.
Mmm true, but the money can be used to put you in a place you want to be. With people you want to be around... thats my case at least.
This is my life but i got a pizza delivery job (only for 2 nights a week.)
Have you ever delivered  a pizza and a naked woman picked it up from you? 
How's life, alternate me?
Pretty bad :( Was supposed to be on a plane to Florida right now but the flight got delayed until 4:30. Yep - a 7 and a half hour delay.
internet yes, reddit, yt, twitter, tumblr, no will to play games idk why, food is the only thing that brings me joy besides my pets, weed was good for a while but now it makes me even more bummed out, and yeah jerking off a lot, wtf is life even
> no will to play games idk why  Depression. You no longer enjoy the things you used to. I don't enjoy games at all anymore. Although I'm pretty sure that games just shooting suck these days and nothing new or innovative is being pushed out. But I'm beginning to no longer enjoy even music (or I'm certainly too lazy to actually find new good music). And that scares me.. I mean, music? Dang.
> no will to play games idk why  Depression. You no longer enjoy the things you used to. I don't enjoy games at all anymore. Although I'm pretty sure that games just shooting suck these days and nothing new or innovative is being pushed out. But I'm beginning to no longer enjoy even music (or I'm certainly too lazy to actually find new good music). And that scares me.. I mean, music? Dang.
try listening to nine inch nails, the strokes, muse, radiohead, the fratellis, arctic monkeys, franz ferdinand, slipknot, stone sour, faith no more, depeche mode, gorillaz, rhcp, smashing pumpkins, placebo, jeff buckley, depeche mode, the doors, alice in chains, soundgarden, stone temple pilots, cage the elephant, tame impala, two door cinema club, the black keys, whew... try any of these bands if you feel like it
If you can do all that without a job that doesn't sound bad at all..
Supportive parents and decent welfare. I guess it could be a lot worse.
Supportive parents and decent welfare. I guess it could be a lot worse.
Ah yeah if you have your own place that is pretty damm nice. You dodged being a wage slave and wasting away to not starve.
You really think you can handle a job on top of all those copes? The fact you're coping should be a signal. If you'd spend your time being productive the probability of being able to work would be much higher. But even without the pressure of a job you're coping.
I'll start with a part time job. Like 10 hours a week. If I work too long I lose all of my centrelink (welfare) anyway so I may as well keep the hours low.
Don't just assume you know the answer to someone's problem. There could be many factors affecting him, just being 'productive' may not be enough.
I'm just saying a job wouldn't make him happier than video games and weed. Must be a really, really, really great job if it works that way.   But yes, different strokes for different folks. Maybe he just needs something to replace these things with and a job, even a crappy one, could work for him. Doesn't sound logical to me but he'd be blessed if it works that way for him.
25 here. The date comes, you get a couple 'happy birthdays' on facebook, couple relatives give you 50 bucks then pressure harder on you to get a job, by 6pm you're alone, in your appartment/bedroom, doing the same shit all over again. 
I don't even have a Facebook account and most relatives forget my birthday and only my parents give me gifts. And yeah.. it's over pretty quick and back to the same old routine. Would love someone to go to dinner with.. have a few beers etc.. but it just isn't meant to be :(. I never had a 18th or 21st party either.. and no gifts from anyone except my family.. 
Go on tinder. 
Swiping 100s of women who won't give me the light of day, except for a date once in a while where they use my money to have a nice day, or use my body for sex?
Nine inch nails - Every day is exactly the same 
I can't give you reddit gold, but I can give you All The Love In The World
I can't give you reddit gold, but I can give you All The Love In The World
:o  Thank you :)
Now in my 40's, I feel like not only am I totally depressed, but now my dreams are all either done with or shattered, and I feel like, to those who watch Better Call Saul, the character of the once dodgy criminal law attorney turned semi-fugitive working as a manager of a Cinnabon in Omaha.  Nothing to look forward to....No surprises.....Just that drink in solitude at the end of the day. Whoops. It's time for bed already. Rinse. Repeat.  Edited for small content
47 here. I can relate. Crap job. No friends. No life...    I think I really died 10 years ago when I tried to kill myself and am now just a shadow moving across the face of the world.    Hope you have better luck than I.
I'm basically you except I'm 19. Some bad sht happened to me at 14, it still drives me nuts. So much that I got expelled from college for threatening other students with a hunting knife.
And yet nobody died...  You are a winner and a warrior.
Sounds like a tough situation my friend.. but idk you are here now and you are breathing and living this life. Is there anything that makes you smile? Anything that gives you a glimmer when it is all going to shit?  Thats what i have to tell myself sometimes when the tunnel vision is getting extra dark for me but idk maybe it might help you to try you know?
The only thing that I can think of is my boyfriend. I love him top bits but I can't see him for over a week still
The only thing that I can think of is my boyfriend. I love him top bits but I can't see him for over a week still
yea that can drag you down for sure.. when i was in college and i moved half way across the country it ruined a long relationship that i had and it tore me apart.   I dont want to seem like a person trying to fix the situation but i would be cautious about putting a lot your happiness and faith in people.. people suck (me included). We all fall short and can hurt people really bad and i dont want that to happen to you, you know?
yea that can drag you down for sure.. when i was in college and i moved half way across the country it ruined a long relationship that i had and it tore me apart.   I dont want to seem like a person trying to fix the situation but i would be cautious about putting a lot your happiness and faith in people.. people suck (me included). We all fall short and can hurt people really bad and i dont want that to happen to you, you know?
We're going to graduate from high school this year and I'm so scared he'll move somewhere I dont want to go cause he's so smart and ambitious
Wait! Are you actually saying that they should meditate their way to death? Is that even possible? If it is why not meditate for a positive attitude because it's not that you don't want to exist but you would like to see life differently from the way you currently do. I wish for positivity and an anxiety free life. I also feel like I didn't exist sometimes because of my absurdist view and my pessimistic attitude but I so wish I was positive, out going and excited by every experience.
Well in the Buddhist meditation tradition you meditate to archive nirvana after dead.  And nirvana is a state of non existent.  That said I actually think that depression and anxiety can’t exist in the light that meditation shines on on self.  Meditation can make you become selfless.  Lead you away from the fallacies of your ego.  Make you let go from grudges.  I can only recommend trying it to everybody.  
How old are you?
17
'you can talk to me about anything that doesn't make me feel uncomfortable'
And the Venn diagram of things that make them uncomfortable and thins you want to talk about are the same circle. Q_Q 
'Nothing you could say or do would make me not want to be your friend.'  Uh-huh, wait until I actually try to talk.
Yep this. Have lots many friends over the years because of this. But that's fine it just shows they weren't really friends. But rather shitty humans that can't deal with real issues.
'Oh I get sad sometimes too!'
What we feel is way beyond 'sadness'. 
It sounds more like 'tell me all your secrets and problems so I can gossip about them later with other people.'
ikfr
I find it especially galling what people have to say after a loved one has committed suicide, i.e. 'I just don't understand WHY they would take their own life! They could have talked to me at ANYTIME.' Yeah, okay. Sure *rolls eyes*
Exactly. It's even worse when the people saying this are the exact same people that'll always just respond by telling you it's not so bad and to pick yourself up by the boot straps. It's like, [gee, thanks, didn't work the first thirty times I heard it from you and everyone else I turned to but this time it sure did the trick!](http://explosm.net/comics/4364)
**IM ALWAYS HERE FOR YOU**  Stops replying after 2nd message 😁
This is my 'best friend' right now.  I guess I'm losing another one. 
This is my 'best friend' right now.  I guess I'm losing another one. 
I literally had my 'best friend' tell me I was lost.  I'm not lost at all.  I was so shooting offended I haven't spoken to him since.  I was abused as a child, treated terribly by society, and further abused into my teenage years.  In 2011, I was in an abusive relationship, and again in 2015.  I'm worn out.    That's NOT lost.  That's knowing EXACTLY why you feel the way you do lol.
**IM ALWAYS HERE FOR YOU**  Stops replying after 2nd message 😁
'im here for you'  Only replies with *'oh', 'I'm sorry :(', ' I wish you didn't feel like that', ' I think you should talk to someone'*
'im here for you'  Only replies with *'oh', 'I'm sorry :(', ' I wish you didn't feel like that', ' I think you should talk to someone'*
But what would you rather them say?  There's not a lot you can say and they most likely won't be able to help anyway. Venting helps. 
>friend says this to me  >i tell her i can understand why people commit suicide and i can see myself doing it  >she tells me to stop talking to her about suicide because it's affecting *her* mental health  >wellshootme
'Wow that's so selfish of you' /s
'you can trust me'
lmao that's my favorite
My offer is always genuine... partially because I suffer with depression, partially because I care about everyone unless you shoot me over 
Same. I can't imagine saying this without meaning it... and it sucks that people do anyway.   I can't tell you how many 'friends' or people I cared about told me this, but once I opened up more, they came and kicked me to the curb...
This is a deep though... Took a second fro me to wrap my head around what you were saying... I think I pretty much agree with what you're saying except for the end... I think that we ARE different, but that's just me... 
We're all insecure about something.  We all bleed the same colored blood.  We all want to do a little better than we're currently doing in life.  Humans are the same, just different life experiences.
And then they go telling everyone 
Like shoot, man, that's why I don't talk to people about it. Then everyone babies you or you're that person with the mental issues.   And they wonder why depression goes unchecked, it's not for lack of us trying, I'll tell you that. 
Don't take it personally. Most people have never actually stared into the abyss. They have no idea what real chaos looks like, and once they get a good look they run away screaming.  I think *this* should be the test for whether you have 'real depression' or not. If a well-meaning naive stranger can solve your problem, it's not real depression. 
> Most people have never actually stared into the abyss. They have no idea what real chaos looks like, and once they get a good look they run away screaming.  Holy shit that's beautifully terrifying.  It's so true.  
It feels bad to unload something on someone and have them say nothing but 'well if you ever need to talk, I'm here!'  Like dude I wanted to talk now but your only response is silence or the promise to talk in the future and neither of those make me feel any better. 
The one I hate the most is 'I don't know what to say to that'. I mean I understand that they don't know what to say, but it just makes me feel like shit because I opened up and now I'm thinking about everything with no closure :\
They get uncomfortable when I actually talk about what's going on inside my head, so I stopped telling them everything.  I'd never lie about this to people. Everybody seems to enjoy life except me. :(
This. As soon as you post morbid memes as well they refuse to reply
Oh yeah, my ex was my 'best friend' he claimed. Until he left me for his coworker because I was mentally ill.
what an idiotwad you deserve better. HIS LOSS
That's because there's always ommited parts of that sentence. It should go like 'You can talk to me about anything, but I probably won't care or listen'
> 'You can talk to me about anything, but I probably won't care or listen **or** **understand**'  FTFY 
Ha. This is my mom.
Same.
What they mean: 'Just hit me with it. How bad can it be, I bet I have all the answers'  edit: Most of the time, the people saying you can talk to them about anything don't know themselves that it's not true, though.
'How bad can it be...' lol how much time do you have?
I don't think they are not trying to help... I honestly think some people like to think they can handle a lot more things than they actually can. Doesn't mean they're a bad friend. It's quite hard to deal with someone else's problems, especially if they have their own going on.
I understand that, but the last part isn't true for me personally. I actually just talked a friend out of suicide a hour ago while feeling extremely shitty and slightly suicidal myself. I'm always able to put my problems aside to help others, but I understand not everyone is able to do that unfortunately. 
I understand that, but the last part isn't true for me personally. I actually just talked a friend out of suicide a hour ago while feeling extremely shitty and slightly suicidal myself. I'm always able to put my problems aside to help others, but I understand not everyone is able to do that unfortunately. 
I can do that, because if your helping others, your at least helping someone. Helping yourself is harder then helpping other people. 
When you do talk about yourself do you feel guilty? This is happening to me a lot lately!!!
I feel.. when I find someone which really wants to listen me, I start talk about me in a rap-god-way because it's so rare to find someone like this  Most times it is my mother or some real close friend (those who had listen the same story about me 50 times)
Never knew i would end up posting here. But here i am.
I feel you. I used to avoid any and all forums related to my problems. Ended up here a day or two ago myself and was like 'whelp, I just started slapping replies around like nothing. Okay then.'. 
Confided in my 'friend', he proceeded to criticise me about my life choices and later said that he did so knowing that I would feel worse about myself so I could change. Yeah, thanks for that. 
What an idiot
'You always have someone here for you. It's good to talk about it. Don't let it bother you'   Maybe I don't want to shooting talk about it like I said three times already.
I would shooting kill to have someone to actually say that to me. I do understand not wanting to talk to people though, I get that way sometimes to. 
I've told that a friend of mine after finding out about his depression and I genuinely meant it. But yeah, I get where you're coming from, experienced that as well.
The biggest issue is typically no one follows up when they say it. That you really would listen if he needed you is really nice to know, even though it has no effect on my life. I hope he does take you up if he needs it. Thanks for being a good friend to your friend!
Mine too! Small world.
You have our permission to have a great birthday as well. Haha, but seriously have a good birthday and a good year!
Currently scraping through comments looking for /u/feelingdepressed for heartfelt reunion!
feelingdepressed has been summoned.
Lets hope he isnt depressed anymore and made another account instead of....
Yeah, I know. I'm a bit worried...
This really hit the nail on the head for me. I don't think I could have described my depression better. Thank you for posting this!
Actually, this sounds stupid, but I thought 'make eye contact with the grocery store cashier' was just me. As in, suddenly being hypersensitive to what people (even people who I never want to get to know anyway) think of me. I just accepted that. Dang. 
Actually, this sounds stupid, but I thought 'make eye contact with the grocery store cashier' was just me. As in, suddenly being hypersensitive to what people (even people who I never want to get to know anyway) think of me. I just accepted that. Dang. 
The worst is when you have a casual interaction with someone you actually know. Wave hi to somebody you know as you cross paths walking to class? 'Oh god did I shoot that up? Did I make eye contact wrong? Was the wave awkward? Dang why did I do that'. So now I don't even say hi anymore
The worst is when you have a casual interaction with someone you actually know. Wave hi to somebody you know as you cross paths walking to class? 'Oh god did I shoot that up? Did I make eye contact wrong? Was the wave awkward? Dang why did I do that'. So now I don't even say hi anymore
There's a group of girls in my class. This is shooting college by the way. All of them are honors students, and I was with them until depression shooted me over. They probably think I was just stupid, and I get so flustered just to see them around. I let some god damn mean girls drama shoot up my day. 
Compassion is what we are here for man.   And while depression can be humiliating it shouldn't be. Depression is an open wound that hurts when its touched. We should never humiliate people for being injured. We must help them heal and teach them not to pick the scab. 
I agree. Depression is not a choice. People should not have to suffer blaming themselves for their depression, when they are suffering enough.
Depression/anxiety has completely ruined my social competency. It's a vicious cycle for me; panicking that you're losing friends and then actually losing them because you're too scared that you've already lost them. I wish I understood myself more, and I really wish other people understood me too. It especially annoys me also when people think I've 'chosen' to be 'difficult.'
Agreed.
I hope you don't mind, but I just shared this on Facebook. I've never heard anyone describe it like this and it was perfect. Everything everyone should know about it.
Thank you for spreading the word!
Thank you for spreading the word!
I'd like to share it too,you hit the nail on the head. I find that people want to blame me for my disease too. That is so frustrating. I don't want to feel  like this,who would? I am so tired of the negative reactions that I am pretty much a hermit now. 
I'd like to share it too,you hit the nail on the head. I find that people want to blame me for my disease too. That is so frustrating. I don't want to feel  like this,who would? I am so tired of the negative reactions that I am pretty much a hermit now. 
I'm in a similar, but somewhat different situation. I would love to share this, but for the fear of people knowing that this is how I feel. I don't want to change what people think of me. I don't want peoples' pity. I'm not sure that I exactly fear them thinking of this as somehow being my fault, but I do worry about being judged for it or being seen as someone who is merely seeking attention. 
I try to tell myself its ok to have depression, and in fact is more likely to happen to intelligent folks. So I refuse to say its humiliating, I think though it leads to a lot of disappointment. I feel like Im a little ball of wasted potential. My parents expected me to be the first in the family to get a PHD. I only got a bachelors degree and have been unemployed a year. 
You “only” got a Bachelors Degree?  I put myself under ridiculous pressure about that sort of thing as well. I got a Bachelors and a Certificate, and still think I don’t measure up because it’s not a Masters. But we have to remember all the effort and discipline we put ourselves through for those four years. It *was* worth it, and it’s quite an accomplishment in and of itself.  Give yourself a pat on the back, friend.
>I will occasionally hide under a table pretending to be a piece of furniture, because the thought of being a being that consumes things and demands attention is too much for me. :/  Sometimes I pretend to dig a hole in the ground, then cover it and just sit in it. This often happens when I'm overanalyzing things. Funny but sad, lol.
It scares me a little that the idea of doing that - burying myself - is incredibly appealing.
What sucks is that people who are the 'Facepalm inducing 'geniuses'' typically are depressed. And what sucks even more is that people in today's society are usually depressed, but don't show it because it's 'socially wrong'.    
Sorry, didn't mean to generalize. Its true sometimes the deperessed ones are the ones you least expect. I was thinking of an old college roommate; he was in the most obnoxious frat and he was dumb as wood but thought he was right all the damn time, that he was God's gift on Earth. And yeah, he lived a pretty fruitful college life (something I had to see firsthand on a few occasions) He was happy and stupid. Ignorance is bliss.
It's like you reached into my brain for these words. If I make it through this week-end I'll be surprised in myself.
Please make it.
You made me want to cry reading this. So many of these  basic life thigns I struggle to do everyday. I really don't want to take a pill but I am strongly considering talking to a professional to try and work out my issues. I know I could work these out on my own I just need some support..
Sometimes with depression we have all the right words to describe our pain and sometimes the words are nowhere to be found. Our minds and hearts ravaged, leaving us weak and confused. A little understanding from others can go a long way. Stay strong!
Please give credit to the original piece, this is not your work. 
I did a quick google search by date and this appears to be the [original source](http://sherunsfromdarkness.tumblr.com/post/9558216178/depression-is-humiliating-it-turns-intelligent).  It has gotten around. 
I did a quick google search by date and this appears to be the [original source](http://sherunsfromdarkness.tumblr.com/post/9558216178/depression-is-humiliating-it-turns-intelligent).  It has gotten around. 
Thank you!
Depression is looking at the world as it really is. 'Happiness' and such are all fruitless illusions. The thing is, the world is ugly, pointless, and dark. An average human is simply oblivious to truth, that's all.
As much as I would like to disagree with this- I cannot. 
[This TED talk](http://www.ted.com/talks/daniel_kahneman_the_riddle_of_experience_vs_memory.html) describing the idea of happiness and why is is difficult to understand and attain may be interesting and useful to you. I think the distinction he makes between 'experiencing happiness' and 'being happy about your life' could get at some of the concern you have and provide a new perspective. 
Thank you.  I'll give it a listen.
>I think it would have been easier if I had never experienced happiness at all.  I think that every day. Good description. Very apt.
There is no true despair without hope. Hits shooting HARD
There is no true despair without hope. Hits shooting HARD
The shittiest thing is that once you've been burned by depression, you will always be second guessing the good times.
Thank you for understanding.  I have tried to explain this to family members who do not comprehend how I cannot be 'happy' with my life.
honestly, as soon as my childhood ended i haven't been happy. I haven't been hopelessly depressed, just in a state of 'meh'. Its almost to a point to where i think it's a chemical imbalance in my head and no matter what happens to me i cant truly be happy
*'If you're in a bad situation, don't worry it'll change. If you're in a good situation, don't worry it'll change.'*  -John A. Simone, Sr.  
So many feels with that one. 
I know next to nothing about depression but I do know a bit about games. In my experience you don't play a game because of where you'll be at the end of the game. You play a game because you enjoy playing it. There is a quote out there somewhere that goes along the lines of saying that often in life the journey is more important than the destination. This mindset has often served me well
You need to grow a bit more to get to the next level of truth and recognize the duality of situations and circumstances.   Conversely to just enjoying the ride is that you can get tired of stormy seas and always traveling, thereby yearning for the security and safety of a port. Sometimes the destination is more important than the journey.   Balancing, accepting, is the true salvation.
Just need to tell you, from one man living through this to another, that shooting moved me. I've never been able to put my depression into context. You nailed it.
I only think like a man.  Just sayin'.
I wonder if hope isn't the problem.  Perhaps it's the *expectation* that we should be happy that shoots us up?
I wish I would have seen this before I posted my previous comment. Yep. Nail on the head. This is the problem. And it's not just you, either. Our American Dream fantasy world is an impractical ideal that leaves us feeling shortchanged and depressed.
it's so sad that, even just *imagining* being happy, feeling content again, the fear of having that taken away, that it's all just some kind of long con, spoils it. do you think that thought changes the game for you - you know, why bother working towards something that's just part of the inevitable trick life's playing on me?
I think what makes me unhappy is the belief that it's going to get better and then it doesn't.  I think it's getting my hopes up that causes so much of my problems.  
>My fear is that life is like that video game, designed so that I can never win, but giving me just enough hope to remain engaged, obsessing over finding the answer, with some sick shooting design to make it unwinnable.  So basically it's like WoW, without the color or fun.
Or the sense of community.
Only people who've felt the same way know the importance of such an accomplishment. Well done.
OR people with empathy. I agree though
OR people with empathy. I agree though
To an extent, definitely. To the full, I'm not so sure. Being able to feel it in theory isn't the same as in practice.
To an extent, definitely. To the full, I'm not so sure. Being able to feel it in theory isn't the same as in practice.
OP was talking about knowing the importance of it, with i'm sure empathy is enough for. not like my opinion matters, just clarifying what i meant
But that doesn't change the fact that I have a horrible personality. I have many more bad qualities than good ones. Ignoring my bad qualities (like you seem to be determined to do) doesn't make them go away. So why pretend it does?
I'm not determined to ignore your bad qualities, because I don't know any qualities of yours. I don't know anything about you other than that one comment. And judging from that one comment, I didn't get that you were a negative, hateful, (or any other synonym) person. From that one comment, I saw that you really do care about people, subconsciously maybe, but nonetheless. 
I like the sentiment, but a lot of undiagnosed depression (especially in men) tends to present itself in anger and bitterness. Yes, that grumpy neighbour who blames the government for minor problems. He might be depressed. He just isn't very likely to get diagnosed.  That said, some of the best people I know have battled depression.
Yeah, I'm one of the angry, bitter ones. (I'm not a man, though.) I definitely think it's short-sighted to think that all depressed people are kind and friendly.
Yeah, I'm one of the angry, bitter ones. (I'm not a man, though.) I definitely think it's short-sighted to think that all depressed people are kind and friendly.
I'd probably describe myself as angry and bitter, too, but I've heard other people describe me as kind, though perhaps not friendly. Maybe, it's in part the depression that makes me see my negative behaviors as looming larger than the nicer ones other people see. I'm going on fifty and I think I may never get used to hearing people say, especially in candid moments, that I'm kind, gentle, graceful, pretty, feminine, sweet. My reaction is always, 'Who the hell is that?' Not at all my self-perception.
Just to add my scientific side to this. There are studies that report a substantial increase of empathy in subjects that were depressed as opposed to non-depressed ones. It was also found that depressed people were more accurate on their self-analysis.   Unfortunatelly it was also found that long term depression (as well as anxiety) produce significant cognitive decline.
> Unfortunatelly it was also found that long term depression (as well as anxiety) produce significant cognitive decline.  I would be very interested in reading that study. Scared to, but interested
  > Nobody wants to talk to a depressed person, but a depressed person would talk to anybody.   This is amazingly astute and well put 
Depression seems to come hand in hand with social anxiety disorder. I barely talk to anyone, The few, never visited, friends I have hardly ever talk to people also. People don't want to hear about it so you shut up, you see someone else depressed and you figure you shouldn't draw attention to them. I know I hate it when people talk to me. It's awkward.  Online conversations are different though. Nobody can see you. 
Wow, that's someone who has no concept of empathy. A little superficial sympathy and they're off. Know what you mean because that's what my sister, my last family, is like. She recently told me to suck it up and get over myself. People like that really don't help. 
I'm to hear that. I just tell myself that they don't understand and can't and they are just trying to say something, but they are there for me. Sometimes there aren't though. I dunno. It's a rough existence, but we survive and advance. 
I think that when we're depressed we so desperately want to go back to before we were depressed. I definitely find myself doing the same thing. I love when something I'm doing reminds me of a happier time in my life. I hope that you can find something new worth your interest. I know it doesn't seem like it when you're depressed, but there's so much out there. 
Yes, find something new is the key for pass through it. You even don't need to do something new. you can do what you used to do in a new ways. Example: I played guitar alone, now i go to a park or go to my friends house to play.
Most of my memories are from video games. It's become so much harder to make new ones...
Mine would be, that's mostly what I was doing outside of school from 9 to like 21.   I mean, I gladly would have done something social instead, but the opportunity just wasn't there. I was a ghost once the final bell rang at school and there were no neighbors, so I did the best I could. 
I'm still reliving moments from 2015 because that was the last year of my life when I can remember being truly happy.  I know how you feel. I'm sorry about the pain.
This hit me so hard. It was 2015 for me too :/
So true. Every night at like 3 AM I'll go to my old high school and just hang out there and just think 
shoot i do this but around my elementary school, high school is in another town, but it's so powerful to re-live some of the memories by just standing there and thinking.... 
I'm getting a cat very soon. I know she'll serve the same purpose. The only problem is that if she ever scratches the furniture, my mom will get rid of her because household possessions are more important than my happiness. 
Double-sided tape is your friend (cats don't like it and will avoid it, stick it on furniture corners)! Also, redirect scratching tendencies toward an approved scratchy post instead of furniture with treats for scratching the post. 
Double-sided tape is your friend (cats don't like it and will avoid it, stick it on furniture corners)! Also, redirect scratching tendencies toward an approved scratchy post instead of furniture with treats for scratching the post. 
I did my research and already planned to do all of that and more, but thanks for the advice anyway!
I did my research and already planned to do all of that and more, but thanks for the advice anyway!
Also get a little water pistol and give her a small squirt immediately whenever she does something like that. Worked for my two cats. 
meow :(
meow :)
I saved a cat once that now saves me
That's exactly my story too. I rescued my cat from the streets, now she's saving me from myself. 
That's exactly my story too. I rescued my cat from the streets, now she's saving me from myself. 
She taught me to love again. Warming up my cold heart. 
We all need something to cling on to. I have my mom right now. She's a paranoid schizophrenic and  doesn't trust anyone but me. It's really the only reason I'm here rn
Exactly. That only proves, that love is one of the strongest forces in humans life. Best wishes to you and your mom. 
If you do not have a job, or one that sucks, you could consider working at an animal shelter? It might help a lot!
Sadly, I live in a small town and there's no animal shelter around. But I could do that job. It's one of not many I could do besides my dream job. I love animals and animals seem to like me too. 
This is one of the best representations of depression I've experienced.   Describing it as a group of monsters that have phases of coming and going. Coming in and out of depression always seems to be a series of gradually increasing peaks and valleys.  Also the sick paradox of feeling envy at other peoples progression in life (not even successes) despite the fact that you have no drive or care enough about yourself to even eat a proper meal today.   
you really got it, damn. thank you so much, I'll try to keep up the work!
These are pretty cool, and you're very talented.  I'm glad you made it through, and I'm glad you shared this.
Thank you so much :)
You should post this in /r/Art 
I'll try soon! I just wanted to post it here first, because this is the community that really gave me so much confidence to keep drawing. I'll definitely try soon though :)
Who the f downvoted this?
lol
Nice artwork. I use to draw a series of drawings called A Monster within us Which was pretty much a young girl (around 8?) With a monster beside her always in the city with it raining. I don't know where the drawings are sadly had probably 15+ of them.
thanks! Also, woah! I would love to see it, and I'm sure other people would too! I hope you can find it again and maybe post it somewhere (here?), it sounds pretty great to me :)
If anything, you have invited people from the community to share part of your catharsis and coping tools when fighting this. I'm glad you chose to stick around and create more, and I'm sure the world is better for it. Thanks for being rad, and thanks for sharing.
yeah! Two years ago people said similar things, and wanted me to post more. so I'm hoping some people find this helpful in some way. Thanks for commenting!
Really great work. Please keep it up, your artwork reflects a great depth of character.
Thanks so much, I definitely will. This means a lot 
These are so impressive, you really do have talent. Do you have any suggestions if someone wanted to learn to draw?
Please OP share your wisdom! We would love to, someday, being able to draw like that!
Those are some awesome drawings and I like the way you presented the story. Glad you're still here to share your talent with the world. :)
thank you, it means a lot. These comments mean a lot to me :)
Amazing stuff. Keep doing what you do. Very well written too. 
thank you SO much. I was worried about the written part because writing's not my biggest strength but I still enjoy it. So I'm glad to hear someone appreciates it :)
Yes. I'm 19, lost my job, and sit at home (I still live with my parents), wasting away my time on this earth playing video games and jerking off. I shooting hate my life.  Edit: Thanks for the replies everyone. I does make me feel better. At least a little bit.
> sit at home (I still live with my parents), wasting away my time on this earth playing video games and jerking off. I shooting hate my life.  Hey, that's what I do
> sit at home (I still live with my parents), wasting away my time on this earth playing video games and jerking off. I shooting hate my life.  Hey, that's what I do
HEY ME TOO EXCEPT IM 23 DOING THIS SHIT
HEY ME TOO EXCEPT IM 23 DOING THIS SHIT
Are you me?
r/nofap
Out of all these things your only focusing on that part?  Are you serious rn?
3 year post college graduate, holding a dead end job that I loathe, and at 26, feels like time is running out. I have no drive/confidence to seek out a 'real job' or strive toward any of my passions. I used to be so motivated and ambitious, but I've been such a sad sack as of late and don't know how to climb out of it.
Same, I used to have so much energy and want to excel and grow in life, now I'm in college and I've somehow lost all that motivation I once had and that's even more sad than if I never had it in the first place.
Im a failure and I always will be 
I got a fortune cookie a while back, it said 'You only become a failure when you're ok with being one.' Thanks a lot fortune cookie, for making my worthlessness official. 
Confused bot
They won’t leave me alone!!!
Yes. 35 and working for barely above minimum wage. Not putting my degree to use, ready to kill myself every day. Feel totally useless.
Damn, may I ask what your degree was in? A lot of people are struggling in the workforce with degrees it’s disgusting.
Damn, may I ask what your degree was in? A lot of people are struggling in the workforce with degrees it’s disgusting.
I have a bachelor's in physics. Can't really do anything physics related without a master's or PhD. I also have experience in coding, but not enough, or not relevant to the jobs I find available.
20 years old tomorrow, and still nothing.
Get back to me when ur 22 like me jeff. At 20 I still felt positive.
Get back to me when ur 22 like me jeff. At 20 I still felt positive.
I'm 22. Do I get a cookie?
I'm 22. Do I get a cookie?
You guys make me feel better about being kiss-less at 19.
Really? Do you have a similar disease to Andy Milanokis? (Sp?)
Nah, well I get mistaken for anywhere from 12-16. I'm just short with a babyface.
Jesus shoot it's the pity olympics in here
What did you expect?
I really enjoy your drawings, especially the one titled 'The King(?)'. All of the drawings have so much emotion and have even brought tears to my eyes. They are very powerful! I love it. 
Yes! The King(?) was amazing.
Your depression bore great beauty and I am in awe. I'm so glad to see you channeled it into something amazing. I've recently hit a low point in my depression that's been worsening and given up my passion of writing completely, which used to bring me such joy...maybe it will give me more reason if I were to start again. Thank you for this. 
please please please write! I want to write a book. The thing is, I'm not that good at writing, so I get too embarrassed to write anything (I know, totally hypocritical with my earlier comment on how people should just draw regardless of how 'good' they are).   If you're passionate about it though, you should really do it. I bet whatever you produce is great, since it used to be such a great thing for you. 
It's the same for me. I dream vividly everytime I go to sleep and it's often the best part of my day. 
Same. I love dreaming. The WORST is being woken up... Then forcing myself to get out of bed. I just wanna sleep forever. 
Same. I love dreaming. The WORST is being woken up... Then forcing myself to get out of bed. I just wanna sleep forever. 
The best being able to remember every last detail from your dream. Sometimes I'm amazed how much my brain can fit into one nights sleep.
The best being able to remember every last detail from your dream. Sometimes I'm amazed how much my brain can fit into one nights sleep.
Dream journals help with that right?
You guys are lucky...I've only been having nightmares as of late, with me waking up and being glad it isn't real, but realizing that things going on IRL are worse than the nightmare. It's hell, and I wish I could just get 8 hours of pure sleep.
That's rough man but don't give up. 
Practice makes perfect.  Posted from my bed.
You must be great in bed :> https://s-media-cache-ak0.pinimg.com/736x/8e/47/67/8e47679fb184c7b0da7f74dadff29d32.jpg
Yeah... although it would have to be the sleep of anaesthesia where everything just goes black. I don't like regular sleep. Too many bad and unsettling dreams. 
I'd love it if every dream was a great one but this would be totally fine too.
I do this all the time. I dread going to sleep because I know I'm just going to have to start it all over in the morning. The overwhelming anxiety, despair, feeling of helplessness, sadness, it all comes back in the morning.
Nighttime is just so peaceful. Daytime is just full of chaos and stress. It just fuels my insomnia.
Nighttime is just so peaceful. Daytime is just full of chaos and stress. It just fuels my insomnia.
I feel the opposite, I hate being alone with my thoughts without any distractions. At least during the day you can drink beers, reddit, etc.. But I fear the time I have to sleep.
I feel the opposite, I hate being alone with my thoughts without any distractions. At least during the day you can drink beers, reddit, etc.. But I fear the time I have to sleep.
> e being alone with my thoughts without any distractions. At least during the day you can drink beers, reddit, etc.. But I fear the time I have to sleep.  Why don't you just drink beer and go on reddit in the night? 
Oh gosh, that is me! It feels good to find someone who understands.  I don't try to stay awake all night so I can feel slightly less miserable in the morning, but I do put it off and get all anxious. Because going to sleep means the day is over, more shit to endure! 
Bam, exactly. I do this the most on Fridays. I never want Fridays to end, because that means the end of the weekend feels so much closer.      Illogical, but I can't help to feel that way. 
I barely sleep. At all.
I sleep too much because the only time I feel at peace is when I'm not conscious. :|
No one reading new posts probably but thats probably a good thing i just want to mini vent? So here we go. its 4 shooting am and im sill up when i have somewhere to be at 10:30.. i hate myself. im so lazy and indecisive. I dont want to go to that shitty thing tomorrow cus thats one day and or choice closer to some 'activity' to 'help' me get a job. I.. just.. ugh. Dang me.
If youre still on, please stop. Go to that thing at 10 30, there should only be about 2 hrs left. Please go, i promise you when you come back reddit will still be here but if you dont go youll feel regret and regret is the worst thing in the world. 
Upvoted to show I didnt ignore you
same
THIS is exactly why a simple 'hello' can mean wonders to others. It takes 2 seconds to say hello, and it can brighten up someone's day tenfold.
and when accompanied by a genuine smile even more! Although I have to admit those are hard to come by these days...
No it isn't. Angst is not the same as poetic. Wallowing in self pity is not the same as poetic. This isn't beautiful, it's just pathetic.  OP can do way better. I know he can. Give me better
Give you better? What does that even mean?
HEY.......New Vegas didn't suck :(   On a more real note, you're not alone. 
Yeah, Nev Vegas literally is one of the best games... if you know how to mod it and your PC can run it with the necessary mods.   On my note: NV keeps me from falling off the ledge into deep depression. You two are not alone.
Yeah, Nev Vegas literally is one of the best games... if you know how to mod it and your PC can run it with the necessary mods.   On my note: NV keeps me from falling off the ledge into deep depression. You two are not alone.
Game's great without mods.
Game's great without mods.
Yeah, but it is GREATER with mods... at least it is my personal preference.
>but my parent's think my depression is just in my head.  UGH. Like, YES, it is in your head, which is part of your body. That's like saying 'your stomach ulcers aren't real, they're just in your stomach!' 
Ugh.  Yeah.  A lot of people seem to think that just because it's not 'real', it doesn't have real effects.  Depressive thoughts might be totally illogical, but they're real enough to pump stupid hormones/chemicals into your bloodstream that make you feel physically and emotionally drained.
All in your head is an idiom, but I see where you're coming from
Right, it's an idiom, but it's also very literally true with depression. 
No one will mock you here.   Anything that keeps you going is valid.Depression is just that crushing.   
Exactly.  Maybe one day you'll decide you have to stay alive for half life 3 and therefore ensure your immortality :D
Exactly.  Maybe one day you'll decide you have to stay alive for half life 3 and therefore ensure your immortality :D
Half life 3, my only weakness! 
Half life 3, my only weakness! 
easy on there bud science isnt ready for immortality 
Gaming kept me alive for well over a decade.  Small comfort to know that at least I turned to that instead of hard drugs and alcohol.
Indeed, it's a comfort.  But yes, it is just a small one.  It can also be addictive, but at least it doesn't harm others like drugs and alcohol.
Indeed, it's a comfort.  But yes, it is just a small one.  It can also be addictive, but at least it doesn't harm others like drugs and alcohol.
It does pair nicely with them though if you're up for a challenge.
2 years ago in my senior year when I played a LOT of video games, my dad told me he'd rather me being doing something illegal.  Some parents are just stupid.
Like drugs?  Gee.  Thanks Dad.
I feel the same way, just replace *Fallout 4* with *Final Fantasy VII Remake*.
Oh boy, you're in this for the long haul
I feel the same way, just replace *Fallout 4* with *Final Fantasy VII Remake*.
Same here, but adding Kingdom Hearts 3 and Persona 5 to that.
Same here, but adding Kingdom Hearts 3 and Persona 5 to that.
Persona 5 and Fallout 4 is what's keeping me going this year! 
Wait for Half-Life 3
But then he'll have to become immortal.
But then he'll have to become immortal.
Breaking news: r/depression found way to immortality.
Breaking news: r/depression found way to immortality.
Ironic as shoot.
Plot wise I thought 3 was slightly better, though both were pretty lacking imo. I say three is better if only for the atmosphere, as well as DLC quality (The Pitt is one of my favorite DLCs to have been released, and Broken Steel was alright too). 
New vegas had waaay better writing than 3.
That was surprisingly cathartic. Thank you, OP.
My thoughts exactly. The random spontaneity of it made it all the better. 
shoot, guys
Life is a huge sigh..
Sigh.. I just feel like ending this misery, even though I know better than that..
One day at a time, bud. We can only do so much. Relax. It'll all be good soon if we stay positive. 
One day at a time, bud. We can only do so much. Relax. It'll all be good soon if we stay positive. 
Thanks. needed that.
I don't want to start over  I wish I could give my body to someone else   Like brain transplant or something  I just want to be gone but I don't want to hurt the few who are close to me
 100% agree, like I wish I could trade with someone who loved life and was full of potential and died young from cancer or something 
 100% agree, like I wish I could trade with someone who loved life and was full of potential and died young from cancer or something 
My son's brother's friend's mum randomly died in her sleep recently. Mid 30s, slim, teacher, married with two young daughters. Why on *earth* couldn't it have been me?
My son's brother's friend's mum randomly died in her sleep recently. Mid 30s, slim, teacher, married with two young daughters. Why on *earth* couldn't it have been me?
I totally get that
Like my dad. Everyone loved him, he was successful and loved people and life. Im a anxious depressed mess who has no plan, no friends, and no money. Better yet, my sister! She was only 22, about to finish college, had a fantastic future with an amazing boyfriend and career. She loved kids and couldn’t wait to have them and teach them. She was perfect. 
Okay I'm glad I'm not the only one who thinks this. I've said this to people and they're like horrified that I would think that way ha
I agree, but I don't regret my life. My decisions are my own, I have accepted that.
Life is a series of failures until you figure yourself out.  Some people require more than others.  Some don't even allow themselves to fail.  
Life is a series of failures until you figure yourself out.  Some people require more than others.  Some don't even allow themselves to fail.  
“Life is a series of failures until you figure yourself out. “  I’ll remember this. I’ve failed so many times in the past 5 years. I hope I’ll figure it out. I hope it’s true. I’m tired of constant failure. I need a break.
“Life is a series of failures until you figure yourself out. “  I’ll remember this. I’ve failed so many times in the past 5 years. I hope I’ll figure it out. I hope it’s true. I’m tired of constant failure. I need a break.
I feel you bro.  It's easy to take every single failure to heart.  I think the happiest people view failure as part of the process, and not so much some sort of character flaw.  
If i restated my life I'd still be weak and incompetent so there's not point to it.
Nah see, if we got a free do-over where we got to keep our knowledge and experience, we'd be set! We could prevent our screw-ups from ever happening!
Unfortunatly, you and I get to live with dissapointing mistakes and missed oppurtunities.
You just described my whole life. I spend most of my time filled with regret these days. 
This thought is irrelevant.  There is no past or future.  There is only the present and how you choose to deal with it.  Don't bring the baggage of the past with you.  
Easier said than done. I'm so sick of this motivational bullshit.
Easier said than done. I'm so sick of this motivational bullshit.
Of course it's hard. Do you see another way? It's not empty motivational bullshit, it's the truth. 
/r/MaladaptiveDreaming  Maladaptive daydreaming (compulsive fantasy) is a term first proposed by Eli Somer, Ph.D...to describe a condition in which an individual excessively daydreams or fantasizes, sometimes as a psychological response to prior trauma or abuse. This title has become popularly generalized...to incorporate a recently described syndrome of immersive or excessive daydreaming which is specifically characterized by attendant distress or functional impairment, whether or not it is contingent upon a history of trauma or abuse.
I did this a lot as a teen in response to stress from bullying.  My mother couldn't figure out why her 15 year old daughter always wanted to go to bed around 8pm.  It was so I could daydream about a life without bullies threatening to rape me and kill my dog. I had a whole fantasy world that they couldn't enter. 
I did this a lot as a teen in response to stress from bullying.  My mother couldn't figure out why her 15 year old daughter always wanted to go to bed around 8pm.  It was so I could daydream about a life without bullies threatening to rape me and kill my dog. I had a whole fantasy world that they couldn't enter. 
Wow I am not alone. I'm sorry that people created that shitty situation for you.
I do this every night to help me sleep/not cry. I pretend to be the hero of other people's stories. It helps, but I can't get over how pathetic it makes me feel sometimes.
It's a great way to fall asleep. I wouldn't consider it pathetic. Sounds like positive thought, in a way, because you have a desire to do good.
I have an entire universe in my imagination where I retreat to as a coping mechanism.  It's part of the reason I game as well. It allows me to retract into a universe where I'm the one in control.   I've always wanted to turn my universe into something. Whether it be through writing or some other medium. Issue is I'm garbage at anything artistic. 
You should write about it... get it out on paper no matter how messy it is in its first draft.  Jot notes... scribbles... anything.  
Instead of actually doing something to earn money and get out of the deep and very depressing debt I'm in, I imagine what I'll do after winning the lottery.
Absolutely do the same thing. Almost to the point where the fun part of winning the lottery wouldn't start until all the plans I've made have been checked off.
I kind of drown myself in TV shows/ movies and imagine myself to be one of the fictional characters.
Thank god for netflix...   Come to think of it, netflix might be a depression enabler
Thank god for netflix...   Come to think of it, netflix might be a depression enabler
I definitely agree with you. I make all these plans to be productive which goes to shit as soon as I click on the Netflix tab... 
I definitely agree with you. I make all these plans to be productive which goes to shit as soon as I click on the Netflix tab... 
Yep. I know that feeling all too well. I blew off days because I got the email notif that house of cards was up. It feels good to watch the series and the movies and I just keep clicking and clicking and poof... three months have passed  Netflix is a feel good rabbit hole for endless escapism.
I have kind of created a fictional girl (cuz I am a guy and for some fked up reason I can only ever be very close to a girl) who accepts me for who I am and she is willing to stay with me all the time. Sometimes I look into the empty seat beside me when I am eating or traveling and imagine her sitting next to me. Idk, maybe I am gonna die soon. 
I fill empty seats with imaginary people a lot. Hey, hope you had/have a nice day and all the rest of the days : )
Sometimes when I feel lonely I watch those let's play videos on YouTube and it makes me feel like I have a friend 
I do this almost everyday. Hang in there man :)
The world where I can talk to people and people talk to me. The world where I can do things that I've always dreamt of. Without that world, there is no other world to look forward to.
>Without that world, there is no other world to look forward to.  It's almost all I have left at this point. It gives me some sense of temporary contentment just for a little while.
ALL THE TIME BRUH. I WISH I WAS A BADASS SAVIOUR OF HUMANITY.
This.
All the time. I daydream all day, every day. I spend most of my time inside fiction, inside fantasy. 
If I didn't do this, I'd be dead. Sometimes they get four, five even six layers deep. 
Lucid dreaming is something I frequently try to do, and I've succeeded around five times. The reason I try is so I can fantasize that my boyfriend didn't dump me, that I was pretty, that I was intelligent, popular, that fictional characters existed.. I know, it's dumb..
I wouldn't say it's dumb. I fantasise about things that would make me happier because it helps, and if it helps you it certainly isn't dumb :)
Yeah, I have actually been doing this for years as an attempt to escape the reality of my life; but after a while I exapnded it further and created almost a fully fleshed out Universe beyond just me living a life I wished for. This can be extremely productive and allows you to build something you enjoy and have an investment at least in my experience, it is also partially the reason I got over my depression.
Check out r/worldbuilding they have some interesting discussions going on over there 
Check out r/worldbuilding they have some interesting discussions going on over there 
There is a subreddit for this, thanks man I appreciate the info.
yeah, personally my own brand of this is taking long drives and fantasizing about what it wouldve been like to grow up in these areas instead or to have grown up 'normal'
I do this on long walks, I pretend I live on the street I'm walking down or a house I pass by. 
Wow this thread and some of the answers within hit close to home, thanks for posting this OP.
It really helps to write things out, and see that you are not alone in your feelings. I had to write something after all I could do is just day dream which just makes me more depressed. 
Too much adderall huh?
Probably in combination with some kind of depressant or maybe benzos. 
Your successful suicide attempt confirms the severity of your struggles and problems whereas not succeeding bears one to question as to whether or not your problems were serious at all.   A quote by Albert Camus on suicide from *The Fall* comes in mind.  'MEN ARE NEVER CONVINCED OF YOUR REASONS, OF YOUR SINCERITY, OF THE SERIOUSNESS OF YOUR SUFFERINGS, EXCEPT BY YOUR DEATH. SO LONG AS YOU ARE ALIVE, YOUR CASE IS DOUBTFUL; YOU HAVE A RIGHT ONLY TO THEIR SKEPTICISM.' 
That's a beautiful quote about a sad truth. Thank you for sharing.
Why did you yell the quote at us?
MAYBE IF WE TALK LOUD PEOPLE WILL THINK WE'RE SMART.
MAYBE IF WE TALK LOUD PEOPLE WILL THINK WE'RE SMART.
DOES PLAYING MUSICAL INSTRUMENTS LOUD MAKE PEOPLE THINK WE'RE GOOD AT THEM TOO?  /r/Vaporwave /music plays  *insert Macintosh Plus 420 here*
My only issue with taking quotes like that as a hard truth is, if someone has the intelligence to recognize it, then there has to be people out there who also try to reverse it, and work to be more trusting and supportive, right?
I wouldn't take it as hard truth but moreso an overwhelming majority of opinion. Surely there have been thousands of lives saved by some kind of intervention but you don't hear about it. Nonetheless, it's an apparent  and common viewpoint.
My darling girlfriend attempted to commit suicide a few years ago. When she told her mother beforehand, her mum told her to kill herself because she just wanted attention. Now her mother treats her like she's a shoot up. 
What the actual shoot. I hope she's getting better.
I shooting hate it when my dad calls me selfish. 'You don't want to do this that only I want you to do? That's being selfish'
'You no longer want to stay alive for the happiness/benefit of other people? Selfish.'  No - you're being selfish by assuming my life is for your benefit. You're being selfish by only thinking of your own grief instead of the sheer pain of depression and how sometimes it is quite literally impossible to live with. 
this is because your death proves to the community that you're a martyr and an example of a dilemma that needs to be addressed. 
And it's ironic because the people who then notice that there's a problem, never realize that they are the problem.
Me too, buddy.   I have no shooting idea what's wrong with people. I hate everyone.  
I feel that way too sometimes. It just seems so mind-boggling that people will only feel the pressure of their conscience after you're already dead.
I feel that way too sometimes. It just seems so mind-boggling that people will only feel the pressure of their conscience after you're already dead.
but i fear that even after the death they won't care. So work hard to make your future good and have hope that this hard work will result into something good , something which will finally make you happy.
/r/showerthoughts
Honestly thought that was where this was posted and was going to ask when shower thoughts turned to depression. Sure enough, I got my answer when I got a second look.
It feels like that fake offer, 'Now, if you need anything at all, no matter what time it is, you give me a call, okay?'  Calls at 3am.  'Uh, I don't know, man. I'm really tired. Can it wait til morning?'
'I'm here for you, talk anytime' proceeds to not look at me or respond to hello for months. Claims to have helped people with mental health issues.  great
'I'm here for you, talk anytime' proceeds to not look at me or respond to hello for months. Claims to have helped people with mental health issues.  great
This is why i don't say this after i was asleep two times when i should not have been.   Thankfully nobody died or anything, but it was still shit.  
My sister throwing tantrums and acting like a sociopath her entire upbringing, 'mummy's little sunshine'. I get sick and depressed and suicidal after my dad died, mum says he deserved to die. I have lots of technical information about them, but I don't understand women at all.
Well, I'm a woman. Trust me when I say that behavior like you just described is not gender-specific. All genders are equally shooted up.
I have these moments where I suddenly become really aware of the fact that people are listening to me and realise that what I have to say isn't that important/interesting. Finishing the sentence under those circumstances is nearly impossible and I just get really quiet and drop out of the conversation. 
It's always so awful when someone actually decides to spark a conversation with me and I try to continue it, but then I say something that doesn't make much sense to the other person. Then they just kind of look at me a little confused or with no facial expression that suggests that they understood what I've just said. At that point I just let the conversation trail off in embarrassment. Happened just yesterday too. And the conversation was going so well...
What I hate is how it made me loss my ability to express myself properly. I'm stuttering, I'm trailing off, I can't put a proper sentence together. This is even worse when someone asks me something unexpected (for example, surprise small talk during interactions with cashiers.)   edit: I accidentally a word, and I'm not even surprised.
Same here. I decided to just stay quiet. Usually i think before I speak, but sometimes I don't get the chance.
You put into words what I have been struggling to do for several years. Thank you. I can't think. I can't focus. I can't be creative and I hardly feel human. I'm hardly HERE and I hate it. 
I'm there too. I'm really not doing so good in school. Do you remember that old SpongeBob episode where he procrastinates from an essay? I shit you not, that's where I'm at now. In 40 minutes, all I've come up with is 2 sentences. I'm so demotivated, and uncreative. Its like my mind has no imagination. Its blank all the time.
I'm there too. I'm really not doing so good in school. Do you remember that old SpongeBob episode where he procrastinates from an essay? I shit you not, that's where I'm at now. In 40 minutes, all I've come up with is 2 sentences. I'm so demotivated, and uncreative. Its like my mind has no imagination. Its blank all the time.
Dude. Like I can't even focus when I'm doing something simple like taking my kid to the park. Only mine's like I'm so anxious around people I can't focus, not even on my kid. I'm constantly disheveled and feel so sloppy it's ridiculous.  Then in contrast when I'm alone I'm daydreaming constantly so much that I'm so distracted by thoughts I never get anything done. And then I never have the motivation or confidence to create anything with those thoughts.
Dude. Like I can't even focus when I'm doing something simple like taking my kid to the park. Only mine's like I'm so anxious around people I can't focus, not even on my kid. I'm constantly disheveled and feel so sloppy it's ridiculous.  Then in contrast when I'm alone I'm daydreaming constantly so much that I'm so distracted by thoughts I never get anything done. And then I never have the motivation or confidence to create anything with those thoughts.
Same here. It's hard to do anything... But at least, while daydreaming it sometimes feels like i could achieve something...
This is exactly how I feel. I'm considering a career change because of this... I can barely function as a graphic designer any more. 
I'm just like this too and I'm the middle of a Graphic Design degree. What have I done? 
This has been my life lately, especially since my doctor increased my dose of Wellbutrin. I honestly wonder some days if I have some kind of neuro degenerative disorder. But when I've told doctors that I'm concerned, they pass it off as 'lack of sleep' or 'side effects' from my meds.  There have been many times where I have locked my apartment door, walked downstairs and forgot whether or not I locked the door! Some days I'm fine but others, I feel like my senses are dulled.
I'm in the same boat. I think the increased dose is making everything foggy. I'll even forget conversations that I had even if they're important.
I'm in the same boat. I think the increased dose is making everything foggy. I'll even forget conversations that I had even if they're important.
Right? It's like the phrase 'If it's important, I'll remember it' rule goes out the window. And aside from that, I'm still depressed. Only difference is I feel like I can control my mood a bit more, though it doesn't hurt any less.
This has been the hardest part for me lately. My meds have helped with every symptom but this. I feel so shooting stupid. I was always in advanced classes and known as a smarty. And now I need people to repeat themselves to me so I can process whay they said. I can't answer simple math problems and I forget everything. It's starting to really wear on my friends and family and I'm worried that it's affecting my job. 
>I need people to repeat themselves to me so I can process what they said  Yeah, this is the worst. It convinces people that I'm stupid or slow. And they're not wrong.    This cluster of symptoms actually got me fired recently, making my depression much worse. 
Might be worth getting evaluated for ADHD. Do some research and see if it looks like your life. Depression can and typically is a comorbid. What you describe sounds very familiar.
Yeah even if they arent diagnosed with ADHD their doctor can still prescribe the same medications for it, especially when suffering similar symptoms.
I kind of agree, except that the time between falling asleep and waking up feels instantaneous, so I don't really like sleeping. It's like fast forwarding to the next day. When I stay up late, it's procrastinating dealing with the next day.
I like sleeping, but I'm the same way. I stay up as long as possible because I know that no matter what, waking up means I have to deal with my shitty dead end job and feeling like shit all the time. I never want to go to sleep, and I never want to wake up. One hell of a Catch 22.
I like sleeping, but I'm the same way. I stay up as long as possible because I know that no matter what, waking up means I have to deal with my shitty dead end job and feeling like shit all the time. I never want to go to sleep, and I never want to wake up. One hell of a Catch 22.
I'm the exact same way. I stay up way too late because I'm depressed and if I don't go to sleep tomorrow can't come, but eventually I have to sleep and if I screwed up my sleep schedule I just feel worse in the end, physically, mentally, and emotionally. Waking up is difficult too, because all I really want to do is go back to sleep again...
I like sleeping, but I'm the same way. I stay up as long as possible because I know that no matter what, waking up means I have to deal with my shitty dead end job and feeling like shit all the time. I never want to go to sleep, and I never want to wake up. One hell of a Catch 22.
Upvote for 'catch-22.' I've never heard that used before. So I went and read about it.   Because of you I just learned something new; something important.   *high five* 
Upvote for 'catch-22.' I've never heard that used before. So I went and read about it.   Because of you I just learned something new; something important.   *high five* 
Instead of reading about it, go read the book.It's hilarious.  And full of black humor.    Two things I appreciate while on the downswing. 
'Sleep is death without the commitment.'—Leah Weinstein
'Sleep is the cousin of Death' - Nas
I like drug induced sleep (smoking weed or passing out drunk). I dont dream, nor is it a fitful sleep. When im like that sleep is instant for me.  I then have to wake up. Thats the worst part. All the pain, hurt and memories come flooding back to me... I just wish one day i accidentally overdose. 
Can't overdose on weed :)
Ah, yes. I recall having this thought a lot. I literally stayed in bed for a week (except for bathroom or food) because I wanted to sleep my life away.   Just try to keep focusing on the little achievements. Everytime you make yourself get out of bed, pat yourself on the back. When I stopped comparing everyone else to what I was doing, I started getting a whole lot better.  So, feel better. And know at least one person is cheering you on!
I stopped even comparing the amount of sleep I require to every one else. All of my friends go with 5-7 hours. I personally need 9-10 to feel happy and my self. I am much more functional and don't avoid things.
I stopped even comparing the amount of sleep I require to every one else. All of my friends go with 5-7 hours. I personally need 9-10 to feel happy and my self. I am much more functional and don't avoid things.
this is true for me too but i'm terrible at getting to sleep, if i have to be up i always don't go to bed early enough to allow for the sleep i NEED. then feel awful. *note to self*; go to bed.
I can relate. No further than yesterday I had a bit of a meltdown infront of my closest friend, and now she doesn't answer my sorry texts. I just hope that she still has some patience left, because she is the only thing that keeps me from falling back into depression.
Holy shoot almost the same thing just happened to me a few days ago.  She was the only friend who actually cared to talk about feelings and mental issues and stuff and now it seems like she's just done with my shit and I'm getting worse and worse by the day.
Holy shoot almost the same thing just happened to me a few days ago.  She was the only friend who actually cared to talk about feelings and mental issues and stuff and now it seems like she's just done with my shit and I'm getting worse and worse by the day.
I'll be ur friend
thank you for writing this. i feel the exact same way. i dont think people understand how painful it is to live like this
Sleep, work, eat, shit. Nothing to look forward to, no feeling of excitement about anything. Everything feels so pointless...
Same, shooting sucks. I’m drinking vodka at 3:01 pm because I have no other way of actually helping myself. I tried staying positive, I tried everything people told me and nothings helped. Just try and stay strong, you’ll beat it, I’m sure we all will one day.
I actually quit drinking after I received my Medical Marijuana card and it helps so much more than booze ever did 
Unfortunately that eventually stops working and makes things considerabely worse
Drinking and depression is a match made in heaven
Drinking and depression is a match made in heaven
You mean match made in hell. It inevitably leads to much much deeper darkness. 
instead of vodka, try an adderall prescription. Might help you break out of your boredom loop.
Danging lol, it would help but it would help like shooting heroin does to back pain eg it creates new problems
Danging lol, it would help but it would help like shooting heroin does to back pain eg it creates new problems
take low doses. Mathematician Paul Erdos used pretty low doses to bring himself out of depression after his mother died. Especially since depression is a mental thing, using a crutch to crawl out of that mindset might be useful.
Thats not true in my opinion. I know people who I talk to maybe once or twice a year and I still consider them my friends. It just depends how close  you wanna be to them.  Once you know they're the same kind of person as you, it just comes naturally anyway.s. You dont lose friends because you dont talk to them. You lose friends because you disrespect or mistreat them.  At least thats what I epxerienced.
>You dont lose friends because you dont talk to them.   What? Some of my old friends I haven't spoken to in literal years. Not because anything bad happened, we just drifted apart. I would not call them my friends anymore lol.
same. it's so hard to make friends when you're alone and depressed.
And vice versa, people don't want to be friends with you if they know that you're depressed and that you may make them sad too or something... (happened with my only friend 2 hours ago, I told her about mine depression and now I'm shooting lonely again, seriously shoot this world I wanna die already).
And vice versa, people don't want to be friends with you if they know that you're depressed and that you may make them sad too or something... (happened with my only friend 2 hours ago, I told her about mine depression and now I'm shooting lonely again, seriously shoot this world I wanna die already).
I've learned not to overshare
I've learned not to overshare
Same. The times I've even slightly started to broach the subject it was all eye rolls and sighs. I keep to myself with my family.
Thats so sad. She wasn't your friend to begin with imo. Real friends stand by you not desert you during hard times.   Sometimes I too think the world is such a sad place though I think thats my depression.   There has to be good people out there - ones who will stand by you. Still looking myself.
I still want to believe there are good people in this world but after 7 years of looking for one myself... I kind of lost all my hope for that. And yeah I know it's not much but I'm only 21 y/o lol.
I understand how you feel. I isolate myself a lot when I get depressed. It reinforces the problem.  Hell just last night I blew off a board game and pizza night at a friend's place because I knew I couldn't to put on a facade of being happy.   Was planning on going right up until the last minute but realised I couldn't *handle* it. How idiotic is that?
It's shooting bullshit that we have to put on a facade of being happy. Why can't I just be slightly less miserable in the company of friends while I do what I normally do? I just want a friend who'll accept me as a quiet depressed person and let me enjoy the company of others. I shouldn't be forced to shooting parade myself and dance just so people will invite me over. I'm shooting sick of it. 
I can relate to your first few parts though I think there are people out there who care and its just a matter of finding them. I'm still searching.   The people that always leave in the end imo are those that were never right for me or you from the start. If they stuck around, we may have felt worse in other ways imo.
I suppose. It’s just that the search takes a lot of trial and error. After a while it gets old. I though I found the person that would stay. They’re pretty much the person that knows the most about me other than myself, but they’re slowly going away too. It just sucks thinking you found the right friend and then they’re not.
I have forgotten entire events , entire people I've known for years . I don't remember much of college at all. It's almost to the point I'm not sure it happened 
It's most dramatic for me with family members. My brothers remember much more about our childhoods than I do. I just take their word for most things.
It's most dramatic for me with family members. My brothers remember much more about our childhoods than I do. I just take their word for most things.
I understand completely. I can't remember anything past 3 years ago...since before I joined the Navy. It's like really brief and faint vignettes that drift in and out of an ocean of blankness.   It's so damn hard to describe to other people. Especially siblings. I don't remember much about my childhood. And it breaks my heart. It's hard to get a firm grip of who you are when the history is gone.
I understand completely. I can't remember anything past 3 years ago...since before I joined the Navy. It's like really brief and faint vignettes that drift in and out of an ocean of blankness.   It's so damn hard to describe to other people. Especially siblings. I don't remember much about my childhood. And it breaks my heart. It's hard to get a firm grip of who you are when the history is gone.
> It's hard to get a firm grip of who you are when the history is gone.  Truer words have never been spoken. It sucks when you're around people you've shared your past with because you can't even connect with them anymore because who you were is no longer who you are. Your memories are gone but theirs aren't.
I remember my childhood to high school 100x better than college...
That's probably just the binge drinking.
I think, for me at least, my memory is such a minefield of triggers that I've become conditioned to avoid remembering things, because even seemingly innocent memories can start a train of thought that goes to a very bad place.
A smell, name or just a TV show gets me. 
Other than stuttering while talking, short term memory, stumbling on words, i feel that i started experiencing this too.
I feel you on this one. I didn't know why I started stumbling over my words all the time.
I feel you on this one. I didn't know why I started stumbling over my words all the time.
I used to stumble when i only talk with people i know, it's getting worse to the point where i stumble when talking to strangers.
Studying for tests now is a pain. I used to pride myself in school on being seen as intelligent amongst my peers. Now I feel like an idiot grasping for smoke. 
Feels. Me too.
I've started having trouble forming sentences/stuttering when talking to people lately.  It's as if I don't know how to communicate what I want to say.  Maybe this has to do with depression or something else.  It's hard to tell.  And it happens with almost everyone I talk to.
For me, when i read something, the words are often jumbled in my mind. It's scaring me actually. It's getting worse.
For me, when i read something, the words are often jumbled in my mind. It's scaring me actually. It's getting worse.
Yeah, I've had something like that happen too.  It is scary.  I felt like I could hardly read at one point.
I spent many weeks revising for finals this year and, after falling into quite a bad depressive spell after exams ended, I now find that I can barely remember anything I learned. I used to have a very sharp memory as well, people would always comment on it. 
Same. I used to be super sharp, now i have a hard time remembering words, how to spell, and putting witty phrases together like i used to. 
And is there any way to counter this short term terrible memorization?
I'm not aware of any research about that question, so I can't say I know. My intuition is that it's partly what comes along with the territory of depression, and you have to practice to keep up your memory. Or learn to cope with it (I love making lists). 
I'm not aware of any research about that question, so I can't say I know. My intuition is that it's partly what comes along with the territory of depression, and you have to practice to keep up your memory. Or learn to cope with it (I love making lists). 
I've always had memory issues, but ever since my adolescence I feel like my memory went downhill and I fear I'll never be able to go back. I used to work around it through effort and by being organized. I always had good grades, but once I got into college and my depression accentuated I went from being one of the best students to being one of the worst (really bad!).
The overwhelmingly negative memories are all I can really remember. I want to remember the good times but it seems my brain has blocked those off and is saying 'NO! Bad dog! NO GOOD MEMORIES FOR YOU!'
Me too, sadly :(
Definitely. For me though, I always forget what happened during a depressed period. I have no clue why I was feeling the way I was feeling, how I reacted to things or what helped make it better. I mean, its nice to forget bad moments but also not so cool cause I won't be able to prevent or make them better next time.
I read something when I first started researching mental health that listed a symptom as feeling like the mood you're currently in is the mood you've always been in and the mood you'll always be in, and not being able to remember feeling any other way. 
I read something when I first started researching mental health that listed a symptom as feeling like the mood you're currently in is the mood you've always been in and the mood you'll always be in, and not being able to remember feeling any other way. 
A symptom of depression, you mean? Or a different kind of disorder?   This really explains what I feel like when I'm having a bad time. It also feels like the place I am in at the moment (pretty much always my bedroom) is the only place I will ever be in again, or something. Like a prison, my world doesn't exist outside of this room.   Really terrifying, but at that moment it feels so real.
My exact sentiments for my current crush. She's the prettiest girl that I've ever seen: 12/10, smart, elegant, witty, funny. Man, just the thought of her smiling makes me melt. And here I am, smothered with emotional baggage(s), boring and unattractive.
It really sucks because I've been like this forever, but it feels like no matter what I do, nothing ever, *ever* changes.
It really sucks because I've been like this forever, but it feels like no matter what I do, nothing ever, *ever* changes.
Do you really like this guy, though? 
I don't know about good enough, but I've come to a very solid realization that I am a *parasite*. Better to abstain from dating ever again than to poison more people's lives that do not deserve it.
Sometimes I feel this way. I've never had a long term relationship, but I've read and seen all the terrible things that spouses do to each other. Basically I think that I wouldn't be one of these terrible people, I'm not going to physically or mentally harm someone, I'm not going to cause any trauma to my future girlfriend or wife.  And while I can't give her the world, I think I'd be a better husband than many. It's not glamorous, but not everyone lives a fairytale.
I was never physical--and I doubt most people think they're capable of physical abuse, too--but I have been emotionally abusive and manipulative, and that's something I never thought I would be capable of. But I've left hugely negative impacts on two people so far.  No more.
Good for you. Thats honorable. Kudos
The platitude ' there is someone for everyone' has always struck me as hollow. Like when someone says ' god bless you' after a sneeze. Both are more  polite rituals people do out of habit, or sense of obligation.  
I disagree. Theres 7 billion people on earth. The math favors matches.
I disagree. Theres 7 billion people on earth. The math favors matches.
How likely would you be to move to another country, learn a new language and date way outside your appropriate age range? Also 7 billion would assume your bisexual also. Also my pint was even if the odds are slightly in your favor, isn't kinda disingenuous to preach it as an absolute guarentee.
*I have absolutely no idea how to date people. How to even go about dating people. How to be in a relationship. I don't even know how the whole thing works.*   Why should some upstanding attractive-looking individual out there be saddled with someone like me? 
I've never been on a date. I've never kissed a guy. Never even held a guy's hand. Meanwhile, this guy has definitely had girlfriends (I'm guessing here but I'm 99.9% sure), been to so many countries, performs in theater, does adventurous stuff, the works. Physically he's an 11/10. There's just no point.
Where do I meet you!   Lol jk, but yeah. I don't do much besides school and video games. Girls like me and I know how to talk to them, but it's like I'm a catfish because once you truly know how friendless and depressed I am it's a joke lol
My entire life is reddit, youtube, netflix and video games. I'm in college, and I live here, but it makes no difference.  At least girls like you and you know how to talk to them. I can count the amount of guy friends I had growing up on half a hand. I don't know how to talk to guys, and in the rare instance a guy likes me its  always someone I'm not attracted to.
My entire life is reddit, youtube, netflix and video games. I'm in college, and I live here, but it makes no difference.  At least girls like you and you know how to talk to them. I can count the amount of guy friends I had growing up on half a hand. I don't know how to talk to guys, and in the rare instance a guy likes me its  always someone I'm not attracted to.
So like I don't know about other guys, but it's not too hard to win me over lol. Just smile at me and giggle at my jokes and you're in 
So like I don't know about other guys, but it's not too hard to win me over lol. Just smile at me and giggle at my jokes and you're in 
I wish every guy was like you :)
I tried to ask a girl out but she thought I was a gay and said 'I don't date pussys' 
Sounds like she showed you who she was. Which is a testament to her character, not yours. 
I've too felt this way for a long time. Doesn't help to be asexual as well. Who would waste time with someone who has no relationship experience, redeeming qualities, friends, or interest in fun times? I already accepted that I'll likely be alone forever. I like the idea of dating a guy one day, but definitely not now.
Would you truly say you're asexual? If you're interested in dating a guy, I'd say it's less about being asexual and more about being scared, which is perfectly understandable (unless your definition of dating excludes sexual attraction/feelings).
Would you truly say you're asexual? If you're interested in dating a guy, I'd say it's less about being asexual and more about being scared, which is perfectly understandable (unless your definition of dating excludes sexual attraction/feelings).
I might not be interested in dating someone now, but who's to say how I'll feel in the future. And yup, ever since discovering the term I haven't doubted for a second that I'm ace. I wish I was just scared, because I've reached the point of 'shoot it' and could probably benefit from that. But I wouldn't put anyone through the grief of associating with me at this time of my life. I'd just suck the fun out of everything.
You're far from alone. I'll just leave it at that.
Together in being alone
> start small  > go out, change hobbies, start to exercise, eat properly, Sleep properly
One at a time, building up as you go. Otherwise depression will knock you on your ass and keep you there. Literally just waking up at the same time every day is enough for the first 3 weeks of trying to make a change.   
Ask him out, worst case scenario is he rejects you and you get depress... oh wait.  Worst case scenario is already happening, you have nothing to lose.
He lives down the hall from me and is living with some I deal with regularly, so I'd rather not.  I've learned from experience that it's just best to remain in my comfort zone.
Every girl I've asked out has rejected me. I have opened up to most of them about being depressed but I never told them that I wanted them for support or even implied it. I'm still quite outgoing, I try my best to be nice and as genuine as I can possibly be. I guess girls just don't like guys who face depression. Maybe it's a sign of weakness. Whatever I suppose, I'll just stick to the single life and enjoy myself. 
- Don't tell people early about your depression. Enjoy their company. When they know you better, then you can tell them. - Just meet and hang out with as many girls as possible. Keep going.  - Single life is quite good. I went through a divorce two years ago. I am single now and life is different. It's quite good.
I feel the same, it's awful... I've reach my low point this year, I'm giving up on my master's degree because I can't do anything, at all. And because I can't do anything, I feel bad and get more depressed. Which makes me unable to do anything... Like right now, I can barely write.
Can you talk to your school, counselors, or something? Getting into a masters program and working towards that is a great accomplishment. I only did 2 years of college so luckily I didn't have a lot to lose when I dropped out. I hope you find something that works for you. 
Can you talk to your school, counselors, or something? Getting into a masters program and working towards that is a great accomplishment. I only did 2 years of college so luckily I didn't have a lot to lose when I dropped out. I hope you find something that works for you. 
I'll see if I can just take a break from it. Like 4-6 months away from that place and try to get better.  I was luck that during college I was depressed as hell, but at least my brain still worked at the time. I still dropped out after one year, but managed to come back and finish it.  I belive we are able to make our brains function properly again and I hope you find your way too.   Thanks for caring :)
Absolutely. The most depressing thing for me these days is realizing just how much slower I am when it comes to thinking, reading, solving problems, and even speaking. Being very depressed for a long amount of time feels like somebody ripped out an important chunk of my brain.
Yes this is adding to my depression too as my only source of self-confidence has been in my intelligence, but now my cognitive abilities have been so terribly affected that it's showing in all these areas and now I'm losing the last/only thing I ever had confidence in. It's making me worried I look/sound stupid which is just making my depression worse and worse and of course keeping the cycle going. 
Absolutely. Yes.  And, doesn’t it make sense? Depression builds redundant neurological pathways in our brains that creates “dead ends.” That’s why having multiple depressive episodes puts you at higher risk of relapse.   However..... it’s not permanent.  You still have the absolutely human ability to overcome this.   Don’t give up, and focus on overcoming the depression with all the tools you have. The rest will follow! 
So, through neuro-plasticity, the neurons could be re-wired or new ones could be created, if the depression was cured? I feel like my lack of cognitive acuity is one of the main reasons my depression persists so its a hard rut to get out of.
This is one of the reasons I can’t go back to work just yet. It requires remembering deadlines and all. It’s frustrating. I have a really great memory, like it helped me do good in school that’s how good it is. Now my brain can barely remember stuff. Like I had an appointment and I thought it was at 1 pm til I checked it the night before and it was actually at 9 am. I can’t remember where I put my keys even if my room isn’t that big.
Same, i cant function in this state, i dont trust myself to build someones house when my cognitive impairment makes it difficult to read a book or remember what i had for breakfast. At best id have to take my work down and lose money having to rebuild, at worst i could compromise the structural integrity of a house by making a serious mistake without realising.
It's why we escape into them.
'Hail, companion.'  ;_;
It's better then what I've gotten before  'Did someone steal your sweet roll'?   'Maybe I'm the dragonborn, and don't know it yet'?   No I amn idiothead. 
I got a mod where every time a guard said the 'sweet roll' line they'd get zapped by lightning and be turned into a sweet roll.
I got a mod where every time a guard said the 'sweet roll' line they'd get zapped by lightning and be turned into a sweet roll.
Please tell me the name of this mod.   Killing every guard in every city quietly is tricky, much easier for the Divines.
Please tell me the name of this mod.   Killing every guard in every city quietly is tricky, much easier for the Divines.
While I'm at it I'll make sure and find the other one the person made for a different line of theirs.  EDIT:  Okay, first one is ['Daedric Punishment for Insults Related to Sweetrolls'](http://steamcommunity.com/sharedfiles/filedetails/?id=112286694)  Second is ['Divine Punishment for Mention of Arrows in the Knee'](http://steamcommunity.com/sharedfiles/filedetails/?id=1174244)
ELI5, I'm retarded and I don't get it.
The guards say that in Skyrim
The guards say that in Skyrim
Ah, cheers. Never played it before.
Blood Elves storyline is so tragic, theyve got a lot of sad quotes like this
Remember the Sunwell!
We should start our own guild/support group.  Sign me up! :-D
My brother and I are trying to start a guild on Dalaran WoW WOtLK private server if you're interested. For the Horde!
The sun is a Wondrous body. Like a magnificent father! If only I could so grossly incandescent! 
Solaire is the nicest anyone's ever been to me 
I don’t talk much anymore either. Feels like having a conversation is me being fake because I’m not really interested. What is there to say anyway. All I want to talk about is my depression but I’ve talked about it with loved ones in hopes that I’ll change and now they just see me as a liability and are over concerned. There really is nothing they can do to make the depression go away.
This is where I'm at. It's common knowledge that I'm depressed and anxious, but I still hide alot of it. Especially at work. I only let people see the surface of the mess I am. Usually unwilling, through physically shaking or being unable to relate to other humans.  I hate when people say it's fine and try to help, but instead prod and make the wound larger. Humans? I stay away from them if possible.
My doctor mentioned these to me. Made from hemp - legal. Are you taking a certain number of mg? Do you take at night or morning?
I take them every night and 5 mg but if im having a hard day i take 10 mg. We cut them into pieces because there pretty strong. 
That's the reason most depressed people don't actually go through with it. It was my reason. It means you're a decent person who cares about others.
You can care about others and still 'succeed' in taking your own life. My brother was perhaps the most caring person I knew but his pain outweighed the guilt of leaving his family in pain. 
I'm in the same boat. I actually recently started dating this amazing girl and I'm sitting next to her right now just thinking about killing myself.  What the shoot is depression, and why does it exist? It's not fair. 
Right?? It's a weird, conflicting feeling to have so much love for other people, and only hate for yourself. Not loving it.
Right?? It's a weird, conflicting feeling to have so much love for other people, and only hate for yourself. Not loving it.
And then people tell you, 'no one can love you if you don't love yourself' and you go 'well shit'
Yea. I wish I were more solipsistic. I wish I could be successful, to finally snuff it. I wish all of these things. But my family, man. Especially my little sister.    
Oh, god, my little sister :(  I tend to think of my dad because he isn't in great health and needs me for help.  But my little sister would probably just follow my lead :(  I worry my dad would, too. 
Just dont kill your self  I did beat depression and you can do it too  Everyone can do it
everyone can? i'm not so sure  even if everyone can, not everyone do it
Hate to say it. Even after suicides and suicide attempts, people don't take depression seriously. 
True...people think suicide is always just this impulsive thing that they 'never saw coming'. I'm pretty sure that's what people would say if I went off into the deep end.
True...people think suicide is always just this impulsive thing that they 'never saw coming'. I'm pretty sure that's what people would say if I went off into the deep end.
they think that suicide is their own inability to cope - 'a permanent solution to a temporary problem' or whatever dribble pop psychologists are sprouting.   They think we're weak, they have no idea how difficult it is just getting up every day. If you've never truly suffered, you have no idea. 
The good ol 'It's just a phase.' If only that was true =[
or that 'they choose to go to that dark place'  yeah, no one chooses this shit.
Haha I love that one. But my personal favorite remains to be 'stop taking those pills and tough it out'.
I wish those shoots could have the kind of suicidal thoughts I got when I skipped ONE dose of my viibryd. I can't even imagine going more than a day without tapering correctly,  I would probably end up killing myself if I didn't taper correctly.   If they want to tough out defeating and utterly convincing suicidal thoughts which one doesn't even voluntarily initiate, then I really wish they could, just to see what it's like. 
your supervisor was an ass but the other people might just be saying that to other people because they think you'll be embarrassed if they know the truth. I could be totally wrong just trying to introduce another possibility/perspective 
They just don't want to hinder them selfs by actually worrying and caring for another human being.
I don't know if I can explain it...but my depression is not really from a lack of perspective or grasp on what is 'good' around me. I keep a gratitude journal, I am surrounded by great people, nature, etc. but can't seem to connect to the outside world. I can objectively feel the warmth of the sun and lack the response I know I'm supposed to have.  
It is not your fault. Do not blame yourself. Depression is a mental illness. I would highly suggest talking to your doctor about therapy or medication. Medication is not for everyone, but therapy is a really great way to help with issues sometimes.   If you live in a state with medical marijuana I would perhaps look into that.
Sending you love <3
Take my energy!
Different people have different depressions for different reasons. Advice is not in short supply. Hugs are. I believe most chronic depression would be better served with hugs.  Any depression that is served with advice doesn't stick around long, because you get advice everywhere.
hugs are personal, people don't necessarily know when to give it
Have another big bear hug from a girl across the other side of the world. It's good that you reached out. Everyone is suffering in some way or other. Hugs help. Hug the world. 
You're so right :) *hugs*
Just buy a 'FREE HUGS' shirt. Those shirts are love magnets. Trust me, I've been to EDC 3 times and seen this on many occasions. 
Haha I actually have a free hugs shirt but I don't wear it out of fear that I won't get any hugs
Haha I actually have a free hugs shirt but I don't wear it out of fear that I won't get any hugs
Wear it and post on Yik Yak again OFFERING free hugs. Maybe people don't know they need one too until someone offers. 
Bro, I use to leap off my bicycle and throw myself at Free Hugs people when I'd see them on campus. You'll get hugs, trust me. If not, come find me; I have plenty and am happy to share. ;)
AH you're right. Guess I'll be wearing that shirt when I go out later :)
Yes. Me. That is me. This post honestly made me breath a  slight sigh of relief because it's not an easy thing to talk about and I don't want pity so I never bring it up. I know it sucks but it's kinda nice knowing you're not the only one who feels like this. 
Oops, meant this to be a response to the thread  But the offer is for anyone who needs it. I know how frustrating it feels and would be honored to help anyone who has been where I was.
Story of my life. So many plans, but no drive, no energy, no motivation. No future. 
Do the smallest possible thing to take care of yourself or improve your situation. That's the first brick. You can build on that.   Go for a walk, do some exercise or a bit of housework. It could be anything. Once you've done it you can consider it the first of many achievements.   Many things can seem daunting until you start them. Rome wasn't built in a day. 
Do the smallest possible thing to take care of yourself or improve your situation. That's the first brick. You can build on that.   Go for a walk, do some exercise or a bit of housework. It could be anything. Once you've done it you can consider it the first of many achievements.   Many things can seem daunting until you start them. Rome wasn't built in a day. 
Once you build the first brick, you start feeling down again. It’s a constant cycle of frustration and sadness. Life hurts. 
Once you build the first brick, you start feeling down again. It’s a constant cycle of frustration and sadness. Life hurts. 
That brick is there and you own it. It may be a cyclical feeling, but as you build on the positive, maybe the next wave of depression will be a little less severe.   
I've tried that. It doesn't work. I do one thing, feel exhausted and then dont do anything else. That's the thing about depression - we don't have the same psychological/neurochemical motivators that normal people have. It's what makes us depressed. Normal people exercise and get a rush of dopamine. I exercise and feel like shit.
^^^^^^^^^ SERIOUSLY. THIS.
My biggest problem is my sleep schedule but I cannot anymore miraculously fix it. By now my body is used to sleeping at a very irregular times so getting back into a proper rhythm is something I feel has become impossible over time
me too. i've ruined my sleep pattern and my health, i only catch up on my sleep every few weeks or so.
This!!! So finely written!!! If I had the money I'd give you gold for that!! Thank you!! 
You are most welcome ... and thanks for your kind words.
I have recently discovered the depths of my depression.  Your post really hit the nail on the head and describes a lot of what I am going through.  Thank you so much, it means a lot.
I'm sure the weight of that realisation has been difficult to acknowledge and carry. Glad I could help you with this in the same way it helps me.
Ayyyy, there are more of us!  I used to spend all day every day in my own head. Music, games, TV, it was all inspiration for me to go into my own head and live out a fantasy.  Work and a relationship have put a hold on most of it, but I still so it a ton.
I hope I can one day get to the point where I have stuff to distract me from this really bad habit
I hope I can one day get to the point where I have stuff to distract me from this really bad habit
I don't think it's bad, so long as you can maintain a hold on what part of you is real and what part of you is what you imagine. I've lost a fight or two because I thought I was a bigger badass than I am.  It's all about expressing those daydreams while staying grounded, abd it's totally doable!
I am SO DOWN for living in a tree!! Haha you just reminded me of my 10 years old fantasy of living in a tree house :D
Imagine it. A whole town, up off the ground. Hidden in the leaves.
It's called maladaptive daydreaming. Lots of people with AvPD do it, and other disorders too I'm sure
> AvPD  [Hot holy damn!](https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Avoidant_personality_disorder)  This is the perfect definition of what I am. Never knew this existed. I just chalked it up to my cptsd. 
It's called maladaptive daydreaming. Lots of people with AvPD do it, and other disorders too I'm sure
Never knew AvPD existed, I just googled it and it sounds so much like me and I also do what OP said (s)he does. Oh my. 
I spend a lot of time daydreaming and imagining a better alter self in a better alternate reality. Be it through games, reading, music anything that is able to distract myself. You are not alone. In fact it's because of this fantasy that I feel less alone. 
It makes me feel more alone cause as soon as that fantasy goes away I realize that none of it is true. No friends, no girlfriend, I'm fat, and not doing anything with myself besides wasting thousands of dollars of my parents money to get a degree so I can work a boring 9-5 for the rest of my life  But shoot it, back to fantasizing...
Not a weird rant at all, this a safe space and no one is judging. We are all just trying to get through this together. Thank you for sharing
Thanks as well. Hope you're okay too.
It's all the time - say, when I watch a funny YouTube video or playing a game. I'll imagine there are friends beside me, laughing too, and I'm not terribly alone 😂
Lol I do this as well. Or when I'm in a store by myself I pretend I have friends there with me and we are all having a good time.  Being sixteen without friends is hard 
/r/MaladaptiveDreaming  Welcome aboard...
This is the first I've ever heard of this, so I just felt I had to thank you for sharing it.
This is the first I've ever heard of this, so I just felt I had to thank you for sharing it.
You're very welcome :) I was *floored* when I first found out. See my reply to another person in this thread, I talked about it a bit.
Thanks for sharing. Nice to know I'm not just crazy haha. Helps to feel not so alone in our struggles.
Yeah!! It's so insane that there's a term for it. I was honestly blown away when I learned of it :)
I don't know if daydreaming while sitting in class can actually be considered 'unhealthy'. School is bullshit. Anything that helps one escape it is healthy in my opinion.
Escapism can be dangerous 
I would recommend taking action. Even if it's just to go for a walk down the street, it's better than being stuck thinking unproductive thoughts.
Lol I daydream when I walk
Some of my family members just think I'm a lazy piece of shit which is exactly what I am but I don't like having it thrown in my face.
my family doesn't know about 80% of my problems, i guess it's better that way, i save them a lot of trouble without them even knowing and they still treat me like shit sometimes and accuse me of faking when i feel really down or anxious  no one knows how hard it is for you, except you, hang in there 
You can be depressed in almost any situation. There are people being depressed despite having a healthy relationship. If you are chronically unhappy it is an depression regardless your situation.
yupp; its a chemical imbalance in the brain, but ive seen alot of people that dont believe that its anything other than seeking attention. (Edited cuz typos)
yupp; its a chemical imbalance in the brain, but ive seen alot of people that dont believe that its anything other than seeking attention. (Edited cuz typos)
I dunno about me tho. I'm pretty social and funny. I have many acquitants at my hobbies but it just seems as I can't get any of them as my friends. And the friends I have contact me almost never. I always have to contact them first and that feels awful. So to me it seems like really I am the problem, not something in my head.
I dunno about me tho. I'm pretty social and funny. I have many acquitants at my hobbies but it just seems as I can't get any of them as my friends. And the friends I have contact me almost never. I always have to contact them first and that feels awful. So to me it seems like really I am the problem, not something in my head.
Im not going to say that isnt possible. Clinical depression is where you have the imbalance, but there are other types of depression which have nothing to do with that i beleive. Like the people who are only depressed for a week or a month, and then almost never experience it again. I dont have any friends really in person either... Im not very good with people, except when im typing them and we've never met... im Wierd. Sounds like you could be similiar.
I think its worth grinding and failing. once you fail you can then analyz what you did wrong and then improve yourself, but don't lose yourself in reflecting just on failure. You should think about your achievements too.   Don't be scared to fail. One of my favorite quotes about motivation is 'you miss 100% of the shots you don't fire'  Keep your head high my friend.
It's the only way to improve, but it can be very disheartening. My mistakes are those other people make when they're 5 or 6 maybe.  I'm thirty years older than that. It doesn't play well.
I mostly feel like a burden to everyone and everything rather than ashamed that i shouldn't be more depressed than the guy with no legs next to me on the bus.
My shame kind of stems from being a burden on people. I see the faces of people when I inconvenience them or make them angry in some way and I feel ashamed that I burdened them for that moment.
It doesn't have to always be the case but sometimes having a certain number of responsibilities can help keep the mind busy and give you a feeling of success. (Of course if there are too many responsibilities or unrealistic demands it will only cause more stress and make things worse.)
I hope that will be the case for me! I know I have a tendency to predict the worst outcome for things, so maybe when I see that my predictions aren't bound to happen, life will actually become better when I get out of this prison that I've created for myself.
That's why I play video games, can't be bothered to even think about how much life sucks when I've got a bunch of scrubs trying to kill me.
I can't even be interested in games any more
I can't even be interested in games any more
Try arcadey roguelikes .. like FTL or Rimworld. At the very least their randomness stimulates your mind and encourages a structure in mental approach. Rimworld is presently seeing me through a very confusing phase - helps keep you grounded in a weird way.
You have to really want to do something and even then sometimes there's no way to motivate yourself. I've gone hours without eating, even though I have money to buy food and groceries in my place, because I couldn't be bothered to get up out of my chair to go get or cook something to eat. 
I've gone days before cause I simply forget.  I don't seem to have the same appetite mechanism most people have.  
Finding something to do is a shooting challenge.
Yeah, I was supposed to spend the time this winter break finding new, challenging things to do. Live life I guess, put a new spin on.   Except I can never be sure what to spend my time on, and ultimately I don't want to do anything because it's stressful and I'm lost and all. So I paralyzed myself the whole time and accomplished nothing.   Didn't even take or get past the first little steps into what I had planned for myself. 
I agree. Nothing is interesting ever. But if you're drunk then everything is interesting.  
As someone who has had a drinking problem I can say it just makes things worse.
[r/raisedbynarcissists](https://reddit.com/r/raisedbynarcissists)
Already there!
Jeez if you didn't mention a deployed husband I would assume you were me. Same narcissistic critical mother who hasn't had a job since I was born assuming I'm faking my depression and telling me how she just snapped out of it.
Yeah, according to my mom you can beat depression and social anxiety by just 'getting over it' and moving on with your life. Gee, thanks mom, I wish I had known that years ago.... 
Same here, I got to dogsit a puppy last week and I felt so motivated with him, I just wanted to walk him and play and all that, really helped me forget about my own thoughts and do something new.   The puppy is with his owner now and I'm back at being lazy. I think I should get a puppy of my own.
You should! A kitten turned up at my house one day and we adopted him. He makes me feel so loved every time i get back home after a bad day. 
Just from my experience: I am much more likely to want to do something if I do it with someone else. What hobbies have you enjoyed in the past? 
Only video games. I've tried other things and they didn't catch my interest. I play online with some people, but that only does so much.
Only video games. I've tried other things and they didn't catch my interest. I play online with some people, but that only does so much.
I suggest trying to take it to the next level then. I really enjoy pen and paper games like dungeons and dragons because I am with people and its not just a sit down session. I might spend a lot of time planning, being creative and just chatting with my party about which stupid, overpowered skill they want to use next. You might even enjoy digital game design. It is still 'sitting around', but you can accomplish something. 
the reason is you're clinically depressed and you need treatment from a doctor.
I've never wanted to be 'that guy' who self diagnosed himself but I knew something just wasn't right. I've taken the initiative to book an appointment to get to the bottom of it. Thank you 
'Depression's like a big fur coat, it's made of dead things but it keeps me warm.'
That's a nice quote.
i'm pretty certain i'll never feel 'happiness' the way i once did. i might find a new sense of it; i might find it with a more evolved definition. but the happiness and simplicity and innocence i was granted as a child is long gone
Describes perfectly how I feel about all this. Being a kid was the greatest thing in the world. 
Yes.  I'm 46 and can't remember how it feels to feel 'normal'.  I know when my depression ticks down because I'll say 'oh wow, this is shittier than normal' but I have no memory of how it feels to wake up happy.  None whatsoever.  I was talking to a therapist a while back and said 'I think this is my new baseline'.  She disagreed but it hasn't changed and, for me, I don't think it will.
Ditto except I'm 30. Firstly, can I just commend you on your ripe old age as someone with chronic depression? The idea of making it to 46 right now is unimaginable. You must be an incredibly strong person, if nothing else.  I was just wondering if you're on meds/what your story is with the meds route?
Literally 2 months ago I was a perfectly normal and happy person. But then my mom killed herself and for the last 2 months all I have been thinking is should I do the same.  My past feels very different to me now. 
If you have been chemically ok for your life but just now it's changed this may not be clinical depression but grief, definitely. You HAVE to seek counseling or some kind of support group. You may still be able to beat this.. Sorry for your loss.
May we all find happiness someday 
I'm desperately searching man, I really am. I keep hitting walls but I'm praying there's a tunnel somewhere hidden by the fog.
Well put. This is exactly how I feel as well. 
Nice username.
I know what that's like. I don't know myself anymore. Why did you give up on Wellbutrin? Please try to take it everyday unless the side effects are horrible, because the getting-better thing can sneak up on you with meds.
I didn't feel a huge difference after about a week and researched it out of curiosity. Some absurdly small amount of people (like less than half a percent) have seizures on higher doses and I let my anxiety get to me, even though I have no family or personal history of seizures and am taking the lowest XL dose. Then I got really mad at myself and vowed to eat better, sleep well, etc. but after a few days kept slipping and slipping. 
I didn't feel a huge difference after about a week and researched it out of curiosity. Some absurdly small amount of people (like less than half a percent) have seizures on higher doses and I let my anxiety get to me, even though I have no family or personal history of seizures and am taking the lowest XL dose. Then I got really mad at myself and vowed to eat better, sleep well, etc. but after a few days kept slipping and slipping. 
I used to feel that way too. I was on Wellbutrin for a year and a half. At first I was TERRIFIED of seizures as well, but when you're on 150 there is an extremely low risk of that. Even if you had a seizure, the way I see it, it would be better than dying of suicide or suffering for years from depression. I totally understand that anxiety makes you think in irrational ways though.
'happiness is for amateurs' -Jason Collett I think     
Truly. Can't really take most of peeps I know seriously anymore because they're ignorantly happy and oblivious. 
I'm scared to death of getting stuck in a job I don't like or tolerate for the rest of my life. I'm not cut out for the 'go to college, get a job, get married, have kids, die' lifestyle.
See this is exactly why I come here. You guys just 'get it' mentally ill my ass maybe were the normal ones. 
See this is exactly why I come here. You guys just 'get it' mentally ill my ass maybe were the normal ones. 
Funny you say that... Up until just now I have avoided being involved with anything related to 'depression' because I never saw myself as being mentally ill. I'm just always sad and dissapointed with life in general. I would probably still be in an existential crisis state if I didn't decide it wasn't worth my time to think about, not that anything really seems to be anyway. Regardless, after reading a couple posts and comments here, I feel like you guys kinda get it.
Lol I shooting hate how they emphasize the word 'career' like it's somehow better than a job
Everything is a job nowadays. Even if you find the career you always wanted, the people at the top will always squeeze you until you start hating it.
I remember seeing someone once say a job is something you'd quit if you won the lottery, and a career is something you're truly passionate about and will probably never consider quitting.
Lol delusional bullshit 
Shut up and get lost
Be prepared
Humans weren't meant to work 40 hours a week, and especially not 40 hours a week at a desk job. The current policies at most work places are so outdated and inefficient it's ridiculous.   We need more of a shift towards life on the work-life balance scale. It's slowly starting, and I hope it continues to move that way. 
Slowly starting?? Lot of people work more than 40 hrs or are taking on multiple gigs/picking up time to survive in these overinflated times 
Slowly starting?? Lot of people work more than 40 hrs or are taking on multiple gigs/picking up time to survive in these overinflated times 
Some companies are allowing more work from home, open vacation policy, flexible schedules, etc. You're right though a lot of people work over 40 hours or take up a second job which sucks :(
I work 55-60 hour weeks at a desk job that I don’t like and I’m only one year out of college. All my time goes to work. Can’t sleep right now and it’s 1 am, have to be I’m at 7. Tomorrow is going to be absolute hell
Forgive me for asking but, how do you live like this? It's both inspiring and amazing but at the same time it makes me feel worse about myself for not even being able to come close to the normal standard.
Contrary to what society tells you, you don’t need a career. You don’t need to find that ONE thing that you want to do forever. Sure, you’re probably going to have to get a job, but there’s no reason why you can’t change jobs throughout your life. 
I'd expect that you wouldn't want to change jobs too quickly, although it is important to consider the environment that you would potentially work in as well. I do like that trying different jobs gives you a (potentially) great opportunity to see what is best for you.
What about the thought of finding your calling? Maybe you're more entrepreneur-ish.
No idea why you got downvoted but yes......that calling for purpose I'm clueless on so it has aided into my feelings. i feel that also, if only I could break thru on something would make a big difference in my mindset.
Just did... I do it every day... no one takes the time to message me first. :( I'd cry but I'm numb
Same, no one messages me first, until about a week ago, found a soulmate maybe, never would have expected it, end of school realised that i would probably miss her the most, shes 2 classes lower than me, and helps out sith tech for school productions
Same. I hang out with friends at least 2-3 times a week. I just don't know if they actually like me or not, though. I always have to contact them first.  I would try to find new groups of friends, but I have been doing that my entire life (due to moving quite a bit), and I am exhausted.
I'm in the same situation with my main group of friends I've had for years. If they message me first (which is extremely rare) it's only because of something that they want to do and if I didn't come along, they'd be doing it alone. They rarely contact me first. I really feel like I'm not respected in this group. I agree with you, I think it's time for a new group.
I'm in the same situation with my main group of friends I've had for years. If they message me first (which is extremely rare) it's only because of something that they want to do and if I didn't come along, they'd be doing it alone. They rarely contact me first. I really feel like I'm not respected in this group. I agree with you, I think it's time for a new group.
Yeah. I wish I could change to fit in more with them, but it just isn't really who I am. I mean, to be honest, I wouldn't want to hang out with me, so why should they?
Not even checking. Just looking at it.  'Maybe I can distract myself by looking at my phone screen. So yep, that's the time, the apps I use aaaaand I'm done. Back to do it again in 1 minute.'
'Let's look at Facebook... ah, one funny thing. Liked. Okay, notifications? Nothing... Reddit? Hey! Oh wait no messages. Maybe if i open the inbo... nope, empty. Anything special on the frontpage? Ah star wars... that is a nice movie. Can't wait until someone uploads a watchable version. Oh, right! Messanger... nope, nothing. Wait what is the time? Oh... well i guess back to the computer reading about wars again...'
Reading about wars? Star Wars or human wars?
Both. The star wars universe is very big and has lots of potential and the fan theories are good.   While i'm also reading what is currently happening, mostly in the middle east. Humanity has come a long way from throwing rocks.
About two months ago I reconnected with a female friend who gave me her number. I've had a crush on her for the longest time.. I swear every time I get a notification I hope it's her. Sometimes it is and that's great but most of the time it's not and I get bummed out easily because of it.   Before anyone asks why I don't hit her up as often as I should, well it's because I don't wanna come off as a clingy mess. 
Welp, at least you get notifications
This is me. Always. I'm so alone and I know it yet I'm constantly checking just in case. It's even worse now that I've been dumped recently 
Same here, it's the worst (both being dumped and constantly checking my phone for nothing).  
How long have you been learning Russian for? It's one of my bucket list languages but it's intimidating! (difficulty-wise)
I studied Russian for a about 7 years, and once you understand the alphabet, it's about a 5.5/10 for difficulty. As you pronounce every letter in a word, and the sentence structure is pretty much like ours. The only thing that's somewhat hard is the combination of grammar and gender of words. I found French harder to learn than Russian. But that's just me, it may be easier/harder for others. 
I have 0 people in the contacts list, so I don't expect anything.
I can't reasonably expect anyone to message me, yet I still secretely hope for it.
Definitely going to try this as a self-diagnosed notification addict!
Make sure you're still checkin yo shit, but yea I highly recommend for impulsive anxiety 
Nice! I might audition for a play today!
That's awesome! What play are you auditioning for?
That's awesome! What play are you auditioning for?
Plaza Suite, by Neil Simon. I haven't been in a play since middle school. But I'm looking to branch out and I love reading plays. So, I thought, why the heck not?
Plaza Suite, by Neil Simon. I haven't been in a play since middle school. But I'm looking to branch out and I love reading plays. So, I thought, why the heck not?
That's really neat, I wish I had the time to do something like that lately. Hope your audition goes/went well and that you had fun regardless of how it turns out!
I hope you continue to have days like that all throughout the new year! 
me too, thank you!!
Hey how was that Starbucks?
Legends of yore say OP is still at Starbucks to this day. Others say they transcended reality and *became* coffee.
Legends of yore say OP is still at Starbucks to this day. Others say they transcended reality and *became* coffee.
haha!! thats funny because whenever i drink/eat too much of something my dad always says i'm going to 'become' that... made me smile
Wow, congratulations! Hope you keep us updated with how the venture to Starbucks went.
it was good! i got subway too and then got gas and then got shampoo
Hey that's awesome!!! My day has been better than it has in weeks, for whatever reasons, maybe med reasons but I'm trying not to overthink it. I wish you the best of luck with the rest of your day and future days 
So today I woke up at 8am ate showered and made to New York City with a friend to help work on a clients workspace. And I got paid! Hooray , happy new year.
Proud of you!
thank you so much
Nice! I got some Pizza Hut today it was pretty good :)
i had pizza last night!! i had crab cakes and cheese cake tonight :)
Waking up 'on time' makes me feel so much better.
me too!!
Awesome! Keep it up! :-)
thank you so much
You're my hero!
i have been crying reading these comments and this made me smile, you are mine too
Congrats my friend 
thank you!!
WAY TO GO! This is my biggest issue too. Great job getting out there. Hope you had good weather and great scenery. 
Thank you!! 
That's great :) so happy for you.  Hope you enjoyed it.
i did. i went to cheesecake factory for dinner with my friends. i hope you had a good day
Awesome! That's great!
thank you :)
thank you :)
Of course! It's hard to do and I've been there too. Keep with it, it's hard, but think of small accomplishments like that and make yourself keep going! Good luck 
Of course! It's hard to do and I've been there too. Keep with it, it's hard, but think of small accomplishments like that and make yourself keep going! Good luck 
you don't know how much that means to me... tomorrow maybe i'll wake up at 8!
Good luck. 
It was a good day 
It was a good day 
That's good, I hope more for you
ITT: The clinically depressed berate another clinically depressed poster for daring to suggest that he or she may be of exceptional intelligence, thereby deepening his or her sense of worthlessness, because shoot you that's why.
I have no problem with people knowing they're smart. hell, I'm pretty smart. But I know that intelligence doesn't make you a better person, they way being athletic doesn't make you a good or valuable person. You still have to do that yourself, and not always just in the ways your gifts might suggest.
Basing your self-esteem on a falsehood doesn't seem all that healthy to me.
and who says it's false?
and who says it's false?
It's not, necessarily.  But a person is far more likely to believe he is exceptionally intelligent than to actually be intelligent.
I happen to think the whole 'ignorance is bliss' thing is true, and furthermore its opposite ... 'knowledge is misery' (or however you would phrase it).    NOT that all depressed people are necessarily brilliant, but certainly that many brilliant  people are depressed.
I've never understood people who have said they did their best work while depressed though, to me, riding the upward swing of the wave is when I'm able to achieve the most. Once I'm back in the rut again, not a whole lot gets done, I'm drained of energy.
In fact, there really no evidence of correlation between intelligence and depression.
Ok so that could just mean no one has ever done a study.  Do you know that for a fact?
Source?
enit1 is acting borderline trollish, but [he is right](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Intellectual_giftedness#Depression), according to the sources cited by wiki. A quick google search also found [this paper (pdf)](http://deepblue.lib.umich.edu/bitstream/2027.42/85266/1/fialkoff.pdf), which found 'no overall significant association between depression and  creative intelligence.'
Source?
How can I show you a lack of something?
My scumbag DNA decided to throw in some ADHD and social anxiety, also.  Not feeling depressed today? Too bad you can't concentrate or follow through on anything, and will likely not amount to anything.  Feeling focused and determined today? You should tell your friends... oh that's right, you don't have any.  Feeling social and friendly? If only you were interesting enough for people to like you....  Yeah, my brain is awesome.  
Hi there, mine does the same thing. Just thought I'd let you know.  Edit: It is ridiculous how similar our brains are, these monologues are identical for my cycle of problems which happen to be the same.
So narcissists don't get depressed?
I'm sure they do, but MDD is (*typically*) characterized by feelings of inadequacy.   A lot of comments here are essentially 'I'm depressed that nobody else sees how smart and awesome I am!' I'm not going to accuse others of not having depression, but when I personally experience a depressive episode, those are 2 of the very last adjectives I would use to describe myself. 
I'm sure they do, but MDD is (*typically*) characterized by feelings of inadequacy.   A lot of comments here are essentially 'I'm depressed that nobody else sees how smart and awesome I am!' I'm not going to accuse others of not having depression, but when I personally experience a depressive episode, those are 2 of the very last adjectives I would use to describe myself. 
Interesting, I don't see the comments that way.  It seems to me they are saying 'Regardless of the good things I see in myself I am still depressed' 
For me.. 'Amazing athlete? Good person? Smart? Good singer? Have some depression.'
why someone downvoted you is depressing.. sing me a lullaby!
Hate to break it to you, but a lot of people believe that only fools think they are wise, and that wise people think they are fools.  So ... you might actually be a wise person.
But now that you've told him, he's going to think he's wise, thus becoming a fool.
I've had this plan for many years now. As soon as they're gone, I'm out.
Same here, I can't put them through the pain but once they're gone so am I.
Don’t actually do it though. Life sucks but hey share what you love about your parents with your children. Then you will have another people to live for. This is too dark :( I want to die now. University sucks.
I'm gay, 41, and nobody has ever been in love with me. I don't exactly have anyone to live for after they're gone.
I'm gay, 41, and nobody has ever been in love with me. I don't exactly have anyone to live for after they're gone.
Minus the gay part I can so relate to your comment .
Yes. Dad's already dead. As soon as mom's gone, I am too.
dont
dont
Sometimes life is not for everyone, I’m sorry
My mom says sometimes I'm the only reason she doesn't kill herself.
Mine says something similar, not out of depression but she sometimes says how she would kill herself if something happened to me, y'know just because of the love she has for me and the heartbreak  she would have if I was gone
I cant agree more, if it wasn't for my parents, I'm sure I would've thrown myself off a building or onto a busy motorway by now. 
Same. They do so much for me. I can't hurt them like that.
I’d rather die before them. I honestly don’t think I could deal with the pain of losing them. 
I think the pain they would feel would be immensely greater than yours. Better to let them go first. 
I think the pain they would feel would be immensely greater than yours. Better to let them go first. 
I know this but the thing is I don’t want to live anymore.
I know this but the thing is I don’t want to live anymore.
I don't either, but I think the love for my mom is greater than the hate for myself. 
Please don’t do it, everyone. There’s still hope! I’m depressed too, but have faith, please.
I agree. It saddens me deeply that so many people have this same plan.  Please everyone, re-think this. 
I'm holding on. These thoughts usually just pass through my head and I'll think of the future, in an anxious way. Depression wants me to think of all the bad shit all at once. 
I feel you. Whenever life kicks me down or I get upset for no good reason , I also find myself wanting to die, trying to turn down the volume to the point it’s no longer bothering. But that’s not the way out. I don’t know what is, but suicide isn’t.
Yeah as someone with depression, it saddens me to see so many people wanting to do this.
Well it's not like we want to be like this
Initially I had that reaction too... but you never know. Let people believe what they want to believe, especially if they're suicidal and the thing they believe is helping them hold on... cause none of us really know for sure.
I very much disagree.  I don't think living perpetually miserably out of guilt is better than dying.
You are right, she won't know because she will be dead. However, if she did know I doubt she would want her child to cut their life short to join them in death. No loving parent would want their child to end their life because of their own inevitable death. This is my opinion, you have yours. 
I didn't say you were wrong.  I said your point is totally irrelevant.
And I have more messaging apps than people to message! :)
All of these contacts and no one to message! I actually had to delete some apps after a particularly bad episode, and have remained undercover so far, just from sheer shame and self hatred 
All of these contacts and no one to message! I actually had to delete some apps after a particularly bad episode, and have remained undercover so far, just from sheer shame and self hatred 
You stay in undercover too long and people start to think your a self-centered pompousn idiot
You stay in undercover too long and people start to think your a self-centered pompousn idiot
People probably think this of me. Of course, I’ll never talk to them to find out, so it doesn’t matter right?
I had my first cry last night cuz i was all alone. Sucks man. 
Same actually, I cried yesterday 
Same actually, I cried yesterday 
i hope you feel better. last night was a true moment where i realized, shit.... i have depression and im not making it up
i hope you feel better. last night was a true moment where i realized, shit.... i have depression and im not making it up
Nah I feel the same as yesterday if not worse, just trying to not kill myself really.
I wish I was there with you to make you feel comfortable man.
thank you <3 i hope you have a good day. I'm about to go to the gym although i have been in my room unable to even step outside :( i hate this cycle....
You cried because no one messaged you?
It's a combination of things. I don't understand either but seems like i was having a mental breakdown and i just feel nothing interests me anymore....cried twice already today. 
I feel you. It's always sad when I haven't heard from anyone all day and my phone buzzes but it's just the phone running out of power. 
> ~~all day~~ for months  FTFM
shoot people who don't answer messages, literaly only takes 5 seconds 
Sometimes people are driving or in situations where it's not appropriate to text back. 
Sometimes people are driving or in situations where it's not appropriate to text back. 
of course but then you can answer later 
of course but then you can answer later 
Yeah but it's not good to think too deeply about people's motives. For me at least, I know it's much healthier to give people the benefit of the doubt.  Easier said than done of course.
Not to be an ass but I see a lot of people in this thread saying 'same' and 'me too'. How about if you picked one random person in this thread and DM them to ask them how their day is going or just send them something nice so they know someone thought about them today? Just an idea. 
I've messaged everyone here :)
Good luck tomorrow! I start a new job at a hospital in the morning too, so I am feeling the nerves, but this sounds like a good opportunity for you. Keep your head up. 
Thank you and I wish you luck on your new position!
The hardest steps are taken at the beginning, soon enough you will be helping others fight through depression. I was in depression before but I fought against it for the sake of my future and dreams. Now I'm a full time police officer and entrepreneur. Good luck with everything! 
Thank you, I really appreciate the support.
Thank you, I really appreciate the support.
No need to thank me, I am here for anyone that has gone through what I went through. 💪🏽
Good on you!
Thank you thank you!!!
Good luck for tomorrow, you've got this 🍀 I'm proud of you 😊
:-) :-) thank you!!
Good luck man. Let us know how it turns out!
Thank you
Congrats! I hope the best for you! Update us when you can :)
Thank you so much
What is an incel?
'Involuntary Celibate' but on reddit it seems to usually mean 'deep seated resentment of women'
So an update I guess. We've been talking  for the past couple ofdays and I asked her out on a date. She said yes!    
Woo
That's shooting awesome.  That is so incredibly difficult to do.  For people like us anyway.  So that's a huge victory for you, even if she had shot you down.  You conquered your fear.  I've gotten a little better at it than I used to be.  Only thing is the couple girls I actually asked out had boyfriends, haha.  Congrats, man.
Hey, you wouldn't have known if you didn't ask. I had a guy ask me out once when I was engaged, I told him the truth but I wasn't mad at him for asking, and anyone who would be irritated for you just asking isn't worth your time anyways.
Three years ago me and some girl were talking in class for several hours. When class was over she asked me for my number and I made the dumb mistake of not having a phone. I've never had another chance after that.
I talked to a girl in my class who I knew was into me but I lost contact with her after she moved because I didn't have a phone. I still think about her to this day.
That happened to me a few times.  She's gonna ignore you when you text her.
Okay, Nostradomus. 
I understand. Sometimes it's easier to talk to strangers. At least for me,  part of my depression is the guilt of feeling like my illness is a burden on those that love me.
Yes, this. I cant stand the thought of the weight of my depression burdening the people I care about. 
Yes, this. I cant stand the thought of the weight of my depression burdening the people I care about. 
I totally can relate to that.  As soon as I get close to someone I can´t really talk about that.
I totally can relate to that.  As soon as I get close to someone I can´t really talk about that.
The other day one of my friends asked me if I was depressed and I just kinda locked up. Like 'you weren't supposed to see that.'
People like to pretend to be so compassionate...very few seem to care about someone's real depression, in my own experience.
If someone really cares, they will start a conversation, not just offer one.
If someone really cares, they will start a conversation, not just offer one.
How would you even start one though? I have no idea what to talk about if someone is saying they are depressed or they say they hate their life... 
How would you even start one though? I have no idea what to talk about if someone is saying they are depressed or they say they hate their life... 
Show interest in who they are and find common ground, avoid delving into the topic of depression but awknowledge it openly. People who are depressed often need a sympathetic connection with others - what form that is needed in is up to you to find out. If you get nowhere, dismiss yourself and ask if you can talk later. They may indicate their appreciation.
I will sit there crying my eyes out wishing I had someone to talk to, then think of all the people who have said they are there if I need to talk, and I just can't bring myself to actually call them sobbing like a baby crying about wanting to die. It's just too embarrassing honestly.
Agreed. It's not their fault, but I'm never going to be able to reach out over my depression. I can't even picture how I'd start that conversation... 
Agreed. It's not their fault, but I'm never going to be able to reach out over my depression. I can't even picture how I'd start that conversation... 
Right? Same here! I'm like what do I even say? Might as well keep it bottled inside me.... ugh
Loneliness can exist even if you're surrounded by people.
Yeah but it's better to be lonely around people than without any. 
Maybe pets can help you with loneliness :) they will always love you. I wish you the best
I am extremely lonely and live by myself and I would love to get a doggy but pets arent aloud where I live...
Hey, if you don't mind me asking... Did you felt like somehow 'it was too late'? I'm 25 and, after spending a lot of years depressed, I woke up just like you said but somehow I feel like it's too late anyway, I'm going to start college again with a bunch of 18 year olds who will have 7 years in advance to achieve more than I could have.  Sorry to tell you all this, I guess I just needed to tell someone and ask for their experience.
I know the feeling. But wouldn't you rather do it when the difference is only 7 years, and not 20-30?   I have a friend who ended up dropping out like junior year of college because he was too depressed to go to classes (this was around 2014), and just graduated this past spring. He was like 25 when he graduated, but he felt really happy about it and it didn't seem like the age difference was much of a problem. 
Meh, I worked my arse off for years and still ended up depressed and unsuccessful.
Any specifics?
Any specifics?
Specific what's?
Specific what's?
How did you 'work your ass off'? Doing what exactly? (working out, getting a better job)
Don't shooting trust social media. It's stupid. Only shows the good stuff.  You still got many years to figure yourself out, how to handle your depression better and you will find victory within the defeats.
This is true taking pictures in real life is so forced it's awkward 
>if you sit in your room and jerk off on computer all day long nothing will happen to you, ever  What he didn't mention was that even if you go out and do lots of things, nothing of *consequence* will happen to you, ever.
idk, I suspect having sex with something other than a hand could have consequences, potentially
idk, I suspect having sex with something other than a hand could have consequences, potentially
Not that I've found.
Not that I've found.
Not with that attitude
I hate to say this but his case sounds like what most people just think of as depression, just an episodal thing. Especially since he made it sound like you can choose not to be depressed. ('If you become like me').  It's not a choice goddamit!
That's not really a useful belief to hold though. You can choose to work on it.
Depression conditions you to think the worst about yourself - this is your depression talking.
This is true. I have to constantly remind myself of it. Acknowledging that you are depressed makes these thoughts a little bit easier to dismiss. Hang in there man.
How do i know when its the depression and when its real though.
When you treat and judge yourself worse than you would treat anyone else, I think.
People tell me I just need a good kick in the ass to get going. Most times I feel like I'm making excuses for myself by being a piece of shit human being. 
That's exactly what I tell myself. As soon as I start, I'm on a roll. It's just starting that's the hard part. 
That's exactly what I tell myself. As soon as I start, I'm on a roll. It's just starting that's the hard part. 
I would start one time, but then as I keep on going, I feel guilty about even talking about it and end up just deleting it altogether. 
I feel like maybe im just an attention whore and that's why i'm like this
that's literally me with all my problems in life lol high five
This is how I feel as well and I think it's pretty common because depression wants us to believe that we are horrible flaming pieces of shit. I feel guilty if I'm not suicidal and at rock bottom because then I must not *really* be depressed and I'm just lazy and spoiled and making excuses. It's a difficult cycle to break out of. 
I do that and i thought i was being stupid
You sound just like me . Hmu if you wanna LoL
Same.  I'm on right now, damn ranked is down though so I'm just doing aRAMs.
Same.  I'm on right now, damn ranked is down though so I'm just doing aRAMs.
I'd play but I have to be up early tomorrow. Like, I actually **have** to be productive for once. 
I'd play but I have to be up early tomorrow. Like, I actually **have** to be productive for once. 
Same.  I have a long day tomorrow, and Tuesday I head to Vegas
I don't think i am  depressed either. Sure i want to kill myself, have a plan and think about doing it every day. But i do have happy moments sometimes so i can't really be depressed. 
This is exactly what I was going to post yesterday as well...   Because I laugh a lot of the time, I convince myself that I'm not depressed. Then I feel suicidal and it's almost like a reality check. 
If it makes you feel any better, this is precisely me on one of my 'good' days. Hang in there, pal.
You too. Thank you. Much love. 
Me too... I spend every day on the computer doing nothing productive, even though, as soon as i leave my computer to go to the bathroom i get motivated and have ideas for what i could do, but when i get back i'm just a lazy piece of shit again
That describes every minute of every day of my life.  I search the same handful of websites over and over and over again all freaking day.  It's like I'm searching for something that isn't coming.  I'm looking for a change to get excited about, but nothing does.
I just gotta keep trying, i've been trying to fix my sleep schedule these days, so i can start doing everything else, but it's so hard...  Never stop trying, mate
I can't try anymore.  I've lost that ability.  I've lost the ability to want anything anymore too.  The best I can do is try to try.  And I can only want to want something.
I feel you op. I just play league for hours.
I used to play 6~ hours a day. Eventually I got the rank I wanted and quit..because games weren't fun anymore 
LoL? You aren't depressed bro. I play Heroes of the Storm. I don't even have the brain function to learn a more engaged game. I play the casual game that requires less skill. I'm the one that's actually depressed.  (Sarcasm. I feel you, OP.)
Hahaha. I want to try Heroes, but ironically, it looks confusing to me. 
Hahaha. I want to try Heroes, but ironically, it looks confusing to me. 
It's really really easy to pick up if you are good at League. I sucked at League when I came to Heroes and I picked it up fast.
As soon as I accept that I'm in a depressive rut and that I need to take it easy on myself I get a feeling that I'm self-indulgent for taking it easy on myself 
Yep, it's so hard to get an objective read on things when you're in the middle of it. :(
Yep, it's so hard to get an objective read on things when you're in the middle of it. :(
Even harder when everyone you confide in doesn't understand :(
What rank are you OP?
Just got out of Bronze to Silver V 
Just got out of Bronze to Silver V 
Ouch, I'd be depressed too
Ouch, I'd be depressed too
Hahaha no kidding. 
Whether you're faking it or not, and I doubt you're faking it, I think trying to get better would benefit you regardless. 
I'm already getting help, just waiting on another mental health assessment.   I can't imagine not getting help feeling like this. That would be absolute madness. 
How did you feel the last time you tried to do something?   
In general, if I try and do something important while feeling depressed, I just cry. Then floods in the negative, suicidal thoughts, stress and anxiety.   But some days I can wrangle my way out of that mess and I'm somewhat fine. Those are always good days. 
That's a beautiful quote :)  But my depression is not like that. It's kind of sadness that kills your hunger for life and love until you're so numb you don't even feel that sadness anymore, let alone beauty of it or anything else.
I mean no disrespect to OP, but that's because the quote isn't about depression, it's about sadness. It's completely normal to feel sad about the end of a relationship, and in that context, it's a wonderful and wise quote. Depression, on the other hand, is an illness. A nasty, ugly, useless illness that, as you said, kills all the beauty of life. Depression is sourceless sorrow and self-loathing and soul-eating inertia. It's something to fight against, not something to embrace.
I mean no disrespect to OP, but that's because the quote isn't about depression, it's about sadness. It's completely normal to feel sad about the end of a relationship, and in that context, it's a wonderful and wise quote. Depression, on the other hand, is an illness. A nasty, ugly, useless illness that, as you said, kills all the beauty of life. Depression is sourceless sorrow and self-loathing and soul-eating inertia. It's something to fight against, not something to embrace.
>Depression is sourceless sorrow and self-loathing and soul-eating inertia.  Exactly.  This just shows the distinct difference between sadness and depression.  Depression is not a rational feeling of sadness from an unfortunate event, but a crippling sadness that comes from nothing but your own mind.
Sometimes I wonder how nice it would be to not know the difference between depression and feeling depressed.
I KNOW. I dropped in on a mood disorders support group a few months ago, and people were saying that they'd been depressed for 8 months, for 6 months, for a year, all after huge tragic events. All I could think was I'VE BEEN DEPRESSED FOR 20 YEARS! I was very jealous that they spent most of their lives not feeling depressed. 
I KNOW. I dropped in on a mood disorders support group a few months ago, and people were saying that they'd been depressed for 8 months, for 6 months, for a year, all after huge tragic events. All I could think was I'VE BEEN DEPRESSED FOR 20 YEARS! I was very jealous that they spent most of their lives not feeling depressed. 
Diagnosed at 14, negative reaction to my medication, no money to get treatment. 22 now, almost 10 years I've been with this, so I know exactly what you aren't feeling at all, ever.
damn, doesn't help me at all really.  feeling happy that something can you make sad because it makes you feel alive?  if you are sad all the time you get real sick of it, i don't care how alive it makes you feel, and the feeling that you may have lost the best person that may ever come into your life is not a feeling i can really appreciate.    glad it helped you out though, maybe itll help some others too.
Feeling sad all the time makes you feel dead, not alive. 
This was the exact thing that I needed to read right now. My girlfriend broke up with me on Friday, and I've felt like crap since then. But this makes me realize that one of these days, I'm going to look back on it and see that it was worth it.   What episode is this from by the way?
Raisins.
I sincerely dont have an interest in contributing to society. I work solely for survival and hobbies. Dang the rat race
Every depressed person seems to live this way. I shooting love it. I think mental health would be much better if we all lived in a sort of commune with a minimalist lifestyle. If you're living to work I think you're doing it wrong unless you're trying to invent something lifechanging or cure a lethal disease.  Work as little as possible to comfortably stay afloat and pursue your hobbies in your off time is my end goal.
Every depressed person seems to live this way. I shooting love it. I think mental health would be much better if we all lived in a sort of commune with a minimalist lifestyle. If you're living to work I think you're doing it wrong unless you're trying to invent something lifechanging or cure a lethal disease.  Work as little as possible to comfortably stay afloat and pursue your hobbies in your off time is my end goal.
I think it's where a lot of our (my) depression stems from. The thought that being a part of the rat race is mandatory.   I think a lot of people here are smarter than most. That is, they dont think or act like sheep. Whether or not that brings on an advantage or not is a different story 
Yeah, most people my age are off going to University, getting into good jobs, moving out and progressing in life and I sit here everyday playing games and not giving one single shoot about growing up and moving on with my life.  I just don't want to do anything, at all. Nothing interests me and everything is so hard. I'm not a hard worker, i'm so lazy and unproductive. Why do I even bother anymore? 
Hey atleast you have the balls to admit it, most people will deny something like this
If it's enjoyable then it's not wasted time.. forget what society seems acceptable. If you need to change then do it for yourself and not for the benefit of others. 
100% this. 
By 2090 they will be dead. By 2190 nobody who is alive will remember them. The world is billions of years old. Dang me. They are just as insignificant as you.  
Nothing we do matters, and that makes life great. 
Nothing we do matters, and that makes life great. 
If you can find a way to embrace it... for me it just builds on the fact that nothing I do matters, and cant find motivation to do anything... im afraid in my near future that i will end up not even being motivated enough to keep my job... 
If you can find a way to embrace it... for me it just builds on the fact that nothing I do matters, and cant find motivation to do anything... im afraid in my near future that i will end up not even being motivated enough to keep my job... 
I'm already at that point it does take a toll on you not wanting to do anything
Yes. The worst thing is I feel like I followed all the rules. I went to university. I studied and got my degree. I bought a house and got married. But I couldn't find a job. Something something recession and something something work for us for minimum eage/ free but we require a bachelor level education.  I feel like my life stalled out after university and isn't moving forward. 
Same here, but I can't even afford to move out of my family's house. Got out of uni, kept studying one more year, got a job and can't even live my own life yet... 
All the time. Everyone seems to have figured life out, except for me. 
Nobody has anything figured out. They're all just going along for the ride and acting like they know what they are doing. Also everyone's life, road and opportunities are different, don't compare yourself to others. Live your life through your own eyes, not through the eyes of your peers.
This is my constant feeling, and funny enough I was just thinking about it earlier today.   It’s almost like everyone around you is growing up, and you’re just at the same place everyday.   Definitely a feeling I’ve yet to shake off, if anyone has some tips, it would be great. 
Quick tips: limit your time on socmed (esp FB and instagram). When you do happen to look at them and feels jealous to your friends, try remind yourself that they just cherry-picking their happy moment and those socmed devs also has intention to make you jealous on them (by shoving it to your news feed) for their human behaviour survey   Nowadays I only used my socmed as messenger to connect with faraway friends and finding good event in my city
That always feels so nice, I know what you mean. A tidied room gives such a sense of control and even a little bit of self-esteem after a period of chaos. Enjoy the momentum, and good job dude!
Yes! I've found that often it just takes me folding one thing, putting away another and then I'm almost there. 
making the bed is my codeword for shooting 
It's also my parents
It's also my parents
By God... Just know I love you.
> I started exercising and made it a priority no matter how tired I wa  Yes, this makes me happy to hear.  I had to quit school this fall semester because of depression. I have bipolar disorder type II. It sucks. I try to make it to excercise daily but it's so shooting hard just to 'exist'. 
I'm so sorry to hear. I wish mental health did not carry such a stigma still and we knew more about it. It's such a complicated and complex part of us and it impacts so many people. I wish you the best of luck! Know you are important and are worth it! You aren't selfish for wanting to take care of yourself and do what's best for you!!! 
I accidentally dropped out of college because of this... I fully intended to go through with the whole thing but then I just missed too many classes. I feel like a lazy piece of shit but ¯\\_ (ツ) _/¯
Haha, that's totally me. I even did it 3 times. Now I'm working at a helpdesk, as i have been for the last 10 years. What would have helped me if a real study buddy or guidance counselor. But unfortunately i had neither. So my advise to you is to see if your school has a counselor. Best of luck!
Same, friend. Was going to request medical leave but got lazy and found out that I was no longer a student. 
Did you get straight up kicked out? I failed all my classes on semester (only went for 3 weeks) and didn't have the energy or motivation to get my medical withdrawal through. Found out the next semester I was eligible to a retroactive withdrawal which wiped those classes from my GPA. Have you talked to a counselor about this?
>(unless your course relies on attendance to pass.... then you kinda gotta go.... and my comment was pointless... you can probably still retake and put in some more work now though)   CUNY in a nutshell 
Right! Miss 3 classes and that's a automatic F
I have classes starting next month. (My third attempt at college)  USMC vet with PTSD, major depressive disorder, social anxiety, and sometimes aggression when control is taken from me.  This time I'm going for entrepreneur classes and wood shop tech. The idea is to eventually have my own shall wood craft shop where I'm making furniture like bed frames and desks, one or two a month.
That's the dream right there. I'm rooting for you 
Damn. I today skipped my classes and told my teacher I'm sick. I could have killed myself. And probably will.
I skip class often too... don't kill yourself, I know you can get through this.
I left school because of this. I owe them a thousand dollars and it makes it so hard to do anything.
Same and I had to pay them in time otherwise it'd go towards my credit. Did you take care of it yet?
This is me. Except it's over for me, I'm guaranteed to fail now
Me too. My grades are not failing , but they are on the border. And where I am from , that is as bad as failing. I just dont know what to do...everything is failing
Me too. My grades are not failing , but they are on the border. And where I am from , that is as bad as failing. I just dont know what to do...everything is failing
My grades are still good, but I'm on the verge of collapsing. I feel like shit studying and I don't have any motivation anymore. Currently, I'm on my last 'reserve energy'. When that runs out, anything can happen.   And if my grades will fall, my teachers and peers will say: 'But you're so good. Why aren't you doing better?' That will make me feel even worse about myself.
My grades are still good, but I'm on the verge of collapsing. I feel like shit studying and I don't have any motivation anymore. Currently, I'm on my last 'reserve energy'. When that runs out, anything can happen.   And if my grades will fall, my teachers and peers will say: 'But you're so good. Why aren't you doing better?' That will make me feel even worse about myself.
No , what is worse is that when you have failed so often that they stop expecting anything from you. What is even worse is when you cant stop believing them; When you cant stop believing than you were born to be a failure , erased in history , never to be remembered by anyone.
Exactly the same situation that I'm going through. I can't function AT ALL. Fear that can't be explained come to me all the time and I'm totally choked by them. I screwed up all my classes and I don't know what to do. I hope somebody just kill me and stop this painful life.
I did that one semester. I spoke to my professors (I had been working full time that semester and they gave me extra time) Please see a college counselor and get some Xanax. Finals are sucky but remember, you can always make up the classes next semester or explain to your professors why you need extra time. Please don't do anything rash. Get counseling fromyour college, find out if SSRIs might help you. I did. It really does get better. Good luck and feel better!
TFW is short for 'that feel when'
I always read it as 'the face when' and was expecting a rare pepe.
The sinking feeling of watching your life go by and thinking of the regrets we will have later in life due to depression now.  It sucks. :/
I'm old. I'm having those regrets. Lots of them. But you can't exactly blame yourself, can you? Even if a lot of things were ruined by my depression, it's not like I chose that path in life. It's really hard actually making myself believe that, though, that all the bad things I've caused in my and others' lives may have been because of things I did, but weren't necessarily my 'fault' since I have little to no control over it. I do my damnedest to overcome it, I really do.
I feel like it's more accurate to say the sinking feeling of wishing you won't have a later in life so you wont regret just watching your life go by.  
Damn. That hits the nail right on the head for me.
• You don't shave for 8 month, and end up looking like tom hanks in cast away.  I can relate to every one of those points unfortunately. 
Exactly. I didn't shave for like 14 months until just last week, because I had no reason to. No one ever comes over. I don't work or go to school. Only place I go is the store for food once in awhile. 
Exactly. I didn't shave for like 14 months until just last week, because I had no reason to. No one ever comes over. I don't work or go to school. Only place I go is the store for food once in awhile. 
How do you pay rent / collect income?
How do you pay rent / collect income?
Welfare I'm guessing.  Edit: Is that an unfair assessment? Either he is rich, his parents/SO is paying for everything, he's on medical leave or he is on welfare.   
- you browse the web all day long in a state of stupor
I hate this. I used to think if I turned off reddit/etc. I could focus better on work, but then I learned if I'm in a stupor I'm just going to be in a stupor regardless. If I take away all distractions I just stare into space. May as well try and find something to take my mind off life for awhile on the interwebs.
I hate this. I used to think if I turned off reddit/etc. I could focus better on work, but then I learned if I'm in a stupor I'm just going to be in a stupor regardless. If I take away all distractions I just stare into space. May as well try and find something to take my mind off life for awhile on the interwebs.
I'm attempting to spend longer times outside - long walks and bike rides. I know that's not for everyone, but just moving around will hopefully help 'jump start' my mind.
I'm attempting to spend longer times outside - long walks and bike rides. I know that's not for everyone, but just moving around will hopefully help 'jump start' my mind.
Oh my mind does work then it just goes: Commit suicide, commit suicide, commit suicide, you're worthless, commit suicide and so on, so I'd like to keep it occupied.
* You constantly have to lie about how you feel because you can't face the consequences of people which don't understand
There's a saying (I think it's a saying) that's perfect for this. 'Smile so people don't ask you why you're not smiling'
There's a saying (I think it's a saying) that's perfect for this. 'Smile so people don't ask you why you're not smiling'
oh god..I was actually walking down the street a few months ago and this guy admonished me for not smiling, saying 'Oh smile! It'll never happen' I was just like 'ffs..I'm entitled to be in a bad mood!'
The sinking feeling of watching your life go by and thinking of the regrets we will have later in life due to depression now.  It sucks. :/
I hope not to have any regrets; I'm trying all my best right now :/
Solid post, I can relate to almost every point!  Here's another point to add on:  * When your first reaction to any sort of invitation is to try thinking up a plausible reason for not attending.  
Yeah, and when I do end up going I generally end up regretting my decision. I literally didn't go to any kind of social outing my entire year of grad school.
Yeah, and when I do end up going I generally end up regretting my decision. I literally didn't go to any kind of social outing my entire year of grad school.
Me too.  All I get out of social outings these days are exhaustion. I wish it were otherwise, but there you go.  I do force myself from time to time, but it just gets harder and harder.
I hate being around happy people.
I hate being around people. 
I hate being around people. 
I hate people
I hate people
I hate.
I thought it was just me about that last point, but it's somewhat comforting to know there's others that feel that way.  I guess I'll add:  You worry that your depression affects others to the point where they may just up and walk away, not wanting to ever deal with it, again.
Happened to me recently. It sucks even more when that person that walked away told me that I was the one 'throwing away a good friend'. That was what she said when I told her that she's free to walk away, I wasn't going to beg her to stay.
Alternatively,  * You wish you could cry, but emotions are a foreign concept now.  ^^Perpetual ^^apathy ^^is ^^such ^^a ^^drag ^^:\
Having a black hole of hurt in your chest, but not being able to force out a single tear to alleviate the pain.  I know it's unrelated but a phrase 'I have no mouth, and I must scream' comes to mind.
It's still ideation. Passive and normally low risk, but ideation nonetheless. Sometimes it leads to putting oneself in dangerous situations, not getting oneself out of harms way, and leaving life to chance.
Yup. Cycling across an intersection when that truck is approaching just a bit too fast, but you're like 'Dang it, I'm not braking,' and you narrowly escape a lethal accident without it affecting your emotional state.  Pretty shooted up when you think about it. It involves other people and their safety as well, but in that split second you just can't be arsed.
Girlfriend? Must be nice.
that's a bit bitter, surely? I mean, the dude still is depressed..a relationship isn't a cure for misery.
You have a job but can't work because you're constantly depressed. Day after day you surf the net at work instead of actually working. 
I am doing that right now. Eventually the lack of progress on my work is going to get me fired.
* The pressure inside your chest that makes you mostly breathless, as if your heart stopped pumping and became a giant, emotionless tumor that you wish you could tear it off just to make that numb feeling go away.
yes exactly it's like a physical manifestation of the loneliness , pain and that hole in your heart 
You've figured out my survival technique (generally speaking)! If you can't 'do life' the way everybody else does, make life work around you in a way you can manage it. Can't do dishes? Use disposables. Can't drive? Work at home. Can't get out of bed? Get a laptop and try to socialize/work from bed if you have to. Bend your life around your needs, not the other way around, and sometimes you can actually fake being a mostly functional human being!
Trying to find a work at home job currently.....not having much luck unfortunately :/
I can't even shooting post replies anymore before my 'why bother' attitude kicks in. I've typed a lot of responses to this question, deleted them because they sounded stupid. stoic, too poetic, etc. *and I shit you not I almost deleted this one too.*  I don't know what to do with myself anymore. Every day, I have to get up just to be tormented more, and for nothing. 
I feel the pain man. I mostly just read now.
I also can't be bothered to eat. I force myself to do it but it's terrible.
I'll go for long such long periods of time between eating that when I finally do I either get super nauseous or I get a horrible pain in my stomach.
I'll go for long such long periods of time between eating that when I finally do I either get super nauseous or I get a horrible pain in my stomach.
Omg I hate that. Haven't eaten anything in so long that you're like lightheaded and feel awful and you think 'I really just need to do it, I need to get something in my stomach...' But you're so nauseous you feel like vomiting the whole time you're eating.... Ugh 
How about when you watch stuff that's not that good or play games that aren't what you really want to play because you're just killing time? Like I have Mad Max sitting right there, but I'll watch Bloodrayne 3 because I'm not in the mood to do something I'll really enjoy.
Yeah, I spend a good amount of time watching Dota streams because it's less stressful than actually playing the game and requires less mental energy.
Everything feels dark and grey, even on a sunny day.   
Sunny days are the worst. I actually prefer overcast, cool days. The sun just feels like an allergen to my - it hurts my eyes, it hurts my skin, and without lathering my skin with chemicals I become all red and itchy for days after more than an hour or so of exposure.
Eating is a burden for you? Damn it is the opposite for me, depressed and I am eating all the large pizzas alone. My pizza guy asked me who I was sharing all the pizzas with... 
If you put a pizza in front of me, I'd be glad to eat it. But I can't be bothered to pick up the phone and actually order a pizza. When I do go to the grocery store, most of what I buy is frozen or otherwise ready to eat (like donuts, candy, chips, etc). I've had to throw out so much perishable food because I just don't get around to preparing it before it spoils.
So glad you mentioned the dishes and laundry. I hate myself for having so much trouble with simple tasks that other people do so easily. 
Showering. :(
The part about buying games but never being able to play them, really hit home.
In my case it's more all these math books that I bought, and haven't gotten around to even looking at because I just don't have the mental energy to.
I need someone to explain to me why suicide is selfish. I'm not suicidal, at least I haven't gotten to that point yet, but I truly do wonder why people say it's selfish. How is it selfish to want to end your suffering? Isn't it selfish of others to guilt you into staying in your cesspool of self-hate because they would feel sad if you were dead?
It's 'selfish' because it's putting your needs and wants ahead of others. Never mind that you don't actually have any obligation to stay alive simply because other people want you to.
I totally get this. I think it's mainly because I don't feel like I'm worthy of attention and I feel guilty that I'm inconveniencing other people with my problems when they probably have enough of their own to deal with already.
Yeah, it feels like my problems are trivial and not 'actual' problems, like there's nothing really wrong with my life but I'm just not happy and it sucks. But mostly I feel awful when literally no one cares to ask, not even your depressed friends. Feelsbadman.jpg.
Yeah, it feels like my problems are trivial and not 'actual' problems, like there's nothing really wrong with my life but I'm just not happy and it sucks. But mostly I feel awful when literally no one cares to ask, not even your depressed friends. Feelsbadman.jpg.
same, even tho I'll probably deny anything being wrong I still wish people would ask. I'm sure people do care about us both tho, but maybe they don't notice how we feel because we try to hide it.
I totally agree, except even if I kms people would probably be like 'eh she was a stupid girl lol' :)
I'm sure not everyone would say that.
I'm sure not everyone would say that.
Yeah, I guess. It doesn't really matter either way. Sorry if I'm being a downer though, don't mean to.
This is tripping me out man. This is exactly how i shooting feel.
For real. I could’ve written nearly every comment here myself.
Yup. I have actually been told those things by own mother, 'snap out of it', 'it's your choice', 'just be happy' like wow thanks I'm all smiles now :)  And yup, music's been helping and sometimes when my mind gets too loud I write shitty poems about my shitty life. Also heyyy free beer is always a win in my book!
Thats very good, poems and music are good at least you are getting a way to express yourself and let out some of the pent up stress.   Maybe try to join some writing forums online?  Depression may be an ass at times and makes u inactive but who knows, you might find like-minded people there. Just be careful though idk lol
I feel this way too - it's kind of like getting a compliment; many of us aren't emotionally prepared to handle something like that. 
Yeah. I've recently realized that I don't really take compliments that seriously. Sure, feels kinda nice, but like.. I don't actually think they mean it. It's hard to believe.
And if you do nothing, you're going to have a bad time. 
And therein lies the conundrum. 
TIME TO EXPLODE
Quick,divide by 0!
Get something new, anything, a new job that you like, a new pair of shoes, go buy something you wanted for a long time....   only to realize after a short while that you are not enjoying it anymore.   feels bad man.
I know that feel. Just when you think that something is finally making you happy, you end up feeling sad again, realizing that the happiness is only fleeting.
Brain: 'You have free time right now. You should do something fun.'      Me: 'I know... But I can't think of anything I want to do.'
For me it's the other way round    Me: 'I have free time right now. I should do something fun.'   Brain: 'Dang you, go cry in the corner.'  
For me it's the other way round    Me: 'I have free time right now. I should do something fun.'   Brain: 'Dang you, go cry in the corner.'  
I don't cry much, but I do have a hard time enjoying things. Usually the second I realize I'm enjoying something I'll also realize 'this is fleeting. In a couple hours you'll be back home, alone, feeling bad about things you wish had been different. Like this thought right here.' It's hard to enjoy much after that.
I don't cry much, but I do have a hard time enjoying things. Usually the second I realize I'm enjoying something I'll also realize 'this is fleeting. In a couple hours you'll be back home, alone, feeling bad about things you wish had been different. Like this thought right here.' It's hard to enjoy much after that.
I get that when I'm out with friends or my SO is round. I just have this on my mind the whole time.
fuking tru, no one will agree
That's the worst part, man. No one understands because we can just 'get over it.' 
That's the worst part, man. No one understands because we can just 'get over it.' 
'Just think positive!'  I CAN'T, THAT'S THE FRIGGIN PROBLEM YOU DUM DUM!
Everytime I talk about my depression to other people,(rarely) I feel like I'm lying.
omg i even feel like that when i think about it sometimes despite knowing that I feel like shit most of the time
omg i even feel like that when i think about it sometimes despite knowing that I feel like shit most of the time
I agree with this. I'm so shitty to myself that I don't treat it as a proper excuse. Like 'Dude you're such a piece of shit. Nothing's physically wrong with you and you coulda just gone to <place>'
You don't have to tell them, just say you are wagging?  Edit: you probably mean telling the actual school not your peers.
No I actually tell most people the truth about my depression. I think it’s important and less burdensome when I’m open about it. Most people are really nice about it but some people are little bit rude about it as well. 
No I actually tell most people the truth about my depression. I think it’s important and less burdensome when I’m open about it. Most people are really nice about it but some people are little bit rude about it as well. 
That's awesome!
That's awesome!
Thanks dude :)
wish i had that kind of confidence haha
We all do in a way! It was definitely a slow process but we all can get there eventually. Fight on!
When I was in high school I just said I had a chronic illness and most people left me alone 
That's what I'm currently doing when my classmates ask why I always miss school. 'I was at my doctors' = 'I was at my therapist's' People are a lot more accepting when it's a 'legit' illness :/
I feel the same way about work. I work part time, and I feel guilty about it, but I need some kind of relief during the work week.
This is so true. Currently the same way right now.
I'm a girl
Gasp
Had to go home from work today gonna ask my boss if he can cut my hours on Monday. 
Yeah, see if (s)he can cut some hours
I think it is helpful ( at least for me it is ) to try and depersonalize mental illnesses. It isn't something wrong with any part of who you are, it is just a disease like the flu or cancer except it impacts us emotionally and mentally not physically. It is in no way your fault and having to miss school for it is just as reasonable as having to miss school for a physical illness
Very true! I just wish people didn’t think so badly of depression! Oh well, I try to pretend that I’m slowly breaking the stigma by being open about my depression. 
You can use the words “mental health break” works in the job world too
Yeah thats true! I’ve noticed that gets a good response. 
It makes me feel the same way because I know i’m not the only one struggling but everyone else manages and isn’t a pussy about it like I am. It makes me feel as weak as I know I am.
Depression is unique and everyone deals with it differently. That’s how I like to think :)
Why? Depression is nothing to be ashamed of. It's a mental illness. If others shame or guilt you (Or pull the bullshit bootstraps argument), then shoot em. Also, what is normal anyway?
True! Good point! People who shame and guilt are toxic! 
…aand you really shouldn't. Noone gives shit. Only cancer would makes people care about others. Learned in hard way, really.
Yeah that’s true. I’m doing it more for myself than anyone. But I have met some nice people who also are experiencing or experienced depression and it opened up a very nice discussion. 
Don't miss school. Don't let the depression win. Force yourself to behave 'normal' despite all the shit you're feeling. The more you act normal, the more you start to feel normal.
You can't 'force' the chemical balance causing everything away. If what you were saying was true depression would be curable in a week.
Then why am I going to psychodynamic therapy every week? If doing mental gymnastics and making yourself think differently don't work for depression, then what the hell am I doing?
I sort of undrrstand the intent behind your initial comment however it just come across as you basically saying 'pull yourself together'.   Psychodynamic therapy does work, I dont want ti discourage you or your progress but as simple as it sounds it's too complex to be simplified into 'just force yourself to do it'
Reading this made me realize how many times I have 'casual' suicide thoughts daily. It's kind of mind blowing, actually.  You're not alone. Trust me. There's a lot of us out there that are willing to help, or even just listen.
me too.   Lately I have been mulling over attributing them to my ADHD because the combination of impulsiveness and the inability to self soothe could theoretically cause the THROW MY HANDS IN THE AIR AND CONTEMPLATE DEATH response to negative outcomes.
When I was 18 or so, I was driving with 2 of my friends and I asked if they ever considered driving into oncoming traffic.  They were horrified.  
That's a pretty good conversation starter. I'll have to use it sometime.  
That's a pretty good conversation starter. I'll have to use it sometime.  
Its not just a conversation starter though its a part of my life
Honestly, that's sort of hilarious timing. I don't mean to trivialize your experience by finding the dark humor in it though.
Oddly enough, humour is part of how I deal with being depressed.  I don't get the response I was picturing in my mind's eye when I start joking about suicide at family dinners though. :P
Oddly enough, humour is part of how I deal with being depressed.  I don't get the response I was picturing in my mind's eye when I start joking about suicide at family dinners though. :P
Yeah, you definitely need to use proper timing among people who aren't as... skewed... as us :P
This is also one of the reasons I don't really want to get a driver's license. If I told people, I suppose they'd stop bothering me about getting one...
Well I've been driving for 11 years now, and as much as I've felt like swerving into oncoming traffic, I haven't done so yet.  Don't let that keep you from getting your license - you too deserve a drivers license.  
Well I've been driving for 11 years now, and as much as I've felt like swerving into oncoming traffic, I haven't done so yet.  Don't let that keep you from getting your license - you too deserve a drivers license.  
Oh, it's not the *only* reason, it's one of many reasons. I just don't trust myself behind a wheel, with or without a depression.
Might be dumb but don't most people get these thoughts? I've always assumed they were semi normal. I think the term is 'the call of the void'. I've had them my whole life and I guess I just stopped thinking of them as odd. 
Yeah, me too... just folding socks today, maybe if I'm dead I won't have to fold the rest, where's the basket...   And I'm not trying to be funny, that's a very literal train of thought I've experienced. 
Yeah, me too... just folding socks today, maybe if I'm dead I won't have to fold the rest, where's the basket...   And I'm not trying to be funny, that's a very literal train of thought I've experienced. 
You might not have intended to be funny, but it was funny.  'Man, if I just hung myself right now, I wouldn't have to finish these dishes'
You might not have intended to be funny, but it was funny.  'Man, if I just hung myself right now, I wouldn't have to finish these dishes'
'If I just stop watching everytime I bike over the road I might get hit and doesn't need to go to work.'  Me ten minutes ago, I didn't stop watching. 
Yeah. It happens a lot. Every time I'm in front of a train or something, I get this instinctive thought like: 'what if I were to jump in front of this train right now?'. It's strange, and I never act on it, but it's weird how it invariably pops up in my mind.
I get this every single time I'm at a train stop.  I wont do it like that though because it's just too messy and calls too much attention to my own death AND would seriously inconvenience thousands of people who are most likely doing something important. 
Same here, in the morning all I want is sleep. At night all I want is to stay awake.
battling this as I type this
I am with you on that one. I spent all of yesterday and today sleeping all day. While it only makes tomorrow come sooner to repeat it all over again, I do find some comfort in dreams. It’s a bit of an escape from reality. And even if I don’t necessarily remember the dreams some times, it still beats being awake and conscious. 
Right! Dreams can be nice except for when they're of nightmares of of yourself being happy.. then you wake up and it's not real. However I agree with you.. being awake is difficult.
I relate to this so much. 
It's very unpleasant..
This is common but you have to try breaking the cycle. Sleep earlier, wake up on time. It's step number one on the road to recovery. You can't be sleeping at 5 AM and waking up at 9 AM and be in an optimal mental state. Even the happiest person in the world would go into a very dark place like that. Focus on making the tomorrow better. Try it, if it doesn't work, you can go back to how you were any time you like.
I seem to be the exception to the rule. I will genuinely feel more energised, and better in every way if I go to bed at 1am and sleep till 7am rather than go to bed at 11pm and wake up at 9am.
I hear you. The only reason I haven't blown my head off is bc 1) my Dad would die from grief of my death and 2) the financial burden of my debts/funeral services would be overwhelming. So we're stuck here, trying to eliminate the blow our absence will cause. 
I found a local place that does cremations for under $700 and a service that will dispose my ashes at sea for under $300. Filing bankruptcy first, transferring my savings to a protected third party, prepaying for other services & leaving a will designating my property distribution. Hopefully that'll cover all loose ends.
I found a local place that does cremations for under $700 and a service that will dispose my ashes at sea for under $300. Filing bankruptcy first, transferring my savings to a protected third party, prepaying for other services & leaving a will designating my property distribution. Hopefully that'll cover all loose ends.
Sounds like you've put a lot of thought into it, but I hope you reconsider. I'm not very good at consoling without sounding cheesy, but I hope you can find something that brings you some happiness
You sound like someone who cares a lot about others feelings and that's an incredible quality to have. My words won't change how you feel but what I can't possibly stress enough, is that the world needs more people like you who are so selfless, that you would bare the burden of your grief to spare others x
Beautiful and true.
Maybe leave the headphones, it will allow yourself to be more approachable. 
Wait. Who goes to a coffee shop to meet people though? I've never once been approached by a random person at a coffee shop and I've never seen or heard of it happen either. I've started conversations with people I know,  but that's it. If I'm not meeting someone specific, then I'm going to a coffee shop to work on something, or just chill out and get out of the apartment for a bit, not meet people.
Wait. Who goes to a coffee shop to meet people though? I've never once been approached by a random person at a coffee shop and I've never seen or heard of it happen either. I've started conversations with people I know,  but that's it. If I'm not meeting someone specific, then I'm going to a coffee shop to work on something, or just chill out and get out of the apartment for a bit, not meet people.
Depends on where you live, I guess. 
I never leave the house. Good for you OP. I haven't left for probably 20ish days. 
I feel your pain. If you desire, it might be nice to shower, and go for a walk around the block or something. It'd also be nice if I took my own advice.. oh well.
Good for you. Going to the gym is my escape. 
Same here. Picked it up a few months ago. 
Same here. Picked it up a few months ago. 
I follow several people who use exercise to help manage stress. Super inspiring. 
I follow several people who use exercise to help manage stress. Super inspiring. 
I tried that once, but they filed a restraining order
My dad just posted a Facebook status today saying how if you're feeling depressed to reach out and talk to someone about it. Except when I tried to talk to him about my depression he literally told me depression isn't real... he doesn't believe mental illness is a thing. People just need vitamins, sleep, and exercise. He was seriously upset with me when he found out I was taking antidepressants. I read his stupid Facebook status and cried. 
Jesus that is brutal as shoot! lol That's seriously so gnarly all I can do is just laugh at how absurd it is. And I definitely relate - my dad doesn't have a FB but we had the whole 'depression isn't real' argument. And so many random people will repost bullshit about suicide hotlines and whatever, and I know them well enough to know that they have no sympathy for people who kill themselves. Unless they're like former soldiers or whatever popular cause.
Sooo true. I have exactly two friends who I can ACTUALLY talk to. And both of them are very depressed too, which is prolly the only reason. I have one other friend who is like ok with knowing about the depression, but isn't comfortable with hearing about it. Which is fine honestly, because at least he says 'hey I'm not really comfortable with this' instead of just shooting deleting me from his phone or whatever lol
Coming from someone who's not depressed and never has been, somebody telling me they're depressed can be stressful for us, especially since we don't know what to do, so we just default to that. A lot of us want to help, but don't know how. What should we say/do?
> Ok, let me just pull money out of my ass, and pay hundreds of dollars for someone  Dang the U.S.
Haha ya. Something like 50% of psychiatrists don't even accept insurance in America... And that number is prolly even higher where I live lol
OP I couldn't agree more with everything you say, it's like you have hijacked my mind.  I think that telling people to reach out and talk is good for people who have never done so before. Yet when you have been like this for years and years, I fully understand what you say. 
Yeah, helplessness always ends perfectly.
Well, if that's what you think, then that is what you think. 
That's depression, homie.
It's because this advice comes from people who have never been depressed. Sad, maybe, but not depressed and suicidal. 
I know right! I never feel like I'm getting the correct advice because I'm not talking with someone who has been in my shoes and has experienced what I've experienced.
To whom? I don't know anyone. And from those few almost no one possesses the necessary experience, empathy and sensitivity to talk about this. And the strength to carry the weight.
Yeah there's a reason therapists charge hundreds of dollars to listen to you talk for under an hour lol You also run the risk of ruining the relationships you DO have by talking about that shit.
Those are people who don't give a shit about people who are depressed and are saying it for the sake of it. They think life is all happy, and joyful and they aren't going to fall into depression. But just they wait, then they'll know what its like. A true friend/*stranger?*  wouldn't give you a short answer like 'hang in there' and 'talk to a therapist' like it isn't their problem. They would help you and spend their precious time on you.
> But just they wait, then they'll know what its like.  I wish that were true, but many people never have depression and never will.
That's exactly the kind of stuff she would say. No matter what I'd tell her to the contrary. Iknow she wouldn't want me to give up, that's the only reason I had to wake up this morning. But please, never do anything to hurt your loved one. If he's anything like me, you'd leave him as just half a human. An inconsolable pain so terrible that death sounds like the only solution to make it stop. It's nothing I could've ever imagined.
I wish I could hug you IRL. I know it wouldn't take away the pain, but I wish I could.
I wish I could hug you IRL. I know it wouldn't take away the pain, but I wish I could.
i know it doesnt feel like much right now OP, but you did good today, you saved at least one life. maybe this is the legacy of your girlfriends decision, her loss may save many others in time and if you ever feel up to it, speaking at a meeting may help save more. dont think about it now, but i think your experience could be what a lot of people need to hear
Hey OP, you saved a life today.
A statement to be proud of every time it's uttered. 
I can't even imagine, that's the saddest thing I've read in a while. I've never lost anyone I loved, I haven't really had anyone to lose.   My deepest empathies to you, I'd offer a PM chat but I'm afraid I wouldn't be able to say what you need to hear. 
Thank you. I'd never lost someone close either before this. Wasn't prepared at all, but how could you be prepared
Thank you. I'd never lost someone close either before this. Wasn't prepared at all, but how could you be prepared
You can't prepare for that.
Thanks for your reply,  friend.   My suicidal feelings have. Even since I was a kid and when the last of my family dies,  I'm next.   BUT about the sandwich - What if after crawling to that Subway,  your only choice would be my analogy? That's where I'm at in life. 
Then you crawl to the next.  I won't BS you.  You may never find a subway that serves proverbial sandwiches.  But you don't know that until you've been to every last one.
Your story breaks my heart. I hear myself in her. I wish you all the best man 
Hey.  Are you OK?
Hey.  Are you OK?
Yes. I am. Not sure how but I am. I have a boyfriend who holds me through everything. 
Yes. I am. Not sure how but I am. I have a boyfriend who holds me through everything. 
I'm glad to know that.  
> The world is made for people who aren't cursed with self-awareness  > -Annie, Bull Durham
Wow I have never heard that quote before, but it is so true.
I'd like to see some of her art. 
I will try and get some of her art up in the next day or two. I have a crazy work schedule right now.
Are you angry at your wife?  
I could never be angry at my wife for doing this. She had suicidal thoughts since she was at least 8 years old. She wanted to jump off the deck at her house, but even then, she knew it would not kill her. She struggled for so long and so hard. I completely understand her decision. I have nothing in my heart for her but love. I just wish she could have been magically cured of her pain and suffering, but I know that is not how things work.
I am so sorry for your loss. It's also our loss - a loss of great potential for the world.   You mentioned that she tried all sorts of meds. I'm currently doing self research into how psych meds actually work, and I'm coming across very sad stuff. You wrote that at some point her depression got much, much worse. Did this happen before she tried any psychotropic medication, or after?
Well, her depression went in kind of waves. When she gave up working because she couldn't make it though a day without breaking down and then when she quit school, it all went down hill. She was on medication during that time period though.
Been exactly the same during the past semester. Fortunately, I was able to pass majority of my credit hours despite my terrible procrastination. I don’t know if it would help, but my mantra has been “better to do one simple thing than nothing at all”  It’s worked for me as it allowed me to slowly chip away at tasks that seemed terribly insurmountable and impossible to start on. 
That's what I've been trying. My major task right now is finding a job. I just graduated last month, doing a postdoc with my graduate advisor until I find a job. I hate it so much that it just brings down my whole life and crushes my productivity. So I try to work on little things, fill out easy job apps.
That's what I've been trying. My major task right now is finding a job. I just graduated last month, doing a postdoc with my graduate advisor until I find a job. I hate it so much that it just brings down my whole life and crushes my productivity. So I try to work on little things, fill out easy job apps.
Oh wow. That’s pretty crazy. I’ve been on a job hunt as well. I get how challenging it can get. To be honest, I don’t know how I’ll be able to manage working while being in a low mood, but it’s tons better than just staying at home all day. 
I'm exactly the same. I have my first exam at uni on Tuesday and haven't been able to bring myself to do any revision So many deadlines coming up too...
I'm scared for my exams in a couple of months. Over the past year, my memory and motivation have both completely eroded. I wouldn't be surprised if I failed them.
I'm scared for my exams in a couple of months. Over the past year, my memory and motivation have both completely eroded. I wouldn't be surprised if I failed them.
I don't think I even care if I fail anymore tbh 
I don't think I even care if I fail anymore tbh 
Yeah I just failed my exam last week. Didn't even flinch. Years ago I would've actually cried. Now it's just... meh.
I feel you. I feel like my brain has atrophied because of disuse from procrastinating so much. Can't remember shitall because my day's a blur of going on the internet, sleeping , eating and I have 3 barrier exams coming up in 2 weeks. It sucks man
Too real. There isn't even a point in going to classes anymore. I never remember a single thing that happens and only show up at all to keep my attendance from tanking. Pretty sure I'm completely shooted. 
Exactly the same mate. Uni application is due tmw and ive procrastinated it so much that my grades are wank and i probably will never get into the course i want to. Its really hard to motivate me and just like you i was a really good high schooler, seems common :(
I think part of it is that if you're a good student in high school, you tend to have a lot of high expectations put on you for the rest of your education. When it turns out you actually start to struggle and can't meet those expectations, the pressure to achieve really hurts.  
Such a procrastinator, I had 18 weeks to do this online work...only started 3 days before it was due...asked for an extension...still only started 2 days before it was due again. Got it done! It was madness had to call out to work didn't move from my desk but to sleep with m   But now I have like 5 - 100 wd responses due before midnight, like these things are what's between an a and a b but still.....not getting done.
Re, what that other poster said about solutions that work for some but not others.  I would sit somewhere uncomfortable with the work and give tell myself that once I did just one thing (a sentence a page) I could move. Sometimes I got lucky and did like a whole paragraph or a whole chapter sometimes it was just the one thing I set out. And then I was done to shoot off for 30 min to try again.
I'm like that, it's okay.  You know what they say, that procrastinators are the creative peeps. Maybe this all started because of an incident in the past? I'm not necessarily saying procrastination is a bad thing, but if its really that serious maybe finding a cause might help?
Creative maybe, but that same procrastination stops you from doing anything with it.  I don't really know what started it to be honest. It might be because of the fact that the jump from high school to college, in terms of difficulty, hit me harder than I thought it would, and the fact that asking for help never actually got me anywhere just made me want to give up.
Yep that makes too much sense I feel like depression has become an integral part of my personality I feel like I'll never be a fully functional member of society, I'll always be just barely afloat, till I sink.
Same. I just try to get through the day and I'm always glad when it's over. 
If I knew how not to be depressed I wouldn't be. 
Accurate.
Sometimes. I have good points in my life at times where I'm not depressed, but it usually only lasts a month or 2. And I don't think I'm truely happy. I always know that it's going to come back so it keeps me from being happy because I don't want to be so happy that when I get depressed again I have a huge fall down. 
I think being happy would feel so unfamiliar to me that it would make me sad. 
I think being happy would feel so unfamiliar to me that it would make me sad. 
It just makes me anxious. Like it's wrong or it's a joke. 
Sometimes when I feel genuinely 'happy' I get automatically depressed again because happiness makes me feel empty for some reason. It's like my 'happiness' is it's own depressive state if that relates and makes sense.
For me those moments of true happiness upset me, because I miss it so much, but I know that soon the depression will take a hold again, which just frustrates the hell out of me, causing me to fall a little further.
I expressed this fear when I started taking antidepressants to a friend of mine. They've never known me when I wasn't depressed, and I can't really remember a time I was at least mildly depressed.   I don't even know what it means to not be depressed. I'd imagine I wouldn't lay in bed for two hours every night trying to think my away around the fact I just don't have the motivation to wake up anymore. 
How did you feel after taking the antidepressants? Did they do anything for you? 
I worry that i've been depressed for so long that I can't tell the difference between not being depressed and being distracted enough to feel not depressed 
I often characterize my depression as being unable to be distracted enough to stay happy. Other people lose themselves in their career or a hobby or their family. I can't keep it together long enough to get enough momentum in those areas to keep me interested in them.
For the past week I was in a decent mood and I just wanted to be depressed again. 
this is how it is for me, up and down 
I don't even worry about it. I have accepted the fact that I will be forever depressed and unhappy that I was born.
How do you go about keeping going? I am in a very similar boat, and have kind of hit that dead end in life, and suicidal thoughts definitely creep in more regularly, and its become a slight concern. 
I relate to that except in 'doing nothing'. I try to take my mind off it by taking up hobbies. I restore old tobacco pipes, play piano and guitar, review movies, and do other random hobbies to keep myself occupied. Admittedly I don't always, some days I'll just lie in bed and drift in and out of sleep while watching Netflix. But it helps in a small way which is nice.
I think OP should consider your reply, peoples mind stays in... like in a loop of the things you do/think/feel. I dont remember how its called exactly but there are tons of info related to what Im trying to say, people needs to do activities/hobbies and other stuff to get your mind out of that state. 
Welp, I thought this stranger cared. I fell for it too lol 
Unfortunately, the more we find out about them, the sketchier they appear.  Sorry you got tangled up in it.
Unfortunately, the more we find out about them, the sketchier they appear.  Sorry you got tangled up in it.
He contacted me after I posted on /r/anxiety. Just reported, thanks. 
He contacted me after I posted on /r/anxiety. Just reported, thanks. 
Hey, if this happens to you through /r/Anxiety in the future could you contact the mods over there? I'm part of the modteam and like here, we absolutely deplore any targeting like this.
What shooting piece of trash-shit lingers around a depression forum to shill a blog.  Oh well. People I know IRL take advantage of poor, mentally ill, and low self-esteem people as a hobby. Scum. Just scum everywhere.  
Some doctors already do, and it's depressing. 
Oh my god, i thought someone had actually reached out to me because they cared...i feel so betrayed...
So sorry you had that experience.  It's a harsh lesson that it's almost never a good idea to trust someone who contacts you privately to 'help'.  Someone who's on the level has no reason to avoid letting the community see their responses.
can I still report him even though I replied to him nicely?
Absolutely.
He tried twice to get into my I-Ms under two different usernames. Both had no karma and was alive for less than a day
Can you please send us the usernames as the alts seem to be proliferating?   Address the PM to /r/depression.   Thanks!  
Please do not post their username - we cannot allow witch hunts or doxxing, even when it involves someone who is violating subreddit rules. 
Oh okay sorry :(
i’ve gotten two of these PMs already ouch. should i report or send the mods a message or??
> should i report or send the mods a message or??  Both please and thank you. 
Like 3 days ago I believe
Thanks.  If you still have the PM and can check if the account is suspended, that would be great.  If it's not suspended or you can't check, but you can send the username to our modmail, that would be great also.    
I just got one. I already kind of do minimalism though so it isnt that bad haha
Could you please send the username it came from to our modmail?    Address a PM to /r/SuicideWatch if you're using an app that doesn't offer you a 'message the moderators' option. 
Literally just happened to me, I blocked and reported him. 
This person has no morals and I thought I had problems.
Same though. And I feel I can relate so deeply to depressed people and be truly empathetic but only to this extent when I'm actually depressed. It's really annoying, just when I thought there was one advantage. I turn into even more of a hermit than I am when I'm okay so it makes it hard to actually demonstrate it anyway.
I understand what you mean. This happened to me too. During the time I was feeling happy, I knew people who were depressed and even though I had gone through my own depression, I felt like I just didn't understand or know what to do. Not that I would now, but it was harder to sympathize then. Makes me feel like an a-hole now that i'm back in the depression game. How did I ever forget this..  
When I was beginning to come out of my first bout of depression (which lasted a few years), my psychologist suggested that I write a letter to myself. I found doing this--while in limbo between depression and happiness--really helpful, because for a brief amount of time I had insight into both, and could give advice to any future me's, both happy and depressed. For me, it definitely helps to go back and read it. 
This is such a great idea. I'm at about limbo stage right now. I should try to work up the motivation to write myself a letter.
I have yet to experience this bc I feel as if I've been depressed for 10 years straight. I forget what it's like not being emotionally dead all the time.
I'm sorry to hear that. I'll admit that I am grateful I experienced that happiness even if I don't recall how it feels at the moment. I suppose this time around at least I have some hope that it can get better.      I know everyone has different experiences/reasons for their depressions but I hope you feel better soon.
Its almost like depressive conciousness runs on a different brain circuit than normal conciousness.
You are the closest comment to what I was thinking. There's another guy who said 'its like its happening to two different people'.  I have a feeling that what OP and then you pointed out has something deeply relevant to how we experience consciousness. I can't articulate what I mean but something tells me I don't have to.
This post really resonated with me man. I seriously thought I was the only one who felt noticed that 
It's apparently more common than we think. It makes it hard to blame anyone who is not depressed for not understanding. 
Yup that's pretty much me 100% of the time. When I'm with people I want to be alone, when I'm alone I want to be with people.  It's like the grass is always greener on the other side, except that both sides are really just dirt.
and gravel D:
And when I do socialize i just feel awkward and feel so uncomfortable i want to run away and play on the xbox or something to take my mind off things
Cannot upvote this enough.
Oh my gosh, that's my life story. I want to hang out with people and be friendly, but I always feel like they're annoyed by me, or only talking to me because they feel sorry for me.
ugh, this is exactly how i feel. even if i just want to ask someone a simple question i feel like i'm probably annoying/bothering them.
ugh, this is exactly how i feel. even if i just want to ask someone a simple question i feel like i'm probably annoying/bothering them.
exactly! and the worst thing is I work in retail :( so every time I ask someone if they need help all I can think about is how much they're going to make fun of my voice/appearance as soon as they leave the store. shit sucks
exactly! and the worst thing is I work in retail :( so every time I ask someone if they need help all I can think about is how much they're going to make fun of my voice/appearance as soon as they leave the store. shit sucks
>I want to hang out with people and be friendly, but I always feel like they're annoyed by me, or only talking to me because they feel sorry for me.  Yup that's me.  >even if i just want to ask someone a simple question i feel like i'm probably annoying/bothering them.  Gah, that's me too. It frustrates the hell out of me. I mean really, it's such a simple thing but I just can't do it.  
Perfect. Anyone who doesn't have depression should read this. 
Even people with depression need to read this.  I'm genuinely sitting here fighting back tears because it's nice to know that at least one other person in the world knows how you feel.
Even people with depression need to read this.  I'm genuinely sitting here fighting back tears because it's nice to know that at least one other person in the world knows how you feel.
Seriously. It's really inspiring... It almost makes me want to do something similar. I won't, but it makes me want to. 
I've (unsuccessfully) been on antidepressants for two years now.  Congratulations, calling  H E L P for the helpers in the help van to take me to the helpatorium actually made laugh. Congratulations, you're more powerful than pharmaceuticals.
It was a good one.  By the way, I really like your username. And I'm here if you need to talk. The drugs didn't do shit for me either, so I know that feel.
It's always the weirdest things that make me laugh, or smile, when I'm in the dark place. Like someone falling over or something really silly.  Antidepressants always made me feel worse, tbh. 
Wit is a serviceable replacement for tricyclics, as Oscar Wilde said. I think.
I was going to make a post about this a while ago but decided against it, because guess what? I was afraid of being downvoted. Thank you for having the courage to do it.
Thank you.   I think may take a break from /r/depression for a while. Don't feel like I belong here anymore. But I feel sad because I want to continue to help people. I dunno.
Thank you.   I think may take a break from /r/depression for a while. Don't feel like I belong here anymore. But I feel sad because I want to continue to help people. I dunno.
You always are welcomed here, a lot of people can use your help, and a lot really need it. :)
You always are welcomed here, a lot of people can use your help, and a lot really need it. :)
Thank you. I have avoidant personality disorder so I'm hypersensitive to rejection. Feeling rejected in what I thought was my 'safe place' is really sad to me. So I may take a couple of days off (after this thread dies down), and come back when I feel better. =)
One of the worst feelings I've ever felt was receiving downvotes and zero comments on this subreddit.  When you're feeling shit, the last thing you want to hear is nothing. You feel like if you can't be accepted here, you can't be accepted anywhere.   Thank you for making this post. Maybe next time I'm thinking of hitting submit and deleting everything I wrote, I might actually click that button.
I posted three things in a row a week or so ago and never got a single comment on any of them (They're no longer there. I deleted them after a few days of no response). It was really upsetting. I was feeling really, really bad and bawling while I typed them, and then having no one acknowledge them hurt.
I posted three things in a row a week or so ago and never got a single comment on any of them (They're no longer there. I deleted them after a few days of no response). It was really upsetting. I was feeling really, really bad and bawling while I typed them, and then having no one acknowledge them hurt.
If it's any consolation, huge subreddits like askreddit, showerthoughts, and ELI5 have a huge influx of posters so it's not that unusual. 
One of the worst feelings I've ever felt was receiving downvotes and zero comments on this subreddit.  When you're feeling shit, the last thing you want to hear is nothing. You feel like if you can't be accepted here, you can't be accepted anywhere.   Thank you for making this post. Maybe next time I'm thinking of hitting submit and deleting everything I wrote, I might actually click that button.
If you go to r/depression homepage, in the title bar at the top of your browser it says, 'nobody should be alone in a dark place.' Often I think that is complete crap. 
One of the worst feelings I've ever felt was receiving downvotes and zero comments on this subreddit.  When you're feeling shit, the last thing you want to hear is nothing. You feel like if you can't be accepted here, you can't be accepted anywhere.   Thank you for making this post. Maybe next time I'm thinking of hitting submit and deleting everything I wrote, I might actually click that button.
Thank you. =) It makes me sad when I see some threads and comments get downvoted that actually aren't bad at all. I kind of wish the downvote button was taken away here  (kind of like how /r/casualconversation has it, though you can downvote by going to through a post history).    Like me, I have avoidant personality disorder, so feeling rejected really gets to me. Even if it's strangers on the internet.
Thank you. =) It makes me sad when I see some threads and comments get downvoted that actually aren't bad at all. I kind of wish the downvote button was taken away here  (kind of like how /r/casualconversation has it, though you can downvote by going to through a post history).    Like me, I have avoidant personality disorder, so feeling rejected really gets to me. Even if it's strangers on the internet.
Casual conversation is an amazing subreddit 
I feel you.   Once I asked a simple question and got 11 down votes... didn't even express an opinion, just asked a question.   *sighs and hides forever*
No don't hide. =]
Yeah not always. Also weird that sometimes you see posts pretty much the same and one will get positive replies and the other doesn't.
That's what kind of sucks too. Someone said what I was trying to say in a different way, and they got upvoted. I don't know.  I kind of feel let down.  Because as someone with depression, when it feels like other depressed people don't accept me, it hurts more so than in other subreddits.
That's what kind of sucks too. Someone said what I was trying to say in a different way, and they got upvoted. I don't know.  I kind of feel let down.  Because as someone with depression, when it feels like other depressed people don't accept me, it hurts more so than in other subreddits.
Yup. At least in others subs you can tell yourself they're idiots/trolls/don't understand.   
Heh, you weren't accepting of OP in that thread. We accept you and whatever is troubling you in whatever form you want to express it. This one here included. But I really don't think anyone needs to accept your lack of acceptance, if you see what I mean.   So yes, downvotes can be upsetting and you shouldn't be upset by anything here, apart from when you judge other posters. 
It was the way that it was expressed you know? It could have upset other people. Someone sees that, and they get upset or feel bad. It was how it was worded. Saying, 'I don't like this.' Is different than, 'Dang this.' That was my thinking. =( Guess it doesn't matter though.
Have an up vote friend
To you as well. :)
Drunken depressed upboat here 😃
Row row row ur boat gently up the stream 😬
Yep, I'm the same  That's why I upvote pretty much all posts in here
That's nice of you. =)
I feel you :(
-hugs-  Feel like no matter what I do, I say something stupid.
If it means anything, I upvoted the shit out of you :)  I feel the same way. It's odd, really; you'd figure after countless rejections in real life I'd have grown a thick skin. I guess it's because you're laying out your cards among others in presumably similar situations - and even they communicate through votes  that they find you an ignorable nuisance.  Don't go! We can all be alone here, together, as strangers with a commonality that no one really seems to understand.  
I'm going to take a break, but I'll probably be back. I still do want to help other people. =)
This comment has been overwritten by an open source script to protect this user&apos;s privacy.      If you would like to do the same, add the browser extension [GreaseMonkey](https://addons.mozilla.org/en-us/firefox/addon/greasemonkey/) to Firefox and add [this open source script](https://greasyfork.org/en/scripts/10380-reddit-overwrite).      Then simply click on your username on Reddit, go to the comments tab, and hit the new OVERWRITE button at the top.
Yeah. I'm trying to ignore how many downvotes I have, and that this thread is controversial. It's getting to me a little, but it's nice to know I'm not the only one who feels this way.
Idk man, I'm tired too. I wanna say positive stuff to you, but I'm out of that. So, I'm just gonna go with let's just go to sleep. It's the closest thing we have to not existing without actually physically dying, at least for a couple of hours. 
Honestly, sleep is the only relief I get on some days.
Honestly, sleep is the only relief I get on some days.
Sometimes the thought of waking up prevents me from sleeping
Sometimes the thought of waking up prevents me from sleeping
Dang that. Just accept that 1/3 of your life is spent sleeping (cousin of death) and it’s better than the other shitty 2/3 
I was just about to post I handle it with sleep and then I saw your comment :)
Haha yeah. I'm going to try the human version of 'have you tried switching it off and then switching it back on again?'
Hot bath does it for me as well.
Hell yeah. Showers for me
walking is shooting awesome just go to a store buy some random shit and find adventure
Shopping is a Great Depression reliever 
Shopping is a Great Depression reliever 
Until you check your bank/credit card balance
I feel the same exact way.  I just want to be 'ok' again. not even happy or well, just ok would be enough. I cant even get there.  pm me if you need to talk im a good listener. 
Exactly. I just want to be able to function without having a minor breakdown every few hours. And the same goes to you. If you ever need to talk, I'll listen.
I understand how you feel, you just want to tell your body to stop or flip an off switch though by the sounds of it you're trying. You tried to talk to someone and well for lack of a better word they were a prick, find someone that's not, who will listen to you and try to help. It could help you start feeling better and put you on a Happier track. I hope you stop feeling this way and life becomes fun and Happy 
Thank you so much. I think my family is finally starting to accept that I'm not okay, but it's still hard to talk to them, cuz I don't know what they'll take well and what they won't.
Been there man. Work on your future. That’s what helped me. It’s not as easy as saying it, but if you put in effort you can have a bright future, which isn’t depressing. If you don’t like you job, start applying for different ones. If you don’t have a job, start applying for some to make money and buy things to make you happy. Money can definitely help with happiness if it can’t buy it. I’m here if you wanna talk
Buying things to make you happy is terrible advice. Happiness comes from relationships and experiences. Plenty of people with shopping addictions are miserable because they're trying to fill a void with material items instead of focusing on things that truly matter.
Buying things to make you happy is terrible advice. Happiness comes from relationships and experiences. Plenty of people with shopping addictions are miserable because they're trying to fill a void with material items instead of focusing on things that truly matter.
Maybe, but it's more comfortable to cry in silk pajamas than in a worn out tank top.  (That was my lame attempt at humor *ba dum tsss*)
I didn’t mean it the way I said it. I know that’s a real problem with people. I was meaning he can buy smaller things like an Xbox to help him with boredom or to occupy his time. Work towards bigger goals like saving for a car or better car if need be. You have to spend money to live, might as well spend it to help keep you sane.
Yeah I've found that when I'm keeping busy, it's a lot easier, whether its working, reading, gaming, whatever. Also, having nicer things does increase the happiness factor a little bit. Maybe it's the way we've been programmed, to always try to do your best, be the best and have the best. Whatever it is, it does work, at least a little bit. Or maybe that's just my greedy self (again, trying to be funny *ba dum tss*)
I'm working my butt off in uni in hopes of a better future, but Idk man. It isn't going so well.
That’s really good. I didn’t try in uni and that was one of my problems. What problems are you having? Learning the material? Staying focused? Getting your “homework” done?
That’s really good. I didn’t try in uni and that was one of my problems. What problems are you having? Learning the material? Staying focused? Getting your “homework” done?
I thought that this was something I might enjoy doing, but now that we've gotten to the core subjects of the course, I've found out that this really isn't for me. Now it's just a struggle to do well enough to get a job and a degree at the end of this.  I normally really enjoy learning. But somehow with what we're doing at Uni, I'm not able to, and in our system of education, changing courses is not an option for me.
I wish I had the courage to kill myself. I shouldn’t want to die, but nonetheless I do want to die. 
I'm glad you don't have the courage to kill yourself. I hope things get better for you, and I'm always here if you feel like you need to talk. Please don't hesitate to reach out
I feel you man, honestly I do. Don't dismiss these tips just because of my user name. I recommend music that's uplifting or just music in general. I feel the same as you my friend and music helps me escape reality every second i listen to it. Also, day dreaming. Dreaming of your hopes and dreams or just random senecio can help you escape reality for a few minutes. Don't say you don't have any hopes or dreams, we all do, we just need to find it.
1) Love the username  2)Music is incredible. It's like a soothing balm on frayed nerves. Day dreaming hasn't really worked for me. I keep thinking of what ifs and what could've beens and that just makes it worse.  3) Thank you for your words and advice. And username. Actually made me laugh :)
Have you tried maybe finding  hobbies that you'd enjoy? Hobbies like yoga or running/gym could be helpful. looking forward to the little things in life helps a lot.
Everything that I used to enjoy doing now exhausts me. I have started exercising recently, so fingers crossed on that one
Oh my god seriously? 
Not at all
Really feel sorry for you.   First thing is to take some personal time off if you can afford it, just to clear your head. 
Taking personal time is a lot easier than you'd think haha. Today I played guitar with a few friends and I visited my buddy's grave. Really puts things into perspective, I think. I believe I'm starting to realize what's important.
i just wanna say you're an incredibly brave person for going through all of that. please hang in there
Thank you I appreciate that you would say that. It's nice feeling that this thread is a thread of love.
hey man, if u ever feel the need to talk/vent, I'm here, yeah? 
I love that 'yeah' - sounds affirming + with personality, all in one sentence. You go, poo creature, or whatever your handle is :)
Hang in there bro, I sincerely hope things will get better for you. I think I can speak on behalf of everyone in this subreddit when I say that. Keep your head up.
It's just nice having an entire subreddit filled with people who feel the same way. At least in mentality I don't feel alone in this world.
It's just nice having an entire subreddit filled with people who feel the same way. At least in mentality I don't feel alone in this world.
You definitely aren't alone, friend.
Thank you. It's good to find a corner of the Internet where I can discuss my problems free (for the most part) of judgment or ridicule. Usually this type of conversation I would reserve for a therapy session, but it's nice knowing there's absolution outside of therapy.
As someone who used to believe in the thought that 'mental illness, depression, anxiety, stress is just a weak person,' and then experienced a dark 2016 with some rough parts continuing. Its amazing how much support the internet can provide. The simple things such as messages, comment replies, and simply being able to express yourself on a nonjudgmental website is great. Yes, there are trolls and some folks who feel the internet is their place to be an 'internet tough guy.'
Ow that hurts. I do empathize with your pain there. The only thing I can say is check out r/wholesomememes and visit r/aww when possible.   Other than that, hang in there, friendo.
I'm well versed in these subreddits. If anything I probably spend too much time on the internet to begin with.
I'm well versed in these subreddits. If anything I probably spend too much time on the internet to begin with.
Don't we all?
 What makes you happiest in life?
Back in college it was writing, but since then (and since I started taking lexapro,) I get these bad headaches when I try to write something and besides I haven't had the inspiration to overcome the block.  Lately it's just been weed and bourbon, which I realize are not exactly positive things, but they've helped me numb the pain, which is something I feel imperative over moving on, at least for the time being.
Back in college it was writing, but since then (and since I started taking lexapro,) I get these bad headaches when I try to write something and besides I haven't had the inspiration to overcome the block.  Lately it's just been weed and bourbon, which I realize are not exactly positive things, but they've helped me numb the pain, which is something I feel imperative over moving on, at least for the time being.
Do you like dogs?  Do you have room or ability in your life for a dog?
Do you like dogs?  Do you have room or ability in your life for a dog?
I've actually always wanted a dog. I think I would be a lot happier with one.  But I still live at home and my mother is deathly allergic to almost all animals. When I move out I might look into getting a pet, but I may not be able to afford it. It seems that pet care can add up to $1500 a year or more.
Sorry to hear about that, amigo. Just know that your friends death is not your fault. You're going to be ok. You'll find another job. Your parents will be happier now that they can start rebuilding their own lives together. And you'll find another girlfriend. One who will benefit from the strength you'll gain as you rebuild your life. Try you look at this an opportunity so rebuild however you see fit. Good luck! 
I suppose there's some truth in this. Just like in Shawshank Redemption, you need to sift through a river of shit to get to paradise on the beach.
Whoa.  That sucks.  All of it.  Hugs.  The wheel of fortune has to start turning upward for you soon, my friend.  It can't stay this bad forever.    My gf of 12 years just dumped me, I moved back home with my parents in a town I hate, and I'm now terrified my aging mom has the early signs of dementia.  So I'm not doing so hot either =\  
That's really tough man. For what it's worth, I really hope things get better for you too, and I know they will even if they're not at the moment.
I sat here feeling sorry for myself (as usual), then I read your post. I have a shitty taste in my mouth. I can't fathom what you go through _at all_.  Hang in there buddy.
It's a lot but I think it's very educational. Actually, after the suicide I realized it might've happened for a reason. I said to someone that it felt like I saw something I wasn't supposed to see, like I was peaking behind the curtains of life. It's crazy how fragile and how fleeting human life is. And not a lot of it makes sense after all. But it's all educational.
I've never had a girlfriend, my best friend is alive, my parents aren't getting a divorce, and I left my job myself. Why the shoot am I depressed?
Just your brain not getting the right chemicals bro. Have you tried any medication?
And I just want to vanish from existence...
I think it's important to emphasize the importance of an individual. If you ever attend any funerals you'd be surprised at the amount of people who come out of the woodwork. It's crazy what an impact one person can make, without even realizing they'd made an impact at all.
I just want to feel loved, like I'm actually wanted in someone's life,
I wish I could upvote you a million times. I recently had a discussion with my friend who couldn't understand that's all I want. 
I wish I could upvote you a million times. I recently had a discussion with my friend who couldn't understand that's all I want. 
Same here, some people can't grasp the idea of loving someone unconditionally, 
No kidding. There are people I think of everyday, and even one on my mind constantly. I'd be shocked if I was anything more than a passing thought (if that) to them, though.
It burns even more when you know all it takes is a finger movement on a smartphone to say 'hey, what's up?' but shoot it. No one's ever done that shit for me. Dang people sometimes. 
I wish I'd been approached just once in my life. I asked so many and only met rejections.   And the sad thing is that after months of retreating there is no one who would care, no one who would check up on me.
ugh i feel this. a vicious cycle of hiding away because you need someone to care only to have everyone leave you alone because you're always hiding away. 
Get a cat, serious.
So one more thing can be an idiot towards you? Get a dog...
So one more thing can be an idiot towards you? Get a dog...
> ne more thing can be an idiot towards you? Get a d  You're probably joking but I just want to point out cats can be extremely loving animals too
At this moment, right now.. You're my favorite person.
But only for a second. Now it's Lady Gaga.
Sometimes I wish I would develop some terminal illness.   Then I could just *go* and not have to put my family through knowing I wanted to die.
I know what you mean, I've also thought about this a lot.
...or to never have existed in the first place.
Or that, yeah ...
Going to sleep hoping to never wake up again? I used to call it 'craving the void' (maybe a little strange)
Not strange at all friend. 
I can't relate to suicide.  I'm really attached to existing.  Maybe it's because my life isn't really that hard in ways.  What I've felt is that I don't want to do anything.  I want the bare minimum of life.  I don't see any point in bettering my life.  At the same time I wish my life was better, but I don't want to do what it takes to make it better.  I'd rather lay in bed.
I have the same thing going on - simultaneously wanting to die and wanting to lead a better life. I feel like my mind can be very contradictory at times.
I have the same thing going on - simultaneously wanting to die and wanting to lead a better life. I feel like my mind can be very contradictory at times.
This is EXACTLY how I'm feeling. I've just had a hard time putting it into words. I spend half my time dreaming of being better and doing better, and the other half wishing for an accident or illness, since I just can't commit suicide. The swings between the 2 are exhausting. 
Why not go to Peru and do some ayahuasca?  Go sky diving?  Sell everything and move to thailand?  If you are truly at such rock bottom that you wish to die.. how about leave everything.  Your loved ones would rather love a gone you who is happy, than a suicidal one who is still here.  And perhaps you can return from your journey happier than ever and actually be able to love them with real love back
what if you're too poor to do any of that
Yeah.  I know that I don't mean anything to anyone. I've given up on making friends because I know they'll just get bored of me. I'm not setting myself up for that pain ever again.
I agree.  I gave up on making friends a long time ago, I know it wont last anyways so what's the point.
I agree.  I gave up on making friends a long time ago, I know it wont last anyways so what's the point.
I disagree. When I was depressed, friendship was the only thing keeping me going. You may not have friends now, but if you put the effort into making relationships, they'll come to you. I know.
I disagree. When I was depressed, friendship was the only thing keeping me going. You may not have friends now, but if you put the effort into making relationships, they'll come to you. I know.
Friends have treated me like that my entire life. I was always the one putting effort in, always the one making plans (to which they'd cancel) etc. What's the point? Nobody puts effort in for me, so why should I put effort in for them?  Honestly, I'd love to have friends and socialise like a normal person but I know it just won't happen for me.
Maybe not exactly the same, but I feel like other people need me only when I can help them in something. When it's the other way round, or when it's just some friendly meeting or small talk I don't really exist for them.
Oh gosh, I feel like this a lot. I feel like every time my family or friends open their mouths in my direction, it's because they need something from me. But when I've hit rock bottom, they're nowhere to be found. I feel like I don't need them like they need me, and it feels very one-sided and isolating.
For me it's more like I just wish I'd come across someone's mind in a positive fashion. It feels like I only ever cross someone's mind when they worry about me or when they're talking shit about me
People only think about me if its about who I had sex with or who I’m smoking weed with. They don’t actually see me and it gets lonely :/
People only think about me if its about who I had sex with or who I’m smoking weed with. They don’t actually see me and it gets lonely :/
You've had sex... lucky dumbo.
You've had sex... lucky dumbo.
You're not missing out on anything. I recently had sex for the first time, I did it as a way to try to escape my depression. I only now feel more hollow afterwards 
Yep, exactly the same. I feel invisible to most people even when I'm around them.  And when I don't, I wish I was...
I swear I haven’t had another person strike up a meaningful conversation with me in months or years.
Whenever I’m asked if I wanna hang out it always ends with me helping them with something, it’s either homework or some other remedial task and it hurts. No one wants to just hang out, they just want something out of me and it sucks but something I’m trying is trying to not care and cut ties with everyone and whoever wants to be around I see how long it’ll last and how it’ll make me feel after I’m done .
Yes it's like they're selling their time for you having to do something for them. People I know ask me to draw and paint, fix their computers for them things all the time and I get nothing from that just a little thanks and they disappear.
Me too, life is a journey that I'm certainly not enjoying. 
Me too. Judging by the up votes, we need another me too campaign. Maybe #samehere.
Me too. Judging by the up votes, we need another me too campaign. Maybe #samehere.
\#metoothanks
#samehere
\\#
I think the reason I'm tired all the time is because I expend so much energy being anxious for no good reason.
True.   I very rarely take benzodiazepines, but when I do, I have SO much more mental stamina because no fast, looping thoughts 
True.   I very rarely take benzodiazepines, but when I do, I have SO much more mental stamina because no fast, looping thoughts 
The last time I used benzos, I just remember them making me tired. Not that that's a bad thing, I'd rather be tired and relaxed than wide awake and on the brink of screaming my head off.
Taking supplement of vitamin D helps? I have night shift and I always sleep 5am to 2pm 
Take a vitamin D test, if its below the limit than symptoms such as depression, hair loss and fatigue exist. Dont just take vitamin D go to your doctor and take a test first please. Thank you. Believe me A good night's sleep helps a shit ton  I used to sleep From 7am to 3pm for an year and It destroyed me mentally and physically. 
Take a vitamin D test, if its below the limit than symptoms such as depression, hair loss and fatigue exist. Dont just take vitamin D go to your doctor and take a test first please. Thank you. Believe me A good night's sleep helps a shit ton  I used to sleep From 7am to 3pm for an year and It destroyed me mentally and physically. 
I can also confirm. Freshmen year of college I was sleeping at 2,3,4, and had to be up by 7:30. Took a bunch of naps that ruined my mood too. Sleeping at a set time has helped tremendously. I still want to die, but I no longer want to kill all the stupid birds that have nothing better to do than chirp right outside my window. 
It's always good advise to start with a good medical checkup. Bloodwork can show many issues with decreased energy levels.  Are you getting quality sleep? 8 hours in a bed can give you 2 hours sleep.  Quality is the key. Do you snore? are you over weight? Sleep apnea?? Many things to check on. 
I had some bloodwork done and all they found was a severe vitamin D deficiency. I've been taking vitamin D pills for about a month.
I am shooting zoombie 
>I am shooting zoombie   heh, 'zoombie'. That sucks tho, sorry.
>I am shooting zoombie   heh, 'zoombie'. That sucks tho, sorry.
Maybe it's the opposite of /r/zoomies
Maybe it's the opposite of /r/zoomies
or maybe zoombies are fast zombies? Much scarier.
do you get tired because you hate life or you hate life because you are tired? there might be an underlying medical problem, wanna talk about it?
Both I guess
You have to give yourself purpose in life, even if you don't want to or it's something small. Having hobbies or collecting things is a good tool to combat your feelings because it gives you something to look forward to, improve upon, and learn from.
Nothing is enjoyable anymore.
I've personally reached a new level of apathy.  I wake up tired, I feel tired for about 30 minutes, then the rest of my day is just my body masking the tiredness with... emptiness? I just don't feel... anything. I suppose it's better than feeling especially sad or tired, though...
The apathy is the worst part of it.
For me it's my phone but yes I do this quite often. 
4am staring at phone checking in. Work in a few hours...
4am staring at phone checking in. Work in a few hours...
Get some sleep man!
All the time. It sucks. Sometimes I want to try to doodle, take out a pen and a paper, and just write 'shooting kill me oh god just kill me' something along those lines, again and again until there's no space on the paper. And I'd decorate those writings with coloured pens, laughing at the irony.
I do this all the time. Usually something along the lines of 'I hate myself' until it just completely fills the page. Then I'll start writing it from different angles until the result is a huge, illegible mess. On especially bad days, I'll use my own blood as ink. 
I usually stare off into space in complete silence.  It's like I'm paralyzed, I can't seem to move my body.
That's how I feel with just about everything. Since my emotions have become numb, its like my body is too. I don't have the motivation to even get up sometimes.
Yes, it has gotten to the point at work where I feel like screaming or crying. And then I go for walk or I go cry in my car.
This is eerily relatable. 
Why does life need to have a point?
Because people act like we must continue living just because our parents decided to bring life into the world.  Many act as if there is a special narrative, that everyone has a purpose, and things will improve, etc.  Unfortunately we are insignificant specs in the universe, and some people have much harder lives than others.  If the world had a defined purpose, perhaps it would give more hope and make all the struggles seem more tolerable.  That's one reason I think religion is so popular.
Because people act like we must continue living just because our parents decided to bring life into the world.  Many act as if there is a special narrative, that everyone has a purpose, and things will improve, etc.  Unfortunately we are insignificant specs in the universe, and some people have much harder lives than others.  If the world had a defined purpose, perhaps it would give more hope and make all the struggles seem more tolerable.  That's one reason I think religion is so popular.
Humans are just too smart for their own good. The purpose of all life on earth is it live, reproduce with a successful mate, and then die. The planet is a cycle of life and death. But humans avoid our natural purposes. Since we have become sentient, life is now meaningless. 
I don't agree that we are insignificant specs.  I can't think of anything more significant than a human life.  The notion of significance is derived from our experiences.  Only humans recognize significance.  If we're not significant then nothing is.  Life is like a flipping coin that will never land, but we continue to futilely try and get it to come up heads. 
What if I want it to be tails 
Turn them off, they aren't helping 
As much as I always want to, the idle thoughts are far worse when I'm not blankly wasting time tabbing around Reddit or whatever else, in the really bad moments anyways. 
I lol'd. But pls don't turn into a pyro burning random shit.
I turned into that. Idk why but I just like burning stuff. I have a collection of styrofoam that I make into napalm. I like to do fun redneck shit with it and it is so fun having that rush of adrenaline  Edit: pictures of my favorite explosion so far. Y'all probably don't give a shoot but I think somebody might care https://imgur.com/a/D3cFs
I turned into that. Idk why but I just like burning stuff. I have a collection of styrofoam that I make into napalm. I like to do fun redneck shit with it and it is so fun having that rush of adrenaline  Edit: pictures of my favorite explosion so far. Y'all probably don't give a shoot but I think somebody might care https://imgur.com/a/D3cFs
thats pretty cool. 
I lol'd. But pls don't turn into a pyro burning random shit.
No, no, fire is good. It was the stable of human development for millennia!   There's no such thing as too much of a good thing, right?
No, no, fire is good. It was the stable of human development for millennia!   There's no such thing as too much of a good thing, right?
*staple 
I lol'd. But pls don't turn into a pyro burning random shit.
To be honest it's a third burnt cooking equipment element this year. I like to take naps when the food is being cooked. Never had it burning like a bonfire though.
To be honest it's a third burnt cooking equipment element this year. I like to take naps when the food is being cooked. Never had it burning like a bonfire though.
>I like to take naps when the food is being cooked.      Mate..
>I like to take naps when the food is being cooked.      Mate..
Seriously. You can't take a nap when you're cooking. This shouldn't have to be said. Grow up.
There's a lesson here. There's a lesson for all of us. I'm just not sure what it is. Surely it's not, 'tempt fate for the fun of it.' But there's something here.
That is beautiful! 
maybe you should burn your house down
thanks for an idea. didn't have any plans for this weekend.
I have so much anxiety that even my sleep isn't restful. I used to sleep to escape life and now sleep is an absolute nightmare.
Yep that's me Most people with depression sleep more I now try and avoid sleep because I can't remember the last time I had a 'normal' dream... Even the ones that start 'normal' eventually turn into a nightmare.  Luckily in most of my nightmares if I kill myself it resets or most of the time goes to to a different nightmare so I got that going for me I guess.
Same. Lately the anxiety and restlessness has been joined by night sweats and I'm almost always on the verge of dehydration. I've actually been in the hospital 3 times in the past 8 months due to dehydration. My doctor just says to keep track of my food and water intake and it'll subside with time.  Time is always the 'cure' though, isn't it?
What's the deal with night sweats? I went through 6 shirts last night. Is there a connection with depression and anxiety? 
Do some blood tests — if you're a male, check your testosterone, estrogen (E2) and thyroid hormones levels. If you can, also check cholesterol, glucose and insulin levels. You can have some hormonal issues — which may or may not be the cause of your depression and tiredness.    Please, really do this. Most people don't care for it but it's the cause of such many things.  
Does it matter how old you are? I asked and they said I'm too young to worry about that. I'm 20
Yes. Turns out in addition to anxiety, I also have a mild form of narcolepsy. That means my brain has difficulty regulating sleep cycles - I have vivid dreams every night because I get stuck in REM sleep and never quite get into rejuvenating 'deep sleep'. Hence, I'm always exhausted and will nod off if sitting in one place for a while. It's a real treat.  
Oh, god, the dreams, they are so real, and each time it's like a whole different story... which you won't remember mostly, but the effects are still with you for days or more.  I had one dream that was *so real* that it was practicaly more real than reality itself, i could not sleep for more than 4 hours a day (at best) for the next month or two...   The dream itself was kind nice though.
You and I both. And unfortunately sometimes, if I'm particularly exhausted, I experience cataplexy wherein my legs literally buckle underneath me and I can't stand. But the vivid dreams.. They're great until they're nightmares, huh?
Yes!!! I've had to pull over to the side of the road while driving because my arms will start to go limp. So frustrating/scary. The vivid dreams are the ONE cool part about it. 
For various reasons, yes ( currently living in a car, sometimes I can't sleep because it's not one of my 'preferred' locations to park/sleep; sometimes I'm too sensitive to noises/lights and it keeps me awake).  But, if possible, get yourself checked for sleep apnea.
Hope it gets better buddy, everyone deserves a warm bed. 
I used to be before starting to take care of me. I could sleep for hours straight, go to college and sleep all the morning and afternoon, just to return home and sleep some more.
What do you mean before starting taking care of me?
You need to find something to do , like a hobby, something to look forward to doing and something you can strive towards getting better. You're tired because you have nothing else to do it look forward to do now your just trying to skip the days till something comes up, but nothing ever will until you make something happen
i thought my therapist was on vacation this week! ;)
me too thanks
yep
Jesus this is too real.  Must be hell for bipolar people, acting out on the high, self loathing about it on the low - never knowing who you are
>never knowing who you are  That's the worst part, is the real me that charismatic overachiever who feels like he can accomplish anything, or is it the sad husk of that former me who is so self critical about every decision, every action of the former me. Maybe the 'normal' me is a mix of both, maybe the 'normal' me is neither. Who am I?
>never knowing who you are  That's the worst part, is the real me that charismatic overachiever who feels like he can accomplish anything, or is it the sad husk of that former me who is so self critical about every decision, every action of the former me. Maybe the 'normal' me is a mix of both, maybe the 'normal' me is neither. Who am I?
I tried so hard to put it into words the ups and downs of being bipolar, but couldn't. You worded it very well. This is the hell we live
I tried so hard to put it into words the ups and downs of being bipolar, but couldn't. You worded it very well. This is the hell we live
Dang, I'm not diagnosed as bipolar, but this really is worded very well. There really is a crisis of identity.
I forgot what sub I was in, then thought 'Wow this is a lot like me, sounds like depression'. Pain in the ass it is.
Yeah I was like 'is this a showerthought?' when I started reading,
Music, meditation, distraction.  Only thing that works for me is to actively find something else to concentrate on until the mood goes away, it's hard but it's doable.
Distraction. Though be sure to choose one carefully. I used to use drugs to numb myself. I was sober for 2 years but recently relapse.  I hate myself for it. 
this is so relatable. it feels like a personal attack. it's so horrible. everytime it happens it feels like it's never going to end. and even if you know it will end eventually it feels like that's only because you'll trick yourself again.  and it also doesn't matter that the feeling will go away because its more pain than you can handle in this moment.
Oh my gosh, yes, everything you said.
i feel like this too, my memory is so shitty, i can barely remember anything about my past or just things in general and i have no clue why
It's the brain trying to protect itself.
It's the brain trying to protect itself.
Probably. It's withdrawing from memories in order for traumatic ones to subside into the back of the mind, but it's only damaging in the long run because it's being integrated into the subconscious mind.... 
Probably. It's withdrawing from memories in order for traumatic ones to subside into the back of the mind, but it's only damaging in the long run because it's being integrated into the subconscious mind.... 
that makes so much sense, ive never thought about it like that, thank you. i had a pretty bad childhood and my mental health was so so bad in my teenage life so i guess that’s why ://
Then why do I not remember the fun things that I've done in my life the good times but I remember huddling down in a bomb shelter and getting beat by my dad. I only remember the Terrible Things
Only the terrible things. That's so true. I don't have any single happy memory of me being a kid. I can't go back and find a good place to relive, cause there's none that I could remember. 
I do too.  I believe we get so stressed out thinking about our depression that it makes it hard to remember or think about other things.  I went to a therapist for a while when I could afford it and she used to reccomend meditation, wich is try to clear your head for a moment, maybe that can help, even though I've been struggling to do it again.
I’ve been given this same recommendation. I think it’s important to do. I’ve read that depression affects short term memory so I think this is probably a real phenomenon.
Oh my god yes.  For me, this was almost worse than the emotional side of it.  I remember wondering if I was stuck that way.  It DOES get better in remission. 
This is a wonderful thing to know. I has extreme memory problems right now, definitely due to depression. Damn I feel like this shot never ends.
I can never remember new peoples names, as soon as they introduce themselves, i immediately forget their name...makes for awkward word play when i see them again.  
That's more of a lack of storing the info. Try using their name immediately after hearing it and once during conversation.so 'Hi I'm Brian' then'hey Brian nice to meet you. So, Brian, how many frog legs have you eaten?'
Depression and other mental illnesses have been shown to affect memory (not permanently though, don't worry), according to medical professionals I've talked to about it. Apparently the brain is so busy and stressed out that it goes into a sort of 'panic mode' and puts off building memories sometimes, because they aren't deemed necessary. It's sort of like the brain is in a power-saving mode. This is also why fatigue can be such a big issue for those with depression.
Powersaving mode is a fun way to look at it hahahaha. Thank you 
When I think about things in my past, it feels like I'm remembering someone else's memories. It's strange. 
Sounds like depersonalisation.
Pretty typical for someone who doesn't know the difference between being sad, having a bad day, and being clinically depressed.
I once saw a redditor's comment that said 'Telling a depressed person to cheer up is like telling someone with a broken arm to 'walk it off''
I once saw a redditor's comment that said 'Telling a depressed person to cheer up is like telling someone with a broken arm to 'walk it off''
Also like telling an insomniac to 'just get some sleep.'
Also like telling an insomniac to 'just get some sleep.'
Oh man, the number of times I've been told to 'learn to relax' can be infuriating.     Here's my ego going on a rant, but: Girl, I'm a Buddhist.  I meditate 30 minutes every day, I think I have an idea of what it is to relax.
Shit's a lot harder when you're a teenager, so no one except your therapist will take your depression seriously.
Most times they just tell you to smoke weed or drink more booze. But never tell you but either one will land you in jail. More so with weed.
Most times they just tell you to smoke weed or drink more booze. But never tell you but either one will land you in jail. More so with weed.
> Most times they just tell you to smoke weed or drink more booze.   The shoot? *That* is the worst advice ever. 
> Most times they just tell you to smoke weed or drink more booze.   The shoot? *That* is the worst advice ever. 
It is. They think is so easy.
Or if the jail thing isn't an issue, the possibility that long term distraction with booze and weed may get you stranded in an even worse place.
Or makes your life worse by being addicted to them.
I hate when people have such dismissive attitudes towards mental illness.  LA LA LA NOT LISTENING LA LA LA 
Oh they will suddenly care once they find out that the person who has mental illness became a corspe. People tend to find corpses a lot easier to deal with than a living person when it comes to mental illness.
Oh they will suddenly care once they find out that the person who has mental illness became a corspe. People tend to find corpses a lot easier to deal with than a living person when it comes to mental illness.
Exactly. Then they turn into super martyr mode, either 'I never saw it coming!' Or 'I was always the shoulder little Billy leaned on, we were so close!' 
Exactly. Then they turn into super martyr mode, either 'I never saw it coming!' Or 'I was always the shoulder little Billy leaned on, we were so close!' 
This is so true. And hey, I'd Billy is dead, he won't be there to refute someone's BS. :(
Oh they will suddenly care once they find out that the person who has mental illness became a corspe. People tend to find corpses a lot easier to deal with than a living person when it comes to mental illness.
That was really dark. :( Are you doing alright?
That was really dark. :( Are you doing alright?
Probably not, this IS a depression subreddit.
can't you be sad and awesome at the same time?
I like to think so
I think it works if you suit up.
True story.
True story.
TBH I think there is some truth here... I used to dress kinda sloppy (cargos, shirts too big, baggy sweatshirts).  I have since cleaned up my look (in my eyes at least) with more form-fitting clothing and I think it's helped quite a bit (at least in terms of self-confidence).  And whenever I wear a suit I feel like good-lookin' mother-shooter.
TBH I think there is some truth here... I used to dress kinda sloppy (cargos, shirts too big, baggy sweatshirts).  I have since cleaned up my look (in my eyes at least) with more form-fitting clothing and I think it's helped quite a bit (at least in terms of self-confidence).  And whenever I wear a suit I feel like good-lookin' mother-shooter.
Definitely nothing wrong with taking pride in what you wear.
I usually have a problem with the 'think more, talk less'.  Yeah, like thinking a lot and talking very little about it didn't worsened my situation...
Talking is actually the best solution. Because you start analyzing the problem. Just like a mathematical formula, you can't solve the problem without understanding it first.
Talking is actually the best solution. Because you start analyzing the problem. Just like a mathematical formula, you can't solve the problem without understanding it first.
Thats precisely my point.  The 'Talk less, Think more' is garbage for depressives.
As I see it, overthinking and overanalyzing is part of the problem.  It takes you out of the present moment, keep you stuck on the mental hamster wheel and amplifies the depression.  Talking is better, but doing is best.  Get out of your head and go do something.  It helps. 
I know it does and I know I should but I don't... and I don't get why. :|
I know it does and I know I should but I don't... and I don't get why. :|
That's part of it. I don't know how to fix that for you, either.  For me, it was by transferring that 'mental hamster wheel' (good analogy) from analyzing my own situation to analyzing morality and ethics. Then, instead of thinking 'What do I need to do right now?', the question became 'Is this action ethical?'  Transferring the problem from a personal one to an objective one seemed to help me complete the thought process and bring it into action.
Dave Chappelle said it best. Someone told him that he just needed to keep his chin up.'Just Keep your chin up, Dave'. Dave's reply: 'Word? That's what I was doing wrong, my chin was too low? shut the shoot up, this had nothing to do with my chin nigga!'.  But yeah, this advice is really not useful, to just 'deal with it' or 'focus on the good things'. 
tales of mere existence tells a similar tale: http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=FomroPMOKvg&feature=sh_e_se&list=SL
tales of mere existence tells a similar tale: http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=FomroPMOKvg&feature=sh_e_se&list=SL
Interesting. That guy sounds like Stephen Wright. And yeah those *are* terrible tips! However, a point about the weight-lifting guy: I've mentioned numerous times on here I lift weights and exercise as a means of coping with depression. I've put on 25 pounds of muscle since I seriously started lifting a few years ago. But for me, it's not about getting big, or getting a nice car or shooting chicks...it's a catharsis that manifests itself from serious physical exertion and the endorphins that come from it.
Interesting. That guy sounds like Stephen Wright. And yeah those *are* terrible tips! However, a point about the weight-lifting guy: I've mentioned numerous times on here I lift weights and exercise as a means of coping with depression. I've put on 25 pounds of muscle since I seriously started lifting a few years ago. But for me, it's not about getting big, or getting a nice car or shooting chicks...it's a catharsis that manifests itself from serious physical exertion and the endorphins that come from it.
yeah exercise does help. but starting to work out seems imho quite impossible in the depths of a depressive episode..
This worked for a very short period of time.
yeah, all of 7 seconds
Yay, let's circlejerk about what we already know about depression. This isn't for clinically depressed people, it's for normal people that get sad sometimes.
To be fair, I see this post as a mockery or satire of that type of 'buck up' attitude. 
To be fair, I see this post as a mockery or satire of that type of 'buck up' attitude. 
I can see that too. I guess I have a pessimistic personality, which is part of the reason why I'm on this subreddit in the first place.
Yay, let's circlejerk about what we already know about depression. This isn't for clinically depressed people, it's for normal people that get sad sometimes.
Might be a bit harsh, but this is basically what I was going to say.  Everyone needs to get it in their heads that not everything is directed at them or about them or even relates to them in the slightest.  Especially pictures on the internet.
Might be a bit harsh, but this is basically what I was going to say.  Everyone needs to get it in their heads that not everything is directed at them or about them or even relates to them in the slightest.  Especially pictures on the internet.
Which, in and of itself, is a sign of depression or other disorder. I remember when I fell into a depression a couple years ago and thought everyone in public was laughing at me when they laughed and every status on Facebook from people I was close with was about me.
No, it is for Barney to tell us he is awesome. 
Definitely that too. And he is.
Of course, he's just covering over deep-seated emotional trauma.  Using a band-aid won't cure cancer, but it might look make it temporarily look better.  
This is actually true about his character on How I Met Your Mother, although Barney (his character) doesn't really realize he's doing it. I have to say, I love the show, I love his character, and I am insanely jealous that I cannot force myself to think this way :(
Yeah, it's simple. It's a good attitude to have, in general. But, it's kind of a bad thing to say to someone when they already feel mentally and physically incapable of doing anything. Going through a low in depression makes my day-to-day stuff seems insurmountable. I'd probably be more inclined to smackin' a stupid girl up (joking!) who said that to me than actually taking that sort of advice to heart. 
A person with major depression just can't simply 'do it'. His or her mind is in a since crippled. Unable to do a lot of things without making a lot of effort. As if they don't care about the simple things in life anymore. Or even simple chores to do around their homes such as washing the dishes or even taking a shower. Basically their mind is saying to them : What's the point anymore?
A person with major depression just can't simply 'do it'. His or her mind is in a since crippled. Unable to do a lot of things without making a lot of effort. As if they don't care about the simple things in life anymore. Or even simple chores to do around their homes such as washing the dishes or even taking a shower. Basically their mind is saying to them : What's the point anymore?
Yeah I was just (attempting) to point out that people who say those things have no understanding of what it means to go through depression, so it makes sense for them to spout out some generic, simplified piece of shitadvice. I agree with everything you've said!
Remember, it's all in your head. 
If you were inside my head, you'd understand why that is a problem.
This advice isn't as terrible as it may sound. Practicing radical self-acceptance can help you on your journey of managing your depression. 
Totally agree.  Too bad depression and radical self acceptance are like oil and water.  Very hard for a depressed person to make that cognitive leap. 
The problem is that most depressed people don't have personal experience in being 'awesome'.  They have no idea what it feels like, so they don't know where to aim.
I've had depression all my life, and I am awesome at least once a day.
I wish I didn't have to talk to anyone. Just be silent for a day without anyone asking me anythin.
same, i wish that for a day no one would bother me, like figure shit out for yourself, quit asking me.
this is just about everyday for me. Happens so often its become the norm for me.
Same - I have to fight for days that are not like this.
Days?  yup.  I feel like the only living beings I talk to on a normal basis are my cats
I usually talk to myself, i wish i had a cat.
I usually talk to myself, i wish i had a cat.
Get a cat!!  I love coming home from work and seeing them
No problem arises and I still consider suicide. 😂😂
same honestly lmao
same honestly lmao
Me
'It's as though I just don't have a stable enough foundation, and can't access my own internal resources for dealing with things.'  Welp, this explains my life.
Here hoping we both develop better abilities to access our resources in a crisis, and find ways to build foundations that will serve us! (fingers crossed)
Thanks guys. This is all super, super relatable. I hope the best for you all, too. 
Ah! I need to read more carefully. I didn't realize I wasn't addressing the OP. Everyone included in the hopeful wishes!!
I agree completely. I've always loved storms. I find them soothing. I love to just listen to the rainfall and the thunder and lightning crack. It gives me the best sleep I could ask for. I also like it because I have super sensitive eyes so less sun the better. Weirdly enough most people say they get depressed during stormy days for me it actually helps my depression. 
>  Weirdly enough most people say they get depressed during stormy days  i think that's why i love rain. it drives a lot of people away.
>  Weirdly enough most people say they get depressed during stormy days  i think that's why i love rain. it drives a lot of people away.
Yep me to. I'm captain introvert, just had to do a project for college where I was in a crowded room and God it was my own personal hour in hell. Just like Disney world the less people the better.
I live in San Diego so we never get them here...  Originally from the Midwest though where we would get plenty, and I agree. Not just rain, but also the serious Thunderstorms. I miss that (dont miss the freezing winters so much though). 
In Arizona we don't get rain, we just get massive walls of dust.
I love rain. I wish it rained 24 hrs a day every day. I'd have no anxiety being outside. I also hate afternoons. I prefer early mornings or late nights.
Omg same. Afternoons just remind me that yet another useless day has passed in my useless life.  
Omg same. Afternoons just remind me that yet another useless day has passed in my useless life.  
I think part of it is how you notice the passage of time more in the day. The sun moves through the sky, cars come and go, people are busy. Time stands still at night
I think part of it is how you notice the passage of time more in the day. The sun moves through the sky, cars come and go, people are busy. Time stands still at night
Exactly.   Late nights make me feel like I'm not falling behind and that I owe nothing to anyone. 
Yeah me too kinda because hot weather gives me anxiety and makes me worry about being sweaty. I think I associate warmth with anxiety because I get hot flashes when I'm very anxious which makes me sweat a lot
I couldn't agree more! I live in a temperate climate so it's hot in the summer and cold in the winter. Everyone I know loves that time of year but that's exactly when I go out the least (not that I go out much but yeah) I just really like the cold, whether or not it's raining or snowing or just a nice crisp day, I like knowing I can throw on a sweater and not worry about my body doing things.
How old are you? Just wondering as I'm on your road somewhere behind you. Your friend, the brick
The ripe old age of 29. The only advice I can really if is to try and keep busy. Don't let your hobbies dissipate. I have a lots of good friends, but don't see them a ton anymore, and a family that cares. My situation may just be extreme boredom and laziness rather than depression, but it's definitely something I need to deal with. It really is strange that I know exactly what I need to do to fix the situation, I just don't do it. 
The ripe old age of 29. The only advice I can really if is to try and keep busy. Don't let your hobbies dissipate. I have a lots of good friends, but don't see them a ton anymore, and a family that cares. My situation may just be extreme boredom and laziness rather than depression, but it's definitely something I need to deal with. It really is strange that I know exactly what I need to do to fix the situation, I just don't do it. 
Why don't you try something crazy that changes your life? Where is the sense in just existing? Throw your job, sell some stuff and buy a one way flight to japan or something. There you see it as a challenge to get a job, earn some money and fly back to wherever you live right know. Spice up your life so you have some great stories to tell your grandchildren.
Are you me?
No, but I am.
In all honesty, I probably would have killed my self if it wasn't for the new Star Wars movies coming.
Heh. I remember thinking that I can't kill myself because I needed to see Breaking Bad to the end. I kind of stopped caring about most media though, I haven't even seen the new Star Wars yet, even though I used to be a huge film buff. Having a hard time getting excited about anything, really.
Heh. I remember thinking that I can't kill myself because I needed to see Breaking Bad to the end. I kind of stopped caring about most media though, I haven't even seen the new Star Wars yet, even though I used to be a huge film buff. Having a hard time getting excited about anything, really.
Little do these people know that what they make keep people alive.
Little do these people know that what they make keep people alive.
Yeah, I'm waiting for the next show that will have that effect on me. Right now, I'm not really sure what's keeping me carry on.
Maybe... I would argue that most of the US is glued to their screens for a good portion of the day. Only 6.7% (NIH, 2014) of the US population is depressed, so not quite sure what that says about society.
Idk.  6.7% of a nation sounds pretty big to me.
As much as I can’t imagine how much in pain you feel right now, I also know that thoughts and prayers can only do so much. I’m not quite sure what I can do to help, but I know  /r/personalfinance can help!!! Write a post, check it religiously, and most importantly, DON’T GIVE UP. You can do this. If you honestly believe that you can’t, believe in the people that say you can, like me. YOU GOT THIS.
+1 for /r/personalfinance
She'd be up for whatever she could, I'm sure.  She can work from home on a computer for sure, but finding a position has been hard.  How did you find jobs like that?  We've done job hunting for her quite a bit and maybe I'm just not looking in the right area because I've never seen anything that isn't a complete scam.
If your fiancee can do customer service and that sort of thing, have her look up a company called Modsquad. They've been a finance saver for me, because I struggle to work outside the home. Doesn't pay like a career, but it's something. 
If your fiancee can do customer service and that sort of thing, have her look up a company called Modsquad. They've been a finance saver for me, because I struggle to work outside the home. Doesn't pay like a career, but it's something. 
> Modsquad  I'd never heard of this but it looks promising - thank you for the suggestion!
I’m so sorry for your loss brother.  
Thank you for listening.
Thanks for the kind words and for reaching out.  I'm not really a religious guy but the thought still means a lot, and I appreciate it.
Me either. There’s a point when religious or not that I want it to be true. Hail Thor. Best of luck on your journey. 
This is me. I [Maladaptively Daydream](https://wildminds.ning.com/profiles/blogs/official-maladaptive). Usually about fictional characters, because if I fantasize about having friends or a good life, I'll get depressed thinking it probably won't happen in the first place. Funny how I thought I might be more creative oriented or be a good writer because of this, but apparently not...
Oh hey wow it's me as shoot. I just don't even care about letting myself get carried away anymore, I just let it happen.
I sit around imagining entire lifetimes that will never happen.  Having friends, a family, happiness, all of it.
This cuts as deep as it hits close to home for me, haha.
Glad I'm not the only one that has done that
same
The thing with me is that people talk to me but I'm kind of not there.. I'm holding a conversation in my mind but I just look at them as if I'm mute or simply dont give a shit. *Feelsbadman*
I just stare at people when I don't know what to say or I just don't want to deal with whatever they're saying to me - like I don't have the energy to even address it. It's such a shitty habit and I feel like a piece of shit when I do it, so I do it way less lately, but it still does happen.
I do that a lot. Usually the conversations are about politics, though. Lol.
Same. I guess I just want somebody to listen to me :/
Like a deer in headlights? I just freeze up completely around new people - or, sometimes, I think up funny things to say, but I just don't say them because I don't know the person well enough to know whether they'd get it, or find it funny, or offensive, or whatever, so I just don't say anything at all.  People are hard, man.
pretty much. I just struggle trying to remember what to say or to think of something to say. I hear of people complaining about thinking of the perfect thing to say after,  but this relates to me almost all of the time. 
I want a sticker
Dude it's so awesome. Even my dog smiles at me when I get one.
I wish I had a girlfriend like that. I was under the impression that depression disqualified me from dating and relationships.
I did too for five years or so after I was diagnosed. My depression affects my partner, too. I'm lucky to have found someone so understanding.  They're out there though. You'll find them.
Great job man. Keep taking the pills. That reward system is a bit unconventional but if it works then great.  
What's so unconventional about it, we use the same system to build habits in children why wouldn't it work with an adult? 
This is really inspiring. Mind if I take this idea? 
Absolutely. I think finding a system that works is as important as actually taking the medicine.
Which app?
It's called Medisafe. 
What is it called ?
Ubrands magnetic dry erase chore chart.
Hu..I mean the medicine 
Haha oh. Fluoxetine.
Lmao!
I thought they meant the whiteboard!
just do this method.analzyle your depression when it happens find the route,observe the thoughts that happens experince the experince with full awareness,or consiously and break the pattern.experince it as it is happening,feel everydetail of it,put your full cosnious attension on it,then be silent and just observe whats happening
It's not something that happens in fleeting moments though. So it's not like analyzing anxiety and it's causes. It'd be like analyzing experience's over the course of months or years.
I think it's the same with all this gender identity and sexuality stuff in tumblr. Many who don't have such orientations but are lost go there for community and belonging
And when actual transpeople like me try to talk about our gender issues we get lumped in with those kin crazies, which really dosent do well for the LGBT movement.
This is exactly me. That's why sometimes I just want to stop seeing my psychologist and kill myself.        I don't think it's just a normal teenage phase to contemplate suicide everyday have ideations make plans and have intrusive thoughts about it.
Oh, are you telling your therapist about your intrusive thoughts? That could be something to help control...
I want to get a cat so bad but can't because I'm allergic. Mind sharing a picture of your cat?
I don't know too much about them, but I've heard that there are some hypoallergenic cats - maybe that is something you could look into!  Here is my kitta: http://i.imgur.com/NZm7cYs.jpg
When you feel like you are too tired and apathetic to even go online or open your computer, that is depression for me as well. I don't feel like doing anything that requires effort. Its hard enough for me to get out of bed.
I'm always listening to music. On bad days, I do everything I have to do in silence. 
I wish depression was as awesome as they make it out to be but it really isn't. People romanticize depressed poets and authors like poe and plath but they have no idea what hell these people went through.  
This is really important to me because it shows how insensitive people are, adopting a 'depressed literary genius, dark coffee, twisted mind' aesthetic when those people probably suffered for most of their lives, and if the people who've adopted this aesthetic now knew them while they were alive, they'd probably ignore or ridicule them.
There's people who share their depression, and people who don't.  I'd argue that the people who don't share it are worse off.
they're trying to spare the ones they love
they're trying to spare the ones they love
Or they view themselves as a hopeless case Kama which is why they don't reach out at all. I know that feeling very well
Or they view themselves as a hopeless case Kama which is why they don't reach out at all. I know that feeling very well
its so sad!! WHY! Why is the world like this?! I understand to some degree, intellectually, but other than that, I just don't get it, it's all so horrific.
I believe that if you share it with anybody at all, even Anonymous internet people, you are reaching out and you do want help. But you are not it never is serious asking for help online as you are when you ask for help from a real life person. Because those people can actually do something about it because they are close to you physically and that is scary sometimes
That's fair too, there's definitely variations in commitment and resources, as well as restrictions and freedoms.  > Because those people can actually do something about it because they are close to you physically and that is scary sometimes  Can you give an example of how it can be scary sometimes, for clarification? 
i have a twitter account where i'm pretty open about it. i can't imagine how someone would feel holding those thoughts back for the sake of those around them. 
family and close friends read your twitter?
I'm in no way saying that, sorry if you misunderstood.  I'm accusing people of acting depressed as a meme or some sort of joke. I've come across lots of those kinds of people and as i tried opening up to some of them I've previously considered my friends, they called bullshit on my depression and sort of said i was taking the menge too far.  
Wow. That's weird and mean of those people. Sorry that happened to you.
I'd argue that if those teens are really depressed, they won't romanticized it on tumblr.
How do you know that's not how they deal with it?
just wanted to say that's a really nice post you wrote. It's definitely a journey and the points you make are all really good.
Thanks! It is a collection of what I've learned over the last year. It's helped me a lot, and I thought it might help others too. I appriciate you taking the time to read it and comment.  
I think this is great. Not all of these are something I want to do or can do right now, but in general they're good tips.  Strange that you mention gardening, I've been wanting to try it for some reason, but I'm in a small apartment too, and have no experience. I really don't want to see all my plants die. I wonder, what plants are easy yet fulfilling to start with?
Succulents are super easy. They require very little care and can thrive indoors. I started with one little guy and now I have a mini forest. 
Succulents are super easy. They require very little care and can thrive indoors. I started with one little guy and now I have a mini forest. 
I second this. I have mainly succulents and cacti, and while some require more care than others, they are relatively easy to maintain. If you want to turn it into an actual hobby, it's very rewarding when some of them bloom! I'm expanding to some veggies and herbs on the balcony here in the summer half-year. It's nice to have something to care for, and it's generally a meditative hobby which is nice on the eyes at the same time.  Also kudos for a well-written post!
Wow, thank you so much.  I've always had a depressed mood, but recently it has been increasing greatly.  I decided to look for support on reddit.  After finding this subreddit, this post is the first I've read.  I've already started counseling, and I think I'll try some of the tips given here.  Thanks again.
Right on - you are very welcome. I was in the same boat roughly a year ago. I wish you all the best on your journey. 
This list seems like it will be helpful, thanks!  It is great how accomplishing a goal will brighten my day. & I mean any goal. Going out & buying bananas would cheer me up. It is ridiculous!
Absolutely! Start off with smaller goals and work your way up. After a week you may have 7 goals completed and feel great. 
I printed this out and stuck it on my wall, thankyou. Hope you don't mind :)
I'm honored! Glad I could help! 
Definitely with you on #3. I started weight-lifting seriously about 3 years ago. In that time I went from 185/190 lbs of decent build to 210 lbs of muscle. Results give me motivation. Motivation makes me go and lift those weights till I'm tired. Anything for that release combined with noticeable effects. I've added regular stretching and love the results of that too. Amazing what a difference it makes compared to if I succumbed to my apathy and never went to the gym. 
It's amazing isn't it? It has such a positive reinforcement cycle. Lift to feel good. Then you start to look good, so you want to lift more. It's also easy to track personal gains - last week my bench was 5lbs lighter. Best lifts I have to say are the powerlifts that incorporate lots of muscle groups. Deadlifts are my all-time favorite. Going for a personal best one rep max of 315lbs next week.
These are some really awesome tips, thank you. The part about how the physical pain of working out helped you match your mind and body was especially compelling to me. 
If you haven't tried it - you should. It is so rewarding and it will lift your mind out of the fog for awhile. 
I tried to talk to a therapist but I made them cry :/  my life's not that's great. 
 Sorry that your life isn't hasn't gone so great up to this point. You can't change any of the past, you can only look onward and figure out a plan to move forward. Crying doesn't mean he/she is a bad therapist, on the contrary it shows that they actually listened very deeply to you and showed empathy for your situation. I can't think of a better person to help you in your journey. 
This really means a lot to me. Life is such a strange, twisted journey and the only way any of us can make it through with our sanity is to know we're not alone. Just focus on tonight, and then focus on tomorrow. I'm sending love your way through these words. Sometimes it helps to just love the people around you. 
Thankyou. I find it easier to just get through hour by hour at the moment. It does help to know we're not alone. Sending love back across the pond. 
For those who read this entire text monster, I would give you a cookie if you were here. I apologize for the rambling, unorganized nature of this post.  Edit: Also, in spite of thread rules, I welcome any and all approaches, including tough love if necessary and productive.
Im like u but i was also bullied in 3 schools and have ruined my mental and physical health with drugs and pc. I didnt adventure, i didnt get a skill/good job. I was unpopular loser and still i am. I have a lot of mental ilnesses now. We are same age.
Im like u but i was also bullied in 3 schools and have ruined my mental and physical health with drugs and pc. I didnt adventure, i didnt get a skill/good job. I was unpopular loser and still i am. I have a lot of mental ilnesses now. We are same age.
Keep at it, we can do it! Life is so confusing, and in times like this it can be painful to look into what feels like a purposeless future. So keep focusing on right now, and keep making it better, until looking into the future becomes beautiful!
These words are so inspiring to me. This entire thread has been of such huge value, and it is so comforting to know that I am the exact opposite of alone on this, not just in the mistakes, but in the will to be better. I'm so happy that you were able to conquer your darkness, and I'm going to use this as motivation to do the same myself. Thank you!
I'm really glad I was able to help! Just keep your head up and you can make your life better. I promise, you have more control in your life than you realize.
I read every word. Thanks for posting it. It helped me. Sorry for the multiple posts below
*gives cookie* Why thank you for saying so! I'm glad it helped you, and do not worry about multiple posts. Your words have helped me just as much.
Ok so I'll be honest about TL'DR, I hope you don't mind. I just want to say that as a guy who is nearly 50 and still making shit up as I go along, that bless you, you are so young and you shouldn't worry. You have so many years ahead of you to make mistakes, experiment, learn, and grow. Seriously, don't worry. You are young, and everything will be ok. 
I was about to say the same thing. I know if feels like a lot of your life has already gone by, but really you're so young and it hasn't. You have time.
24 is still very young. You can’t change what you did yesterday, but you can change what you’re gonna do tomorrow.
Thank you for saying so, making cents. It's odd how quickly it's come, but I think you're right about it still being young. I certainly hope to change what I'm going to do 'tomorrow'. I've been reading a lot more lately. Perhaps I'll try to write a book of my own..
i did not read the whole thing but i feel the same way that you do.
We can do it! I like your username!
I try to take comfort in the fact that I am not alone, and that others feel this way, and some have even gone to do the great things you dream about.  I am in a very dark place as well. You sound like you want to fight, and live, that is good. I wish I had more advice, I hope you do and have great adventures. I hope I can be happy and safe.
I hope you can do all you dream of as well, and I'm glad I've made you feel less alone. You've done the same for me. One of the best parts of humanity is how we lean on each other. Much love.
keep fighting, man. It's hard, I know. You're a shooting warrior and you can do this. 
You know, for an immature weenie, you're alright! Thank you, I sometimes wish I were more of a natural 'fighter', and sometimes I find myself being a bit defeatist. But I do sense a warrior in me. Comments like these help me figure out how to unlock his cage. Thank you, immature weenie :)
Hey, I didn't read it all, but I just want to say, do something, anything, before another 5-6 years go by.  Just be like, shoot it, i'm moving to a new city or going to a different country entirely.  Do a reset.  Don't let yourself turn 29 and you're still stuck in the same place.  Speaking from experience here.
I think you're right. I've had this urge for a while, where I've wanted to live out of a van and travel across the continent for a summer or a year. I think I'll at least do something like it this summer. Inertia works for life progress too, maybe many adventures will follow. Thank you for the caring words OrderlyKit, and I send my love right back to you. Let's both do something spontaneous this year!
Thanks for making this post. I'm in the same boat (age and all), and now I feel slightly less alone.
*e-hug* The riches of this post have been awesome. I feel much less alone myself, and I want you to know you can do it!! Focus on the here and now, your perception of the future will follow, have faith in that!
Thank you for discouraging me from posting about my own situation. You're 24 and young as shit and act like your life is over lol. Try being my age and depressed and then talk. 
dude it’s not a competition 
Yes. 'remember that time you said that thing in class 3 years ago? haha I bet everyone still laughs behind your back because of that.' I know the cringey things I've done arent a big deal but they keep me up at night too
When I was 10 I was at some museum thing and the guide asked the group if anyone knew what Masons are and I very confidently said, “They’re the ones who make mason jars.” Everyone laughed. I died a little that day. 
Have you tried listening to a guided meditation as you fall asleep? I've found that listening to one makes me focus on that instead of the intrusive thoughts. And then the sound of the meditation lulls me to sleep.
I was in rehab years ago and once a week we had a meditation class.  Nice soft music and he’d have us tighten and release muscles starting with our toes all the way up to our eyes. There wasn’t one time I could stay awake!
Lately i’ve been so uninterested in things that every night is total boredom for me. No netflix, youtube, games...it’s all so boring and i can never just concentrate on one task. In saying this, all i want to do is sleep and i have been taking melatonin or nyquil to make me sleep faster....why does life seem so boring :( 
You're not looking with the right angle. I believe you have to give yourself attainable goals and reward yourself when you reach them.  I might be wrong, though.
Add in social anxiety which makes going to class an actively miserable experience and that about sums it up for me.
Weird. School is rarely anything close to a social experience for me. I guess it's kinda funny that way. Some of us want badly to be left alone and never approached, others are just lonely and want to be acknowledged. 
Weird. School is rarely anything close to a social experience for me. I guess it's kinda funny that way. Some of us want badly to be left alone and never approached, others are just lonely and want to be acknowledged. 
Just being within the sight of other people causes my social anxiety. It gets worse the more social the situation is, but yeah, even sitting in class has me on edge regardless of if I have to interact with anyone.  The annoying contradiction is that I want so badly to make friends and connect with people, and yet that anxiety is always there at the back of my head telling me that social interaction will literally kill me.
Just being within the sight of other people causes my social anxiety. It gets worse the more social the situation is, but yeah, even sitting in class has me on edge regardless of if I have to interact with anyone.  The annoying contradiction is that I want so badly to make friends and connect with people, and yet that anxiety is always there at the back of my head telling me that social interaction will literally kill me.
I feel you. I have social anxiety too and the stress on my mind even being in a place where there MIGHT be people (even if there aren't actually) has essentially been ruining my life. Others cannot understand it and think I'm lazy for avoiding situations because 'laziness' is pretty much the closest thing they can relate to (it isn't close at all) to justify that.
Protip: Don't care if people care about you
Na thats not it. If people care about you, care. If they don't then shoot em.
When you say you feel like nothing, what do you mean?
Not OP, but when I started skipping class because of depression I did so because I  stopped caring. 'So what if I miss this class? What difference does it make?'
So let's say if things were fine, you would go to school right. I can understand that.  Thiers a problem in your life that's a barrier from getting things done. I can agree & relate to that. What's bothering you? Anything in particular. If you can't see why, think of the things that bring you down. Sometimes I don't even know.
> What's bothering you?  I'm going to assume it's the medical condition known as depression.
Sauce: http://www.viruscomix.com/page528.html  It's one of my favorite comics.
Thanks from me (and probably others), I like this a lot, I'm sure there is more where it came from!
I particularly like the part about sexuality.
Would you mind explaining it to me? 
Would you mind explaining it to me? 
It's basically saying that sexuality isn't something that's 'black and white'. As in, you're either straight or gay. As someone who's bisexual, that's what I feel about myself. Sexuality I've found is something that's fluid and who I'm attracted to really depends on the person. I try not to worry about labels and I think that's also what the comic is saying.
It's basically saying that sexuality isn't something that's 'black and white'. As in, you're either straight or gay. As someone who's bisexual, that's what I feel about myself. Sexuality I've found is something that's fluid and who I'm attracted to really depends on the person. I try not to worry about labels and I think that's also what the comic is saying.
While I don't deny your perfectly legitimate response (after all, art is open to interpretation), I believe that it's more of a reference to the 'pure' and the 'impure'. Many of us are raised to believe that there are two kinds of people: the promiscuous and the prude. In reality, there are many different middle grounds that people can be as far as how they personally explore their sexuality. Again, that's just my opinion.
Now I'm just wondering if I'm gay or not. 
As the comic suggests, maybe you're something in-between!
Story of my life.
Me too, hombre :(
Solution: MORE CATS
My cat disappeared last week.  I waited at the shelter today 15 minutes before it opened.  There were 3 cats that made me go, 'Oh that's him!....no [feature] is a little off.'  I miss my cat, shooting idiot.
My cat disappeared last week.  I waited at the shelter today 15 minutes before it opened.  There were 3 cats that made me go, 'Oh that's him!....no [feature] is a little off.'  I miss my cat, shooting idiot.
Aww... I hope you find him.  :((
Here is the text from this meme pic for anybody who needs it:    >Title: Lonely Scumbag Brain    >Meme: Scumbag Brain    >* SO LONELY, CAN'T BEAR TO BE ALONE  >* SO ANTISOCIAL, CAN'T BEAR TO BE AROUND ANYBODY    >^[[Background](http://imgur.com/n4sQK)] ^[[Translate](http://translate.google.com/#auto||SO+LONELY%2C+CAN%27T+BEAR+TO+BE+ALONE+-+SO+ANTISOCIAL%2C+CAN%27T+BEAR+TO+BE+AROUND+ANYBODY)]    This is helpful for people who can't reach Quickmeme because of work/school firewalls or site downtime, and many other reasons ([FAQ](http://www.reddit.com/r/qkme_transcriber/comments/o426k/faq_for_the_qkme_transcriber_bot/)). More info is available [here](http://www.reddit.com/r/qkme_transcriber/).
Thanks, bot! qkme was being slow for me.
i feel similarly but rather than wanting to go back and never be born, i often wish i could shrink/disappear into nothingness and that the people who know me would forget that i ever existed
Yeah, that'd work too. Or just like going to sleep and not waking up, just disappearing and erasing everyone's memories of you. If only :/
Yeah, that'd work too. Or just like going to sleep and not waking up, just disappearing and erasing everyone's memories of you. If only :/
i'll often isolate myself from friends and family because it feels like the closest thing to achieving something like this? but then i realize that i'm probably making them think that i don't care about them, and i don't want them to feel that way. if they would just forget about me, it would solve everything
i'll often isolate myself from friends and family because it feels like the closest thing to achieving something like this? but then i realize that i'm probably making them think that i don't care about them, and i don't want them to feel that way. if they would just forget about me, it would solve everything
Dang, that's exactly me.
Me too. I think about this a lot. I wish I wasn't here. Also it's a big reason I'll never have kids, I would never want to make someone have to trudge through the shit that is life.  I often pray (even though I don't believe in god lol) that someone else's cancer will be given to me so they can live. I wouldn't be sad or scared to die.
This has been a big one for me recently. Before about a year ago I was quite ready to have kids but not anymore. I hate the thought of bringing someone into this world without their consent. 
'Life is an unprofitable episode disturbing the blessed calm of non-existence.' -Arthur Schopenhauer
That's a great quote.
Sounds like you might have hit the jackpot on doctors! I wish I could find someone like that, but the experience of trial and error is too painful.
This is my biggest problem. How much before we say too much. When therapy is doing more harm than good. When the professional isn't even listening. When they give shitty advice that sounds plagiarized off some blog. When they try and push a certain drug because they are reaping the benefits from that particular company.
I don't need to visit a psychiatrist, councellor or psychologist..... As I don't need to speak or say anything......    All I want is somebody, who I could listen to while they speak to me......
I've definitely had shrinks that were like that.
Not sure if that's a good thing though. Therapists shouldn't emphasize that hard. Imagine how she feels hearing terrible stories all day and suffering with those. In the end it doesn't really help anyone. It just means that she can't protect and distance herself well enough. She should be able to tell you in other ways that she cares.   I know that sounds hard. But any group of therapy workers are also a risk group for mental illness themselves. 
Therapists by law have to have their own special therapist in the UK I'm pretty sure
Therapists by law have to have their own special therapist in the UK I'm pretty sure
kind of like how a mailman needs someone to deliver his mail?
That's a good idea. 
It's therapists all the way up. :P  But indeed.
But who takes care of the therapist therapist?
The clown pagliacci.
The clown pagliacci.
Good joke. Everybody laugh.
Would you be willing to DM me your therapist's name? I live in Michigan and am in a really dark place. Every therapist I've had has taken advantage of me. The last one actually asked if he could still bill my insurance after I stopped going to him. 
Did u get the pm?
Too scared to ask my parents to take me to a professional 
Try to build up the courage to tell your parents you need help. You could also write them a letter if that would make you more comfortable.
Well... something we forgot is that we are the medicine.   Sometimes helping others helps to heal our own wounds. I like this Doctor was very supportive and we should be supportive too with people who is suffering...
This is how I got through my issues.....just helping others and doing good.....it gives you hope again 
My mother is a therapist... the most popular in our state in fact. She always told me when a patient is upset you are supposed to comfort them and put your personal emotions to the side. She told me it's okay to make small talk and laugh with them at the end of a session, but while you're in the session you are essentially their caretaker and they come first over your emotions. 
Who compiles therapist rankings 
Does she do FaceTime sessions?! 
Its not like she will cry for everyone.
Its not like she will cry for everyone.
Challenge accepted 
Why not??? Therapists have emotions too and sometimes having someone really care and really listen is all the therapy you need...
But that's a selfish perspective. Chances are the therapist needs help and isn't fit to work yet. There's a risk of role reversal, which does not benefit the paying client. I want my therapist to keep their shit together and help me put mine together. Unfortunately there isn't much research on the topic, and what little there is was 50/50.
I'd imagine it's a rare occurrence to find such people. Do shrinks have some kind of prohibition against building personal attachment? Otherwise you could make friends :)
It's called boundaries. Therapists are not your friends. It's for their own safety and wellbeing.
Me too I just forget the simplest things or don't think at all. Then when I get (rightfully) reprimanded, it pains me  even more.
Same thing happens to me, I often forget to do small tasks at job and my bosses are already getting sick of it, it hurts when they scream to me and none understands.
Same thing happens to me, I often forget to do small tasks at job and my bosses are already getting sick of it, it hurts when they scream to me and none understands.
This sums up my day 
I feel the same way. My job is so shooting simple yet I bet all my coworkers think im a slow moron. I remember things slowly, I can't speak without stuttering or taking long pauses and I rarely socialize with any of them. Im just waiting for the day my manager lets me go cause im just holding the team back or im just not keeping up...  I hope we both improve with time my dude 
Damn. Where do u work. I felt the same way working as a janitor at a high school. I’d see everyone socialize just fine then when they look at me I just get ignored and I was okay with it. 
Damn. Where do u work. I felt the same way working as a janitor at a high school. I’d see everyone socialize just fine then when they look at me I just get ignored and I was okay with it. 
I work as event staff on my campus. We basically set rooms for clubs or events going on. We also help with any technical issues or if any of them need something. Where do you work?    But thats exactly me too. We had a christmas bonding 'meeting' and I barely spoke 5 words the whole 2 hours. Everyone is buddy buddy with eachother and I just kept to myself. No one really spoke to me anyways. 
Same, even tho I do socialize I'm just slow as shoot at learning some things, it sucks because I get yelled at very often because of it.
They shouldn't be yelling at you. That's not professional and I don't see how it helps.
dont worry you are not alone. 
Me too. When I'm depressed or hormonal I can't figure anything out. 
I am a PhD student in a mathematical field and I known your frustration.  Depression takes my focus away. I am just unable to focus on stuff because I feel sad and miserable at times and I also (unseriously) think of ending it at times.   But OP remember this: it's not you. You aren't any dumber. You are sick. And depression can be treated and improved. Do sports, find a good therapist and talk to them. 
I'm glad you are unserious, that means you are getting better.  A few math jokes you might like:  If only DEAD people understand hexadecimal, how many people understand hexadecimal?  57,005.  (DEAD in hexadecimal)  Why do mathematicians always confuse Halloween and Christmas?  Because 31 Oct = 25 Dec.  I LOVE this!  It's octal and decimal, not October and December.
Worst part is (if you're like me,) the depression makes you do bad in school, doing bad worsens the depression, repeat until you miss so many days of school you don't get credit for junior year.
Ok literally the exact thing that happened to me like it was even my junior year. Unhappy coincidences. But definitely a pretty annoying feeling especially when people tell you 'you're so smart you should be doing better'
Don’t worry happened to me to when I used to be horribly depressed. Felt like there was no point in living and felt actually that my iq had dropped 20. We all have hard patches and bumps and even days were we are down. Whar helped me was relaxing and taking time to myself then sitting down and convincing myself to do something about it
What did u do about it?
The way ive countered this is building a big playlist of uplifting songs with fast tempos and workout, being lonely atleast keeps me in shape but I suffer in the sleep department. I prefer it over the whole crying myself to sleep thing. 
I have the opposite, a playlist full of sad songs
I have the opposite, a playlist full of sad songs
... Could you possibly share that with me?
... Could you possibly share that with me?
I have it on my spotify...but my spotify is connected to my facebook so I would rather not...Although I could recommend you some sad songs off the list (it's short atm)
The only good moment of the day is when my brain is turned off.  So sleeping would be the ideal solution.. If I could manage to sleep properly.. As it is I shake often in my bed tormented by worries. Also, when I happen to wake up, I find it super hard to sleep again.  And sometimes I wake up at 2 am.
>when my brain is turned off      I love the nights I don't have debilitating nightmares, when my brain is truly off and I can use it as a coping mechanism like I have for the past decade.
What video games are you playing atm? 
right now i'm splitting most of my time between Final Fantasy XIV online, and Danganronpa v3. I was playing a bunch of Persona 5 as well, but my Playstation 4 broke and i'm too poor to fix it. So for now it's just those two.
I start to *want* to get better. I realize that I *need* to. And then I get depressed and have a week of panic attacks and suicidal thoughts.   I just want it to end.
Yes. This
I think Morrissey described it quite accurately:  *'And when I'm lying in my bed I think about life and I think about death And neither one particularly appeals to me'*
love it!  
good for you for still pursuing university. I had to (still am) take some time off because my symptoms got in the way and I also really didn't see the point in the investment. I hope your experience is going a lot better!
I appreciate it but unfortunately I've found myself in the same boat. This is gonna be my last semester at this university because I simply don't feel like I'm applying myself and getting what I should be out of it. I'm paying way too much just to live away from home, taking core classes and feeling like an emotional zombie. 
As to the question in your title, seems to be about 60% of the US population, you're not alone!
more liike 60% of the world  
I have this one inside joke with myself - each year I promise myself I'll wait for the next season of Orange is the New Black and then kill myself.
Haha I was telling myself I'll do it after the final season of LOST. I couldn't go out without finishing that show. Well... With that ending I'm surprised I'm still here, and shoot that was along time ago... Been dealing with depression to shooting long now. :(
What motivated you to do that, I'm curious what inspired you to commit to seeing someone. Congrats on doing so, though! 
Probably the same thing that motivated you to write this post.
Have you ever tried medications for depression? Sometimes they can give you the boost you need to get things back on track and stabilize a bit.  It could be worth reaching out to a psychiatrists.
I've made appointments for so many, soooo many times, and every time I just end up canceling. I think it goes back to the whole 'not having faith in the future/not totally wanting a future' thing. That's the problem, I don't feel like I really want to help myself out of this but at the same time...I can't bring myself to attempt suicide. Hence, this post. 
I've made appointments for so many, soooo many times, and every time I just end up canceling. I think it goes back to the whole 'not having faith in the future/not totally wanting a future' thing. That's the problem, I don't feel like I really want to help myself out of this but at the same time...I can't bring myself to attempt suicide. Hence, this post. 
Hey, I used to be just the same, sometimes I still feel that way. Like you don't really want to get better. But for me at least, medication really helped me to get into the mindset of actually wanting to make a change for myself, even if I still feel low sometimes. I don't know your whole situation, but try to make that appointment, even though I know it's so difficult. Depression clouds your mind and makes you think negatively, but you can get better
My ex helped a lot and made me the happiest I've ever been and then I moved away and we broke up and now its back worse than ever :)
Tbh I kind of had to smile because of that ':)'
Tbh I kind of had to smile because of that ':)'
I'm glad that I could at least help someone 'kind of' smile lol
Just being in love helps me. The person fills my thoughts and I have more reasons to get out of bed.
I'm glad it helps you; I find that being in love with someone you can't be with and someone who is moving on makes the thoughts them agonizing and continuous torture that I try and find distractions from but there are only so many ways to distract myself and I'm running out.. :)
I pray to God that you're wrong.  This is the only hope I can still cling to.  The only reason I don't just kill myself.
Relying on one thing to justify staying alive isn't the best idea, especially when that thing is another person. People are volatile. Plus, it's really unhealthy to place that kind of burden on yourself and onto your girlfriend, you should find more than one reason for living. 
Eh I mean I can't really find joy in much anymore.  I lost all my friends and I hate my body with a burning passion.  What's left?
The future; everyone and everything in this seemingly pathetic, yet wonderful world has one.  Don't give up, but I understand that in the moments you are currently on those words might seem meaningless. 
Some of us have to take the mature way out. Let not people suffer from our own behaviours and that's just who we are. Keep looking bro, she's not the only girl out there who's going to make you feel good about yourself. Just be brave and be optimistic.
Funnily enough, a coworker of mine already was showing interest at the time of the breakup, and literally the next day, she and I became a casual item, which lasted until a couple weeks ago lol And now, another coworker at a different job has been showing interest, though she's not nearly as smart. If she and I hook up, I'd rather not get serious with her. One thing I have learned is to stop 'looking' and to just sail with the wind
thats what ive been thinking.   im not trying to offend anyone but i see some depressed people on here saying they are depressed because they dont have a SO and im just confused as to why they think having a SO would magically cure everything.  sorry if i sound harsh its just the way i talk and i dont even bother getting a boyfriend bc i know it wont help me
I assume oxytocin might help, is the idea. 
This is actually helpful to me.  Im depressed and with that comes loneliness from being single so long.  I'm not thinking a girl would fix it but I feel like it would help.  But from what I can tell from your story it kinda doesn't  :/
From personal experience I had with a guy, it goes something like this:  You feel bad -> you are together -> they give you love -> you are too emotionally dead but try anyway to show love back -> they think you don't actually love them -> your negativity pushes them away -> you are more alone than ever before with crippling guilt as a bonus  Different for everyone, though.
No one will be happy forever; we all have our ups and downs and life throws curve balls at the worst times. You have someone that loves you. Use that support to learn to love yourself and the bad times will start to fade. They'll never disappear completely but you can help each other minimize them. Give into the love. Be silly. Get out of your comfort zone for the sake of making a fun memory. You just might have some fun.
Is it weird to say that I don't even want to love myself? Often times I enjoy feeling bad. But I get your point! Thanks a lot
Would you say it's still better than having depression and being alone? 
No it could be worse, that's for sure.
That is a great insight. Thank you for sharing. Depression is not about feeling bad because of what's going on, it's about feeling bad independent of what's going on.
Exactly. Everything could be going so well in my life, but I still feel miserable inside. That is depression, in a nutshell.
If unconditional unhappiness exists, does unconditional happiness exist?
I think most people are unconditionally happy - or at least 'content' or something along those lines.  Living requires an extraordinary amount of work  and if asked why they want to do it so much, there's no satisfactory REASON for it.  They just do.  Even most people with profoundly shitty lives don't consider suicide.
I never understood why we can't be sad if someone has it even worse than us.  With that logic, that means in our world of 8 billion people, only ONE person is allowed to feel sad!
That poor person, though...
This saying doesn't make sense anyway regardless. It's basically saying as soon as i realise that people are suffering, that's supposed to suddenly make me happier. Why would anyone be happy at that? If anything I feel worse knowing that there are people all over the world suffering. It's just ignorance and something I've heard people say when they're trying to make you feel better, but they haven't really thought before they speak.
You're right. Not only does it feel awful to know that others are suffering, I often feel even worse for feeling bad about my problems when others are worse off.  'Oh you feel bad? You should feel like shit for feeling bad, what is wrong with you?'  That's kind of all I hear...
Gotta laugh to keep from crying.
Gallows humor - the best way to move forward. 
I've had similar thought, except it is more that I don't want to inconvenience my great and loving family.
That's how I feel, too. I've thought a lot about how I would kill myself, and I always find myself shooting down ideas simply because it would be an inconvenience to clean up, unless I put a tarp down or something.
That's how I feel, too. I've thought a lot about how I would kill myself, and I always find myself shooting down ideas simply because it would be an inconvenience to clean up, unless I put a tarp down or something.
Yeah, and unfortunately, that only helps with the cleaning of the physical mess. They will still have to deal with the emotional/mental damage for the rest of their lives :/ Which is why I used to think that it would've been better if I had never been born/existed. That would've solved everything, I think.
Yeah, and unfortunately, that only helps with the cleaning of the physical mess. They will still have to deal with the emotional/mental damage for the rest of their lives :/ Which is why I used to think that it would've been better if I had never been born/existed. That would've solved everything, I think.
Yeah, that's true. Most times I feel like a burden to my parents, but I don't think I could bring myself to do that to them, especially to my mom. I love her more than anyone else on this planet and I don't want to even think about what my death would do to her.
I thought you just said you were suicidal?  Wouldn't it be blind leading the blind?
Sometimes people just need someone to listen to them. There's nothing wrong with trying to be there if anyone needs me. Some of my best talks have actually been with people who are going through the same thing. I never said I was trying to play therapist, I simply said I'm here to listen if anyone needs to talk.
Sometimes people just need someone to listen to them. There's nothing wrong with trying to be there if anyone needs me. Some of my best talks have actually been with people who are going through the same thing. I never said I was trying to play therapist, I simply said I'm here to listen if anyone needs to talk.
Thats the other thing that kept me from going through with it: getting out of my own head and listening to someone else's problems. 
me too man, me too
Too many people care about me for some strange reason.
Too many people care about me for some strange reason.
Perhaps it's because you're a wonderful person?
Perhaps it's because you're a wonderful person?
Oh you.
You will only be free when you don't give a shoot.
I thought I could get away with the 'I don't give a shoot' attitude. Unfortunately, I DO give a shoot. The problem is, I don't know what I give a shoot about. 
I thought I could get away with the 'I don't give a shoot' attitude. Unfortunately, I DO give a shoot. The problem is, I don't know what I give a shoot about. 
I tried living without regrets. My thought was that if I did everything to the best of my ability, even if something went wrong, I would have no regret since I had done all within my power.  Then I became exhausted and found I wasn't enjoying life.  I totally hear what you are saying. 'I don't know what I give a shoot about.' I question whether I have an unfulfilled need, a scar from the past, or perhaps this is simply my character. There is no easy answer.
I tried living without regrets. My thought was that if I did everything to the best of my ability, even if something went wrong, I would have no regret since I had done all within my power.  Then I became exhausted and found I wasn't enjoying life.  I totally hear what you are saying. 'I don't know what I give a shoot about.' I question whether I have an unfulfilled need, a scar from the past, or perhaps this is simply my character. There is no easy answer.
I always accepted that it was my character. I think I am programmed to think and feel this way. I never subscribed to the notion that everyone can be happy. I think for some of us, we have to feel this way and carry he burden. It's how we carry the burden that matters. I think most of us here are struggling to just remain here, and not fall down into the depths of r/suicidewatch. 
Except you won't care about other peoples feelings after you're dead, because you'll be dead.
Well obviously haha, but I'm still the type of person to think of other people before myself. It's kind of the only reason I'm alive.
I'm with you. If they don't want public displaces of gore, suicide should be 100% legal for everyone regardless of personal reason.
It's the idea that killing yourself is wrong *because it will make a few dozen commuters 45 mins late*. Never mind the things going on in your life that make you despise living so much that you don't want to do it any longer. Some people could be *inconvenienced!*
It does feel like that. We should be taking piano lessons.
That made me smile. Thank you
That made me smile. Thank you
Ha - sure. I didn't want to go as far as buying life insurance from that annoying guy...
'Hell, if I'm gonna feel miserable regardless what I do, why not feel miserable learning a new skill?' Then bam, a little less sad.
> 'Hell, if I'm gonna feel miserable regardless what I do, why not feel miserable learning a new skill?'      Because I can't afford it... 
Dang that. I'd rather eat a shitload of food. 
And then feel like vomiting 
Groundhog day lasted for _ten years_.  I've also been thinking about this. Nothing ever happens and I can't do any bigger changes.
Wasn’t it forty years?
Wasn’t it forty years?
I've at least read ten years.  >https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Groundhog_Day_(film)#Time_loop_duration_speculations  > In the DVD commentary, Ramis estimated a real-time duration of 10 years. Later, Ramis told a reporter, 'I think the 10-year estimate is too short. It takes at least 10 years to get good at anything, and allotting for the down time and misguided years he spent, it had to be more like 30 or 40 years.'  So, kinda both. Yet I don't know how one can survive 40 years without becoming a drooling mass. 
This isn't exactly the same thing, but I've always felt disconnected from the past and the future. I don't trust my short or long term memory. I'm terrible at remembering how many times I've done something, if I have to keep count of something at work, for example. And I have no faith in the future's existence, which detaches me from everything but the present moment. So it feels like I've never done anything but what I'm doing right now, and never will do anything else.
So often in this sub I read an articulation of an experience with depression on which I've never reflected but have encountered and could never express as succinctly even if I had.   This is one of those times.   As is OPs observation.
Yes, I concur.  It will ultimately deplete the brain of essential vitamins, such as vitamin B1 https://www.alcoholtreatment.net/vitamin-b-deficiency-alcohol-abuse/.    A different coping mechanism would be good.  Caffeine intake should be limited to less than or equal to 300 mg/day, although modest amounts are perfectly fine and can even be used to improve motiviation alleviate some of the symptoms of depression.
Caffeine is my jam. Ever since I started working in a coffee shop, I started to drink coffee and it gives me that extra boost. I'm consuming moderate amounts and I don't experience any adverse side effects, though. 
Have you considered learning how to count cards and playing blackjack?
Have you ever seen a grown man naked?
That's pretty much my life, sometimes these bursts are triggered when i listen to music or when i'm about to have a nice meal! And sometimes they come out of nowhere! I wish these bursts would last longer! *Sigh*
Yeah man. Sometimes I wished I didn't get them at all. It is like waking up from a dream where you happy, only to be greeted by the fact that you will never feel that way again, at least for a longer time.
Hey I feel like you and a lot of people who are having the same episodes like this may look into Bipolar. My friend once she switched from depression meds to bipolar meds, her Quality of life improved. A lot of 'depressed' people are actually bipolar and experience long States of feeling low followed by brief stints of mania.
I don't think that this qualifies for bipolar disorder because the episodes are brief.
Happening to me right now. It's brutal and always unpredictable. I hope maybe you can at least manage  the depression in these times. It works for me real well. It keeps me from self harm. 
I just fell asleep. It feels good not be thinking anything at all.
I just fell asleep. It feels good not be thinking anything at all.
Sleep is the greatest thing for me, not because i rest, but because im in a different world.
It happened last night, when my crush finally replied to my message, and when I read it, my happiness turned into sadness because of her coldness, I'm so pathetic to hope..
What usually gets me down is seeing her updated profile picture and the people that comment on that. I might stop using social media, it just too bad to see other people happy interactions with each other.
What usually gets me down is seeing her updated profile picture and the people that comment on that. I might stop using social media, it just too bad to see other people happy interactions with each other.
Look up anxious attachment disorder. Sounds like that may be playing a role in how you feel. 
I used to, but then I just remember that there is no such thing as happiness, so I'm always in a low mood.  I haven't left the house in 3 weeks.  I get yelled at everyday, what's fun about living when you hate going out and talking to other people?  I wish I never existed...
I feel your pain. If I didn't have children I'd be permanently in bed. Thoughts of not existing plague me daily. You're not alone x
>Probably doesn't like me  =( I'm always paranoid people will wrongly think I dislike them because I know I can come off as cold and antisocial.. aloof, I guess.   In reality, I'm just scared shitless that they're going to dislike me. Which they end up doing anyway, because they don't think I like them either. My brain is an idiot.
I remember reading something about how you should always greet people like a dog excited to see its owner. How to win friends and influence people I believe.   Basically, just smile real pretty and be super friendly. At the very least people won't think you don't like them. Heck, maybe they'll be extra receptive to you.
I remember reading something about how you should always greet people like a dog excited to see its owner. How to win friends and influence people I believe.   Basically, just smile real pretty and be super friendly. At the very least people won't think you don't like them. Heck, maybe they'll be extra receptive to you.
I can't, I lost my tail in 'nam.
sadly if you do that at a job most likely you'll get sexual harassment charges filed against you. Or if you do it at school depending on grade get accused of being interested in the person or if same sex accused of being gay. Then if in normal public it can cause all kinds of problems..
No, I think you're overthinking.
Where are these from? I saw another comic with the same character and style. 
Yeah, I saw and saved that one too.  When I saw this one, I was filled with hope that there might be more.  Turns out...[there is](http://bogglelovesyou.tumblr.com/)  Thank you Google reverse image search.
Yeah, I saw and saved that one too.  When I saw this one, I was filled with hope that there might be more.  Turns out...[there is](http://bogglelovesyou.tumblr.com/)  Thank you Google reverse image search.
oh wow, I really love the way it gestures with its feet because it has no arms.
'Some weird stuff?' Dang.
Weird stuff is good. People without weird stuff are boring ;) 
I like to remind myself of the Spotlight Effect, wherein you tend to feel like others are far more aware of you than they actually are. Sometimes I'll wear the same shirt two days in a row, for example, and assume everyone remembers, but they seriously do not. I mean, when was the last time you noticed something like that about someone else?
Just a couple days ago my 5 year old niece suddenly looks at me and says , 'why do you always wear the same shirt?' So people do notice my many flaws.
Just a couple days ago my 5 year old niece suddenly looks at me and says , 'why do you always wear the same shirt?' So people do notice my many flaws.
Well, kids I can maybe grant you. But their brains don't really work the same as us grown adults. They're much less internally aware and more externally-focused.
[Probably not the nicest thing to post here, but certainly relevant.](http://i.imgur.com/DRQJk.jpg)
I didn't give you permission to use my likeness in that last panel.
I didn't give you permission to use my likeness in that last panel.
Finally, a touch of levity! I like you.
[Probably not the nicest thing to post here, but certainly relevant.](http://i.imgur.com/DRQJk.jpg)
That's not even partially relevant, or necessary.
I dreamed i was in a loving relationship and experienced pure happiness. Felt like a completely new and unknown sensation...  Makes the disappointment only greater...
This has been me recently. Experiencing my first true heartbreak and I dream so fondly of good things with the person and wake up thinking it was all real. Not much hurts more than when it sinks in that it was all just a dream 
Just the other day I had a dream where I made all these new friends and I finally had a group of friends at school, rather than a few acquaintances who only talk to me when they're bored.  When I woke up, I felt like I'd lost something 
I hate that, feeling like you've lost something that wasn't even real to begin with :/
It just lingers over you. Every other dream, most of them are forgotten within minutes after waking up. But these dreams, you will never forget.
Yup. None of my friends understand how much it affects my mood for the day. They just think I'm crazy
Yup. None of my friends understand how much it affects my mood for the day. They just think I'm crazy
Sometimes I don't want to get out of bed because I know how miserable and lonely my day will be, but sometimes I don't want to get out of bed because the feeling you can get in dreams is ten times better than any real-life feelings. The subject matter isn't always pleasant but there's a certain enticing quality about the dream world that I can't quite put my finger on.
I hate dreams where the people I love are still alive - only for me to wake to the sight of a white ceiling, and the familiarity of reality sets in to remind me that they're long gone and so is the happiness that I held with them.   I feel this so hard. I'm sorry. 
I'm sorry that you can relate to this in any way
I only find them cruel if I fail to remember them or write them down. My dreams are usually just visually interesting; the only dream that legitimately made me sad to realize was a dream was one where I met a really nice girl and we walked down a cold city sidewalk as light snow fell.
Here's to hoping that dream becomes de já vu.
Dreaming of a girl I loved so much, waking up to the reality that she no longer cares. I gave her all of my love, but now I'm the one hurting everyday and night while she is happily loving life, she's on top of the world.
I was in this place just 1 month ago.. but now I have a new girlfriend and things are going slowly better  There is still hope.. nothing guaranted, but there is
Happens to me a lot, today included. My dreams are better than my real life. I wake up into a nightmare. 
I used to have nightmares. Sometimes I still do 
I dreamed the Apocalypse was happening. 
Honestly would prefer the apocalypse over what my life is going through right now tbh... 
My mom laughed at me when I told her I thought I was depressed. 
I got, 'No, honey, this is just a phase, it's your puberty.'
I got, 'No, honey, this is just a phase, it's your puberty.'
Normally I'd give you a 'I know that feel bro' image to look at.. but not here.. I'm just gonna give you an internet hug. A big internet hug because my situation drove a huge wedge between me and my mom.
Me too, friend. I really wish they had been right.
I also felt strange that none of my other friends seemed to want to kill themselves?  ISNT THIS PUBERTY GUIZ? O_O
If I ever told my mother, I think she'd believe me. She has slight depression...  Sorry for bringing up an old thread....
<3 <3 <3
This is why I didn't tell my family about my depression. They didn't find out till I was failing at my course, seeing a psychiatrist and on meds for them to really believe me. 
I'm able to disassociate when I'm at school.. I sort of take on this other.. personality? It's a weird way to explain it. Like a paper bag filled with water. It only holds the water for so long, but then the water starts to come out. I have to be away from people for a bit so I can change the bag, so to speak.
I'm able to disassociate when I'm at school.. I sort of take on this other.. personality? It's a weird way to explain it. Like a paper bag filled with water. It only holds the water for so long, but then the water starts to come out. I have to be away from people for a bit so I can change the bag, so to speak.
If you mean that you find it difficult to stay around others, or you can't stand people after a while, then I totally get you. 
Maybe take a bath instead. If only tubs weren't so fricken' small everywhere I go.
Go to Japan. They love their baths.  Or maybe buy a bathtub from Japan. That could work.
Hey man. We're browsing a forum about depression. You didn't kill the mood. Thanks for sharing. Appreciate ya.
Seriously, this is the type of thing we are here for. If you came in all flowers and sunshine it would kill the mood
Mate I'm sorry, I thought I was alone in shit hole.  I need a beer. You want a beer? Lets get a beer.
I'll come with you my one true friend committed suicide not to long ago after she was cheated on by the same guy for the second time and now I have no one 
I'll come with you my one true friend committed suicide not to long ago after she was cheated on by the same guy for the second time and now I have no one 
Sorry to hear that. Feel free to tag along, we are gonna get wasted.
I feel this sentiment so much. It's really difficult to deal with. I hope you can find someone. If you want a meaningless internet pal I'll talk to you if you want! 🙂
Nothing meaningless about an internet pal yo. Most of my pals are internet pals. Reading your post made me sadder than I was :( :( :(
Nothing meaningless about an internet pal yo. Most of my pals are internet pals. Reading your post made me sadder than I was :( :( :(
I think he meant a pal but not bff in meaningless, not that Internet pals are meaningless.
Thank you for this post. For a moment I didn't question my depression and feel like shit for having it without a reason. 
Good.  Pass it on when you meet another depressed person.  It's helpful to remind each other of this stuff.
I often think 'no matter how bad your life is, there's always someone who's in deeper shit than you are.'  It's a cold comfort.
So is the reverse true? Just because someone is happier than you, you can't be as happy. 
Yeah I get this feeling a lot   I go to a good uni, don't lack money at all (enough to not have to work for the rest of my life) but everything is dull and I don't really want to wake up every morning   Games used to keep me busy but now idk
WTF! You never have to work again...  Think about how shootin depressing it is to grind the 9 to 5 to make ends meet.  I don't mean to be an idiot. But you have so much to be grateful for
WTF! You never have to work again...  Think about how shootin depressing it is to grind the 9 to 5 to make ends meet.  I don't mean to be an idiot. But you have so much to be grateful for
yeah thats why i feel really guilty for not enjoying anything  i've tried doing charity work, personal hobbies, theoretical physics, etc, but nothing really  does the trick for me
yeah thats why i feel really guilty for not enjoying anything  i've tried doing charity work, personal hobbies, theoretical physics, etc, but nothing really  does the trick for me
give surfing a shot. That saved me  
It's incredible how idiots can people be.
It's like calling 911 and getting a 15s ad. 
It's like calling 911 and getting a 15s ad. 
Brilliant, I suggested it to my local law enforcement agency.
Brilliant, I suggested it to my local law enforcement agency.
I've been put on hold multiple times when calling 911. I'm surprised they haven't taken this route already!
Disgusting that idiots would try and take advantage of people, can't an admin have it's account deleted?
The bot is has been shut down while we (the admins and the mod team) investigate the situation.  The organization behind it appears to be well-meaning, although whether their software can do everything it claims is something I have serious doubts about.  
The bot is has been shut down while we (the admins and the mod team) investigate the situation.  The organization behind it appears to be well-meaning, although whether their software can do everything it claims is something I have serious doubts about.  
Pretty sure they are full of the bean. I'm also sure they knew what they were doing when stating this mess
Pretty sure they are full of the bean. I'm also sure they knew what they were doing when stating this mess
>  full of the bean  ??
I have to say that the technology itself looks like an interesting idea, but if it's in the hands of people who behave in this way, that is incredibly disturbing. 
According to their google its only on kik and FB messenger 
According to their google its only on kik and FB messenger 
The bot account is definitely active here behind the scenes.  
Is there a way to block users before they message you? 
Not as far as I know.  
I'm confused; what did this bot exactly do?
It's allegedly some sort of mental-health support service.  We're still not clear on the details, but we and the reddit admins are working to learn more.  
It's allegedly some sort of mental-health support service.  We're still not clear on the details, but we and the reddit admins are working to learn more.  
Ah, I see. Thanks for the heads up, regardless.
I just subscribed to interact with others who have mental illnesses.  I don't know what this 'bot' thing means.  Do I unsubscribe? 
You shouldn't need to worry about it.  If you get a message from it, let us know, but that's unlikely at this point.  
Oh
is your username a reference to the song by the Animals?
is your username a reference to the song by the Animals?
Nope
Nope
Is it a reference to you being a pilot?
Wish I knew this before I replied.
How long ago did they PM you?  It's okay that you replied, just know that we have serious concerns about them so I wouldn't take their 'help' too seriously.  
One day ago.
Thanks.  We've been assured that they've now been stopped.  
Right out of my journal I swear 
Same 
Same 
Same if I had the motivaition to write
Same if I had the motivaition to write
Eh it's more of a habit. When I'm really sad I don't bother
I don’t have dreams, sleep is like a free trial of death for me 
'Free trial of death,' don't think I've ever heard a better description of how wonderful sleep is. Although, sometimes I do recall very pleasant dreams, and when I do, I'm very pissed that I've awoken to my crappy life and can't go back to sleep.
Same. It's cost me 18 jobs and puts tons of stress on my relationship. She has to pay and cook and clean while I struggle to do anything  I feel like the world's biggest piece of shit. 
Hey, she understands you and gets what youre going through. And depression sucksn idiot man it shooting sucks. Maybe once in a while, just for her, cook breakfast. Just breakfast. Then im sure you can slowly move on to other things in the house to make things easier for her. Baby steps though man, baby steps. 
Same. I usually feel like I'm just being annoying. Sometimes I can't even look at the replies I get...
That's how I feel too. 
That's how I feel too. 
And then if I get down voted I won't comment or post for a week.  A troll or hater leaves a negative comments I won't load up Reddit for a month.  I've even deleted my account because of it.   You're not alone.
And then if I get down voted I won't comment or post for a week.  A troll or hater leaves a negative comments I won't load up Reddit for a month.  I've even deleted my account because of it.   You're not alone.
I understand, and it's really silly. I don't want to care what some random internetn idiot thinks because I know it doesn't matter, but I still do. Anyway I liked this particular comment man. 
Same here. I always want to engage in conversation and give my opinion in threads but never comment because of insecurity. Being a non-native English speaker doesn't help. 
Hey, from one non-native speaker to another, your English is absolutely fine!
Hey, from one non-native speaker to another, your English is absolutely fine!
Speaking as an actual native speaker, both of you guys' comments sound just perfect! You two write so eloquently. ❤️
People say math is hard. I disagree. There is an exact science behind it, it either is or isn't. A number will always be that number, regardless of who's reading it, but words... words are complicated. There are definitely way more variables, so much can be interpreted from a word. A single word can have multiple meanings and values. Sometimes I feel like I could swallow a dictionary and still wouldn't spit out the right words to say what I mean. Words are sentiments that get lost in translation.
Yeah words can be used to explain stuff, express feelings, teach stuff, ask questions, describe stuff, share your thoughts and opinions.  It can also be used to explain math!   I think words can be amazing, you have a broad spectrum and even broader if you speak different languages. But I also understand that it can be a jumble of things to choose that never seem just right. Lot more place for disagreement. 
More and more I'm starting to wonder if depression is linked with marx's assessment of alienation from our labor.  I'm really starting to think it's part of it.
I think so, too. I've done a lot of different types of work and the only time I feel fulfilled at all is when I write (as a hobby) and somebody tells me they liked it (doesn't happen often).  All the money I've made in my life can't compare to that feeling, but that feeling doesn't feed and clothe and shelter me. It just gives my life a transient semblance of meaning.
I think so, too. I've done a lot of different types of work and the only time I feel fulfilled at all is when I write (as a hobby) and somebody tells me they liked it (doesn't happen often).  All the money I've made in my life can't compare to that feeling, but that feeling doesn't feed and clothe and shelter me. It just gives my life a transient semblance of meaning.
I like the way you wrote this comment
Check out /r/latestagecapitalism and /r/socialism if you haven't already.
And /r/socialism101
You and OP and others in this thread with the same sentiments may be interested in socialism/anarchism, although I can't say reading up on it will make you any less depressed lol
Can confirm. Became an anarchist and now the world looks like a freaking hellhole. Still, it's unbelievable how much of modern 'common sense' was simply made up. It's unbelievable how people simply accept so much shooted up nonsense.
Anarchism is awesome, no wonder why goverments label any bedlam as one. Though anarchism requers for everyone to behave NOT like douche, which is hard.
Eh I disagree; the worst douches are douches with power.
Anarchism is awesome, no wonder why goverments label any bedlam as one. Though anarchism requers for everyone to behave NOT like douche, which is hard.
And that's why, as much as I'd like it, I don't support anarchy. Too many moving parts for it to *not* mess up hard.
I implore you all to research the state of technology.  [/r/automate](https://reddit.com/r/Automate/top/?sort=top&t=all)
And whys that
Not to say that modern life doesnt have it's downs, but saying it is modern day slavery.... thats a bit much. You are free to do whatever you want which doesnt have to be a 9-5 office job, something slaves are not free to do. There are options and jobs out there you can get that arent 9-5, and if you find something you are passionate about, 'work' can be something that really provides meaning and purpose in your life
> You are free to do whatever you want which doesnt have to be a 9-5 office job  Several more hours are taken in order to maintain and/or reproduce employment/wage slavery (commuting, shopping for or maintaining work clothes, maintaining car and house so that they can efficiently serve your work life needs etc.)
Or you could just find a job you actually enjoy.  If there is something you enjoy an are good at then there are chances you could make money off of it.  I am not a slave, I love programming so I found a job as a developer.  I work with a great team of people and we are constantly laughing.  I can honestly say I love my job.  You just need to find what you like and tie it into a job.
>Or you could just find a job you actually enjoy.  If only it was that easy.
>Or you could just find a job you actually enjoy.  If only it was that easy.
You mean possible. If jobs were enjoyable you wouldn't get paid to do them.
did the same all day just putting boxes on a conver belt would of prefered blowing my brains out
We did the same thing too... I've never thought about death so much in one day than during that period.  I mean I still feel the urge to just drop to my death or walk in front of a train or something and let it end everyday. But it's not every waking moment like it was then. But there's only so long we can fail uni courses and block out reality.  I wish I could I could just disappear completely :/
I too, have had enough of this bullshit. If this is life, I'd rather not be born in the first place. Life itself is already meaningless, so why am I working my ass off some boring and grueling routine?  Oh that's right, I need money! If only I was rich...
this is what life is i actually dont want any part in it tbh
this is what life is i actually dont want any part in it tbh
It's a senseless grind. There's no end until we die.
It's a senseless grind. There's no end until we die.
Can someone more social than me tell me if this feeling persists even when you have a significant other who loves you? Because atm, not even family is enough to comfort me. The only glimmer of hope I see is my dog. Her carelesness and kind nature are the strings that hold me together. I'm not joking.
>Life itself is already meaningless...  >Oh that's right, I need money! If only I was rich...  If these two ideas suddenly became mainstream, the heads of the rich would roll... 
Topple them! Damn bourgeois...
I remember learning about communism in school and thinking it actually sounded like a decent idea if we could make it work beyond pure theory. Then class discussion happened and I realized I was the odd one out.  I still don't get what's so terrible about the idea of everyone supporting each other for the community's well-being. We can achieve so much more by relying on each other than vying for the top like rabid monkeys.
Communism, like any political system, works great on paper and then immediately gets corrupted the moment you introduce the practical effects of human nature.
[deleted]    ^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^0.5002   > [What is this?](https://pastebin.com/64GuVi2F)
Said the bourgie to the workers.
What would you rather be doing? 
That's the problem. I have no clue. I just know that the idea of dragging myself out of bed at 6 am every day, going to work at 8, not getting home until 5 or 6, bed at 10 makes me absolutely miserable. I would literally probably go be a drug dealer if it meant getting out of the daily routine. 
[deleted]    ^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^0.5423   > [What is this?](https://pastebin.com/64GuVi2F)
Do you use a special mouthwash to get the taste of your boss'n idiot out of your mouth?
>Saving my sanity is worth it.  Good for you for taking this standpoint.  I would rather not make as much money if it meant keeping control over myself.
Thank you. And yeah exactly! I think a lot of people wait until their breaking point which is never good. 
Then do it. 
I get it, motivation is great and all, but if you want to make money, don't become a musician. 
OMG this is my exact struggle. I have been at my current job for 3 years now and it is stable, good benefits, decent pay. But I hate it so much I want to quit so badly but my boyfriend and my mom encourage me to stay put. I'm like do you not realize this job contributes to me wanting to kill myself?!
Oh man, I had a similar conversation with a friend of mine.   Him: You really should hang onto that job.  Me: No way, I have to get out, it's making me miserable.  Him: But, it has such great benefits! Their retirement plan is outstanding!  Me: I don't see what good a retirement plan will be if the job makes me *kill myself!*
i honestly would prefer to be dead than work for the rest of my doing something i shooting hated dreading getting up in the morning everyday , ill try become an entrepreneur and if that fails well i dont know what im going to do.
Being an entrepreneur doesn't mean you won't have a boss. Raising VC funds will just enslave you and your intellectual property to those who want to invest. Instead of having a boss, you'll have a board and stakeholders that you report to.  Edit: typo
I'm in the same situation, except it's my dad's company. What should I do? I shooting hate this but it's either that or the company goes to shit after he passes. I'm stuck in a pickle.
I'll run your dad's company for you if you want :)
Meh, I love working. I love working 80-90 hours and barely sleeping.
Joking or....?
Not joking at all. I'm a work horse. I love working mate. 
no offense but i hate workaholics.. It makes regular workers like me look really bad.. I guess only Boss likes workaholics in their company, awesome slave to themyou know?
I feel you. But for me it helps when I think: Wow I am getting money just for existing right now. All I have to do is whatever this guy says
You're making all the money you need by your work alone. All your employer is doing is stealing from you.
Join the Military and work 70 plus hours :^)
Dang that.
It's not slavery because you are not forced to do the job and you're getting paid.   Downvoted for stating a fact. Nice.
But is choosing between working or starving really a choice?
Our ancestors worked less than we do in the modern day.
I think less than a few hours a week for hunter gatherers.
This is depression, not reality.    The universe is a mirror. If this juvenile crypto-communist crap is truly what you all are seeing, it indicates the need to work on yourself, not overthrow 'the system' so you don't have to work.  The enemy here is depression, not people who like their jobs.
> This is depression, not reality.   That may be why I posted it in r/depression.
Well just go live in the woods then? I think you need a reality check. Its not slavery if you agree to work for a certain wage. You could quit your job right now if you wanted to.
and what choices do you have ? thats the illusion society gives everyone your not free, if you are you die...
It's not slavery, a conspiracy, or unnecessary. We need work to produce things... It sucks but why are ppl railing against the 'system?' What do you think will happen if everyone stops working? Not saying this to downplay people's stress over this but you'd probably be a bit happier if you didn't think there was some evil conspiracy going on.
>We need work to produce things  Yes we do. What we don't need is to be stuck in soul-crushing, alienating work designed only to make the rich richer, while struggling to eat ourselves.
Maybe you can get a pretty good job and work it for 5 years, save up a ton of money, then quit and live off the savings for another 5 years while you live at home in your own pocket of bliss. Run out of money and repeat.
But then while you're working, you'd need to pay for food, clothes, bills and whatever you require to stay sane. You couldn't save enough money to live on for that long.
That's awesome! I'd love to hear from you again next year!
Done!
Just wanted to say that your story is super inspiring to a shootup like myself. I hope you do great things and I'm so glad you're pushing your boundaries and really doing all you can!
I don't know your story, but calling yourself a shootup isn't going to help you out. Maybe you did have some shoot-ups in the past, but that doesn't define who you are. You are someone who learns from his mistakes and powers forwards with renewed ability to live a good life. 
I don't even know you, hut I am proud of you! You have the fighting spirit I wish so many others had! You are inspirational!
Thanks! I owe a lot to my parents - they told me to come home and basically took care of me while I tried to get back on my feet. 
Sounds like you had a busy year nonetheless.... I'm impressed that you could get up to so much even while feeling so depressed. Stay strong!
Not going to lie - medication and therapy helped a lot. I spent many hours for many months lying on the floor of my parent's house starting at lint balls because I was too fatigued and apathetic to move.  Went on three different meds before I found one that didn't turn me into a zombie or get me so hyped up that I was worried I would do something rash.  
I've spent the past four days in bed. Today I basically just stared at the ceiling for 16 hours straight, tormented by my thoughts. Sometimes I wonder how long a man can live miles below the point of minimum basic humanity without taking his own life.
Dang man, thats sounds like me. Like theres no point in leaving bed. I just lay there listening to music. Contemplating my shit life. 
Dang man, thats sounds like me. Like theres no point in leaving bed. I just lay there listening to music. Contemplating my shit life. 
What music do you listen to?
What music do you listen to?
I do the same thing and just lie in bed all day. I tend to listen to DSBM (Depressive Suicidal Black Metal)
Just out of interest, are you a young male between the age of 15 and 24?
Are young males between the ages of 15-24 more prone for depression? I think I heard this before but I'm not sure. Is that why you were asking?
Even with antidepreasants, its still hard for me to get out of bed most days. I work, i lay in bed, back to work. I text people on my phone when I can, but when no one's answering me I tend to think thats fine, they've probably got more important things to do.  Video games can only keep my interest for fove minutes, if that. Honestly, I've found the only escape from my own mind was to start reading in bed.
I hate it when people don't reply. Well there were only two people I could text. I gave up texting eventually. Not heard from them in ages. I don't think they were real friends.
I do this aswell, not really stay in bed, but I do aimlessly walk around the apartment.
Exactly. I aimlessly walk around all day, thinking random unimportant things, then redditing, and sleeping.
I suffer from huge social anxiety. Recently joined POF, and I actually have gotten replies from girls which is great. However, I spend my whole days watching girls get completely bored of chatting with me, one by one. I spend like an hour trying to figure out what message to send next, but it's all just tediously boring conversations over and over again.
Anecdotal but maybe helpful.... I met my boyfriend on POF (3 years shortly!). He said he was about a day away from giving up when I replied to his message.   Sometimes I wonder what my life would be like if I hadn't just sent that message back. Without him, life would be bleak. I am so thankful he kept trying and that, of course, I replied back.
Definitely, I'm there too.  It's horrible.  The fog makes it so hard to make decisions or do anything.   I used to pick things up pretty quickly and now it feels like I can't even do simple tasks by myself.  Part of it is the self doubt as well.   I feel like I'm dumb now and the bad thoughts start and it cycles.  It really sucks.
When you were a straight A, honor student who was supposed to 'go places' like, sorry everyone. The only question now is when I'm gonna off myself.
That's a really good metaphor! Except when my hand is on fire, people believe me when I tell them about it.
Exactly. Its really hard when people cant visually see what we are feeling. Adds to the stigma that we are just looking for attention. One time a friend of mine said 'keep your chin up man, its all in your head', to which i replied:  'I know. Thats the problem.'
Exactly. Its really hard when people cant visually see what we are feeling. Adds to the stigma that we are just looking for attention. One time a friend of mine said 'keep your chin up man, its all in your head', to which i replied:  'I know. Thats the problem.'
I have an additional problem to that, which is living in a society where mental issues don't exist apparently and people with actual issues are stereotyped as straitjacket wearing lip-flapping padded room dwellers. Which means that if I actually sought a professional to help with my depression I might as well lock myself up in an asylum due to the stigma I'll face. Not to mention we have an *extremely* limited access to therapy and I simply don't have that luxury.   
Same. I get super foggy to the point my eyes can’t even focus. Anything I try to read is clear, I can see it, but my eyes can’t focus on the words or decipher them. It’s like I’m super tired but I’m not, I’m wide awake. I usually get really overwhelmed really easily when my brain is foggy like that. Can’t think can’t make decisions can’t focus I just exist. 
Omg. This is me. I feel like my world is falling apart but I can't see it clearly enough to hold it together...
Suffering from it myself, it is definitly a barrier, how long have you been brain fogged? 
At least 7 years! I can't remember the last time I had a clear head 
At least 7 years! I can't remember the last time I had a clear head 
I oft hear it disappears at age 25, if you are lucky, you've probably heard people mention your brain doesn't turn off when you sleep, my own fog is caused by it according to doctors. Do you have a healthy diet and sleep schedule? It helped me a bit, unlike the carbamazepine. 
I oft hear it disappears at age 25, if you are lucky, you've probably heard people mention your brain doesn't turn off when you sleep, my own fog is caused by it according to doctors. Do you have a healthy diet and sleep schedule? It helped me a bit, unlike the carbamazepine. 
Yes diet and sleep definitely help to reduce it, and avoiding alcohol. I'm 26 now so maybe I'm not so lucky :(
Brain fog is my biggest nemesis in depression because it makes it impossible to get anything worthwhile done if I do find the motivation.   I've been changing up my diet to have less refined sugar and carbs and more protein. It has helped somewhat for me. I feel less exhausted and foggy in general. But it's hard because making healthy choices while depressed. If you sometimes lose you appetite while depressed like me, it's hard to force yourself to eat a salad and not pizza. 
>  it's hard to force yourself to eat a salad and not pizza.   make that a vegan pizza at least.
I battled this for years.  There are other root causes. Depression is just a symptom. I had following things that all cause brain fog, anxiety, depression, weight gain, Unable to lose weight, fatigue, etc.  1. Candida 2. Sleep Apnea 3. SIBO (small intestine bacterial overgrowth)  I have two of these resolved. Working on the third one. Do some research, compare your symptoms. 95% of neurotransmitters are made in your gut. Heal your gut.
This should be at the top
I've heard the gut is responsible for a huge portion of one's immune system but didn't know of the neurotransmitter thing. 95% for real?
Yes, just Google it. Here is a link. https://www.scientificamerican.com/article/gut-second-brain/
Yep. It makes me feel stupid sometimes. Like, when I'm having a conversarion with someone I know what I want to say in my head, but I can't form it into words.
Yes that happens to me too! Like a delayed reaction
Yes that happens to me too! Like a delayed reaction
Same. Sometimes I feel 'verbally paralyzed' if you will. It happens to me when I'm at college, I'm don't have many people to hang out with and spend more time alone than is healthy.
Definitely, especially when people are talking to me. I hear what they are saying, I understand their words but it just kinda buzzes off and it makes no sense what they are saying even though I know it makes sense and i know what they're saying. Anyone else?
Same. It's like I need to take a moment to really understand what they said, or ask them to repeat it, which sucks because you feel like a jerk who's not paying attention to them.
Same. It's like I need to take a moment to really understand what they said, or ask them to repeat it, which sucks because you feel like a jerk who's not paying attention to them.
Yes! I totally was listening. And following. And now that you're done talking, I couldn't recall what you were saying if you put a gun to my head. I feel horrible when that happens. 
 I get major brain fog when I have PMS, as well as feeling more depressed than usual. It’s such a weird feeling that it happens so regularly on a monthly basis, but sometimes i forget and I’m like “why am I feeling crazy and like I can’t do anything right?? I am barely functioning rn” but then I remember it’s the beginning of the month and I’m about to have my feminine glow.
Sounds like you may have r/PMDD
YES. A friend of mine describes it as feeling like your brain is full of cotton wool.
Yeah! It feels like there's something physically inside my head 
I sometimes get intense brain fog. I've started running and I've felt a bit happier generally as well as being about to think clearly while running it's been surprisingly effective and surprisingly addictive.  Start running guys. It's hard and shitty at first but it gets a lot better.
I used to be so into running. Now it's so hard to get out the door. But it is so worth it.
It's like my brain is lagging
LOL exactly
yeah, i completely get that. im honestly just cheating my way through school at this point, since i can't focus for the life of me. i feel so horrible about it.   i think i'd just rather kill myself at this point, it really doesn't matter much anyways.
You absolutely matter, as much as you might think that you don't. With help, it gets better.
Psychomotor Retardation I believe is the term you’re looking for or pseudodemntia I think it’s called. It’s terrible. 
 I was surprised during one of my last visits that there was a name for that *thing* I've felt my whole life. I described it to the therapist as 'lead legs'. She got a good chuckle out of it.
Can you give some context? Like, are you on medication?
Mother emotionally abused me/didn't love me growing up and was sexually abused by one of my coaches. Been depressed for as long as I can remember. Brain fog started about 7 years ago. Can't remember the last time I had a clear head or was happy. Started meds a week and a half ago, hopefully it helps
If you guys could put your mind together in reading this Reddit and comment back your views, it means you guys are not interested in what you are trying to do. Try to find out what you are really interested in or try to work on making what you wanna do more interesting. 
You clearly know nothing about depression. You sound ignorant, so you probably shouldn't comment here until you do some research. 
I don't want a relationship because I know I need to focus on my own well being but man I just want someone to hold me and play with my hair while we watch really bad movies. 
I feel you
Gay guy here. I placed an ad on craigslist and met this wonderful guy last year who was looking for exactly the same as me ( cuddling only ) . We had a great night and in the end became best friends. 
That's a really wholesome story. Thanks for sharing!
Best thing I ever did was get a dog. Cuddles every day. He snuggles up to me at night too. And snores, but I don't mind. 
This gives me so much hope, I can't wait to get a dog and cuddle with him all the time. It sounds wonderful.
I haven't had any physical human contact in over 5 years haha 😅😅😅 kill me lmao
15 years and running though, haha.
15 years and running though, haha.
My whole life I've had none, and I'm 21
I love having my dog around to cuddle. Too bad he can't talk, but I'm pretty sure he understands most of what I say 😁 
what did we do to deserve dogs ;-;
what did we do to deserve dogs ;-;
We bred them over thousands of years, that's what 🐶🐶
Trust me it's only a temporary form of happiness.. I've been dating this girl for the past 2 weeks and we've slept together 3 times so far including last night. She's working tonight while I'm at my house all alone. I realized through out the day that even if I feel good when I'm with her, it doesn't help at all with the fact that I hate myself. She tells me I'm beautiful, nice, and gives me a ton of compliments, but I still feel like shit.
Still, feeling good sometimes > feeling good never
Still, feeling good sometimes > feeling good never
True but in the span of 1 day I went from the happiest I've been in 2 years to the saddest from thinking about me not being worthy of her.
True but in the span of 1 day I went from the happiest I've been in 2 years to the saddest from thinking about me not being worthy of her.
Realizing you have something worth losing can be stressful.   They always say if someone else is hanging out with you they feel worthy of you. Let them decide, don't over think it, don't make the decision for them. 
I definitely feel the same way.  I miss my ex and I wish he was here to keep me company.  I'm so lonely and sad without him.  I wish I had been a better bf, fml
Just remember that ''this too shall pass''. Everything in your life is ''just'' a bump in the road. A very long one. It wouldn't feel natural if there never were anything wrong. :-)
Just remember that ''this too shall pass''. Everything in your life is ''just'' a bump in the road. A very long one. It wouldn't feel natural if there never were anything wrong. :-)
will depression pass? will thinking about my dead brother pass? will chronic pain that gets worse by the day pass?  Sure it's all good to have that attitude, but there are some things that just might not pass until i'm dead and it's not that comforting to think that death is what will make my problems easier.
will depression pass? will thinking about my dead brother pass? will chronic pain that gets worse by the day pass?  Sure it's all good to have that attitude, but there are some things that just might not pass until i'm dead and it's not that comforting to think that death is what will make my problems easier.
I'm sorry for your pain. Hang in there <3
You should check out r/cuddlebuddies You might find someone in your area
If you live in the us that is
If you live in the us that is
I'm Canadian and started to talk with someone on there
I'm Canadian and started to talk with someone on there
Well fair enough but canada is next to the us :p
Same to me. I was just wondered if it's easier to sit on your couch alone watching Netflix when you don't know any different. At least you don't MISS something? I mean dreaming sucks too, but I guess missing something is worse. I don't know. Maybe it's not..
Missing it is definitely worse. But please don't let that stop you from trying. Y'know the whole 'It's better to have loved and lost, than never loved at all' thing.
I feel you. I rarely get any human contact (last hug I got from a non-family member was...gosh, two or three years ago) and I've been craving it lately. Unfortunately I have severe social anxiety, so I'm basically a hermit with virtually no chance of making real-life friends in the foreseeable future. That means unless I meet someone online, cuddles probably aren't going to happen. :(
Your comment reminded me of an awkward encounter I had a week ago. Met a girl and took her on a date. Went for the kiss and I hugged her instead. Really threw the whole moment off. Wasn't sure what my body was doing but i don't recall hugging a girl in over a year. My mind knew what it really wanted I guess :(
Sounds like you might like the series Louie. Or any of Louis CK's stand-up material.
I always hated Louis CK until the depression kicked in and then suddenly everything became so relatable and hilarious.
I think everyone feels the same.
Can confirm
Can confirm
Yup. Confirmed.
A year? Try 10 years then get back to me.
Hah. Try never and get back to me. (Now where's the one-up man?)
Hah. Try never and get back to me. (Now where's the one-up man?)
Never ever? Does that count? 
I feel ya man, I've had so many one-sided feelings for another person, so I can relate to what you said.
Every time it is always one sided for me.
That sounds irritating to me given how much netflix pauses and buffers
I don't think Netflix is the big part of this.  
http://imgur.com/RYHsCKc
This one is spot on for me. 
This one is spot on for me. 
Thanks
http://imgur.com/t1NeIVi  I did this last night, started off as a sort of abstract self-portrait, but now that it's done I can't decide if it's a drawing of me or of depression itself.
Damn. That's good 
I'm an artist too, but I've been very disinterested in it for quite some time. Nice drawing.
I hope you can find your joy in art again. The world would be a better place with your art in it, I am certain.
That could look rad with some awesome shading/lighting 
[Reminds me of this](http://scaredyet.net/wp-content/uploads/2014/08/033-VBP7A.jpg)
[Reminds me of this](http://scaredyet.net/wp-content/uploads/2014/08/033-VBP7A.jpg)
Super cool, thanks for sharing.
I feel you, and I really like that style. Question: Do you use any programs on the pc to draw? If so which ones?
No almost all my work is exclusively analog. This was done using copic markers.
No almost all my work is exclusively analog. This was done using copic markers.
It looks great, always wished I could draw. Never put the time into it, where should I start? I use to doodle stuff years ago.
so..  where can we see more of your work? 
I have an Instagram @wlydayart and a website wlydayart.com
Ever done​ art therapy? It's quite interesting. An Art Psychotherapist told me that our subconscious is often 6 months ahead of the conscious mind. So in 6 months time you may be able to look back at the painting and understand some of what it represented.  I liked the painting though, quite striking!
I haven't, but I will look into it, thanks for the suggestion. And thank you for the kind compliment!
This makes me want to go out of bed and do something creative myself. It's beautiful
It's worth a try! Painting has been the only thing I've enjoyed doing in the past year. Thank you!
I'm not an artsy guy, but this looks amazing! You sir/madam, got a talent. 
Thank you so much :)
I love this style! I love the colors and how well painted it is! Keep it up! I usually am confused by abstract but I actually really love this one. 
Thanks!!!
Holyshoot that looks great!  Obligatory +50 stars for USA palette 
Thanks!! I didn't even realize it had the USA palette hehe. I'm Canadian, still has my colors too!
That is very awesome. Whenever I try to paint to lift my mood, I get more depressed because I can't paint or draw to save my life.
Thank you! I know what you mean, I've done lots of things I haven't been happy with.
Wow that actually looks nice, coming from an artist.
Thanks for your input!!
Holy shit that is awesome.
You're awesome! Thank you!
Dude that's shooting awesome. I would pay at least 300$ for that !!!
I would also pay that much.
That's actually pretty damn nice
Thanks :)
looks cathartic as hell. nice work!
It felt good to paint again! Thank you!
I like it a lot we can definitly feel the power in those feathers, you should definitly continue painting
Thank you, I will!
I'd buy
:)
I don't know what is it, but it's so powerful, or empowering. Makes me think of a warrior, or that animal in the jungle that everybody fears and respects. I really love it.
Thanks so much!
I'm not normally a fan of more abstract art like this but I really like it. Love your use of colour!
Thank you! I love abstract!
OMg I LOVE this and I love the colors so much!!
:) :) :)
It looks really nice. I'm happy that you enjoy drawing. Have a nice day!
Thank you, I hope you have a good day as well!
It's very powerful. Thanks for sharing it. 
Thank you!
This is beautiful.  It's the first thing that's made me feel something other than hopelessness today, thank you.
Glad you felt something!
Ohhhh wow!!!! This is beautiful. 
Thanks so much!
The thing about drawing that it is just so uplifting and fulfilling. Please never stop, you're very talented :)
Thank you! I will keep painting!
The colors are amazing, I liked it. 
Thanks :)
I love it so much, made my day
Happy it cheered you up :)
Wow usually my preferred kind of painting is realistic. But this is amazing I would be interested to see this kind of style with other objects/things/stuff. I love it :) 
I love abstract! I just don't have the patience to do realistic things, I need to do big broad strokes :) Thank you!
does it mean anything? 
Nothing in particular, I just picked some colors I liked and tried to make it look interesting.
It looks like a city down there.. 
Cool interpretation!
Damn...That's pretty dope OP!
Thank you!
That's amazing! If I had a modern black and white penthouse I'd definitely have that on a wall.
:) You flatter me :)
:) You flatter me :)
I swear I'd actually buy that... Is it for sale ?
Wow, this is pretty amazing. I love the colours. 
:) Thank you!
Ooh, looks great!
Thanks!!!
I like it.
Thank you!
I like it a lot, next time you paint please post it somewhere
All these upvotes are making me confident enough to post in /r art next time hehe
this is so beautiful!! i absolutely love it, especially the wild, intense colors. it's all so inspiring :)
Thank you so much :)
This is so awesome that you're using a healthy outlet for expressing how you feel :) such a moving piece 
It's nice to do something other than browsing reddit for hours! Thank you!
It is absolutely gorgeous! 
:):):)
the bottom left part of the painting looks like a demonic backdrop of another realm to me 😅. The part that Im assuming is supposed to be the headdress looks almost claw like and its trying to grasp the energy or the rest of the surface 'the world' and pull it into the bottom left corner, back to hell.   Thats honestly what I first thought without focusing on the title. Maybe im trying too hard though lol
Haha that's an interesting take on it!
> you don't want to shoot it up, because things get even worse if you do.  Yeah.  The idea of waking up afterwards is worse than the fear of attempting.  So I try to think of a fail-proof method, and then don't follow through because it's too intimidating.  We need off switches.
we need cuddles, not offswitches 
we need cuddles, not offswitches 
Cuddles plus temporary off-switches?
Could you imagine, you shoot yourself with a gun through the mouth, and wake up only to realize you don't have a shooting face. That thought alone is enough to keep my blood pumping.
You would be surprised with the frequency this happens. People flinch. Especially when using a shotgun. Mostly they shoot off their lower jaw & nose. 
You would be surprised with the frequency this happens. People flinch. Especially when using a shotgun. Mostly they shoot off their lower jaw & nose. 
Yeah,if you're going to kill yourself use a small gun and put it in your mouth,aiming slightly up.Better chances to shoot off a vital part of your brain,and if you flinch the gun shouldn't move too much.  I didn't plan that ahead for suicide with a gun though,so I may be wrong,because where I live getting a gun is pretty hard if you're not a criminal,so I don't have that option (even though it would be the best one in my opinion).
The only reason I havent killed myself is because of what it would do to my family
I spent a lot of my life thinking the exact same. My mind is an idiot. It likes to flash images and ways to kill myself. Whenever I shoot something up it tells me I should just kill myself
I feel the same way. The main reason I haven't is because I don't want my little sister to see my dead body or haven't deal with that, and same with my parents and friends. If there was a way to die easily, I would have taken it long ago. 
This. It's like a shooting see saw with your conscience. If I go out ill make sure to minimize damage to my family and friends, I've already put myself in a good position by drifting away and losing contact. 
If it were easier, we'd all be dead.
No 'we' wouldn't. There are a lot of people out there with friends, jobs and relationships and who love their life too shooting much. They would never press the button even if it was as simple as pressing an off button.
No 'we' wouldn't. There are a lot of people out there with friends, jobs and relationships and who love their life too shooting much. They would never press the button even if it was as simple as pressing an off button.
> There are a lot of people out there with friends, jobs and relationships and who love their life too shooting much.  I have friends and a job. That isn't at all my problem when it feels like a complete shooting waste
Just remember: death is going to be really, really shooting boring. When life gets shitty, it's good to have a crazy ass backup plan. For me, if I ever don't want to live anymore, I'm just going to sell all my stuff and go backpacking, live off the land. Anything is more interesting than not existing. Trust me.
You won't be conscious to experience the not existing though. You won't be capable of finding it boring, because there'll just be nothing. We weren't bored before we were born either.
No, I know exactly how my life became this shitty. Fear. It stops you from living
It's really paralyzing. How do we ever take steps to get better when were so worried those steps might make things so much worse?
Yep, and I usually fall asleep because it's better than being awake and having to think about it.
It's almost a biological reaction for me. I don't 'consciously' want to sleep it away, but when I get too depressed I automatically get very sleepy. And then I spent long time in bed unable to go to sleep.
It's almost a biological reaction for me. I don't 'consciously' want to sleep it away, but when I get too depressed I automatically get very sleepy. And then I spent long time in bed unable to go to sleep.
I have insomnia but this week I've slept normally. I've also been feeling extremely depressed this week and the week before that I was feeling the same thing for a few days and those were the same days I slept properly. I think you might be right.
Even my dreams are shooting me now.
I have dreams have to negociate, shouting, yelling with people always gave me problem irl. So tired day n night.
I just feel like I never got a chance. I read some of the comments here about people who made bad decisions.....My mate didn't work hard at school, dossed off at uni but still managed to land a great job, drive a bmw and get married. I'm thinking to myself what the hell did I do wrong in life? Everyone is moving forward while I'm just stuck here. I'm not living, I'm simply existing. 
I failed at my marriage. I failed at my career. I failed at being a Father. And here. I stand.  Ive got some legit reasons but l wont let depression win. 
Dang yeah I do. The worst part is that I'm in the best place I've ever been in my whole life, but still... Dang. 
I'm with ya exactly. Getting ECT treatments now to try and fix it, but they're not working....
I don't wonder, I know why and how I ended up this way, I feel like it should alleviate some of the stress but it doesn't, I just keep thinking about going back and beating some sense into myself even though I know that won't change anything.
It's hard because you know every poor decision that lead you to this point but you don't know how make the right decisions moving forward to get back on track for a better life. Hindsight is literally 20/20. To have the ability to go back and make the right choices.......
It's hard because you know every poor decision that lead you to this point but you don't know how make the right decisions moving forward to get back on track for a better life. Hindsight is literally 20/20. To have the ability to go back and make the right choices.......
It's worse when you know what you need to do, or some things that'll help but that crippling feeling keeps you on the ground, unable to move.
I block all that bad shit out. That keeps me sane.
How do you do that?
How do you do that?
I learned acceptance for my situation. I also dont validate the negative thoughts. I disassociate from them.
I learned acceptance for my situation. I also dont validate the negative thoughts. I disassociate from them.
When I do that I feel like I'm lying to myself.
I know that my life is shitty because im a very stupid person and im worth nothing.
Uh no Youre not. Thats one of depressions lies. Keep youre chin up.
Every day. I just don't know what to do anymore.
One day at a time.....its all you can do..
Don't hate yourself but the others for abandoning you and not caring about you. There is nothing wrong with you. You are the only one with ability to change what you don't like in your life.
Dont hate anybody.....its poison
Feeling similar. I find it more and more difficult replying to people because I'm always afraid of it going wrong.
Same here!!!
I want out.  I want an off button.  I want to sleep forever.  I hate being dead inside and having to continue going through the motions.  
I feel like sleeping whole day every day. Getting up everyday for work without crying is such a task . But going through the motions. Smiling at everyone. Doing all the right things. Eating at the right time. Sleeping at right time. 
Oh well, you can always do it tomorrow. 
Facts
Oh well, you can always do it tomorrow. 
procrastination activates
procrastination activates
*procrastinates intensely*
I feel empowered to beat this ugly thing called depression. I want to take it to the cleaners and wipe up the floors with it. I want to fight. You should too, and I feel your pain.  Anhedonia and lack of motivation can be very tough with depression. All we can do is pray things get better.   Hang in there.
even just taking a piece of clothing to the cleaners and wiping my floors with anything clean would be amazing. i feel you, thanks.
One of my biggest fears is that if things do finally get better, I'll soon fall back down into the depressive void. Really, there's nothing from stopping that from happening...
Eventually you can learn to detect when these lows are about to start. After that you can learn how to deal with them so they get resolved before they become insurmountable. It's a long journey (but worth it!) and I wish you the best of luck <3
Eventually you can learn to detect when these lows are about to start. After that you can learn how to deal with them so they get resolved before they become insurmountable. It's a long journey (but worth it!) and I wish you the best of luck <3
Thank you...really
Thank you...really
You are welcome. Come back if you ever need a lift. I always do my best :)
Dr. House.   Well played.
I love House. One of the main reasons being that most of what he says is extremely relatable for someone with depression.
I love House. One of the main reasons being that most of what he says is extremely relatable for someone with depression.
Exactly. The finale was so, just, perfect... T_T
I am here dude and I hear you. *Big Hugs* for you. Pm me anytime. 
You're a nice person
You're a nice person
Thank you but just doing what's right and cuz I care :)
Kind of like [this comic](http://nedroid.com/2011/01/memories-of-youth/)?
This hits *so* close to home...
I sometimes get a sinking feeling in my stomach when I remember something embarrassing or stupid I've done in the past.  It's like the feeling you get free falling.    It makes me feel better when I remember the even more stupid things other people have done though. 
I take medication and it helps. I went to a hospital to sign up for a day program and told them about this. I got committed and only got out because my friend is a fat jewish lawyer (joking, but seriously).
>It makes me feel better when I remember the even more stupid things other people have done though.  Thats exactly what I do. I just remember this one time my friend accidentally shit himself in class in high school. Ive never shat myself so i can't complain.
But now some of us feel worse.
doubtful, probably scarred some people. Just kidding, but seriously.
just take the thoughts out of my head.
Every day. And the awkward moment is always at least 4 years ago. 
I can dredge up shit from 30 tears ago.
I can dredge up shit from 30 tears ago.
I'm not sure if that was a typo, but it turned into a rather beautiful statement anyway.
I'm not sure if that was a typo, but it turned into a rather beautiful statement anyway.
Oh, great. Now I'm going to obsess over my stupid typing error. 
I will have physical muscle spasms when this happens and say to myself 'I shooting hate my life, I wish I was dead'.  Sometimes I just say it in my head, and sometimes I will whisper it under my breath and hope no one hears me.  I have no actually suicidal tenancies, that is just what comes out.
3 month old reply, but same here. I say something like 'kill kill kill' or 'I want to kill myself' and I really don't. Then I think about how awkward it'd be if I finally got a job after 9 months only to have this happen and try to explain it away. 'Please don't fire me.'  I guess I should be thankful I don't mutter 'niggerfaggot' anymore. >_>  Laughing at myself a bit right now.
3 month old reply, but same here. I say something like 'kill kill kill' or 'I want to kill myself' and I really don't. Then I think about how awkward it'd be if I finally got a job after 9 months only to have this happen and try to explain it away. 'Please don't fire me.'  I guess I should be thankful I don't mutter 'niggerfaggot' anymore. >_>  Laughing at myself a bit right now.
>niggerfaggot  **[I heard what you said!](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=G2nTbqbtGug)**
At my school a kid was taking a crap, some guys came in and forced him outside, they made him pull his pants down and shit all over the ground whilst singing living on a prayer. They filmed it and put it on the internet.  I remember that if I did something embarassing, at least im not that guy.
evil. pure evil.
Forgive yourself. Forgive yourself for having done that awkward thing when you remember it. If you do it honestly and *really* forgive yourself, you'll feel better and those thoughts won't come back so often and even if they do, you won't feel so bad. I've been doing it for a few years and it does help.
Forgiving oneself is so simple yet so hard to do.
Thanks, that was the last drop I needed to get over my crush.
Crush rather than ex? 
Crush rather than ex? 
Let's just say that this case was a rather serious and very complicated one, and depression did not help making it better at all.
Interested in getting over crushes, for good?
Easy, you must **crush** them!   (read with Russian/Borat accent)
I wish this was easy... This is exactly what needs to be done in my life.
Yup, it's about trying to take positive steps, as many or as few as you can push at a time. I'm trying to end days being able to look and know they are good ones. anyway, cheers. 
Thanks Will Smith, I really needed that. After 7 years, it might just be time to get over my ex now.. If only it was mentally possible to erase her from my brain permanently. 
Don't view it as a negative. It was a learning experience for you. It was most definitely not pleasant but you learned something and became stronger from the whole.  Be well and stay safe. 
And unfortunately people buy into this rather than living the life they've been given to the fullest....
I don't know that it's a matter of 'buying into it.'  It's more like a subconscious sound reel that loops whether you like it to or not, constantly flipping images up to your conscious which make you compare what it is you see in front of you, to what you think you should be seeing.
Been there. It's shooting horrible. I think it comes down to hyper focused concentration on stupid repetitive thoughts and no concentration on anything else. 
How did you get out?
How did you get out?
There's no easy answer. It took a few months, but it could've been anything. I was taking meds. Going to psychiatry. Stopped school and work. Forced positive thoughts when I didnt believe them.   I don't remember the exact day it stopped, but I remember realizing after a few days it wasn't too bad. Then a few weeks after that I was back to normal.   My depression is back now. But nowhere near as bad as before. 
It sucks. I used to be someone. I used to be able to talk to people, make people laugh. I used to have a lot of friends. Now I barely talk to anyone at all and have nothing ever to say or contribute to any conversations I wind up in at work. It sucks being such a radically different person, in a negative way. Don't think I could ever go back to that type of personality again either.  
I used to have motivation.   Then i'm here, looking up from the bottom of a dark pit. 
I used to have motivation.   Then i'm here, looking up from the bottom of a dark pit. 
It's hard to even look up anymore. I miss living 
You wrote this. That's something. I mean that.
It was mostly a shout into the void. I didn't expect as many people to relate, thank you for your kind words. Truly. 
That isn't such of a big deal to me. My personality has always been as interesting as a blank wall anyway.
Man, don't say that... everyone's got a personality, even the aspects we least consider have some impact on our lifes. Tell me, what things you used to love before depression came?
It feels like you went through a lobotomy
I always felt like my brain just ran out of power and has stayed dead 
Take time away from people. Groups won't recharge you. Sing the songs you hear in your head. Get high sometime. 
Probably not recommended but this is exactly what I did when I felt similarly. Nothing brought me any joy, I had zero interest in anything, and all I felt was chronic boredom and pain. I hadn't been a frequent smoker before, only once every couple of months, but I started smoking weed nearly every day, and it allowed me to feel something different, and get some interest back in life, and I personally believe that it got me out of a very dangerous slump.
Probably not recommended but this is exactly what I did when I felt similarly. Nothing brought me any joy, I had zero interest in anything, and all I felt was chronic boredom and pain. I hadn't been a frequent smoker before, only once every couple of months, but I started smoking weed nearly every day, and it allowed me to feel something different, and get some interest back in life, and I personally believe that it got me out of a very dangerous slump.
I am thinking about smoking weed even though I was against it for so long. It helps that California wants to legalize pot as well. I could use it for medicinal purposes because I sure as heck don't want to smoke and risk losing my job. Glad to know it helped someone out there.
Change your diet, I promise you'll feel better and get rid of the brain fog one you find what's causing it: http://kellybroganmd.com/two-foods-may-sabotage-brain/ Also try and exercise (just take a long walk each day) and make sure you drink plenty of water (spring water is more tasty and you'll want to drink more).
I'm a healthy ass vegan and even when I used to exercise I felt the same. It won't help everyone. 
I feel like I'm the scrappy doo of people's lives. They initially put me there thinking it'll increase ratings but quickly find they freaking hate me. I also don't appear in the series reboot.
THIS
THIS
Too real
i feel like a side character in my own life.
I feel like the goddamn *antagonist* of my own life.
Not even a side character, just a background person that shows up for one or two scenes.
An extra who gets fired because they can't even blend into the background properly... Yup.
I feel this way all the time around my friends. They usually text each other or hang out separate from (various friends hang out 1 on 1) classes but I'm never invited alone to hang out with them, only in a big group. It's tough knowing know one cares enough to hang out with me or even imply they'd like to hang out.
Dammit I just realized this is true for me too. I shouldn't hang out with friends who don't appreciate me but then I wouldn't ever hang out at all.   Edit: letters 
Dammit I just realized this is true for me too. I shouldn't hang out with friends who don't appreciate me but then I wouldn't ever hang out at all.   Edit: letters 
This is what happened to me..I realized I was the only one trying, so I stopped.  Now it's been about 3 months and haven't talked to anyone outside of work.  Even good friends that moved away and kept in contact with, came back into town and I only heard after she's back home now.  Kinda sucks :/
Yeah. I always feel like my life just isn't important or relevant enough. Like I'm just an extra in a movie.
You know when the credits start rolling and then they speed up after a while? So fast you can't even read the names? I'm sure my name is in there somewhere
Not even. More like those NPC that you can't interact with and just pace back and forth in the same path.
Incredible 😂. Such an accurate way to put it. 
That's not possible. I always thought everyone else is an NPC and lm the only one alive. 
 Right? I often empathize with people, but I could never quite grasp the thought of someone else's consciousness.
The more I hang out with my 'friends' the more I feel this way. I'd recommend you spend more time with yourself and doing things like reading or nature walking, finding a creative outlet or something that is unique to yourself. Now that my buddies are away at college I basically just chill with myself and that's the way I like it. 
Thats great it works for you, but I get way too lonely. I spend most of my time by myself anyways. I think way too much on stuff when alone. 
Become the main character of your own life. You have to care about yourself first 
yeah man, live your life before you live someone else's. Lift your head up. You've got this. life is shit but i know you're trying to make the most of it or you wouldn't be here. Best of luck, friend!
It's the kind of thing that you don't really understand until it hits you..  Dangin sucks right? stay strong
Even between episodes I forget what it's like.
'Tell me one last thing,' said Harry. 'Is this real? Or has this been happening inside my head?'  Dumbledore beamed at him, and his voice sounded loud and strong in Harry's ears even though the bright mist was descending again, obscuring his figure.  'Of course it is happening inside your head, Harry, but why on earth should that mean that it is not real?'
That's a sequitur, dude. And a good one. 
I'm going through a depressive phase. I just reread the seven books and I feel like I actually am Harry. His life feels more real than mine. If I can't be a wizard I don't want to be anything at all.
deleted
deleted
I teared up.   You're right, even us Muggles are capable of what Dumbledore considered the strongest form of magic: love.
I was the same way with anxiety. I always thought to myself, 'Why can't they just act OK since they are, in fact, OK?' Then I started having panick attacks later on in life and my general anxiety has stuck around since. Now I understand.   These things are hard to grasp until you experience it. I wish there were simulators for people to use that truly let them know how it feels to have such ailments.
An effective simulator would be to drop 10 hits of acid and then be locked into a coffin with no idea of how long you could be in there for, could be 15 minutes, could be 5 years.   At least that's how I feel during a panic attack. 
An effective simulator would be to drop 10 hits of acid and then be locked into a coffin with no idea of how long you could be in there for, could be 15 minutes, could be 5 years.   At least that's how I feel during a panic attack. 
I was thinking maybe have people inject copious amounts of epinephrine and come face to face with their worst fears (Ex: if their fear is small, dark spaces, your casket idea would work).    Oh, and when they're done, ensure there are judgemental people telling you to 'Relax' afterwards, as if it's a choice.
I was thinking maybe have people inject copious amounts of epinephrine and come face to face with their worst fears (Ex: if their fear is small, dark spaces, your casket idea would work).    Oh, and when they're done, ensure there are judgemental people telling you to 'Relax' afterwards, as if it's a choice.
this one is a perfect description of how anxiety feels to me.
I feel like chronic illness is at the core of my depression too. The weird thing about it is that depression strips away more of life than the chronic illness... But you're right, it's always worth fighting. I learned that again tonight.  We have to keep moving. We love you, friend. Stay strong.
For me, too. When I see a new doctor, they look at all of my medical conditions/medicines lists and give me that look like, 'Man, all of this and you're only in your 20s?' It's hard to focus on just your mental health when you have a crapload of other conditions, ya know? Don't know where one thing ends and the other begins.
For me, too. When I see a new doctor, they look at all of my medical conditions/medicines lists and give me that look like, 'Man, all of this and you're only in your 20s?' It's hard to focus on just your mental health when you have a crapload of other conditions, ya know? Don't know where one thing ends and the other begins.
one of the ER doctors said that to me, 'you're only 25 why do you have  pages of blood tests/other tests?'. Made me feel really uncomfortable actually, 'cause she said people my age usually have a page or 2 max. And I felt like I had to defend having multiple tests done somehow...
I'm not sure what you mean. Of course it's all in our head. Just like epilepsy, Alzheimer's, Parkinson's and brain cancer. 
I think he means that he used to think it was people's fault for not having the right outlook instead of it being something someone can't control.
I think he means that he used to think it was people's fault for not having the right outlook instead of it being something someone can't control.
I know what he meant, I was just being facetious. 
I know what he meant, I was just being facetious. 
Poe's law, I suggest you look it up.
Um... welcome to the club?
'Yay'    One of us! One of us! One of us!    (I'm sorry)
what do you mean by 'I just didn't believe in it'? as in you didn't think depression was an actual thing orrrr...? I didn't know there were people that didn't believe in depression
It's common for people to misunderstand depression because they associate depression with just sadness. The kind of sadness normal people experience time to time. But it's so much more than that.
It's common for people to misunderstand depression because they associate depression with just sadness. The kind of sadness normal people experience time to time. But it's so much more than that.
I dated one of these people. Actually a few of them. One of them told me that it meant I was 'mentally weak', unlike him, because 'he was an eagle scout'. He was 30 at the time still talking about being an eagle scout once as though that had anything to do with it.  I DON'T HAVE DEPRESSION BECAUSE I'M ICE CREAM
Do you have prints for sale?
I want it but I don't know whether it'd just remind me of depression every time I look at it v_v
I...I want this.
Me too. I love it!
There are studies that show making art is therapeutic. I've been doing so recently and I must agree. I love this subreddit mainly for its art.
Same thing for writing. I keep journals. Recently, I finished one and couldn't afford another for a minute. I felt like I was going insane because I couldn't write.
I am just a curious person asking question when it comes to mania. Is it really happy and sunshine like the painting? Is it more of a caffeine like high? I've experienced the depression part, but I've always wondered what people with manic depression go through.
For me it is just like that. One second I'm fine going about my then boom I'm sad or mad over seemingly nothing really. 
Big time (besides the decent grades part)! And such thoughts only contribute to me feeling even more depressed lol. Do you see a therapist? 
Nah, just the thought of telling my parents makes me shrivel up inside.  I regularly swing between ‘what was I thinking my life is great why was I so upset’ to ‘I wish I could just stop existing’.  So I don’t even know if I really have depression but I just feel like shit for no reason. Wbu?
Nah, just the thought of telling my parents makes me shrivel up inside.  I regularly swing between ‘what was I thinking my life is great why was I so upset’ to ‘I wish I could just stop existing’.  So I don’t even know if I really have depression but I just feel like shit for no reason. Wbu?
Lol same, I refuse to admit or discuss with my parents how depressed I am, even though they can clearly see. For a lot of people depression is not a flatline experience but periods of it being significantly bad, to feeling ok and then back again. 
Depression has no right to have you. Keep fighting. Scream in its face and tell it to give you all it's got because it's a weak little shit. You got this. Remember that there's nothing wrong with enlisting some help in the form of therapy or medication, we don't make soldiers fight alone.
Thank you for this comment. You gave me one of the few smiles I'd had today :) I wanna whip this shit so badly!
Thank you for this comment. You gave me one of the few smiles I'd had today :) I wanna whip this shit so badly!
I'm with ya buddy and I believe that we can do it. I'm going through it right now and feel like finally I might make it out the other side and have some semblance of a normal life. I'm on Effexor and Wellbutrin, the latter being the more helpful of the pair, receive therapy and really really digging this book called 'Stopping the noise in your head' that someone actually recommended to me on here the other day.
Same I feel like my thoughts are 70% stuck in the past and the rest is anxiety trying to figure out what to do in this current mess.   I never understood how nostalgia can be a positive feeling, for me it always made me feel like I didn’t belong wherever I happen to be (which is a feeling I experience practically everywhere nowadays) and that i’m doomed to be this way forever. 
Sometimes I get caught up in how much pain the things I'm nostalgic for still bring. It's like Idc that it hurts bcuz it's this familiar ache of an 'easier' time, but then I remember all the pain & questions that ran through my mind then, & it's like I need to overthink it all over again bcuz, at this point, I'm just a glutton for aching for memories & past scenarios beyond my control.
When I think about the past I feel intense nostalgia that makes me feel totally and utterly hopeless. I had so much potential. I was going to be something, to do something. People don't understand how promising I was in my early life. It feels like it's all over now.
Same. Before my depression exploded, i was so full of potential. I was smart, had good grades, had friends, had girls who liked me enough to openly approach me, had dreams, and relative good health. Now its all irreversible. Death is what i now look forward to.
I am in the exact same boat. I was delusional to think that I was destined for greatness, everyone around me thought I was going to do incredible things with my life. Now I realize I'm just mediocre and it's shattering my identity. 
Mediocre is not a bad thing. Don’t put pressure on yourself to be better than you are. The fact that you recognize that your existence could be and can be better is enough. Greatness is not expected of you, billions of people go through not being great. Embrace the mediocrity and make steps to boost a little of that greatness from time to time. Don’t give in the the non existent pressure to be great.
Most of my adult life has been spent wondering why the shoot I went to college and dropped out, then came back as an online student and dropped out again. Undiagnosed mental issues it turns out. I think back to high school days when I could just go home at 3pm, make the same snack everyday and watch shooting TechTV. 
Wow, same. I'm now contemplating going back a third shooting time. Depression and anxiety took away my adolescence and my 20s (I'm 28) and I can't stand the thought of it taking my 30s too. 
Wow, same. I'm now contemplating going back a third shooting time. Depression and anxiety took away my adolescence and my 20s (I'm 28) and I can't stand the thought of it taking my 30s too. 
Yeah same and I feel terrible for being so old with nothing accomplished or anything to show for it
> I don't think I ever was. But for my partner, always thinking about the past and how he's not living up to expectations.   I've that in spades (along with future anxiety). Do you know any specific coping mechanisms your partner tried that helped at least slightly?
Nothing helps. We have both been on a the carousel​ of meds for about +4 years now. Nothing helps.
I was born with it.
yeah... since i was self aware at all... i cant remember a time that i didnt feel lost, confused, broken, disgusting, and sad whenever i reflected on my experience... my past, my present, the anxiety and dread of a hopeless future, despite hope and potential for success seemingly just within my circumstantial grasp. im weak and unhealthy in mind and body and i wish i had even good memories to cling to instead of this vacuous emptiness
Young men crying is and never will be a bad thing. It takes more courage to show how you really feel even if she was heartless 
Especially since she was.
Especially since she was.
But she probably doesn’t have the courage that you have to show your actual emotions. She is just saying what was said to her 
Probably a parental defense mechanism to deal with the idea of their child having a horrible mental illness. I know guys who got angry at their kids when they found out they were suicidal but I think that just stems from fear
It very well could be this. After my depression got worse and it was clear this was my new normal, I felt distance from my parents. One day in the car my dad just randomly said “I don’t know how to help you and I feel powerless that I can’t do anything for my baby boy.” I told him he didn’t have to do anything...just be there.
It very well could be this. After my depression got worse and it was clear this was my new normal, I felt distance from my parents. One day in the car my dad just randomly said “I don’t know how to help you and I feel powerless that I can’t do anything for my baby boy.” I told him he didn’t have to do anything...just be there.
This is honestly it.  I don't need you to try and fix me, realise you don't know how, and then get more frustrated with yourself for not being able to help. I understand it, but it's not helpful.  I just need you to be there. That's all.
This is honestly it.  I don't need you to try and fix me, realise you don't know how, and then get more frustrated with yourself for not being able to help. I understand it, but it's not helpful.  I just need you to be there. That's all.
My mother handled it this way as well. Then, when she got passed being angry she said 'Well. At least it's not my fault.'   Um. Ok, mom. If that's what you got out of this convo, great. 
I'm sorry, but that is utter nonsense. Even if she didn't know how to deal with it properly, the sheer callousness and mockery OP's mom displayed to OP was absolutely unnecessary. She just sounds like a shit parent.
Agreed. I think this sort of response is more due to ignorance, sometimes willfully so.  OP, sorry you are going through this. I recommend you check out /r/raisedbynarcissists. Minimizing and belittling your issue, blaming you for it, as well as trying to make it about them is classic narcissistic behavior.
I dont think the issue so much is being willing to afford, so much as many people CANT afford that and there are very few social programs in place to help with that.
That's why we need some universal healthcare
That's why we need some universal healthcare
Even in Canada, where there is universal health care, psychotherapy isn't covered. It's psychiatry or bust, at least in Ontario. 
Are you in the US? I'm from Australia and there is what we call 'bulk billing' GPs who can refer you to an in clinic psych and it is all for free. 
Yeah US, I know mental health is something alot of other countries have programs for, unfortunately they are rare here and left to city/state level to be handled.
You're comparing apples to oranges. While a an actual doctor fixing your broken leg is actually doing stuff, eg, putting your bone in place, doing physiotherapy, managing your prescriptions and doing a whole follow up on the process, the snake oil salesman known as therapist is just talking to you, not helping you in any meaningful way and then slapping a bill at the end of the day. 
I heavily disagree. I went through therapy for my depression and PTSD, and it was phenomenal. I wouldn't have been able to get through that on my own. Just check out your therapist before you commit to a session to make sure they're good, and most insurance companies will pay for it.
I agree. Some can't afford it. I ration my antidepressants because I have no doctor for a refill. Freaking shameful
I'm sorry you're in that place. I was there last month. :(
I'm sorry you're in that place. I was there last month. :(
Thank you
I usually just tell those people that weed/alcohol/bullets are cheaper. I've been to therapy tho and it works if you get a good therapist, worth the 90 bucks if you want to get better but as it stands now I kinda feel like I don't want to get better. I want to off myself, plain and simple. I'm just done with life... I find it mundane and no longer worth while unless I'm on acid. 
'I don't want it to get better.'  Jesus shooting christ yes.  That sentence just does not compute with someone who enjoys living.  I get it.   I want my depression to get bad enough that one day i won't feel guilty about offing myself and hurting my family and friends. 
'I don't want it to get better.'  Jesus shooting christ yes.  That sentence just does not compute with someone who enjoys living.  I get it.   I want my depression to get bad enough that one day i won't feel guilty about offing myself and hurting my family and friends. 
> I want my depression to get bad enough that one day i won't feel guilty about offing myself and hurting my family and friends.  That resonates a lot with me.
Yeah, that's exactly the point of my post. Money per se isn't really much of an issue for me personally. I can afford it, it's the quid pro quo that bothers me. Why should they really care under quid pro quo circumstances?
I think the only way to see it is the reverse, how would they be able to live and pay for their studies if they didn't charge patients?  I think they chose that line of work to help people, so they do want to help, they do care precisely about your issues. They could have chosen to be gynos or eye doctors, they wanted to be this kind of doctor to help with this kind of problems. But they need money like everyone else.
I agree 100%. Today I even saw a redditor say their therapist fell asleep during session... there's no way I am paying $90+ for that! 
There are good therapists, and bad therapists, and it's up to you to search. A good one will hold up a mirror for you to look inside yourself, so you can work on your pain.
There are good therapists, and bad therapists, and it's up to you to search. A good one will hold up a mirror for you to look inside yourself, so you can work on your pain.
This is true. I went to a dude then then do a woman both sucked didnt do shit. Then i went about a year later to an anothar woman who was recommended by my mothers friend who is a therapist. Went there 3 times and i become like a totaly diferent person. Some therapists suck some save lifes 
Ah, you're a Rammstein fan. Do you live in Germany? Is mental health counseling really covered by the subsidized healthcare system there? I would think most countries with subsidized government healthcare wouldn't cover that.
I'm from Finland and yeah it is. Been to numerous different doctors and therapists without having to pay anything. Of course for example when you consider how much my parents have paid in taxes through out their careers it's not like it's really 'free', but its free to me.   Meds are subsidized to some extent but not all of it.
Universal single-payer healthcare is crucial. Here in Germany everyone who needs the help can get it, regardless of financial situation.
I hate to contribute to the desperation train here, but the realization that I will no longer have insurance by March and will not be able to afford to see a psychiatrist, general care physician, or specialists for my other illnesses has led me to believe that I'll simply have to kill myself by the end of the year.  I'm barely skating by with the help I need. Once that's cut off, who knows what's going to happen. 
Well put
I genuinely can't describe the pain
I genuinely can't describe the pain
It sucks. Be gentle with yourself in this time.
A hot rod of metal being smashed against your chest repeatedly?
If you keep hitting over and over it starts to go numb and turns into scar tissue. When the rod stops, you still can’t feel there, no matter how many people tell you to get over it.
Sometimes it's a physical pain for me, like a weakness in my chest and shoulders.
Yeah for me everyday,  after meal i feel like bloated baloon lol and    loud cracking of my joints ,muscle tension on daily bases .
Sometimes it's a physical pain for me, like a weakness in my chest and shoulders.
My whole body just aches, I cant move and Ill cry if I can muster up any energy, and sometimes ill yell
Yes sometimes you get so depressed you just dont know how to say it anymore...
It just gets worse and worse... ha  At least theres drugs
It just gets worse and worse... ha  At least theres drugs
I mean honestly.. shoot drugs.. Although it might seem like it helps at least temporarily, you‘re actually just avoiding getting better from your sober state. I mean medication can be okay, as your drug usage gets controlled but don‘t be naive and think that taking drugs regularly by yourself won‘t ever hurt you. I‘m just warning you, but at the latest, when you are addicted you notice that anyways, but you will most likely feel worse than ever before, because in reality you just avoided your underlying problems...
I mean honestly.. shoot drugs.. Although it might seem like it helps at least temporarily, you‘re actually just avoiding getting better from your sober state. I mean medication can be okay, as your drug usage gets controlled but don‘t be naive and think that taking drugs regularly by yourself won‘t ever hurt you. I‘m just warning you, but at the latest, when you are addicted you notice that anyways, but you will most likely feel worse than ever before, because in reality you just avoided your underlying problems...
I handle my problems like any responsible adult. I carefully sweep them under the rug where they belong.
It just gets worse and worse... ha  At least theres drugs
If i knew where to get sum
In the end drugs will make it worse. Trust me, I tried almost all of them. All the heroin and meth in the world won't solve your problems.
Yeah but if you feel like theres nothing you can do in life but suffer, theyre better than suicide
 I've been there. 
Was just about to comment this. Not that you needed to know. Sjsjshebsjxkdmwnwbsks to you too.
Oh hey, you made it to that stage.
So, what are the membership benefits?
I used to be able to see a future for myself. I no longer do w/this pain I'm suffering. I'm going to give myself time to go through the process but how long do I undergo the treatment before I admit defeat? 
You don't admit defeat, you never admit defeat. When you let it win, you're just telling everyone else that it CAN win. Humans can get through anything as long as they know that it ends, and trust me, this isn't forever.
I used to be able to see a future for myself. I no longer do w/this pain I'm suffering. I'm going to give myself time to go through the process but how long do I undergo the treatment before I admit defeat? 
I really dont know, just keep trying, keep fighting and have a dream in your mind. Having dreams of meeting a beautiful asian girl one day and falling in love helps me not hang myself/OD.
I really dont know, just keep trying, keep fighting and have a dream in your mind. Having dreams of meeting a beautiful asian girl one day and falling in love helps me not hang myself/OD.
Everyone needs a dream. I'm glad you have yours op Dgjwsfiklnrgeuusecbj
I’m here too. Failed a suicide attempt the other day. Can’t see myself going on. I can’t take this pain anymore. The weight in my chest is so heavy. I can’t do it. I gave it a good run. I’m done. 
One time I thought I had to die to prove that mental illness was a real thing; I guess it was more proving to others such that my life had a meaning.;   of course that was with the assumption that everything I do as daily life is meaningless and that collectively it all added up to nothing.  Idk, the jury is still out.
I’m here too. Failed a suicide attempt the other day. Can’t see myself going on. I can’t take this pain anymore. The weight in my chest is so heavy. I can’t do it. I gave it a good run. I’m done. 
Hey, are you still here? I'm done too but I have dreams that I want to one day somehow achieve, Im 15
hhhgsh;lnbshiurfijiifin jojfej solo ihfisdh wookie hohohohoho
This is giving me a Star Wars vibe
I just came here to say that.  Fifth day I haven't left the house apart from the convenience store. Massive sinus headache driving me nuts.
Yeah standard stuff really
This is so weird, I got an intense frisson just by looking at your post even though it’s just gibberish. Stay strong ♥️
Thanks, the english language is too linear to describe something so profoundly despairing
I always look at this like I'm two different people. There's such a huge dichotomy between who we are when we're spiraling and who we are when we're sufficiently distracted or distanced from those thoughts. 
There's this quote on Pinterest I've always felt relates to me, it says 'I just have this happy personality and a sad soul in one body.'  I can't fully explain it but my bad side is just as part of me as my good, I'm not Me without them both. I appreciate my depression because I learned a lot about the world, and myself through it. It made me more realistic.   That's why I flip-flop a lot between emotions. 
There's this quote on Pinterest I've always felt relates to me, it says 'I just have this happy personality and a sad soul in one body.'  I can't fully explain it but my bad side is just as part of me as my good, I'm not Me without them both. I appreciate my depression because I learned a lot about the world, and myself through it. It made me more realistic.   That's why I flip-flop a lot between emotions. 
I appreciate what they're saying but I don't think I'll ever appreciate being depressed
I appreciate what they're saying but I don't think I'll ever appreciate being depressed
I get u, depression is sucky. It makes you feel like a dying rose. Like you had a moment of beauty, light, but then it's slowly taken from you and you wilt..   I feel like venturing into this dark place has made me more understanding of others. I'm not so close minded. I learned to really love people, because I know how it feels like when you don't have it.  
I can understand that, and it's probably part of the reason why the 'positive thinking' mantra bothers me so much-- like the idea that you should just ignore negative feelings. 
It's a coping mechanism to just block out every negative thing life throws at ya... But I can't do that.   I would rather see the absurdity of life, accept it and keep going.. Then delude myself the whole way
I'd say for every 3 regular posts or comments on my account, I've written at least 1 about suicide but deleted it later. I have posted on r/SuicideWatch and r/depression dozens of times, but I delete it almost every time. in my emotional state I feel like I need to say it but then later I feel embarrassed and delete it. it sux. 
I always think about what others may think if they scrolled through my profile so I usually delete my suicidal posts lol I don't want them saying, this stupid girl is crazy. I'm really not, I just think life is this absurd thing so I rant about it, and how much I want out sometimes. I wish that we could post anonymously for moments like those
I always think about what others may think if they scrolled through my profile so I usually delete my suicidal posts lol I don't want them saying, this stupid girl is crazy. I'm really not, I just think life is this absurd thing so I rant about it, and how much I want out sometimes. I wish that we could post anonymously for moments like those
I have 1 friend who definitely knows my Reddit username (we ran into each other on a random r/funny post) and I have several friends I've made from Reddit who I worry will look thru my post history
I comment a lot right before sleep and then when I wake up I delete pretty much all of it.
I have sort of the same issue, but different time of day.  Will wake up and be in a generally good mood, and comment quite a bit and once in a great while even post something to a sub.  By the time I've made it into work (2-3 hours later), I've 'sobered up'.  I'll  log on my PC, open up reddit and delete a lot of it. If anyone is reading *this comment* I guess its safe to assume I let this one slide..  ;)
I have similar feelings as you. Lately I've been thinking that being child free is the best and most responsible choice for myself. I like kids and I know my partner would make a great parent, but how could I risk passing on this terrible illness? Mental illness runs heavily in my family from depression and anxiety, to OCD, bipolar disorder, alcoholism, etc. I've been hospitalized twice myself, and I don't want anyone else to have to experience that.
If you're concerned about your kids inherenting any illness, have you considered adoption as an alternative? 
I’ve thought of adoption but I’m not there in my life yet really. I think it will depend on my support group in the future. We are over populated, it makes sense and it could be utterly joyous!
Good luck to you!  It's great that you're taking your time to decide; don't let anyone pressure you into having or adopting a child.  Yes, having a child is life-changing and can be wonderful, but it also takes a lot of time, effort, money, and energy (both physical and mental) to make it work.
As a young woman with several mental illnesses but a very very big wish to be a mother, this makes me think it is possible ♥️ thank you. 
I'm glad, I'm not going to lie it's difficult. But for people who want to be parents it's absolutely achievable. 
Oh wow. This is actually one of the exact reasons I don't want kids. I don't want to pass down my depression. It's not like I can tell most women that.   I've never heard of weed affecting dreams. Are you sure?  Dreams are hard to recall, and you have something like 90 in one night. 
It has to do with weed limiting the amount of time you spend in REM sleep if I remember correctly, in my experience it's a real thing, dreams get super vivid and weird once you stop smoking.
It has to do with weed limiting the amount of time you spend in REM sleep if I remember correctly, in my experience it's a real thing, dreams get super vivid and weird once you stop smoking.
Same here. Smoked weed every day for about 7 years. I quit a month and two weeks ago, and I've been having incredibly vivid dreams for about a week and a half every single night and I hadn't even heard about weed affecting dreams until I told a friend of mine about it last week.
That's not how it works, you don't just pass down depression. The only thing you maybe could pass down is a proneness to depression but not depression itself. So if that is the main reason why you don't want children, then go on and have children. 
Just what the shoot are you talking about?   Of course we are talking about genetic predisposition. Of course I'm not passing down a feeling.  I didn't think anyone on reddit was dumb enough that I had to spell out 'genetic predisposition to depression' instead of 'depression'.  'Proneness' is not and never has been, a word. 
I hear ya. My wife and I both have hereditary depression and anxiety issues and we don't want a child of ours to suffer and not know why.  I want a daughter but we aren't going to do it. It would be irresponsible of us to try on the off chance it doesn't manifest in them. I've seen it first hand too, a relative of mine is a mess. We don't want to risk our child being that way. 
Adoption is always an option. Just because you're not genetically related to them doesn't mean you have to love them any less, and in many ways, it's more special because you chose them instead of it just happening. 
Happy Birthday! You are never alone. You'll always have us, random people online. 
I think if it weren't for random online people, I would've killed myself years ago.
It's my birthday too. My dad forgot and even though at school my name was on the announcements only two or three people wished me happy birthday. It's just another day I guess.  Happy birthday 
Happy birthday!!!!!
The lack of physical contact is insane... Don't babies need to be held 20 hours a day? How long do I need to be held :(
And still I only get a hug twice a year, once for christmas and once for my birthday smh
And still I only get a hug twice a year, once for christmas and once for my birthday smh
i don’t get one for either :(
And still I only get a hug twice a year, once for christmas and once for my birthday smh
/r/humblebrag  /s
/r/humblebrag  /s
You made my day better. Thank you
Look at this lucky shoot celebrating his birthday
Fr fr :( 
I've started hugging my friends instead of fist-bumping or shaking hands as a greeting. I'm positive everyone knows it's because I'm stunted and need to feel, but no one's said anything yet.
>I'm positive everyone knows it's because I'm stunted and need to feel, but no one's said anything yet.  That's just your depression veil 
Wouldn't recommend doing that as a boy to other boys, idiots will say you're gay
Nah I've never had this happen to me. Not unless I was like back in 7th grade
Wouldn't recommend doing that as a boy to other boys, idiots will say you're gay
thats not really a thing 
I don't know if I'm loveable, but I do know that practically speaking, I have nothing to offer.   I don't look good, I don't make good money, I don't drive a nice car or have a nice life, and my mental issues make it impossible for me to be any sort of dependable emotional support for anyone.  I'm lonely, but I get it. I wouldn't want to be trapped in a relationship with me either. 
This is exactly how it is for me, though also throw in physical health problems. All of that makes me pretty unloveable, imo. And that's been my experience too.
I make good money, doesn't help haha. Though it's nice to not worry about bills. 
That's just it. I can't pay the bills. Im not self-sufficient. Im a failure as a man.
Despite being lonely and unloved, I hate to interact with people. I try to avoid them since I have such a pathetic life.
Same here also nice username mate
Same here also nice username mate
I ship you two
I see myself pretty much as a disgusting freak, who no one wants to love.
I feel the same way because when I am  near anyone, I get really weird and uncomfortable and usually say something offensive. I’m embarrassed to walk around people because I feel like a freak.
At least people want you sexually
trust, being used and thrown away is way shittier than being alone.  grass is always greener I guess.
Its the opposite with me. I'm the one who finds everyone else unlovable. In theory I want physical/emotional closeness too but if I ever come close to it I feel deeply uncomfortable and occasionally weirded out. 
I'm exactly the same, I want people to be close to me but they can't because I keep most people at arms length and I don't often drop the 'Yes I'm fine thankyou' social facade. I'm afraid of letting people see under the mask so nobody really gets to know me very well. I've only started to realise all this recently, I feel like I can describe what the problem is and why but not stop it from happening...
I'm exactly the same, I want people to be close to me but they can't because I keep most people at arms length and I don't often drop the 'Yes I'm fine thankyou' social facade. I'm afraid of letting people see under the mask so nobody really gets to know me very well. I've only started to realise all this recently, I feel like I can describe what the problem is and why but not stop it from happening...
For me, dropping the mask is usually more trouble than its worth. And I've kept it up for so long, I think I've actually become the mask rather than the person who used to be behind it. I dunno if that's good or bad but at the end of the day, I'm unhappy if I hide and unhappy if I don't hide. No winning I guess.
> I remember days when I used to be able to fall asleep on time and be happy about the coming day.  Wow. I never even realised but I haven't thought that in a while either.
I can't think of ever doing that more than a day or two in a row. Damm. 
Five years of Fallout 3.  Even an apocalyptic wasteland was preferable to all of this.  You aren't alone. Far from it.
I just started playing new Vegas and I've spent whole days just playing the game 
The worst is when the depression is so bad, even gaming or watching stuff just doesn't appeal. I've had days go by where I spent most of the day not gaming or watching Netflix, but trying to convince myself to even do that. :/
literally me right now
I like to play games like skyrim where I can live in a different world.
Ever tried Fallout? Pretty damn fantastic, if you're into sci-fi, and/or post apocalyptic stuff. The other Elder Scrolls games are great too, if you haven't tried them.
I do. I suffer with chronic pain and the chronic depression that goes with it. For me it's Netflix and Internet, mostly reddit, that I use to distract myself.
Me too. Bipolar and PTSD here. And every time I ended up in the hospital I was told 'you just need to find a job'.
Me too. Bipolar and PTSD here. And every time I ended up in the hospital I was told 'you just need to find a job'.
just find a job?  let me strap on my job helmet...
Pretty much why I've lost interest in it. Being terrible at life is bad enough, but being bad at something that's meant to take my mind off everything? Dang that.
The way I get around being bad at gaming is by using cheat codes and stuff. The only problem with that is that the games get boring rather quickly.
The way I get around being bad at gaming is by using cheat codes and stuff. The only problem with that is that the games get boring rather quickly.
I only really played MP games, hard to cheat at them. SP games are the complete opposite, they're either too easy and I get little satisfaction playing them, or they're too hard and I lack the motivation to continue playing.
Marco Polo? Daredevil? House of Cards? Silicon Valley?  Have you watched those?
I've seen Daredevil but none of the others. What are those like?
I've seen Daredevil but none of the others. What are those like?
Marco Polo - life of Marco Polo, an Italian merchant traveller who traveled West (Europe) and East(Around China/Mongolia).  I won't spoil the rest because it's an adventure.  House of Cards - a story about an ambitious Democratic politician.  A lot of power struggle, drama, sex and violence.  Silicon Valley - a story about a startup tech company.  I just watch it for the comedy mostly.
Yeah this is what I do most of my weekends. I wish I could spend more of my time doing this honestly, but I have work every day during the week and it is slowly killing me.
Work is killing you?  Rough coworkers? Rough job duties? I am jobless and waste the day away and feel like that is killing me. I wish to have a job so I can have something to wake up for and create structure in my life. 
Work is killing you?  Rough coworkers? Rough job duties? I am jobless and waste the day away and feel like that is killing me. I wish to have a job so I can have something to wake up for and create structure in my life. 
I second that
Yes, and I really try and stop myself too. I've found this only makes things worse. Best thing you can do is stay busy. 
Video games can *be* 'busy' though, especially if you have nothing else going on. Empty work that fills up space.  It's definitely not helpful to game if you have other pressing things to do, though.
Video games can *be* 'busy' though, especially if you have nothing else going on. Empty work that fills up space.  It's definitely not helpful to game if you have other pressing things to do, though.
Yes, but there's a difference between doing something to 'escape' from the real world and doing something because you enjoy it. If your 'escaping' then whatever that activity is it's not helpful to you and its just feeding your depression so you shouldn't do it. 
for me its because being awake when everyone else is asleep are the moments i feel most calm, because with everyone else doing nothing but sleeping i dont feel shitty in comparison or feel like i need to be doing something. during the day its the opposite and sucks
this is also why I like the rain so much. 
this is also why I like the rain so much. 
wow same!
oh my god, i do this (or at least try).  but the issue is, i also want to go to bed really early to have less time awake. so adding hours asleep at that time limits the amount of sleep that stretches into the afternoon. this whole lifestyle feels like spilling one's life away, does it not?   btw, is your username a reference to a particular Smiths song?
Yes it is :) I am a huge Smiths and Morrissey fan. They have and continue to get me through sone dark times. That song is possibly the most relatable song I know (sadly enough) It's a classic though.
my sleep cycle is messed up. lately, ive been waking up at 1-2am in the morning. 
Hey that's my bed time.
I had and have terrible social anxiety.  I pushed people away and still do unintentionally.  It started so early. I’ve never developed social skills. It really hurts. I’m 27 years old I’m so lonely it hurts but I don’t know how to be with people. I’m gonna try suicide soon. 
Don't do it man. You are stronger than that. I have social anxiety as well and spent the past few years behind my computer. Try to get into social hobbies: in that way you will see a lot of people without really having to push yourself to contact them, since you will see them through your hobby anyway! I now do dance classes like folk and swing. (And got into running, but that's only social if you join a sports club)
You all, let's be friends! I'm in a similar situation, but still in college to finish my freshman year and unable to get a job because constant stress, social anxiety and working a boring entry-level job just makes me feel even more pathetic and worthless. Trust me, crying relieves so much stress, so cry more or find other ways you can release that energy.
I just said on my comment that we should be friends!
I just said on my comment that we should be friends!
Me too thanks
Your lucky you still felt good at high school:) i felt like this after 8th grade. I tried my 1st attempt to kill myself after. Im re attempting soon. Wish me luck:)
Hey dude, I know we don't know each other, and I don't know your situation or how difficult it might be, but I really hope you can find peace in life, and that you don't attempt to kill yourself. If you ever want someone to message, I will be here.
I wish I enjoyed conversation.
This really hit me hard. I froze and stared into space for a good 5 minutes.
'Stop feeling sorry for yourself.'
'You have it so much better than the rest of the world'  'You need my religion'  'Just choose to be happy'
'You hurt yourself? Wow u attention seeker'
Weirdly enough, now that you mention it, I think I do actually do it for attention...it's a way to silently scream out at the world that you need help, without having to speak a single word, because you don't know how else to express yourself 
Oh shit I know exactly what the fake soul crushing [weak smile] is! Help me
Yeah it's like I didn't want her to feel like she was leaving me sad but I also **hate** faking smiles. Thus the [weak smile] is created.
If you can I think you should briefly thank her later. Not many people care enough to stop and ask if a stranger is doing okay. 
That's true
You said endorphins twice 
That's just how good endorphins are.
Had a very similar situation yesterday. Girl stopped me after class to ask me if I was alright. I couldn't really come up with a coherent response so just said 'I have a lot of stuff on my mind' while avoiding eye contact.
Yes, I think surprisingly difficult to formulate a response.
for me its almost like a separate person who takes over and makes those decisons, like someone speaking through your mouth like 'hes fine.' I find that i can feel a really bad spell coming on days before it happens but i cant stop myself. its like when you know you're about to get a cold/flu
Whe. You think about it, it us like we all have our own Tyler Durden. He's a simple Tyler in that the thing he is that we aren't is that he's okay.
When I was on vacation a year or two ago [I can't even remember,] I was in this building having lunch and a lady came by to ask if I wanted to have lunch with everyone else in their lunch room. I politely shook my head and continued to eat by myself. It's like, I wanna be with people, but my brain doesn't want me to. It's dumb. 
Do you have social anxiety or something similar? I have no such problem myself,  I just know that nobody can help me so I often isolate myself. I don't want people to spend effort trying to help me when they just can't.
Do you have social anxiety or something similar? I have no such problem myself,  I just know that nobody can help me so I often isolate myself. I don't want people to spend effort trying to help me when they just can't.
I would say so. I've developed it over the past few years, though. I never had this problem before and was even the person who would go up to people to initiate a friendship. But things have changed. 
I think my prof is noticing my nervous tendencies in class due to my social anxiety. 
How I wish my profs notice my shaky voice and stutters when they call out my name or to present. 
One time I was just washing my hands in a public bathroom and I girl came up next to me and said, 'Cheer up, buttercup.' in a really sympathetic voice. Like what the shoot, is DEPRESSION written on my face? Even if it was, telling someone to cheer up is so not helpful
She probably didn't think you were depressed, she probably just saw you looked sad. Most people who are sad aren't depressed. Maybe she just thought you'd had a rough day or some bad news.
My supervisor came to me the other day  to tell me that i'm going to have to do extra hours next week even though that she doesn't have that right and that i'm going through my mid semester, when I was with a customer. I was so angry and pissed that the customer told me 'to not let my anger control my actions'. Unbeknownst to her, she did not know what kind of action i was thinking at the moment. People can detect sadness but not understand the context.
retail?  yikes. Same stuff happens with me and my customers all the time. Wish you luck buddy
Hey, if she stopped out like that; it means she cares. Don't be afraid to talk to her more, sometimes ladies see the best to talk to about things like this. They got the motherly nurturing instincts
Sometimes. I know people who slightly care, but to unleash my burden would be too much and stepping from semi-acquaintances to being completely vulnerable in front of them.
Something very similar happened to me a few years ago, in a store. I remember being so alarmed by it at the time, like I couldn't believe people could tell where I was at in my head. It was one of the things that helped me reflect on my depression and really take steps to manage it.  In retrospect, I think it must have been obvious to everyone but it took a stranger to point it out.  I hope things work out for you too.
> it must have been obvious to everyone but it took a stranger to point it out.  This is an oddly powerful sentence
Shit dude, why did you say you were ok? You should have told the truth
Because she can't help me. I don't want her to waste efforts
Because she can't help me. I don't want her to waste efforts
You don't know that
Ye, he probably should but... In my experience it's kinda hard and awkward to speak about that kind of stuff with someone you barely know, a stranger basically. I don't know, maybe it's just me.
Of course, but you know what's harder? Suffering alone. She's obviously open enough where she asked a near-complete stranger about that just based off facial expressions and body language. Whereas you can spend years around people who don't even realize if something is wrong or don't bother to ask.
Of course, but you know what's harder? Suffering alone. She's obviously open enough where she asked a near-complete stranger about that just based off facial expressions and body language. Whereas you can spend years around people who don't even realize if something is wrong or don't bother to ask.
You're probably right although sometimes people just want to be nice.
This works until you've gone back to sleep for the 5th time and your body won't let you anymore
I'm so drained all the time i find i could sleep 48 hours if i wanted. The only thing that gets me out of bed is to eat so i don't starve.
Walmart sells generic sleep aids that is basically Dramamine. There not really addictive but it'll be hard to sleep with out them for a few days. When my depression was worse I'd take 15-20 a day to sleep for the whole day
Was it diphenhydramine? If so, please be careful and NEVER take more than 250mg (preferably stay under 150mg). In larger doses it is a very potent and unpleasant deliriant. You can have dark, scary, realistic hallucinations on high doses. However, under ~200mg it's fine.
Does it help...in the long term this won't help. hence your health is starting to take a hit. Find your purpose & passion and work towards it. Your life is your art form. You can still turn it into something spectacular & happy
I wish I believed that. I just don't have any faith in myself. I'm scared. 
I feel so awkward and embarrassed when asked those questions. Whatever I say, I feel like a faker and a liar -- not actually making up false answers, but definitely trying to make reality sound a lot more interesting and upbeat (and less panicked and meaningless) than it really is, or really feels. 'Oh yeah, fine, last week I saw a newborn fawn.'
Yes I always feel so fake too. If I told them the truth they'd tell me something I've heard a million times or they would tell me about how their cousins brother fixed his depression by going to church or getting up at the crack of dawn to exercise or just stopped thinking about so much.....the same line of bullshit you get from anyone who finds out about how life has really had been
I just had a whole week off and I did NOTHING! I go back to work tomorrow and I know people will be asking what I did this whole time off. It's going to be kind of embarrassing having to admit that I slept 50% of the time. The struggle is real. 
It makes me unreasonably uncomfortable when coworkers ask what I did last night/this weekend. I can't tell them 'I spend more time with you guys than any other people. So nothing as usual.' so I always direct the question back to them. I know it comes off as rude and I'm really not trying to be.   
Honestly, if someone downvotes someone else's work that clearly isn't harmful and is really sincere, they're just being an insensitive piece of shit. Dang em.
You mean every 2nd person on reddit? Yes shoot em.
You mean every 2nd person on reddit? Yes shoot em.
They gotta buy me dinner first.
They gotta buy me dinner first.
Can't skip dinner.
When I posted I got hate but mod immediately deleted the comment. The mods do actually stay active on this sub wich Is nice
<3
Thank you! *virtual hugs back* I am not trying to be an 'upvote attention whore' (lol). I really do appreciate the support of everyone here, it just irked me; I guess I can still be pretty insecure. :/
To be fair, it's hard to not be insecure when you have depression. Keep fighting the good fight :)
To be fair, it's hard to not be insecure when you have depression. Keep fighting the good fight :)
Thank you! You are awesome. I really appreciate the support, kind stranger :) Have a wonderful day!   **EDIT:** ah the wonderful downvote. You can downvote away but you wont ruin my day ;)  **EDIT #2:** and you can presume I meant this obnoxiously and downvote this even more but the fact is others responses helped reaffirm my faith in humanity so go ahead it wont bother me (too much)....lol!
I think down votes and up votes should be shut down on this sub.
It's not possible to disable either downvotes, or upvotes.  You can hide them with css on the desktop, but that's easily gotten around and has no effect on mobile users, who are the majority.   
I love myself and my life  ...  HA GOT YOU
Me too, thanks.
Me too, thanks.
Haha
Yay, I guessed it correctly before opening. Can I be happy now?
Nope! Hah!
found out I didn't get the job that I thought I was going to get. I really hoped it was a joke, but it definitely wasn't.  shit sucks.  
I'm really sorry you didn't get it. 
Ooooh, here's one! Here's a good joke! Literally *every single aspect* of my life, including but not limited to my career prospects, cash on hand, and love life! Hahahahahahhhhhadjkjfgdkj./
shh bby is ok
Watch NXT takeover on the WWE network. If you don't have it you can sign up free for the month and watch Wrestlemania tomorrow too. At the very least it'll get your mind off of shit for a couple days
i'm doing that!
dude I wish I was american or something. it so shooting hurts to be alone 
Damn, dude. Wanna talk about it?
Sorry if i overshadow you, but i saw a therapist today. And i feel like thats a small win for me too. I dont really have that many friends so i decided to share here   Edit: wow i got gilded too, thank you so much
Good for you. I remember when I started going for the first time. For me it's just a relief to tell someone something and have them just listen. If you want to talk to somebody you can always message me. 
Good for you. I remember when I started going for the first time. For me it's just a relief to tell someone something and have them just listen. If you want to talk to somebody you can always message me. 
Thank you. I have quiet a few online friends but i never mind adding a new one🙂 and yeah it felt good to just get it out of my system. I've been suicidal for the past few days too but talking to someone has just removed a burden off my heart. I cried in therapy too so maybe that helped as well haha
i need a dog...
If you can I highly recommend it. I don't know where I would be without my best friend. 
i need a dog...
they're always happy and jumping around, someone mail me a pug
Pets are great until they die.  Then it's devastating.  The stronger you bond with them, the more painful their deaths will be.  I've had pets before and losing them was traumatizing.
Dang 
I'm happy for you! Dogs are a godsend, especially for depressed people. Even in days where you don't want to take care of yourself, your dog can remind you that you have a life to live.   Pic of good boy?
[this is zoey :D](http://imgur.com/a/6vaCU)
Honestly, that sounds lovely. This just made me realise how badly I need a dog.
Me too. Maybe a cat instead I heard they are good to help depression.
That's beautiful to hear. Anything in particular about your experience you want to share?
Sure! I've been going through the mental health system on and off for years now without ever really getting 'better' per say. Today was the first day since this all started that I broke through the monotony and apathy that came with my depression and finally enjoyed something beautiful. It's especially rewarding because I've been working my ass off in therapy and it's showing. It encourages me to keep going. I think I'll remember that moment for the rest of my life. Thanks for asking!
Your story is being told now. Moments pass, fleeting, never to be reclaimed. Soon you too will die, disappear, and be forgotten. 
C'mon, dude. Don't be that guy.
What's so wrong with what he said?  It's all true, and if looked at correctly can actually give a sense of purpose to the time you currently posses.
OP's trying to share and enjoy a happy moment after probably years of exactly that sort of thinking, constantly (if he's anything like me or everyone I know who also has depression), and he's diminishing the 'small victory' thing. This wasn't the time or place for a comment like that.
Holy shit. You just described my last hour. Oh well.
Put school somewhere in there and it would have described my whole day
That's... pretty much my whole day.
3 years.
3 years.
Let's be friends.
Let's be friends.
You mean the ones we haven't already wither away and go on to live full, productive lives?
For what is worth, your post was amazing, u have a powerful insight.  Cheers :)
Agree! Although I just lurk most of the time, the rest it pretty spot on.
Thats way too acurate for my liking. Im going to do something to mix it up... like... uhhh.... anyone have any ideas here?
Chocolate.. Oh wait he covered that...
Chocolate.. Oh wait he covered that...
Hey, I found out someone read one of my replies. BREAKING THE CYCLE.
Hey, I found out someone read one of my replies. BREAKING THE CYCLE.
Oh God we better get back in line before they send us to the 'camp' 
>'it's not that bad'   I had a class and in it the topic of suicide was brought up. The teacher gave an example of this depressed couple who flew to Sweden for assisted suicide, since it's legal there. He asked the class if it was okay that they did that. One of the kids said no because 'depression isn't that bad.'   :(
At that point I would get into a heated debate with him because shoot people that downplay mental illnesses.
At that point I would get into a heated debate with him because shoot people that downplay mental illnesses.
I wouldn't entirely blame him. To be fair, education on mental illnesses is non-existant in schools. :/
ye
ye ye
I can't even tell my shrink of my past history of severe clinical depression. Still wallowing in the issue of insomnia.   As for other people (family, colleagues), I prefer that they not know. Re family, I don't want them to worry (or worse, blame me for bringing it upon myself). Re colleagues, it'd just become awkward if not gossip. 
Dangin tell them. Don't mean to be harsh but bloody hell you are paying this person so they can help you, if you don't tell them shit then nothing good will come of it, just a lot of written checks that didn't get anything done.
Stupid question what's DEA 
Does Anybody Else
Does Anybody Else
Thanks 
I don't understand this. Why on earth would anybody be uncomfortable telling their parents about having depression? 
Hahaha
I hope you never set foot in here again.
Haha, thanks. Me too.
You are so mean! Oh, wait sorry I forgot in what sub we are. :(
It's funny that we all support each other with the goal to never see any of you again (in this sub).
Between depression and anxiety, I've lost jobs, friends, even have been dumped because I was too upset or too panicked to slap on a happy face. I've even been called 'shooting sketchy' because I see a therapist, and therefore I'm a psycho who might set their house on fire or something.
yeah you are either rich and whiny and have too much time on your hands which is why you are in therapy or your 'sketchy'. Even further... people tend to assume that people who are mentally ill are on welfare and vice versa 
yeah you are either rich and whiny and have too much time on your hands which is why you are in therapy or your 'sketchy'. Even further... people tend to assume that people who are mentally ill are on welfare and vice versa 
Oh yes. I love the rich snob insults. And god forbid a parent pays for your therapy, now you're a spoiled brat.  And if you happen to be on welfare and getting the help you need, you're a leech.
Oh yes. I love the rich snob insults. And god forbid a parent pays for your therapy, now you're a spoiled brat.  And if you happen to be on welfare and getting the help you need, you're a leech.
exactly. either way you are useless to society. im lucky enough to have free health care... medicare pays most of my meds, free psychiatrist, social worker, group therapy, etc. i often think about how absolutely screwed financially my family and i would be if we lived the states ...
Today I got called a stimulant and shoottard. Yesterday, I was told to kill myself and got made fun of. Mom told me - 'Stop acting like a bipolar shit.' Father told me that my mental illnesses are sublimation. And so on and on.
shoottard. what does that even MEAN!! its like 'assface' people are stupid. I've noticed that the mental health stigma is really affecting those with bipolar, personality disorders, or any psychotic symptoms. Its like the world is coming to terms with depression, anxiety, ocd, adhd ('omg im like totally ocd today i organized my clothes. but so like adhd cause i forgot my keys....etc etc etc)
shoottard. what does that even MEAN!! its like 'assface' people are stupid. I've noticed that the mental health stigma is really affecting those with bipolar, personality disorders, or any psychotic symptoms. Its like the world is coming to terms with depression, anxiety, ocd, adhd ('omg im like totally ocd today i organized my clothes. but so like adhd cause i forgot my keys....etc etc etc)
>I've noticed that the mental health stigma is really affecting those with bipolar, personality disorders, or any psychotic symptoms.  People just don't see a problem here.  >('omg im like totally ocd today i organized my clothes. but so like adhd cause i forgot my keys....etc etc etc)  This. Because you get some rare mood swings does not makes you bipolar, dammit.
>I've noticed that the mental health stigma is really affecting those with bipolar, personality disorders, or any psychotic symptoms.  People just don't see a problem here.  >('omg im like totally ocd today i organized my clothes. but so like adhd cause i forgot my keys....etc etc etc)  This. Because you get some rare mood swings does not makes you bipolar, dammit.
THANK YOU. i remember having a smoke outside my school and listening to some girl convinced she was bipolar cause she was depressed when she woke up but super happy in the afternoon. or remember the #cutforbieber fiasco? like way to take self harming and make it something worth laughing at...
Your parents are shits.  Work hard and get out.  You are going to make it.
Thank you.
Thanks for that reply, it means a lot to me. 
i see you used a new username just for this for opening up in this thread. that means a lot to me. i hope to others as well. i hope you surround yourself with positive and understanding people. and you find the RIGHT therapists - cause they aren't perfect and have their own biases sometimes. i got stuck with a therapist who specialized in cancer patients. she belittled my problems because to her they were so unimportant compared to her other patients. 
You could say any form of 'mental illness' is just societal dissonance.
haha. yes. i guess, sometimes. i've had interesting sociological debates about this with a great professor. 
Must suck to have to constantly suppress your desires! Then again, married men have done it for years :)  Seriously though, pretty damn brave to come out like this - may you have a happy life.
Thanks - and I love your first comment :p
A lot of people are too afraid to even think about pedophilia in order to learn to accept that nobody chooses to be that way. Their first reaction is defense and hatred, it makes me really sad. Pedophiles are human too.
>nobody chooses to be that way   well said. nobody CHOOSES their mental illness. I always hear people in group therapies wishing they had this instead of that cause it would be 'easier'. Pain and suffering are a very personal experience that cannot well be quantified. especially when the pain is emotional, psychological..
You know.....I've never seen pedophiles as the victim in any form of the word. Well maybe not a victim but definitely not just monsters either. This gives me a lot to think about now. I hope you find the help you need sir. 
thanks for coming forth with this. :) sometimes it takes more to admit our minds have been opened then anything else. power to you! i know this thread opened my mind up as well. 
i've gotten fired...lost friends...i dont think this will get much attention cause noone wants to admit these things. good luck anyways
It got mine. I hope everything turns out good for you. :)
thanks for your great story :) the diabetes metaphor really works well in explaining to others - thanks for backing me up on that one :) Laughing and making jokes is so great - i tell people that things are just a little bit more colorful in my head ;)   What would the mental illness ribbon color be?? 
I'm not sure for mental illness overall, but I think dark blue would be a good color for a depression ribbon. 
I'm not sure for mental illness overall, but I think dark blue would be a good color for a depression ribbon. 
i just did a quick google check and it looks like it's dark blue/green!
i know what you mean. sometimes depression is kinda this numb comforting blanket from the world... almost a hazy wall between you and the real world. you tell your psych your suicidal thoughts are bothering you and youve been more depressed lately... with a smile on your face? doesnt go over well. we're so used to masking the depression that if that mask were to come off we wouldnt know how to put it back on..
Yeah, I don't know why I can't just be like, 'I have a problem and I wanna deal with it,' instead of literally exhibiting depression to prove that I have depression.  For people with anxiety (moi) that is a hideous thought--no thanks!
Yeah, I don't know why I can't just be like, 'I have a problem and I wanna deal with it,' instead of literally exhibiting depression to prove that I have depression.  For people with anxiety (moi) that is a hideous thought--no thanks!
haha! yessss. cause i want to have a panic attack/anxiety attack in my therapists office... it wont deter me from ever going again AT ALL...
not to be debbie downer, but 'lets break the stigma' means almost nothing when you're so afraid of the stigma you made a throwaway account. 
I scrolled through almost this entire thread to find this.
You're right about me having to apologize for it a lot.  They get fed up with me a lot.  And I know that I need help.  I can't get help though, my family has too much of a stigma against this kind of thing.  To get help I'd have to tell them, and they would make things worse and not let me get help.
you dont have to tell them! that can be later on :) if you are at school - you can find great resources without your parents knowing. also if you are older then your state/province's age of consent your mental health is none of your parents gosh darn business. 
I have PTSD therefore I'm a loose cannon and a monster...
this is a terrible misconception. another one on ptsd - that you can only have ptsd from being in a traumatic situation. some people have gotten ptsd from just being in the surrounding neighbourhood or being a witness or even watching a traumatic event live on television. 
this is a terrible misconception. another one on ptsd - that you can only have ptsd from being in a traumatic situation. some people have gotten ptsd from just being in the surrounding neighbourhood or being a witness or even watching a traumatic event live on television. 
yea, pardon my french, but shoot dr phil. calling vets with ptsd monsters. it affects so many people and its so uncared for. people tell you to just forget it, things that have haunted me for this long are not just going to ne forgotten.
yea, pardon my french, but shoot dr phil. calling vets with ptsd monsters. it affects so many people and its so uncared for. people tell you to just forget it, things that have haunted me for this long are not just going to ne forgotten.
I'm honestly surprised anyone can come back from a war without PTSD.  I think it's a travesty that adequate services aren't provided to veterans, and they are just sent home and expected to adjust back to civilian life as if nothing happened.  I truly hope you've been able to get some help, as PTSD is one scary disorder.
Your first line stigmatizes people with intellectual disabilities.  I am tremendously supportive of breaking down stigma mental health disabilities, but the first line is a bit crass and stigmatizing of another type of disability, which was an irony I wanted to bring to light.  
you are completely right. i didn't mean retard as in intellectually impaired. but thats exactly what's wrong with using the word in the first place. bad on me! it was very hypocritical  and i've updated it. thanks SO much for pointing it out its embarrassing that it was there for so long. sorry for offending if i did :)
you are completely right. i didn't mean retard as in intellectually impaired. but thats exactly what's wrong with using the word in the first place. bad on me! it was very hypocritical  and i've updated it. thanks SO much for pointing it out its embarrassing that it was there for so long. sorry for offending if i did :)
No worries, and thanks for being receptive to hearing it!  I'm glad you didn't take it negatively, its hard to convey intention through the Internet...
No worries, and thanks for being receptive to hearing it!  I'm glad you didn't take it negatively, its hard to convey intention through the Internet...
there needs to be a sarcasm and sincere fonts... lol
You are a badass mofo, good sir.  Keep chuggin' on.   Here, have a cookie!  ;)
I'm also doing awesome things like scheduling my own doctors appointments and going to work....and enjoying it.
I should be doing that too... what the hell, I'm filthy... -Sigh- Hey, congratulations. You're doing good, and that's awesome. Hope you manage to keep it up.
Agreed. Upvote for OP. Trying to remember to take care of my health myself. My teeth are pretty filthy, and I should go to a dentist.
Congratulations. My follow up after a ER visit. saw how highly i scored in areas of depression. and prescribed cymbalta as well. It's not 100% as i still need to change my habits ( hard to go outside with the high summer temperatures) but it really has helped Cheers! *raises an ice cream sandwich*
My depression is in remission and I feel the same way about going outside right now. Maybe when it stops being necessary to wear gloves while driving...
Awesome, well done! I've walked the dogs each day (but not always showered or brushed my teeth). It's so hard, but it's amazing when you can turn around and see whole weeks where you actually did it. 
My dogs are so jealous now. I shouldn't let them read over my shoulder :)
for me showering when I'm down usually just feels like a bother, a chore, and time stuck focusing on thoughts I don't want to experience. Hence shower beers as incentives.  TL;DR: I would say yes, it more or less is.
I would describe it as a chore as well. Like 'do I really have to shower today?'
My problem stems from the 'you have to believe that' part. With something as maddeningly illogical is depression, holding on to the fact that things aren't as bad as my mind makes it out to be is the number one struggle.
a bajillion upvotes if I could
thanks for posting, loved watching this video the other day, steve ross has a soothing, uplifting voice.
No problem, the gif just really made me smile.
When did he use hair relaxer or straighteners?  Where's the trademark afro?
This is Steve Ross, Bob Ross' son.
This is Steve Ross, Bob Ross' son.
Wow, blew my mind.  By the way, that's from a bavarian TV station, they always used to air Bob Ross late at night, and there's nothing better than coming home piss drunk at 4 or 5 and just lying on the couch and relaxing to that voice. 
This is Steve Ross, Bob Ross' son.
My bad -- was used to the father...  if the son anything like him, prefer the father ...not saying much
To answer your question 'that's life'. That's how people are okay with it.  I can't do it. I do it now and it's not worth it, this is the most important post in here for me. I don't know how to work a shitty, tedious job. And I hate the 'that's life' excuse. Adulthood sounds miserable
That's not 'life' though - the 40 hour work week is in no way divinely inspired - we're all just slaves to our corporate overlords. We've just been conditioned to think this is how the world should work, when it really doesn't have to be this way.  Try checking out /r/communism101 some time.
That's not 'life' though - the 40 hour work week is in no way divinely inspired - we're all just slaves to our corporate overlords. We've just been conditioned to think this is how the world should work, when it really doesn't have to be this way.  Try checking out /r/communism101 some time.
It's bullshit. '8 hours work, 8 hours recreation, 8 hours sleep'  You forgot to factor in the 2 hours of commuting, another hour to buy groceries, another hour to cook food, another hour to do chores, and another hour (one half hour in the morning and one at night) to get ready/get up from bed and you get 2-3 hours to yourself.
It's bullshit. '8 hours work, 8 hours recreation, 8 hours sleep'  You forgot to factor in the 2 hours of commuting, another hour to buy groceries, another hour to cook food, another hour to do chores, and another hour (one half hour in the morning and one at night) to get ready/get up from bed and you get 2-3 hours to yourself.
That's your recreation now. 
I wish I only worked 40 hours a week. Last week was 6 days that added up to somewhere between 50 and 60 hours. Doing  physical labor. I don't know how much more of this my body can take, but I'll be laid off in about 2 months anyhow and I'll get to rest with unemployment.
The American Dream.^tm
As someone from former communist country I got a bad news for you.   It just doesn't work that way you imagine.
That's because that's not real communism lol.
Yeah, i dont know how people do it. Trapped in a cycle for decades and then finally you die and everything you ever did will become pointless because when youre dead its like youre never even born.
Well, to be fair the generations that pat themselves on the back for their work ethic actually received something in return for their labor. If generations born in the 70's are lazy about anything, it's allowing this shit to continue.  Keep voting in plutocrats, or not voting at all. idiots!
I've been hearing a lot of good things about sweden recently. Perhaps I should move.
rapes and immigrant culture.  I used to live in Cologne. Highly recommend against going back to my friends and family for safety reasons. Europe has become overly PC, and in exchange, everyones safety is in decline.
Deal drugs instead.
I can't even do basic stuff like brushing my teeth or making toast, I doubt I'd be able to deal drugs.
Whow whow.... This is not an option. Yes, work is hard but you can divert to other things. Start your own business, work reduced hours, engage in a healthy social life. Im not saying its easy but ending ones life is not the ideal solution.
For plenty of people,  living is not the ideal solution,  either
i don't know how people do it  i haven't worked a day in my life and have no desire to whatsoever, i've never had a 'dream career' at all and would rather do nothing
I've worked because I need money, but I too have no dream career. I'd rather do nothing.
This is basically why I'm depressed. So much pressure to go to college and get a good job just to waste most of your life working for someone you hate and doing something you hate. Dang that, I will get a job for awhile then I'm just going to travel around. Hoping that maybe a change of scenery will ease this hell.
Please try to remember this after you have worked for a little while and saved up some money. I am at that point now but just do not have to confidence to go =(
I'm really really surprised I haven't seen this sub mentioned yet:  r/financialindependence  It changed my life. Seriously. I am on track for being free from corporate slavery in ~10 years.
That sounds nice but at the same time screams 'I'm hooked for ten years *just to opt out*' and man, that's such a downer.
Humans can be so gentle. Good luck with your recovery.
Thank you!
> Take it as a positive omen from the universe.  Yes, that's what I thought - a more superstitious person would definitely have taken that as an omen, and I can chose to do the same if I want. It's refreshing.
Exactly right if nothing else you were lucky it chose you to land on you, never has it happened to me or anyone else i know, so there must be something special about you, how you choose to interpret this is of course up to you but i would call it lucky if it were me, a butterfly is a beautiful creature and i'm sure they are attracted to other beautiful things so don't be too hard on yourself :)
Exactly right if nothing else you were lucky it chose you to land on you, never has it happened to me or anyone else i know, so there must be something special about you, how you choose to interpret this is of course up to you but i would call it lucky if it were me, a butterfly is a beautiful creature and i'm sure they are attracted to other beautiful things so don't be too hard on yourself :)
I'm not at all superstitious, but sometimes, when really special things like this happen -- at the right time and to the right person -- I don't think it hurts to wonder and feel gratitude.  Congratulations on your hard work. Stay strong. And good luck.
Wow! A small & beutiful reminder of how much a living creature can change in a short period of time.   I've often wondered how painful it may be for a caterpillar to metamorphisize into a butterfly or a moth. But the end result is amazing: from a crawler to a flyer. In one lifetime.   Thank you for posting this and good luck with your (at times painful, I'm sure) metamorphasis.
Thanks!
I'm glad it makes you feel good, but holy shit that is terrifying
... terrifying? It's a butterfly.
... terrifying? It's a butterfly.
or maybe he was referring to a life of sobriety as terrifying.
or maybe he was referring to a life of sobriety as terrifying.
That won't be necessary for me, I didn't have any noteworthy withdrawal symptoms. Chain of unfortunate events, really...
That's basically my family for the past 5 years at least. Yes i was addicted to video games at the age of 15 but that's not why i'm like that now. I simply hate being outside, around people and thinking 'should i react this way? i'm i being weird again?' instead of just acting normal.  
Yeah, I've been avoiding friends/'friends' with video games.  Social interactions make me want to puke.
Yeah, I've been avoiding friends/'friends' with video games.  Social interactions make me want to puke.
I used to be a huge social person. Now the thought gives me so much anxiety about 1) just doing it, 2) the thought that I’m just pushing my friends away, and 3) the thought that I don’t have any friends.  You a PS4 or Xbox fan? I’m ps4. 36y/o and LOVE Fallout, GTA, Skyrim, Horizon, basically any open world game. 
Learn an instrument its as repetetive and pointless as games but accepted by society
Except it isn't repetitive and pointless. You can perform for yourself or for other and there so much variation and depth that a whole life isn't enough to master it.  But it's a great distraction OP, go for it! I've been playing the drums for a while now, been very helpful. 
Except it isn't repetitive and pointless. You can perform for yourself or for other and there so much variation and depth that a whole life isn't enough to master it.  But it's a great distraction OP, go for it! I've been playing the drums for a while now, been very helpful. 
I second this, Music opens a whole new world to explore and experience. It isn’t pointless at all.
Or a new language.
I actually do like spanish a lot and have always wanted to learn Japanese but idk what to do without wifi...
If you can muster the motivation, making a small meal and learning how to cook for yourself can be fun and rewarding. Tonight I'm making fried breaded chicken with gravy and creamed corn from scratch. Learning to cook has been wonderful for my confidence and my body, rather than relying completely on fast food or frozen stuff. I highly recommend learning to cook because it is such an important skill for life and it's very rewarding. 
What resources do you recommend for someone wanting to learn?
What resources do you recommend for someone wanting to learn?
Not op, but here's a few subreddits I found.  /r/cookingforbeginners  /r/AskCulinary  /r/EatCheapAndHealthy
What´s your age? If you´re 18 or more, you can do whatever you want, but it isn´t, talk your problems to your dad, if he don´t understand you, do whatever you want
i’m 24 and still live at home with my parents and most definitely cannot “do whatever i want”. i still have to follow their rules. if i don’t they could kick me out of the house 
Does she believe in internal bleeding? That too can't be seen on the outside, can have delayed effects before which the affected person feels relatively fine etc.?  I mean is she intelligent enough to realize that health isn't a question of beliefs?
She's honestly pretty dumb 
She's honestly pretty dumb 
Does she know anything about neurotransmitters?
Does she know anything about neurotransmitters?
She doesn't know shit about anything 
It's essentially like telling a person who has a cold/fever to 'get another perspective in life' or 'think positively'. If these 'suggestions' won't help a person with physical illness, why would they help with mental illness a.k.a. brain illness.
Exactly. Last time I checked, the brain is a physical organ.
She will believe in a foot up her ass. 
this is golden
'what do you mean random motivation quote didnt fix your chronic mental disease? thats silly! they always work!'  yeah, real silly
Another friend said, in response to me saying I stop grooming and caring for anything, that a shower and putting some makeup on would make me feel better. And when I said I can't sleep before 4/5am, she said 'don't bring your phone to bed, and try to fall asleep pretending you're asleep already'. 5/5 would recommend this advice...
Another friend said, in response to me saying I stop grooming and caring for anything, that a shower and putting some makeup on would make me feel better. And when I said I can't sleep before 4/5am, she said 'don't bring your phone to bed, and try to fall asleep pretending you're asleep already'. 5/5 would recommend this advice...
right, because we absolutely choose to not groom ourselves and choose not to fall asleep. thats absolutely how it works.  i cant really blame people like that; nobody really knows how this works until they experience themselves, and properly too, not the whole 'im sad for a day but ill call it depression because lol.' the whole miserable every day, tired all the time package. all of it. but i wouldnt wish it on anyone; depression is horrible.
Even therapists get paid to tell you the same thing. What's worse, they ignore 'real life' problems in favor of telling you to reframe your perspective into something more 'positive'.  Has never worked for me, ever. 
The best psychologist I ever had, helped me by actually helping me think through my day-to-day real-life problems.
>if I 'just changed my perspective'   Do you know much it hurts if you hear this from your therapist over and over again?   Like, am I just imagining my problems? How am I supposed to say things like crippling loneliness don't bother me?
Therapists are hit and miss. You have to keep looking until you find someone with whom you click. Don't lose hope, there is a therapist right for everyone.
>if I 'just changed my perspective'   Do you know much it hurts if you hear this from your therapist over and over again?   Like, am I just imagining my problems? How am I supposed to say things like crippling loneliness don't bother me?
Get a new one as soon as you can. Some people can't do the job they studied years for and end up making patients worse. 
Get a new one as soon as you can. Some people can't do the job they studied years for and end up making patients worse. 
We already ended sessions on tuesday. No other choice than getting a different therapist. Last session was catastrophic. My trust in her is broken.   After we've known each other for years. And her being the only person in my life that still meant something to me. 
We already ended sessions on tuesday. No other choice than getting a different therapist. Last session was catastrophic. My trust in her is broken.   After we've known each other for years. And her being the only person in my life that still meant something to me. 
The second any therapist says anything similar to that, I lose my trust in them completely too. 
Yeah, I've discovered over a long time that people without depression really don't understand that you can't simply change the chemicals in your body to be more positive. I mean trying to be more positive and changing your perspective isn't a bad thing but it isn't a miracle cure that will solve your depression. 
My response was ' not all of us are privileged enough not to have chemical imbalances in the brain'.
I hate people like that so much. Usually what I say to them when they make those rude comments about depression like, 'Why are you depressed?' 'You're just saying you have it for attention.' 'Just get over it,' or 'People have it worst.'  I just tell them to ask that question to someone has cancer or some other disease. Then they realize that they sound like a prick.
The 'don't feel down because someone has it worse than you' is terrible because someone will always have it worse. Where does the chain end? Who is the worst off? It is like no one is ever allowed to feel bad. But damn, Mr. Don'tFeelDown can be pissed for an hour about paying an extra dollar for his drink and it is normal but we cannot be sad about something without being called names. 
The 'don't feel down because someone has it worse than you' is terrible because someone will always have it worse. Where does the chain end? Who is the worst off? It is like no one is ever allowed to feel bad. But damn, Mr. Don'tFeelDown can be pissed for an hour about paying an extra dollar for his drink and it is normal but we cannot be sad about something without being called names. 
>The 'don't feel down because someone has it worse than you' is terrible because someone will always have it worse.   And then you end up more depressed because you feel guilty for being depressed in the first place when so many people have it worse. Ugh.
>The 'don't feel down because someone has it worse than you' is terrible because someone will always have it worse.   And then you end up more depressed because you feel guilty for being depressed in the first place when so many people have it worse. Ugh.
But like, then when can you feel bad? Never? It is just such a terrible thing and it is worse when I know what makes me down can be insignificant at times but the thoughts will not leave. 
Fill up a watering can and start pouring it on her while she's sitting down.  When she freaks out, tell her: 'I don't believe in humans, I only believe in plants.'
'Just stop feeling so wet!'
'Just stop feeling so wet!'
'Just stop making me wet you!'
I see the reasoning in that people can turn to religion for comfort and care but it is like telling that to someone who lost someone dear to them. Yeah, I get the sentiment but it does not stop the pain. For some it helps but it still hurts very much and feels horrible.  Also, some people are really inconsiderate so she is probably like that too. Sorry to hear about that. 
Religion was a source of pain for me growing up, so I have to bite my lip and politely say, 'I'm glad that works for you, but it doesn't help me.'
Feel you. In the same vibe, she said, 'You just need to sleep.'   If I could sleep, I wouldn't be calling you in tears in the middle of the night.
It's so awful when your own parents can't understand what you are going through ( if they know) or not believing  in mental disorders at all and think that being in that bad mood is because you are stubborn and you can very easily just be happy if you want...
Even though she's not really correct at the end of the day you're still stuck with the illness and if meds don't work then trying to be more positive / having a better perspective is often the only thing that we can try to do. It's a shitty tool in the tool box, but it's still a tool. 
It is a tool, but I can't use it the same way other people can, and it sucks that she doesn't understand that.
could be worse, you could be like me and the rare occasions you try to confide in family and friends, you get called 'a weak willed, selfish c**t', a 'drama queen', a 'faggot'. Being told to suck it up, you have it better than 90%, etc, etc.  Then they hang up the phone, continue on with their day, and I wish I was dead.
Confide in internet strangers. How has your day been?
There is a certain amount of truth to that I think, but being told that is extremely unhelpful and there is more to it than that.
Exactly. For someone who's entire brain is hardwired to think negatively it is so so hard to change the way you think. One of my co-workers used to tell me I needed to let the light shine into my heart and it made me want to scream. 
Exactly. For someone who's entire brain is hardwired to think negatively it is so so hard to change the way you think. One of my co-workers used to tell me I needed to let the light shine into my heart and it made me want to scream. 
>One of my co-workers used to tell me I needed to let the light shine into my heart and it made me want to scream.  How did you *not* hit that person with a stapler? (I'm not advocating violence. I just don't think I would've able to stop myself.)
>One of my co-workers used to tell me I needed to let the light shine into my heart and it made me want to scream.  How did you *not* hit that person with a stapler? (I'm not advocating violence. I just don't think I would've able to stop myself.)
Job pays $20/hr. Rent needs to paid. :(  Job sucks all around tho. Working on getting a new one.  
My mom says the same thing. And she takes meds for depression herself!
wtf lol
also worth acknowledging that you can know something logically but still feel something very different.   It can be a long difficult journey to get your feelings to line up with what you know.     
That's very true noodleworm. I believe the pattern goes like this: Behaviour, followed by thoughts, followed by emotions. Change your behaviours, which will eventually change your thoughts, which will ultimately change your emotions. Note the time between each varies from person to person, and it's definitely a journey for people. And it's tough. Danging tough. But people can fight this. 
It could be her inarticulate way of suggesting cognitive behavioural therapy. When you notice a negative thought you replace it with something positive. Also forcing yourself to smile is supposed to release dopamine and improve mood.   Edit: giving this person the benefit of the doubt, trying to be less pessimistic about humanity :p
That's an incredibly simplistic way of describing CBT.
What the shoot kind of new age spirtuality shit are you talking about? You're not helping anybody either.
Your animosity towards a stranger isn't helping things either.
What the shoot? You can't heal your own mental illness. You think people wouldn't have done that by now if they could? Should people with cancer just cure themselves too? Jesus.
My response exactly! Oh thanks, roommate, I didn't realize that my negative thoughts were unhealthy- now that I do, I'm cured.
my mother is the same
I'm sorry.  When I was a preteen I went to my sister, and her response was 'it must be so hard to be 11, with all those responsibilities'.  She was being completely sarcastic, and it hurt so bad.
You're not alone. What's going on with you?
My work is shut till February 7th and although I've tried to be social as much as I can nothing has worked and no one from my work has spoke to me since we shut  I just feel very alone 
My work is shut till February 7th and although I've tried to be social as much as I can nothing has worked and no one from my work has spoke to me since we shut  I just feel very alone 
That's hard, I get that. Have you reached out to anyone?   Or if you really can't manage to make plans with people you know, maybe just go to a coffee shop and chill, read a book or whatever. Sometimes just being around people helps. You can people watch and laugh to yourself about the silly things in other people's lives, or smile at the nice things.
I'm glad you labelled him as an 'Old' best friend. You do not need that...
Yeah because you don't need friends in life. That was the kind of message I'm sending to anyone reading. Loneliness might be a big piece of the puzzle in some cases.
Yeah because you don't need friends in life. That was the kind of message I'm sending to anyone reading. Loneliness might be a big piece of the puzzle in some cases.
That's not the message I got from this. The message I got is that a 'friend' who abuses you when you are vulnerable and need support is not worthy of being called a friend, and is no true friend at all.  You, and all of us who suffer from this illness, deserve true friends who are kind, understanding and supportive. 
I'm quite short on friends after they ditched me cause 'my boyfriend made me suicidal' and I didn't want to leave him cause it wasn't true. Will you, Ufoul, be my friend?
I would but being the 12 year old I am I don't think it would be beneficial on your side. Up to you.
Dang sunny weather people. A good friend helps you during the ups, and downs.
A good friend Dylan was not.
Dylan is going to be outrageously embarrassed when a few years pass and he thinks about this. It will be one of those memories that flashes through his head when he's trying to sleep that makes him cringe and blush. No one with a lick of empathy could say something like that and not regret it once the grow up.
I doubt it. He will probably think about it and think 'What a dramatic retard.' because there is a lot of things I don't say when I post on here eg: He always calls me a retard.
What a shooting douche, you dont need people like that in your life, stay strong
Yeah I got him out of my life. The stay strong part... eh... kinda been considering suicide a lot lately.
Good for you man. I have yet to conjure the strength to do the same. 
Just go up to them and say 'Hey, shoot you selfish little brat. So much for a friend enforcing suicide on me. Why don't you go tell all your little friends that you lost a friend because you told them to kill themselfs instead of helping them when things got hard on them.'
Dylan was never your friend, Dylan was an inconsiderate selfish mongrel of a bully.
Hey now :(
Good on you. I know it sucks to lose an old friend, but he was toxic and bad for you. There are people who do care and will support you through the bad times as well, many of those are in this forum. 
Yep, and around 70 of these comments are from people who care about everyone! I like it when people don't lie. =)
Hell even I liked myself better when I wasn't depressed. I wish it was that easy not being depressed, just push the off switch and never turn it back on ever again.   Screw that old friend. Who the shoot in their right mind will say 'stop backing out and just kill yourself' to a depressed person? 
Dylan Hood will say that to a depressed person. He is so stupid he said the phone I gave him gave him anxiety and then he gave it to some people that bully me to destroy the phone. It was also my first phone let me add.
I read about imagining yourself as a host (or demon possessing) in another persons body. So if you struggle with hygiene on your own you can imagine that this weak human body you're inhabiting requires daily care so you don't damage this body and human stomachs require refilling 3 times a day and constant fluids so you don't damage the body. It's annoying finding a new body so u gotta look after this one while u can  Just another way of distancing yourself and gaining perspective
That sounds dangerous for somebody whose mentally ill. Actors are professionals and still have trouble seperating themselves from their characters at times.
That sounds dangerous for somebody whose mentally ill. Actors are professionals and still have trouble seperating themselves from their characters at times.
Perhaps, but the level to which somebody immerses themselves in this thought process would be different for everybody, so it could only be used in terms of showering, if that is particularly tough for someone, or only going for a short walk each day. It wouldn't have to be a 'all or nothing' type method of thinking 
Perhaps, but the level to which somebody immerses themselves in this thought process would be different for everybody, so it could only be used in terms of showering, if that is particularly tough for someone, or only going for a short walk each day. It wouldn't have to be a 'all or nothing' type method of thinking 
I totally understand what it is but I laughed at the suggestion of demon. You could just think of yourself being taken over by the stronger, inner you.
Narrating yourself can kinda help make you step out of your own head, which can be good.
Wonder if its possible to get dissociative by just doing this 24/7
Wonder if its possible to get dissociative by just doing this 24/7
The only way I can fall asleep these days is by imagining myself in scenarios in which I am doing a lot better in my life than I actually am. It helps me keep myself from thinking bad thoughts about myself before bed, so it's actually a huge help for me. 
I’ve been there. There are so many things that can build up in your head that eventually you’re stuck in a state where you can’t even think clearly. If you don’t want to say it out loud, maybe write it down? It might not help but it does for me. If there’s anything a stranger over the internet can do then I would love to help. Please feel free to PM me as well. :)
yeah. i def write it down. i dunno if it helps, but al least its something
I just wish it was acceptable for guy to actually be emotional instead of expecting to be a rock
One nice thing about getting older: give less and less shoots about what people care, and it's shooting liberating. I'm accomplishing more because I'm getting positive feedback from people. I still have my problems, but damm it feels good. Want to cry, shoot it, cry; skip, shoot it, go skip the shit out of the day until you knees blow out.  
That’s an opportunity! You certainly have a lot on your mind. Be systematic and put it into text (written or typed), no one even has to read it.   Spend some time formulating your frustrations and reflect on it.  You can externalize internal dialogue, try to come to terms with your inner critics and see what they all want.  You might realize how they all really want the same thing, that is, for you to be okay.
I've never found this to be the case.  Writing down my inner monologue provides no catharsis or resolution of anything.
Do what helps you get your thoughts out. Just type it on your phone or computer if you don't want to get caught. Are you worried about getting in trouble or don't you want them to know how you feel as such?
Well I've always kept it to myself. Would never want to put strain or stress on my family with how I'm feeling. So it's easier for me to just keep my worries in my head, rather than force someone to listen. Thank you for taking an interest though Mate, i hope you're doing alright yourself!
Yup
Like right now...only I have no couch
I do it with people. I look into the nothingness when someone is around me and I just compose a confession about how I want to die. But the angry rant composing happens more when I shower. 
Yeah sometimes I’ll get into imaginary arguments with people or I’ll picture myself in a panel situation where someone asks me a question about being in grad school while being depressed as shit and I just go off on a tirade. I’m dying to explain to my program the bullshit they put me through but nobody ever asks and nobody gives a shit so I just suffer and everyone thinks I’m stupid and lazy
Hate to break it to you bud but your valentine is cheating on you with me, I'm really sorry, I didn't realise it was already committed... :/
I don't understand how Depression manages to attract so many people. She's a cold, unattractive, brutal mistress that finds many different ways of wrecking people's lives. You'd think we'd shun her by now, but somehow she's still the  bad company  she always was.
I don't understand how Depression manages to attract so many people. She's a cold, unattractive, brutal mistress that finds many different ways of wrecking people's lives. You'd think we'd shun her by now, but somehow she's still the  bad company  she always was.
That's it! I'm gonna dump her right.... oh wait. :(
That's it! I'm gonna dump her right.... oh wait. :(
Only she has the power to dump! Sorry.
Only relationship I've ever been in
Same.
You are all officially my Valentine now. I have enough roses for everyone! I hope you like the spaghetti I made.
papyrus?
Through thick and thin, that stupid girl never left me. She's been here for almost two years! She sneaks up on me with this otherbad influence  called 'anxiety'. They team up and attack me at random times! Looks like I've got two slithering girls as my Valentine's this year :)
I wish I could say, I haven't seen that stupid girl in a while, but she's here right now.    Danging  idiot.
11 years and counting. Happy valentines! 
hey we have the same age awh
Nearly 15 years! :')
She must really love you. ❤️
Depression: a temporary problem
Is it april fools now ? ^^ 
At least you're planning. I was so sure I'd be dead by age 27, I didn't bother. Now I'm 40, unemployed and trying to finish up a bachelors.
Kudos to you for trying to get your bachelors! That's hard to do with depression no matter the age. I also think that's very admirable.   
Kudos to you for trying to get your bachelors! That's hard to do with depression no matter the age. I also think that's very admirable.   
Thanks. 
Am I the only one here who can't imagine how my life will look in a month and much less a year? 
I was about to reply that I feel the same way, but honestly when I think about it my life will probably just look the same as it does now lol.   But yeah I definitely don't plan for the future.
I was about to reply that I feel the same way, but honestly when I think about it my life will probably just look the same as it does now lol.   But yeah I definitely don't plan for the future.
I guess the consequences of my actions were easier to predict if I wasn't a mentally ill person fighting not to drop out of college for the second time in a row. Though if I had a job or were neet the future would probably be more clear... 
I've felt this way too. I'm honestly still surprised I've managed to live this long. I'm 28, but I feel like I'm just going through the motions in life to just get by (get a job, go to grad school, etc). I'm not really sure what I'm living for.
Oh man I feel happy to relate to this. I'm only 20 and just doing what I'm 'supposed to do'. Thinking about the future feels like I won't be around, and I don't really feel like I'm living for anything either but for hope.
I'm a PhD student. The only thing that kept me going in undergrad was the hope that I could fix my life if I chased my dreams.  Well, now I'm chasing them and I still want to die. I feel so foolish for hoping.   I don't know how the shoot I'm going to cobble together enough motivation to finish the program. 
Same here, going for a PhD is stressful and depressing as shoot.
I've thought about dying on an almost daily basis since I was 9. I struggled a lot in high school with having to be decisive about things that I didn't expect to be around for. I'm 23 and still have no idea where I'm going or what I want to do. Sometimes I think I might be happier if I had just picked something and gone down a path. Instead, I stayed in place and now I feel stuck. I still can't imagine a future that involves me in it.
I picked something, then my life and circumstances changed, so now I'm literally back at the beginning. It worked insofar that it got my mind off things and gave me something, but once things changed, I realized how empty everything my life and I am.
That was always hard for me to get past in high school. I never thought I was going to live past graduation and, honestly, I'm still surprised I did. You really just have to take it day by day.  A good support system and the right therapist really helps get through that. If I'm being honest I still feel like I'm lying to myself when I plan for the future, but then I think about being unprepared for the future.
That's exactly how I feel. I'm only 17 yet I constantly dream about the day I have kids etc. only to have that little voice in my head whisper 'you won't make it that far'. Makes me want to kill myself even more
WHY! WHY AM I LIKE THIS WHAT THE HELL DID I DO
Care to explain your frustration ? 
Care to explain your frustration ? 
If I could I would. I don't even know why I'm this way, that's the problem. Why can't I just be a normal human being? Instead I'm an awkward loser who spends every day pathetically wallowing in his own misery and I have no motivation to do anything else and I'm too much of a coward to end it.
a guided meditation for you.  https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=92i5m3tV5XY
This was actually extremely helpful. Thank you!
This was actually extremely helpful. Thank you!
That's teh best part and why I love it.  IT's very tongue in cheek, but it will help.  Glad I could be of service.
Sometimes I'm just walking outside minding my own business then people look at me weird. like wtf did I do. When I arrive back home I say this each time. JUST FUUUUUUUUUUUUUUCK. Dang u for staring at me weirdly like im not a shooting normal human being. wtf
People look at eachother all the time, take it easy. 
I came to this subreddit on a whim just now, first time I've ever looked for it, just feeling depressed and I have to say this tickled me and brightened my day up some so you did some good today! Hang in there stranger 
Thank you :)
I've been saying that a lot the last few days. I don't know how I'm supposed to feel, act, behave, ... . I don't know why I feel like complete shit? Why me? What the shoot did I do? What the shoot do I do? Who even am I? What am I? Things are so shooted up. Dang. FUUUCK 
Agh yes! Everything is just so frustrating and horrible. I don't know what it is but there's just something in me that's taught and angry and sad and I can FEEL it in my chest and it HURTS! Wtf!?
Agh yes! Everything is just so frustrating and horrible. I don't know what it is but there's just something in me that's taught and angry and sad and I can FEEL it in my chest and it HURTS! Wtf!?
It makes me so shooting crazy. When I keep thinking to hard about it, I begin to stress and hyperventilating. Why does it have to be this way? Urggh 
It makes me so shooting crazy. When I keep thinking to hard about it, I begin to stress and hyperventilating. Why does it have to be this way? Urggh 
I would legit stop whatever I'm doing at the moment and just fall on my knees or on my back and just clutch my temples praying to gods I don't believe in to just make me stop thinking so much. How shitty it is when the act of shooting thinking can hurt physically? shoot
I feel the same way lately, especially today.  Hang in
Hang in might not be the best advice 'round these parts.
It is sarcasm.
You have been pardoned of your shoot, sir.
Just got drunk af. Again. It dulls the pain for a bit, but then I get worse. Dang I seriously have a drinking problem. My parents locked their room to keep me away from the liquor and I just found the key and got in. Getting shooted up is the only thing I look forward to.
My escape is weed, was never able to hold my drinks I'll admit that. Having something to turn to, whatever the shoot it may be, is the highlight of my days. I don't even remember the last time I did something productive. Let's clink glasses and bongs, brother. 
Only writes 'HECK' and gets 400+ karma. How? Why?
Because most people in this sub understand that shoot more than you can know.
My sympathies OP. Is there anyone around you who you can commiserate with over your shared grief? It might help perhaps.
I have family and friends and they're being incredibly supportive but it's still difficult.
I have family and friends and they're being incredibly supportive but it's still difficult.
It must be very hard. Can you take it easy for a few days, not go to work/school and just lie down and get through it as much as you can?
It must be very hard. Can you take it easy for a few days, not go to work/school and just lie down and get through it as much as you can?
I can and I am.
Thank you everyone for the kind words.
That's what this sub is here for man. Were you with her at the end?
That's what this sub is here for man. Were you with her at the end?
No. 😣
No. 😣
Oh man, well I'm here to talk if you want to vent
/u/olioster what was the cause of her death?
She had been sick for a while with complications from diabetes and she got the flu a few weeks ago and was just too weak to fight it. That's our guess anyway, we don't know an official COD yet.
I feel like I have that same conversation with someone new every day...
Hell, at least it's someone new. I feel like I have that same conversation with the same people every day. Shit's getting old.
Hell, at least it's someone new. I feel like I have that same conversation with the same people every day. Shit's getting old.
Hey, at least you're having conversations with people.   I haven't had any social interaction today, I live alone so I don't think I even muttered a word today.
Hey, at least you're having conversations with people.   I haven't had any social interaction today, I live alone so I don't think I even muttered a word today.
Same shit, different day. 
> a fear of how much is 'safe' to tell someone.  Exactly. I wouldn't want to accidentally unleash a nuclear blast of negative emotions onto someone, so I just don't say anything.  And I also feel you about not knowing how to respond when someone genuinely asks how you are doing. It's difficult to put into words, and if I tried, it would be a jumbled, incomprehensible mess of sentence fragments that have no logical connection to each other.
Dude, I just got a great idea.  I wait for someone I hate to ask me how I feel, and then I tell them, nothing held back. Despair, put to use, weaponized, with extreme prejudice.  ...Oh, wait, shoot. I don't hate anyone... except maybe myself, anyway. Back to the drawing board, I guess.
It's shooted up how we have to hide how we truly feel
I feel this way too, but to be fair I hate when other people tell me they are depressed or share negative thoughts. I guess this is what therapists are for.
I feel this way too, but to be fair I hate when other people tell me they are depressed or share negative thoughts. I guess this is what therapists are for.
Nobody wants to be near the debby-downer, after all and therapists are useless 
Nobody wants to be near the debby-downer, after all and therapists are useless 
get yourself a good therapist might work better.
Same here. If I were to say what I really want to, 'I'm depressed as shoot and watching my life slowly slip out of my hands', they would look at me like I'd just said I'm about to shoot up a school. Nobody expects this, and nobody really cares, it seems. And that's understandable - I wouldn't want a stranger spilling all his problems onto me either. Just the way people work, I guess.
That’s really well put. We obviously need support, but the stigma surrounding depression prevents us from even acknowledging that we do. For me, I have gone past the point of wanting to stay out of people’s business, so the obstacle for me being helpful has more to do with never actually seeing people, and others being reluctant to share. Sigh.
I hate the question 'How are you?'. I always have. It doesn't matter how you really feel; you tell the truth, you look like an idiot. I'm sick of saying 'fine'.
I wish people would stop using that line as a casual greeting. I know it's so deeply ingrained in our culture by now, but if you want to greet someone, I think you should just say 'hi' or 'have a nice day'.
I wish people would stop using that line as a casual greeting. I know it's so deeply ingrained in our culture by now, but if you want to greet someone, I think you should just say 'hi' or 'have a nice day'.
I'm glad I'm not the only one who always feels this way.
My junior high yearbook is full of, 'get some sleep'... I'm almost 33.
Shit
Right, it's but they don't want to know the truth anyway. Thats what I think at least. They're happy with that answer and they easily accept it
Yeah. If I told them the truth, they would never ask 'how are you?' again and do their best to avoid me. 
That's not rejection. That's dodging a bullet. 
Funny, it certainly felt like a rejection. Especially since she stopped talking to me and started changing her way once she saw me. I must say, we were close friends, maybe not very close, emotionally-connected; but she was a friend that I believed could understand me and I could understand her.
Still a better love story than twilight. 
It's an older meme but it checks out 
been rejected 5 times and i only asked 4 girls out. feels bad but hurts less each time. 
Wait... someone went out of their way to reject you when you hadn't even asked them out? Why?
Wait... someone went out of their way to reject you when you hadn't even asked them out? Why?
Maybe they rejected themselves.
Yeah keep asking, she'll cave eventually Edit: (Sarcasm)
No. No no no. As a girl who has had this done to her I absolutely hated that shit. It's much easier to take rejection once than to keep pushing and possibly end up with a restraining order against you. 😂
Make sure to show up places where she frequents, like her work or school. Bring chocolates and have her schedule memorized so it shows you're compassionate and committed 
Dont forget to find out where she lives and steal some hair from her hair brush so you can make a shrine to her in your closet, her dirty panties and or chewed chewing gum also work
Wat
Yea not sure where that came from...
I need everything to stop while I sort myself out. I don't want to lose more of my life to this disease.
I dream about this.     Everything stops. Everything is quiet. I can catch up on sleep, reading, studying, work, cleaning, organizing, planning, making healthy food, getting exercise, meditating. Three months of peace and catch-up. 
I dream about this.     Everything stops. Everything is quiet. I can catch up on sleep, reading, studying, work, cleaning, organizing, planning, making healthy food, getting exercise, meditating. Three months of peace and catch-up. 
I would love that. But at the same time, I know that I'd just waste those 3 months away. Like I always do. 
I would love that. But at the same time, I know that I'd just waste those 3 months away. Like I always do. 
Yeah this might only work if there was also no internet or TV during that time 😋
A reset and/or a rewind button would be great - alongside a save button.  Yeah... there are stuff in the past for which I regret...
Stop button also
I dwell on this way too much. Every day I wish I could go back 5 years. Life was so exciting and good then.
I wish I could go back to my first day of freshman year of college. I'd do a few things very differently. I'd say high school but not really sure there is anything I could have done to make high school not shitty. Maybe could have signed that modeling contract instead of walking away from it, but I'm guessing that would have just led to a drug addiction.
Life is exciting and good now too. The world we are in is beautiful and we need to spend a bit of time every day paying attention to that.
You're not wrong, but if you're depressed you are effectively incapable of seeing it.
There is. Mindfulness meditation. Check it out. 
What we dream of is a pause button on life that doesn't affect you. Meditation is like a pause button on you that doesn't affect life.   Honestly, though, I've tried meditating. It's good at making me sleepy and more calm, but that's it, and if I meditate when my mind is in a bad place (which is often) my bad thoughts just spiral. Probably doing something wrong but idk.
I woke up at 9 am, on a Saturday, to do laundry and vacuum.   I'm a single 25 year old guy.  What is my life. 
If it makes your feel any better, I'm a single 40-year-old doing the same thing on a Saturday *night*. 
It's psychological proven that if you are feeling depressed or something comparable and you start cleaning, it wil releave some of your stress. So you start to feel better and it's like your mind/life is getting also organised and cleaner.   I usually start cleaning up some mess when I feel a depression-attack coming up. And for me this really helps. I hope you will also.
Depression-attack. That's one way to describe it haha.  
Last time I did that was when I had someone come over... that  was a year ago. I need some external motivation 
my only tip is that the pleasure of having it clean is better than the feeling of it being dirty.. you can do it! 
You inspired me OP, I'm going to take a shower.
hey a shower is a step in the right direction!:)
I hope you showered too! It multiplies the great feeling tenfold!   Congrats man! Celebrate little victories like this. You really deserve it. 😊
showered too! only thing left to do is wash my sheets and blanket, which I'll probably be putting off until god knows when lol 
That's awesome! That feeling of accomplishment and a clear mind that comes after cleaning your room. For me every time I clean my room I feel like I can actually think clearer.. as strange as it sounds idk if others have felt the same way!
I have the same. I love how cleaning makes me feel. Things should be tidy and organised, it makes my mind more organised.
A dirty room can be a symptom of depression?
people with depression tend to be bad at keeping things clean and keeping up with them :~) therefore for most people with depression is seemed as an accomplishment once they do so!
people with depression tend to be bad at keeping things clean and keeping up with them :~) therefore for most people with depression is seemed as an accomplishment once they do so!
I see, thank you for clarifying, friend. This explains a lot.
It makes me often wonder if I'm just a lazy selfish person who use depression as an excuse... which makes me more depressed.
Me too.  That's why I'm glad this post was made.  Makes me feel better knowing it's the stupid depression.
It's like being a kid and not wanting to take a shower, but once you're in the water and everything feels so smooth and how it feels kinda nice. Same thing with cleaning the room and all the stuff that feels great once we do them and especially once we complete them. 
*'Hey, I agree, that's why I should do it more and not think about it.'*  -Me at one second  *'But nah, I'm comfy in my chair and I'd rather think about and imagine things and events that will never happen in my life for the rest of the day. It's not what I want in the long term anyway, it doesn't matter.'*  -Me for the rest of the day
*'Hey, I agree, that's why I should do it more and not think about it.'*  -Me at one second  *'But nah, I'm comfy in my chair and I'd rather think about and imagine things and events that will never happen in my life for the rest of the day. It's not what I want in the long term anyway, it doesn't matter.'*  -Me for the rest of the day
This describes me perfectly.   Am I depressed or lazy? My girlfriend told me she is worried about me because this kind of behaviour is getting more common and extreme. 
> Every single freakin' shootin' thing you feel like doing is a bad idea and every single thing you really with all your heart don't want to do can help.  We do what we do because there are certain immediate rewards and we just don't have the energy to consider the eventual consequences.
Yeah, and even when I do have the energy, I lie to myself that it's not a bad idea regardless :p
I know that feeling all too well. Not so much family but I have a friend who I know would blame herself. Even if she got over it eventually there would always be a voice inside her asking if there was something she could've done.  It's horrible staying around purely so others don't have to deal with your death. 
It's kind of tiring. 
True. Or at least die in an accident so that they won’t blame themselves for it.
That would be wonderful.  Though now I feel guilty for feeling this way. What a troublesome existence 
That would be wonderful.  Though now I feel guilty for feeling this way. What a troublesome existence 
I totally get what you mean. But I guess I’m still am hopeful for the future. Like, if I can just hold on just a little bit longer, if I can just push through, maybe there’s something worth getting. But for now, it is a troublesome existence isn’t it.
I totally get what you mean. But I guess I’m still am hopeful for the future. Like, if I can just hold on just a little bit longer, if I can just push through, maybe there’s something worth getting. But for now, it is a troublesome existence isn’t it.
That's what I hope for as well. But even though I'll  doing all I feel I can it just feels that time is passing me by and it'll be too late soon if it isn't already.   I'm getting too old for this s*** x_X
To add to that, the people you may effect by killing your self aren't limited to those that know you. What about the people that have to find you? The first responders who may feel like they failed to save you? I know someone who was thrown into a terrible depressive episode by seeing the aftermath of a suicide, not even the suicide itself just the bits that were left behind after they removed the body. So yeah, committing suicide can never have 'no consequences' in my experience. 
I think the deputies found it odd when I apologized to them for having to deal with my wife's body. I never saw it, but a shotgun usually leaves a hell of a mess nobody should ever want to see. (But I am still thankful for the lengths she went to in order to assure I was not the one to find her.)
Yes, I wish they would stop caring. I wish I didn't have a family so I could kill myself. But no, I know it would destroy them if I died, I can't do that.
I feel the exact same way. If I didn’t know I’d crush my family and friends (and possibly throw them into some kind of mental crisis), it’d probably have been done already. Whether on purpose or on accident (ex. unintentional drug OD, or risky behavior). It’s mostly my Mom, Dad, and husband that I think about. I want to stop destroying other people’s lives with my anxiety and depression (among many many other things), but killing myself would be just as destructive to them.
Honestly most of my day is refreshing the new page waiting for something interesting or waiting for someone to message me
I spend like 4-5 hours a day just refreshing the new page on /r/animemes...
I spend like 4-5 hours a day just refreshing the new page on /r/animemes...
r/anime_irl
Even when I engage in things that are technically fulfilling I feel empty so I can't win. I'm not happy.   If I won a million pounds I wouldn't be happy. I've thought about this for a while. I'd spruce myself up and buy a house or whatever, but it won't make me a better person overall.   I can't change the uninspiring  idioty douchebag I am so I sort of accept that I'll always waste my life in sadness.
thankfully there's marijuana!
thankfully there's marijuana!
I can't smoke. It messes up my brain even further, haha. I'm gonna have to be tee-total for a few months I think.
22 male, jobless, no friend, only high school degree, living as a full NEET with my parent, gaming all day long. Couldnt find any jobs...sad
dog, you know the saying 'nobody like you when you're 23?' that's actually true inasmuch that there's gonna be one year in your early 20's where everything seems to fall apart (22/23/24). Ask anyone over 25 and they'll agree with you. Mine was at 22, but lasted about 18 months. Things will get better, but much like a boxing match it'll feel like you have to throw a lot of shooting punches (and a bunch of punches that won't even land) before it feels like you're not losing anymore. 
22 male, jobless, no friend, only high school degree, living as a full NEET with my parent, gaming all day long. Couldnt find any jobs...sad
I was in your same situation before. So I know very well how difficult it can be to get jobs with no experience. Too much prejudice in today's job market.  If you ever need someone for a fake reference feel free to contact me. I've done stuff like this for other unemployed friends that didn't work for years and they work now and are able to support themselves.
This is so true. Sometimes depression happens because what we expect and what is true are two different things. And that FEELS BAD. But accepting your feelings and listending to them is so helpful.  Having feelings is hard and dealing with them takes skill and bravey and practice. It hurts at first but it gets better. 
It's honestly strange when you start to notice this. Accepting when I feel bad helps things clarify and progress.  Sometimes all it takes is a split second acknowledgement and a 'well, okay then, that's what that is' and you can move through a lot. I think there's often a fear that acknowledging pain will make it come and never leave.
Basically my life.  I wasted so many years of my life doing nothing but playing games and sleeping  my life away.  Now I'm stuck and it's like well wtf do I do now.   I am having an incredibly hard time getting over this. 
Dude, thats just like me, i thought im the only person alive lives a miserable life like this. im now 2 years jobless, still searching...
I chuckled. It's perfect.
I cannot second this enough. It's perfect. 
Hahaha.  Masterfully done.  I love it.  I'm saving it, I may share it with others.
Feel free to share.
I wish I could show this to everyone in my life who refuses to understand me. It's perfect. (Just realized that a bunch of other people said 'it's perfect,' too. Hope I don't seem too much like a broken record by saying that.)
You don't. It's perfect.
It looks like everything leads to isolation.
Yeah, it kind of looks like the central hub of the chart. Funny, I hadn't intended on making it that way, it just kind of emerged on its own.
Yeah, it kind of looks like the central hub of the chart. Funny, I hadn't intended on making it that way, it just kind of emerged on its own.
I came here to say that might be my favorite part about it. For me at least, while some things are always hard the degree of isolation seems to define the worst times. For all my alcoholism and dependency on weed and ill-prescribed anxiety pills, isolation is by far my most dangerous addiction, because it feels so much like safety, when in reality it is the biggest cause of decay of spirit, and as shown on your chart, maybe the biggest driver of the whole vicious cycle.
Could you explain what you mean by scarcity mentality? 
The belief that good things are few and far between, and that if you find someone/something you like, you should hold onto it tightly because there may never be anything like it ever again. For example, I have an okay job in the field of my choosing. Due to a scarcity mentality, I am afraid to pursue my career and find something better because I feel I may never be able to find another job like it ever again. Scarcity mentality also applies to relationships.
The belief that good things are few and far between, and that if you find someone/something you like, you should hold onto it tightly because there may never be anything like it ever again. For example, I have an okay job in the field of my choosing. Due to a scarcity mentality, I am afraid to pursue my career and find something better because I feel I may never be able to find another job like it ever again. Scarcity mentality also applies to relationships.
I've felt this way about many different things in life. I didn't realize there was a name for it. 
I get called high functioning and I hate it. Just cause I show up to things on time and shower/do minor stuff, doesn't mean i'm not slowly breaking down inside.
Same here calling me highly dedicated, punctual and so on. But everyone overlooks the slow decay. 
Same here calling me highly dedicated, punctual and so on. But everyone overlooks the slow decay. 
I just wish that I could do that. When I get really down and things just feel like they're pointless, I just...can't do things. Or if I try, I do really badly and it just makes the spiral worse. Sometimes I continue to function but many other times I just can't :\
Fellow mental health worker here. Same shit, mostly (I wish I could say with confidence that my clients are getting better... I'm new to working with kids and am getting precious little guidance from my supervisor despite practically begging for it). I'm terrified of being found out at work. Solidarity, brother.
I work with adults and I would say I see about 80% of my clients improve significantly over the 30 days I work with them. Me not so much¯\\\_(ツ)\_/¯
Perhaps get a better therapist if they feel like a parrot.
Even just a different therapist, you might just need a different approach than you provide to your patients day in and day out. 
Just keep fighting
In my experience, the harder I fight, the harder my mind fights back.
Yep. I can get out of bed but still feel nothing. 
I can't get out of bed 
If you look through my profile, I've been there. I was struggling just to get out of bed for **years**. I've been waiting for a miracle, or someone just to save me from, well, me. Safe to say it didn't happen.   No, I don't want to get better. It's not possible. I've given up my search for happiness and contentment
> No, I don't want to get better. It's not possible. I've given up my search for happiness and contentment  Allright, I see.  Well, I’ll see myself out. Good luck, sir!
6:00 pm - Write a page detailing how your day went and reflecting on your emotional state.    6:05 pm - hahahaha that’s so edgy better delete it
holy crap that is so accurate
4:15pm - Browse r/Depression and find a relatable experience
4:20pm - find out no one can help you and smoke weed
4:20pm - find out no one can help you and smoke weed
4:25pm - Now
4:25pm - Now
4:30pm - nap and wake up at midnight 
Damn, If only I could cry.... It would be such a great release 
I find yelling into a pillow until I'm out of breath is a pretty good release
I can't cry anymore.
I am the exact same way.    I can feel the tears right behind my eyes but they no longer come out anymore. I wish I could cry, I just want to let it out. But I can't and it sucks. 
Constantly. I get just straight up talked over, even if I'm in the middle of sentence. Nowadays, I don't talk to people unless they speak to me first.
I don't know what's up with that? It happens to me too. I always make it a rule to let someone finish their sentence and listen to what they are saying and then speak. I thought it was pretty straightforward way of communicating but I see very few who actually wants to listen these days. How do people even communicate now when no one wants to listen is beyond my comprehension.
I don't know what's up with that? It happens to me too. I always make it a rule to let someone finish their sentence and listen to what they are saying and then speak. I thought it was pretty straightforward way of communicating but I see very few who actually wants to listen these days. How do people even communicate now when no one wants to listen is beyond my comprehension.
Because 'Most people do not listen with the intent to understand; they listen with the intent to reply'
Because 'Most people do not listen with the intent to understand; they listen with the intent to reply'
Yep this is why the number one thing to make a new friend is to ask them about themselves. Most people are so self-involved they'll befriend someone as it makes them feel better about themselves.  Dang those people
Same here. People will ask me a question, then immediately talk over me. So I stop talking (to be polite), but the conversation never comes back to me. No one notices that I've checked out. Makes me feel invisible.
This happens to me to, all the time. I get the 'why are you so grouchy, or not talk talking?' But I learned to just ignore it, because I will just begin a story, and get interrupted once again.  🙄
Dunno if you're female, but I'm AFAB and men will always talk over women, it's one of the many things that agrivate me. It's right up there with mansplaining. Men (or anyone really) who don't really value the other person in the conversation, and are just there to talk and not listen are so frustrating. like why do I bother
Ummm... listen I hate politics in any way shape or form but there's a word for people who say 'mansplaining' unironically...  This is r/depression so I don't wanna argue, but sex is completely irrelevant. Assholes are idiots. Period.
I made plans with my crush and on the day we were going to go out she ghosted me, and broadcasted online what she was doing instead. Made me feel worthless. I know where you're coming from. Shit sucks.
wowie that hurts
That's so not fair! I am sorry that your friends and sister are not replying to the invite. You sound like a wonderful & selfless person and I think that it's your friends who are really missing out on having a great friendship. 
Thank you very much, that is so lovely to say. I'd like to say I'm over it, but I'm a sensitive person and it does hurt my feelings. I look forward to marrying my Best friend and starting our life together :) 
Thank you very much, that is so lovely to say. I'd like to say I'm over it, but I'm a sensitive person and it does hurt my feelings. I look forward to marrying my Best friend and starting our life together :) 
I can relate to this feeling, I am sensitive too. Congratulations!!! 😊May God bless you both with lots of love and happiness 🙌🏼
I feel that way sometimes. I guess cause I don't talk much, when I do talk people don't really hear me or care
We are alike. Wish we could meet in real life. Haha we would have no trouble listening to each other.
I feel like people physically look away from me a lot.
I have this feeling too but when alone I feel the exact opposite. As if everyone is looking at me
Yes. People respond to confidence.  People respond and listen to those who don't waste their words.  Don't let it become a normal thing - don't let people constantly ignore you because it becomes harder to break.
Seriously.  If people interrupt you or anything like that, immediately stop talking, and stare at them, wait for them to finish, then pick up where you left off. Don't allow them to think it's ok and commonplace to just talk over you or other people.  We all teach/train people how we are to be treated.   Sure it would be nice if we didn't have to and everyone were perfect little angels, but that's not realistic.
You're talking right now, people are paying attention to what you have to say. I'd say that's a step forward. I'd say that says that maybe it's not too late.
This is the internet. Different than real life.
Humans these days are self-centered and ignorant. People are fake because they don't want to show their true selves to other people. Humanity deserves to burn for the pain associated with its sins.  I hate it when I get ignored by other people. It makes you care as though you have very little value. I don't take rejection very well because I have a self-esteem that's as brittle as glass.
I'm just like this, man. I shooting hate literally everybody does it. It makes you feel like shooting shit. I'm always giving an ear to people, and it doesn't get reciprocated. It's literally everybody too. My friends, people I run into, just everybody. It makes it feel like I'm just the problem.
I'm just like this, man. I shooting hate literally everybody does it. It makes you feel like shooting shit. I'm always giving an ear to people, and it doesn't get reciprocated. It's literally everybody too. My friends, people I run into, just everybody. It makes it feel like I'm just the problem.
That's exactly why I chose to become a nihilist.
Yeah pretty much all the time throughout my 24 years in this hellhole.  If someone ignores me purposely I will remove them from my life instantly. I know that sounds a bit over the top but I just can't be bothered with most people anymore. It's like they think they are some special snowflake or something, better than me etc. Dang society.
Your a poet my friend 
Hey man. Dang society! 
You know it brother.
Most people are just too busy focusing on themselves and what they want. You cant take it personally. 
Yeah.  Human social interaction and dominance structures are crazy and silly things when you analyze them more thoroughly. All these (for most individuals) subconscious behaviours, or at best, ones rarely given thought to, come out this way from each of those people having a, 'self,' that they are interested in. I know a lot of depressed people don't feel that strong sense of self so it's hard to mindlessly barrel through conversation allowing self interest to take over.
All the shooting time. My family loves to stare at me when I'm talking and mid sentence just walk away. And then tell me I overreact when I call them out on it. I just gave up trying 
That's my family too, man. Dang them.
I understand more than you know... no one ever understands when your world seems to be crumbling to them you'll get over it soon enough 
When is soon? Honestly see no end in sight.
When is soon? Honestly see no end in sight.
Me neither...I'm wondering the same thing...
I really need a hug, not just a hug, a genuine caring hug, not some it gets better hug
It is weird that you can feel what is good hug or bad. And the good hugs feels so good
It is weird that you can feel what is good hug or bad. And the good hugs feels so good
Yep... I've had a few casual hugs before in high school, especially at the end of parties and graduation, but they were all shitty half hugs. People don't really want to touch me, feels bad man.
That's why I got a dog!
Yes! Nothing better than their nice, warm, loving licks on your face. Love my little Australian Terrier :)
I want a hug and to be held, too. But I know that's not going to solve my problems :D I'm greedy and always want more than I get. 
I feel you. And of course we want more, because we think we have little. But I learnt that I am aiming too high. And even though I have an ultimate goal, we need to start somewhere. Seriously, a warm, tight hug isn't all too bad. 
I feel you. And of course we want more, because we think we have little. But I learnt that I am aiming too high. And even though I have an ultimate goal, we need to start somewhere. Seriously, a warm, tight hug isn't all too bad. 
nah. then I'd get horny and want sex. then I'd get hungry and want food-- expensive food. then the list would go on and on. I don't see my desires as bad or excessive. I'm atheist. I don't follow any religion. 
nah. then I'd get horny and want sex. then I'd get hungry and want food-- expensive food. then the list would go on and on. I don't see my desires as bad or excessive. I'm atheist. I don't follow any religion. 
Sure, I know exactly how that is, I feel like that every day, constantly. But you need to restrain your urges sometimes. Start with little and build yourself an empire. 
Yes.  I relate, pretty much to everything you are feeling.  What a bizarre existence.  Whenever I'm somewhat participating in life and somewhat happy, etc., and so on, it feels like I'm pretending... like I'm faking it, like I'm acting.  The 'real me' feels like the isolated, exhausted recluse who just wants to detach and withdraw into my own little world.
Same, and then if I ever have a positive thought about myself I think I must be delusional and fooling myself. Positive brain: 'I feel proud of the thing I achieved, I like the way I look today, maybe I'm not an awful person...' Depressed brain: 'Are you kidding? You're worthless. Stop fooling yourself.'
Same, and then if I ever have a positive thought about myself I think I must be delusional and fooling myself. Positive brain: 'I feel proud of the thing I achieved, I like the way I look today, maybe I'm not an awful person...' Depressed brain: 'Are you kidding? You're worthless. Stop fooling yourself.'
I'm reading these comments and replies....on one hand I'm glad to hear that I am not alone in my struggles. On the other hand I'm pretty bummed out knowing that other people suffer in a similar way as I do and one thing I know is that I wouldn't want anyone else to go through this kind of pain.
Yeah. I feel like when I laugh or act happy I'm just faking it. I find myself eating for no reason just trying to make myself feel full. The only times I don't feel empty is when I'm breaking down in tears in the middle of the night. Then I feel full of hatred, and resentment. All I wanna do is make myself bleed or feel pain, to see there's more than emptiness in me, there's something actually there. I just want to feel whole again. I just want out.
I can relate and I feel this a lot too. I guess the only difference is how we deal with it really. Sometimes I find myself crying deeply alone....other times I'm not crying but I feel emotionally numb but depressed and shooted up inside.
This is my default state.  My therapist calls it apathy.  So little matters to me anymore that I basically don't give a shit one way or the other about most everything.  Years of depression grind you down into this apathetic state.  It's almost like I float through the world without interacting or caring about it.
Something worth checking out, maybe:  https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Dysthymia  > Dysthymia has a number of typical characteristics: low energy and drive, low self-esteem, and a low capacity for pleasure in everyday life. Mild degrees of dysthymia may result in people withdrawing from stress and avoiding opportunities for failure. In more severe cases of dysthymia, people may even withdraw from daily activities.[8] They will usually find little pleasure in usual activities and pastimes.  
Something worth checking out, maybe:  https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Dysthymia  > Dysthymia has a number of typical characteristics: low energy and drive, low self-esteem, and a low capacity for pleasure in everyday life. Mild degrees of dysthymia may result in people withdrawing from stress and avoiding opportunities for failure. In more severe cases of dysthymia, people may even withdraw from daily activities.[8] They will usually find little pleasure in usual activities and pastimes.  
Thanks for linking this, this sounds like me.....
Thanks for linking this, this sounds like me.....
Hope it helps :)   Digging into it was a relief for me years back... just knowing what it was, and that it wasn't just me. 
Yer I can't even cry anymore really. I feel lifeless sometimes like I'm dead inside and the life has been sucked out of me. 
Sometimes I wish I could cry because it would prove I still have feelings
Sometimes I wish I could cry because it would prove I still have feelings
Wanting to cry so bad and you can't is frustrating. I know I still have feelings and emotions but  deep inside somewhere long gone.I can't bring myself to cry or talk about it. I'm numb. 
Oh, it varies. Most of the time it's an 'I don't care,' and everything is bleak and I'm indifferent, and sometimes I'm *incredibly* sad and everything is bleak and I wanna die. I prefer the former for sure. 
Yeah I feel Iike Im always either very apathetic, or like hyperemotional (with negative emotions)
Weird seeing my favorite webcomic on here.
It's wonderful. I only found it this month. I've been binging on it.  Makes me feel like my unhappiness is rather absurd.  
> because I might be at mortal danger and my only reaction would be 'so?'.  My reaction would be 'Finally.'
Have to say my heart and mind were in a complete shooted space-but these two comments made me have a half a second break and literally laugh out loud-because I connected with those feels so hard.  Thank you for your honesty. I've been there. Might currently be there. Dang if I know. I'm in a tornado of too much feels. 
Yes, I go back and forth between the numb, emptiness, and profound sadness.
I'm in the sadness right now and looking eager to being numb again.. anything is better than having an aching heart. 
I'm in the sadness right now and looking eager to being numb again.. anything is better than having an aching heart. 
I totally agree with you.  At least with numb and empty, I can usually go along like a machine performing its function, unmoved and unaffected by the things going on around it.
Same here, so it's hard to answer the questions like 'what do you like most', 'what's your hobby', I just don't know because I don't care. I'm pushing myself to try to do things and I hope I could find something I like
My latest revelation is to volunteer at an animal shelter. Dont know how long ill be able to keep it up. At least those animals appreciate you and accept you for who you are without question. People can get too complicated. 
[deleted]    ^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^0.9674   > [What is this?](https://pastebin.com/64GuVi2F/22877)
It's a sorta body mechanism to coop with the fact that you can't coop with feelings. It just turns them all off.
Yeah, you're probably right. I used to cry more, now I just feel like a zombie after I've had my depression longer.
Me too, I used to cry almost everyday. Nowadays I have in a month 1 day of crying, 1 day of happiness, and the rest is just emptiness.
Yes, however having depression is not just made up and if you have it, you have it. It's completely normal to feel that you are lying to yourself. It's cool that you were able to express this though.
Is this really true? I feel like I'm lying to myself about it all the time and then that just makes me feel worse 
I am in a constant state of convincing myself i'm not depressed compared to all of the 'people i know who actually have depression'
oh man I do the same thing! i'll hear about other people's symptoms and get super anxious that I'm actually completely fine because I don't have those specific symptoms. I have a magical ability to ignore all the mounds of evidence that I'm not completely fine. Like, rationally i can tell myself 'nah, everyone experiences it differently, don't worry about it.' but there's that insistent, powerful, irrational thought that I've been wrong this whole time and i don't actually have it because i'm not experiencing it the 'right' way.
oh man I do the same thing! i'll hear about other people's symptoms and get super anxious that I'm actually completely fine because I don't have those specific symptoms. I have a magical ability to ignore all the mounds of evidence that I'm not completely fine. Like, rationally i can tell myself 'nah, everyone experiences it differently, don't worry about it.' but there's that insistent, powerful, irrational thought that I've been wrong this whole time and i don't actually have it because i'm not experiencing it the 'right' way.
That's EXACTLY and I mean EXACTLY how I feel!!!!
This does tend to happen to me with my partner, I create the scenario in a negative light and get angry at her when the situation hasnt even happened, I think it has alot to do on my part with jealousy and insecurity in myself or so i believe. Do you feel jealous or insecure in yourself?
Incredibly insecure, I'm just really good at acting brash and confident - so good that people tend to think I'm a lot more thick-skinned than I actually am, I guess. That backfires on me a tonne :(
Me constantly. I eventually just end up being angry and sad at the same time.
Sad-Mad.
I've got no reason to be angry.All the bad things that happen, like failing the road test for the third time, exist because I'm a stupid, worthless loser.
Booooo, that ain't true.  My cousin failed 5 times and then passed.  Been driving for 12 years now without killing anyone lol
I am curious, does drinking ever make you feel good for a while?   Everytime I drink I get more depressed. :( So ...only orange juice for me :( 
I won't say it makes me feel better but it changes me , when I am drunk I stop worrying about ALOT of things and at that point everything seems normal to me and I am at ease for alittle.
What do you mean by this? 
This is what I call a vicious circle. My habit with depression is to beat myself up and make myself feel bad FOR feeling bad.  See?
Seeing everyone interact so naturally, fearing that you'll be expected to do the same. Everyone seems to have a plan and your  taking it day by day just trying to survive to see tomorrow. Future? what future all I see is today. That feeling, that doubt scared me out of university and now i'm trying to build myself up to go back.
My biggest fear about going into university is this. I don't understand how people can naturally interact and socialize without even thinking about it. It's never come natural to me and at this point it probably never will.
It gets worse when you see how wildly your paths diverge AFTER college...
Tell me about it. I've got friends getting jobs left and right, and I've been stuck in my hometown, virtually unemployed for the past 5 months.
Yeah but deep down inside I bet a lot of them are super scared and unsure of themselves. We all put on a mask.
The funny thing is, I do this. Do people look at me and get jealous of my 'happiness?'  How ironic.
What is schadenfreude ??
enjoying somebody else's pain
And everyone is attractive and hooking up with each other and you're alone 
Yeeeeeep, there's the big one.
Yes. Like being busy is some sort of reward in itself. I mean, yes it's good to be productive but some people brag about how busy they are and how important they are at work
I wish I had no responsibility and could just run off with no consequences. 
I wish I had no responsibility and could just run off with no consequences. 
YESSSSS.
Same, but what will you be doing then?
Man I just want to chill and play games and consume mass amount of media cause well, if everything's pointless might as well just enjoy myself
> if you were really into prospecting a non-addicting, very safe and effective medical drug, that cured depression and stabilized moods  Exercise is such a drug. Check out this [presentation by Stephen Ilardi](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=drv3BP0Fdi8).
Look, exercise is great. I exercise every day and I always look forward to it. It *does not* make everyone's depression go away. It doesn't even make mine better.
It's pretty strange to me how 'hard work' is considered desirable by some people. I'm just trying to stay alive and do as little as possible until I die.
I'm with you so much on that one.
I've fought depression for years, & always hated hard work, but I find it very desirable. It's really good for you if you can manage it.
Busting my ass at jobs and jobs that are hard labor I like because it's like meditation for me, and a workout when otherwise I wouldn't  Shame my body is trashed at 23 so I can't do hard labor jobs anymore :/ I'm so shooted 
Busting my ass at jobs and jobs that are hard labor I like because it's like meditation for me, and a workout when otherwise I wouldn't  Shame my body is trashed at 23 so I can't do hard labor jobs anymore :/ I'm so shooted 
How's it trashed?
Always find it scary I guess sorry how relatable people in this sub are, every in my life is always moving forward, getting what they want and Im just trying not to kill myself
You and me both :/ My class is graduating from college this year. I took some time off to figure out what I want to do and to focus on my mental health, ended up getting into drugs after a few failed suicide attempts and lost most my friends. I've sobered up, and I'm back in school finally, but I still feel miles behind everyone else. Aaaaaand I'm not any less depressed.
Something that helped me with this (and it might be a weird solution that doesn't work for everyone or maybe too political and feel free to let me know if this is the case because I am new to this sub) was to read up on Marx and socialism because the system is shooting us but there are at least other ways to think about how the world could be and that gives me at least a little bit of hope.
You might want to watch Michael Moore's latest doc 'Where to Invade Next'. It discusses how old US ideals are being put to good use nearly everywhere in the world, except in the US.  [Trailer](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=tFgewMnZdQc) 
You might want to watch Michael Moore's latest doc 'Where to Invade Next'. It discusses how old US ideals are being put to good use nearly everywhere in the world, except in the US.  [Trailer](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=tFgewMnZdQc) 
goodbye
goodbye
Yep, I cried at points watching it too. This is what I've struggled with this whole entire life of mine. I have no place in the world and I don't want to live anymore. I have stopped talking to people about how I feel for the most part because I don't want to hear any sympathy or false quips like 'It gets better!' and I no longer want anything to do with living life. 
That actually makes me sadder because it's like looking at something that will never happen. A false hope in my eyes. 
I know it looks like and feels like that but even getting involved in the Socialist party (UK) has helped me with my depression. It's made me feel useful for something that I actually care about.
I know it looks like and feels like that but even getting involved in the Socialist party (UK) has helped me with my depression. It's made me feel useful for something that I actually care about.
It's encouraging to hear it's been good for you. I've been intending to get involved in an organization for a while. I can see it being really helpful--social contact and organized purpose. 
Yes ! It makes me nuts that everyone planted all these thoughts about being busy that it adds on to my depression. Feels like hell, like i'm a just a stick on a road.
Exactly I feel obligated to work and it sucks. 
Exactly I feel obligated to work and it sucks. 
The worst thing is that we would try too hard to work, in the end it would pressure us and we could fall deeper in depression.
Money doesn't buy freedom. We're already free. You just have to take it. 
Well being rich will make you essentially immune to certain crimes.
Yeah. We are all slaves to money 
This fact is one of the main contributors to my depression I think.
I can work as hard as anybody.  There's just no reason to do so.
I hear you man.  Absolutely the way I feel about it.  A lot of depressed people apparently sometimes feel like it's everyone else that's crazy, and nothing makes me think I'm the only sane one more than watching people obsess over such petty meaningless bullshit.
Completely understand this. What's the point of in the end where all gonna die anyway?
What's the point even if we live forever?
It's most definitely not how hard we work. More appropriate would be how society values our work. There is an important difference. The value determines our pay and therefore our compensation for our work.
And also luck and privilege.
Yeah, and there isn't much about what we are supposed to do with life that I'm excited about either.  Just comes across as being forced to do things that make you unhappy so you can survive.
You got that right. We live pay check to pay check and we still can't make ends meet. We don't live. We exist.
as an university student i'm seeing plenty people getting shooted over for working hard while cheaters just breeze trough anything
Don't worry, because of them cheating, the cost of schooling has gone up, and nearly half of all employers don't believe college grads are ready for the workplace anyhow. no reason not to cheat, there's no jobs out of school worth a crap anyhow. 
If it makes you feel better, I'm super religious yet super depressed
This made me smile. Not smile because you're depressed or that OP is. And it's not anything religion-related.  But because it shows your wit and sense of humour. And those are great qualities to remind yourself that you're awesome.
This made me smile. Not smile because you're depressed or that OP is. And it's not anything religion-related.  But because it shows your wit and sense of humour. And those are great qualities to remind yourself that you're awesome.
<3
I know that depression has nothing to do with being religious. I don’t care about religion  I’m just hurt because I thought I could count on him. I not have anyone else...
well there you might be wrong as you already are depressed and it is basically impossible for you to look over the bright side or the optimistic side about anything but just stop thinking about the matter of your brother if all you can get in your mind is negative stuff. 
Same. Very devout Catholic and yet still very depressed
I'm a devout muslim. Guess depression affects us all haha
I'm a devout muslim. Guess depression affects us all haha
And I'm agnostic. Of all the ways of uniting people of different religions, I would've preferred something that didn't also cause people to kill themselves :(
I believe in God and I suffer from depression, anxiety and God knows what else?  Your brother's being an idiot, I am sorry.    And I hate when certain people say that the reason someone's suffering from mental illness is because they don't believe in God. I hope you get the help you deserve! 
Yup for real.. did these people ever read Job? This man was a strong believer yet he lost everything. Depression is not a punishment. Not trying to judge, but man it upsets me. 
> I thought he was the only person in my family I could count on.  That sounds like he gave you reasons to feel this way. Were there some 'positive' moments with your brother in the past? 
Yes. We used to be close, butbthen he’s started being mean out of the blue 
Yes. We used to be close, butbthen he’s started being mean out of the blue 
Okay. I am not defending your brother in any way, his behavior is unjustifiable - but could that all be an act of desperation from his side? It sounds like he is kind of internally disrupted - you said that he started it out of the blue.
Should've told your brother the reason he can't make someone feel better is because he's a self-righteousn idiot-head.
Yeah 
I talked to a counselor the other day who told me basically the same thing...If I find Jesus everything else will go away.
Did you ask for a refund after that?
Did you ask for a refund after that?
Haha no, but I'm not going back.
Haha no, but I'm not going back.
>Haha no, but I'm not going back.  I'd formally complain to the licensing board. Therapists and counsellors are not supposed to bring religion into it (unless you bring it up).
To live is the rarest thing in the world, Most people exist, that is all.  -Oscar Wilde   I salute you, and Id reccomend doing something the scares you to start, it will help you on your path.
Genuine question: why would you recommend doing something that scares you? I think I'm scared of everything these days, I wish I could get past it
Genuine question: why would you recommend doing something that scares you? I think I'm scared of everything these days, I wish I could get past it
I've found nothing really makes you truly feel alive than doing something that terrifies you and realizing you're ok.  It's all about being stronger than you were six seconds ago. 
I realized the same thing. Living doesen't have to suck.
If there's an alternative, I'm all ears.
If there's an alternative, I'm all ears.
Some Meditate, some do psychadelics, some change jobs, some do yoga or exercise, some paint, some just go the stoic way and 'tough out' their depression (I don't recommend) some get therapy, some never give up and keep failing till they succeed, some die, some live, some exist. It is your choice but choosing joy can be incredibly difficult but when you do, you'll find the one you need is you.
The problem is living does have to suck if you're not lucky since you can't change everything..
Here's what I do if life sucks, I let it suck, at that moment, but I don't hang onto it. I experience it then let it go. Sometimes I cry, go a little crazy, get angry, whatever, but then I let it go. Look for what's good, can be something small like my bones don't hurt that day or the sky is clear. I appreciate that good thing as much as I experience the sadness. Fully feeling emotions helps with balance for me.
that's super sweet of her op  treasure her
She really does care a lot to do this. Give her a big hug, OP, for being like this. 
I wish I could have lunch with my mom, but I'm an idiot and moved across the country.
Damn im not the only one
I know this makes you sad. It made me sad when I was in high school too. I had so much anxiety about eating lunch and not having friends.  But, now I'm in my early 3,s and eating meals sólo is THE BEST! I love it.  I guess what I'm saying is, hang in there. It won't always be this bad. 
I have social anxiety, so I actually *preferred* eating alone. Eating alone is the bee's knees. 
Did the same during school. Listening to music, my Kindle, and sitting in a relatively empty place on campus really helped. Solid advice above.  Have you thought of joining some clubs, u/presenting_a_nobody? 
Ehh they’re not really my thing.
Ehh they’re not really my thing.
Well, regardless, hope things look up. Highschool doesn't last for forever!
I think both ways to feel about this frustrates me.  The pessimist in me feels sad because I know how it feels to be alone.  The optimist in me see the love your mom has for you and that frustrates me too because that love doesn’t seem to help while I’m depressed.  It sucks!  I guess the only thing I can say is I have compassion for you and I know that knowing that may not help but I’m saying it anyway.
Exactly how I am. She tries to cheer me up, but its just not really up to anyone besides me i guess.
I used to have lunch with my mom every Tuesday. Then she started cancelling about once a month because of conflicts. Then 2 or 3 times a month...now, we don't go to lunch at all. So not only do I not have friends, my mom can't be bothered for 1 hour a week to give a shit anymore.
I’m sorry :(
I’m sorry :(
Me too, friend. Me too.
I drive in two weeks. Ill just go to my truck for lunch.
I used to go to the library for lunch and just read books :)   That’s works if you like to read
That's nice as hell of her wtf 
Im not saying im mad at her.
I think this all the time at work...a Children's hospital.  I will start wishing I could trade my life for dying children. ☹️
Working at a children's hospital, you are most certainly contributing to something!!<3
I've been feeling like that for a while now. I don't know if I want to die, but I want to just forget about everything and everyone and just take a rest.
Usually thats what I do. Have a nap, or just go to bed, maybe shower (again). But it hasn't been working so much lately.
Usually thats what I do. Have a nap, or just go to bed, maybe shower (again). But it hasn't been working so much lately.
Yup, sleeping is about all I do. It's like being dead without the commitment. 
Yup, sleeping is about all I do. It's like being dead without the commitment. 
I like that - 'dead without the commitment.'  So true. 
That's how I became an alcoholic.  It's great at making time go away without introspection or thinking.
That's how my gambling problem got worse.
There's a line in the Smith's song, 'Nowhere Fast,' that really speaks to me:  'And when I'm lying in my bed   I think about life   And I think about death   And neither one particularly appeals to me'
Currently listening to the Smiths right now. God, they're so good.
Yeah, I messed up a bit a few days ago and I, for the first time, was really considering just leaving all this behind. I just don't have the courage to do it, usually there is something other than a lack of courage holding me back but right now that's all there is, I feel as if there is no hope for me, I'll always feel inadequate and I'll never be able to truly good enough. Too scared to die but barely any reason to live.
This is exactly how I feel. I think the only reason I am really still living is for my family, which makes me think of how selfish others can be, like I am supposed to suffer the rest of my life just because you would miss me? Maybe I will be able to move away from everyone and finally get to be alone and maybe then I can relax.   Now I feel selfish though...
This is exactly how I feel. I think the only reason I am really still living is for my family, which makes me think of how selfish others can be, like I am supposed to suffer the rest of my life just because you would miss me? Maybe I will be able to move away from everyone and finally get to be alone and maybe then I can relax.   Now I feel selfish though...
I also stick around for my family who don't even know about how I feel because I don't feel comfortable with them at all. I also have some really amazing friends who have stuck with me through all my stupid issues, I just don't feel like there is anything for me in this earth, I feel so uncomfortable and lesser around 95% of the people I'm with. 
It makes a lot of sense. If people don't remember me they are not sad and I don't inflict pain on them by killing myself. And it's not like I'm memorable for anything, anyways.
I get what both of you are saying. The concept of 'fading away' seems like a nice... end.
Like I could sleep for years.
this is the feeling i get right before i go to sleep and right when i wake up then i tend to think about it for days at a time its crazy cause i have never seen anyone else say something like this its nice to know i'm not the only one.
I just want to live in one of my books/TV shows...
http://i.ytimg.com/vi/n-BmKFgJJog/maxresdefault.jpg  I'm not making fun of you or anything, it just reminded me of this. What I wouldn't give to pick and choose a new world to live in...
http://i.ytimg.com/vi/n-BmKFgJJog/maxresdefault.jpg  I'm not making fun of you or anything, it just reminded me of this. What I wouldn't give to pick and choose a new world to live in...
Ha-ha honestly I would love to live in an Anime. And I don't mind being poked fun at it makes me happy that I can be weird and confident about it. 
I think it's called suicidal ideation. And the other one is just obsessive thoughts, unless you were doing it on purpose, I guess. Uh... glad to hear you feel more comfortable with your feelings now?
I suppose comfortable isn't right either. I have just come to term with having depression. And I'd say I'm 90% better now. And yeah suicidal ideation is correct.   I definitely suggest anyone having thoughts of wanting to die, but not doing anything  should seek medical intervention. Better to be safe. Depression sucks, but getting help for it makes it suck less. 
Could you please share the author's name?
Absolutely! Her name is Ann Heberlein. 
*It really is true - once you love someone, they live in your heart forever*  Dang, i'm scared actually.
'Shit' I thought.
I hate this because I'm gonna feel like this for the rest of my life. You've just confirmed it lol. It's already been 9 years. Not even in contact with the person. And I feel the same now as I did back then.   It's absolutely exhausting.
Wow, this is exactly me. Got to know a girl 9 years ago online, met her once over a weekend that same year, and still think about her all the time. :(
This is one of the best posts I've ever read on this site. It makes me sad though, I have a girl I feel the same way about. It's been six years since we communicated regularly and I still think of her every day.
Im currently afraid this is going to happen to me. I still talk to her every week. Shes moved a few hours away but the thought of us growing distant absolutely terrifies me. 
Im crying.... thats beautiful. 
Well I'd say it's more heart crushing
Well I'd say it's more heart crushing
The fact that she continues to live in his heart is beautiful and touching. 
Lol I must be really lucky I've never loved nor have the slightest interest.
In a way, I'd say you are lucky. 
So you going to see her again?! For coffee or something? You have to tell her how you've felt all these years.
This could be bad too. What if he admits his love and she does the same. What if she tells him that she loved him all these years? So now he will have to live with the mistakes the rest of his life. It's not like they can both destroy their families and lives they built. It'll only hurt more
thanks for the support.
I feel you, don't know what's up with the downvotes.  Depression makes me into an uncaring, antisocial robot too.  
she sounds like a thot
You sound like an idiot
It's not even a bitter thought, just a realisation that there's no logical reason someone would look at me and go 'Hey, I want that one!'
Damn straight. For me, if for some reason someone showed even the slightest hint of attraction to me, I'd automatically start looking around for a hidden camera. 
It's not even a bitter thought, just a realisation that there's no logical reason someone would look at me and go 'Hey, I want that one!'
love is a feeling though, and as we know, feelings are not logical ;) we can't help who we fall for and we can't help who we love. it's not based on what things a person can or cannot offer us. 
love is a feeling though, and as we know, feelings are not logical ;) we can't help who we fall for and we can't help who we love. it's not based on what things a person can or cannot offer us. 
>> it's not based on what things a person can or cannot offer us.  It's not even naïve, it's simply delusional. Sorry.  Especially if you're talking about anything related to sexuality, which is basically all about offering one set of genes for another of similar value.
It's not just a feeling, it's knowing deep down in your gut that there will never be anyone out there for you.  I just don't see how it's possible that a woman would ever willingly, and of her own volition, want to choose me to spend time with. There are so many people out there better than me in every single way that I don't blame anyone not seeing me as Boyfriend material. 
You'll have better chances finding another lonely, damaged woman who can relate and understand.
Kind of the worst thing ever.  Last night I broke down in tears. In 25 years of living, I've failed to garner the love or respect of a single person.  The worst part is I just don't understand why, or how, this has happened.
i'm a 27 year old female. i've been told the sheer fact that i possess a vagina means my life is easier than a man's and i should be getting hit on every time i walk out the door. nope! 27 year old dateless virgin. honestly, it's not always you. some people just live isolated lives and get really unlucky. but the good part is we're not geriatric, we've still got time to turn it around, and we can. best we can do is work on ourselves
i'm a 27 year old female. i've been told the sheer fact that i possess a vagina means my life is easier than a man's and i should be getting hit on every time i walk out the door. nope! 27 year old dateless virgin. honestly, it's not always you. some people just live isolated lives and get really unlucky. but the good part is we're not geriatric, we've still got time to turn it around, and we can. best we can do is work on ourselves
Do you REALLY wants to just shoot around or do you want an relationship? Because if you just wants to shoot it's the easiest thing, just create a tinder/okc/anything related account and match some guys, eventually one of them will match with you and you must only give hints about wanting sex. If you want a relationship it's another story, not easy at all...
I thought that. Then I gave up. I hit fourty-two... and I met someone.
Did it work out?
Did it work out?
Yes! We're still together after fourteen years.
I've felt this way for years now. I have feelings for this girl who I see quite a bit (she's over at my house as I write this) but I've told her and she doesn't reciprocate the feelings. It's a shitty feeling.
that sucks man, but good on you for telling her how you feel. that's a really brave and honest thing to do. its way better than those guys who never say how they feel and then get bitter when she dates someone else. at least you know now and don't have to wonder. 
More than that I'm worried I'll never be able to love anyone back. 
The song 'Words Darker Than Their Wings,' by Alter Bridge, helped me change my mind in this regard. Now I'm just worried about finding a girl who can love and understand me. Anyhow, give the song a listen sometime if you have the chance. 
Danging hell i think that every day.  Especially when one of the symptoms of my [AvPD](https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Avoidant_personality_disorder) is  >Some with this disorder may fantasize about idealized, accepting, and affectionate relationships, due to their desire to belong. They often feel themselves unworthy of the relationships they desire, so they shame themselves from ever attempting the relationship.  which makes this even worse.  Like sure, i have friends, but i still feel crushingly lonely all the time, and i can't see any way to change that.
I have exactly that
I dont think you can just settle for anybody just so you arent alone either. Ive tried that. I was with somebody for 8 years that i didnt love. I knew after 3 months it wasnt right but i just needed someone. Maybe its what people did??? After 8 years the cracks got too much for me. I have no idea how to meet anyone. Certainly no idea how to meet 'the one'. How do people know when theyve met them?
I'm not sure how you know you've met the one. Maybe it's a feeling? But, in terms of meeting someone maybe you could try online stuff like OKCupid? Sorry if that's a terrible suggestion but for some people it's easier than walking up to someone.
I'm not sure how you know you've met the one. Maybe it's a feeling? But, in terms of meeting someone maybe you could try online stuff like OKCupid? Sorry if that's a terrible suggestion but for some people it's easier than walking up to someone.
OKCupid causes me a lot more harm than good. Every single >90% match has yet to respond to my 'hey, how are you?' messages after two years on the site.   The feedback is 'this person is perfect for you and utterly uninterested' aka 'you suck'
I do. But I don't care. Women want men to provide for them ($$$) and their children and I'm simply not gonna do that. Women hate men like me. I actually don't believe anyone should enter a relationship. Don't ever give another person the keys to your happiness. People become sad all the time when someone they didn't even know existed a few years ago leaves them. Dang relationships. I don't need one and neither should you.
Bullshit. The woman I love doesn't need me to provide for her. In fact her independence and inner strength is a quality I find attractive. It's not fair to judge all women as money grabbers. Sexism much? No wonder you are alone with that attitude. 
You need to love yourself first before you can find someone who loves you. 
That's a tired cliche that doesn't really mean what you think it does. 
I can relate to many things you’re talking about. You’re not self centred. Just because you have a “good” life that doesn’t mean you can’t be depressed. Anyone can be depressed. Sorry you’re feeling like this
Thanks. I just feel like a fraud in my depression sometimes.
Thanks. I just feel like a fraud in my depression sometimes.
Your feelings are valid. 
You might suffer with complexity, hard to avoid jealousy. I deal with this. 
I don't think I've ever heard of that. Can you elaborate?
This hit me pretty hard man. Different lives different perspectives. Might be selfish of me, but it's nice to know some one else feels the same. 
It's not selfish. I think that's why a lot of people are even in this subreddit, but I'm sorry you feel this way too.
People who are sad are sometimes addicted to being sad. A very hard curse to break but very normal. Just note: people who are happy are addicted to being happy. You get to choose what you are addicted to. 
Sorry, but I don't think that's entirely accurate. I didn't choose to be addicted to being depressed, if I even am *addicted*. If I could choose happiness as an addiction, I'd be happy right now.
I do #3 as well. Except that I say to myself 'I hate my shooting life' and 'I want to shooting die'. Usually I'll say it when I remember a moment where I overreacted about something to someone and was overly emotional about something.
same. I do that ALL THE TIME and then I get super socially awkward, almost like I malfunction for a little. 
#3 has become like a weird tick for me. Like, as soon as I think it, I check off a mental list to ensure I think it every day. 
Ok, you don't have to shout...
Wait do you find that it's sometimes difficult to understand English (or your mother tongue) the same way it is to understand a second language?? I sometimes have to repeat what someone said to me a few times in my head before it makes a coherent sentence.
I've had that happen a couple of times.  Like I heard something.  I knew what the words were, but they didn't make any sense.
Holy shoot. Are you me?
And me too? How are these not considered symptoms of depression by professionals?
I've been feeling depressed again, quite recently, and I haven't been eating that much as well. In fact, there are days that I wouldn't eat at all. Just coffee. 
I tend to not eat when depressed because I feel like I don't deserve to eat. This only makes things worse in the long run though because being hungry makes me feel even worse. 
I tend to not eat when depressed because I feel like I don't deserve to eat. This only makes things worse in the long run though because being hungry makes me feel even worse. 
I usually drink coffee to get through the hunger. I, too, feel like I don't deserve to eat and that I should die instead. My family's noticed that I've been getting thinner and thinner and I've noticed that my clothes are getting bigger and bigger.
DEFINITELY agree with the loss of intelligence part actually. Been feeling that lately. I used to be pretty smart but I can't focus on a page in a book or do simple calculations :/
Yes!! My brain feels like it moves in slow motion. Someone will talk to me, but it takes forever for the words to reach my brain, then actually comprehend the words, the form a response lol. It makes people think I'm not interested in what they're saying. Same with math. Can't do simple calculations any more. I hope it isn't permanent  :/
Feeling complete guilt, I'm sorry that I'm a waste of space and the only thing that I did was rack up bills for seeing my therapist. If I could just 'think myself' out of it I would :( 
Yeah the guilt is terrible. All I can think about when around family is how disappointed they are in me. They say otherwise but whenever they get upset I imagine it's my fault
Yeah the guilt is terrible. All I can think about when around family is how disappointed they are in me. They say otherwise but whenever they get upset I imagine it's my fault
Exactly, I've stopped talking to distant relatives because they're very conservative and don't think depression is a serious issue. The guilt is easily one of the worst parts of depression, It's crazy to think that there are so many others going through this as well 
Brain fog, insomnia, agoraphobia, binge eating and weight gain, simple tasks are extremely taxing, sometimes other people are exhausting, sometimes other people are infuriating, I spend all day glued to my phone even though I have responsibilities and a child who needs me. The disgust I have towards myself is intense, I feel like a waste of space.
I'd like to give you an internet hug if you'd like. Minus the kid we could be depression twins and it breaks my heart any time I know someone else is suffering like I am/have because I wouldn't wish this on anyone.
I'd like to give you an internet hug if you'd like. Minus the kid we could be depression twins and it breaks my heart any time I know someone else is suffering like I am/have because I wouldn't wish this on anyone.
I'm sorry that you can relate to my comment. Knowing that there is someone else out there who understands makes me feel like less of a failure. I hope we can find a way to get past this.
I can really relate to this, and I also have a child. I intensely despise myself and constantly feel like I'm letting her down. I'm so exhausted all of the time. 
It's really the worst thing I've experienced. I love my kid and want to be there for her but even the basic things she needs have become so difficult to provide. I don't enjoy spending time with her the way I used to. And it repeats every day.
I think part of wanting a chronic illness is a desire to justify the feelings you experience, both the feelings of loneliness and pain, and also justifying a sense of lack of responsibility and feeling better than others because you are in pain.   
I've thought about this too. Depression is always sort of thrown around like it's an emotion that you can control after a one bad day at work. But it's not. And it doesn't help that my mum always shouts at me saying that I'm being lazy and that I'm giving myself depression by not giving my heart to Jesus.. I guess after the constant shouting I've suddenly believed it's my fault and just want it to be the fault of uncontrollable divisions of cells.
This week things are hitting low again and I found myself shutting down, just to see who will reach out. Haven't posted on social media, haven't texted my friends, just to see if anyone cares.   Of course, this makes me feel infinitely worse because I haven't heard from anyone. 
Once, I took my birthday off facebook to see if anyone would remember it. Of course, no one did. I can definitely identify with how you feel.
1. Sitting around and waiting for your expiration date to come ; you pray that death is around the corner, ready to take your life. 2. Seeing your colleagues achieve great things while you sink in self-pity and solitude. 3. Crying yourself to sleep every night. 
This
I want to comment and agree on a lot of this. I want to expand a lot on it.  The problem is I don't have the motivation to even do that.
Your comment just hit me so shooting hard because I understand. This would be me a few weeks ago at my lowest in my recent episode :( ... Dude, I get it. I get how unmotivated it feels<3 :(
You may have ADHD if it's the only symptom
It's not, it's legit depression. I wondered about also having ADHD but I'm not sure I fit the symptoms other than the concentration stuff.
homicidal wut?:
yep, it's actually a symptom that teens facing depression can experience, especially if they happen to have an abusive parent. In my case, it's a verbally abusive one, who always undermines my feelings and calls me names. It goes hand in hand with my other symptom: extreme irritability :)
The best one is death... how would I call my doctor? 'Oh yeah, I was taking this medication and I died. Should I be worried? Is this normal?'
'Hey doc... I woke up dead.  Is that a problem?'
'Hey doc... I woke up dead.  Is that a problem?'
'No, that's excellent! That's a sign that your depression is fully cured.'  Dang, that's dark...
'No, that's excellent! That's a sign that your depression is fully cured.'  Dang, that's dark...
Nah, we're just predicting the zombie apocalypse.  I mean, let's face it.  If we're dead and calling the doctor, we're either a zombie or a vampire. :)
[How the hell do you wake up dead?](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=sf8FAqOQUq4)
lololol i loved this scene
Just walk it off youll be fine.
I have a saying along the same line: 'rub some dirt in it, you'll be fine'
I have a saying along the same line: 'rub some dirt in it, you'll be fine'
My grandpa always told me 'under the sink there is a bucket of stop crying like a stupid girl and suck it up'. 
My grandpa always told me 'under the sink there is a bucket of stop crying like a stupid girl and suck it up'. 
Your grandpa sounds like a nice guy
The funniest one is when suicide is a side effect.  Oh thanks, I thought I was taking them to cure that, not cause it
Yeah for some reason studies identified that esp. young people can experience new or worsened suicidal thoughts at the start of treatment, hence the whole 'black box warning' thing.
Yeah for some reason studies identified that esp. young people can experience new or worsened suicidal thoughts at the start of treatment, hence the whole 'black box warning' thing.
It's because the antidepressants give you back the energy required to actually carry through with it. At rock bottom, you're alive because you can't work up the effort to kill yourself.
It's because the antidepressants give you back the energy required to actually carry through with it. At rock bottom, you're alive because you can't work up the effort to kill yourself.
This is why I'm so conflicted about taking medication. I have no energy to kill myself right now. But I have a plan and think about it a lot....and everyone that knows I'm depressed wants me to go on antidepressants. 
Mine say that as a side effect it just baffels me 
The thought behind that is that relatively early on in treatment a side effect can be extra energy. Generally it takes around 3 weeks for the antidepressant effects to kick in however. 
Ha!! One of my meds said not to operate 'heavy machinery or large vessels'... Vessels??
Boat captains get depressed too...
What's so funny about that?
If he found it funny, let him be, at least it made him laugh
[deleted]    ^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^0.5347   > [What is this?](https://pastebin.com/64GuVi2F/03045)
(All around me are famillar faces...)
(All around me are famillar faces...)
Worn out places, worn out faces
Worn out places, worn out faces
I'LL TELL YOU WHAT I WANT WHAT I REALLY REALLY WANT
One of my meds has 'accidental injury' listed
So if it's self-inflicted injury, you shouldn't tell your medic?  Hah
It's not a depression med, but my favorite one that I tell people about is the restless leg medication that can cause gambling addiction. :)  My least favorite is Latuda. I quietly stopped taking it, I couldn't stand constantly throwing up. 
How on earth can if get you addicted to gambling i wonder. The only thing i can think of is make a gambling addiction worse
Was the medication a metal rod to use as a splint 
\*spews his glass of water* Duuuude...
I know that I desperately need meds but I have never been to a doctor even. I don't know how to even afford to see a doc. Any advice? That would be my last attempt before calling it quits.
I'm not sure what the costs are to just see a doctor since I live in Canada and that is free for me, but I know the medication is fairly cheap and the process to get it is as easy as telling the doc you are struggling with depression. At least that's what it was like for me. Hope that helps you.
You aren't lazy. People don't forget to pay the bills, or just not pay them, due to laziness. Those people saying you are lazy are idiots, or ignorant. For me its homework. I know that I should work on an essay before the last minute, but I can never do it until I have only just enough time left to frantically scrape it together and turn it in half-assed.
Thank you kind stranger. I keep doing the same thing. You made me feel a little less alone.
My problem. I spend hours and hours on the internet and in bed but yet spending 10 minutes to go make pancake mix is too much effort. 
I feel ya. I just can't be bothered to lift a finger and do work sometimes.
Yeah it's crazy. Sometimes it'll happen partway through doing something for me as well. Like I'll be taking a walk somewhere and suddenly all of my energy escapes me and I have to force myself, with gritted teeth, to keep taking steps.
That happened to me last night with laundry :(
I hate it when something like that happens such as taking a walk and then you lose all of your motivation and somehow have to find the energy just to get yourself back home.
Yep, that exact thing happened to me yesterday. It was a beautiful day so I figured I'd go for a walk and then all of a sudden I felt like crap.
Yup.  I have been google researching Johnny Depp's relationship history for ... an amount of time I don't want to admit.
Well don't leave us hanging. Is he single, or what?
Well don't leave us hanging. Is he single, or what?
Yeah he just got divorced 
Yeah he just got divorced 
From Amber Heard? That didn't last long...
Haha, sorry, I was sleeping! But yup, she filed the papers. 2 days after his mom passed away. She also wants spousal support -- after only 15 month, no kids or anything either. Of course, he left the mother of his children, partner of 14 years, to marry her. Oh, and he has a history of alcohol problems.   Oh, and yeah, the dogs.  I spent way too much time on this. Now I want to watch  Tim Burton movies.
This hit way too close to home for me. It's like I know I have to work, do dishes, clean the apartment ooooorrrr I could learn everything there is to know about GroupLove.
I'm sitting on 150 video files that need editing and could probably be at least entertaining to SOMEONE on YouTube. Shit, I've got Premiere open right now with 4 episodes ready to edit.  And I've been watching movie clips from American Gangster on YouTube for the past half hour. I have to work in 8 hours and I haven't slept yet.  Goddammit.
Get editing. If you fancy linking them afterwards I'll definitely give a few of them a watch!
Get editing. If you fancy linking them afterwards I'll definitely give a few of them a watch!
Well, here's something I threw together last night because of that new Mega Man cartoon: https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=FxdcS8-ZyrA
Yeah the trashbag has got to go, but that's pretty impressive you read two books. I haven't read in ages, except internet.
Same. I take out the trash but can't find the energy to read.
I have horrible attention span. So I will start to look up a random word that pops into my head like Mangosteen. About 2 hours later, I will be looking up a movie about a sentient, telekinetic tire that goes around killing people. 
aaahhhhh yeah, Rubber, great movie. Not really.
A while back I heard someone say that happiness is not the opposite of despression, it's motivation that's the opposite of depression. I know it's different for everyone but lack of motivation certainly seems to be one of the major problems for me. 
Heard it as, 'vitality is the the opposite of depression.'
My problem is mustering up the energy to even move. It's easy to surf the web cause only my fingers have to move while the rest of me is frozen in place. How do you get the energy?
I think the trick is not to have depression in the first place.
This movie always has and probably always will make me cry like an infant.
It made me cry harder than when Mufasa died in the Lion King.  Does that make me a bad person?    I AM CURRENTLY HAVING A LILO AND STITCH MARATHON.  WHO WANTS TO JOIN ME?
It made me cry harder than when Mufasa died in the Lion King.  Does that make me a bad person?    I AM CURRENTLY HAVING A LILO AND STITCH MARATHON.  WHO WANTS TO JOIN ME?
General Disney movie marathon? I'm in!
General Disney movie marathon? I'm in!
YES!   Putlocker is a great way to watch movies for free.   Right now I'm watching the last Lilo and Stitch movie, and I want to cry. :(
I es the same way....this made me sad, just because my memories were of inevitable lonerness. Meh, Lilo and Stick always makes me happy though.
I like this comment cause of the errors. 
I'm sorry man, I hate these feelings, it's as if life wants to give a glimmer of hope, just to make sure we remember how shitty it really is at the bottom of the barrel.
well said. 
This happens to me all the time, it leaves me totally unsure about what my capabilities are.  It's been years since I've been able to sustain an effort.  
>... totally unsure about what my capabilities are.  It's been years since I've been able to sustain an effort.    You just succinctly expressed why I lack motivation in two simple statements. Thank you! You put it into much simpler terms than I've ever been able to.
i usually have like weeks or just days of brilliant motivation and when i get shit done but after that, i just stop.. everything just dies down to even worse than it was.
I wish I could get weeks, I can barely get hours...
I wish I could get weeks, I can barely get hours...
yeah, it just hits hard as shoot back when the week goes :/
I’m always that friend the one that it doesn’t matter if he’s there or not and doesn’t feel connected to anything. 
I bet some of the friends in your group would love for you to be there but just go along with the few who don't mind as to not cause waves.  And if not? Just be on the look out for new *good* friends. Everyone has those friends that they are just mediocre friends with and maybe through them you'll eventually find the people you *really* care about.
I bet some of the friends in your group would love for you to be there but just go along with the few who don't mind as to not cause waves.  And if not? Just be on the look out for new *good* friends. Everyone has those friends that they are just mediocre friends with and maybe through them you'll eventually find the people you *really* care about.
I’ve always been the guy who just walks through life not taking anything seriously and pretending that is serious, also I put work and school ahead of socializing. 
shoot them. find better friends 
Same thing happened to me and that's exactly what I did. Never regretted a thing. 
It may just be they don't think you like it. Doing nice things for people does not get you reward points to cash in either, thinking about it like that makes anyone inevitably feel mistreated because it's easy to see the good you do,  but harder to qualify what others do. Sometimes people are very short in responses but I don't think it's out of dislike. I've found asking about it helps. 
Also worth noting that gifts make some people feel uncomfortable. Like you're putting them on the spot and now they 'owe you.' (Even if you're just trying to be nice.)
This is why I started a policy of keeping my personal life separate from my work life. 
amen
I see myself as this organic machine whose existence is merely to consume food and produce shit. I suppose that is a similar thought. 
And media products. Glorious, escapism triggering media products.
Every single day. There are some days when I start to cry as soon as I realize I'm not asleep anymore. 
well shoot that describes my situation perfectly. sleeping seems to closet thing to joy that i can experience but the thing is with my depression comes insomnia. i feel ya brother keep grinding!
well shoot that describes my situation perfectly. sleeping seems to closet thing to joy that i can experience but the thing is with my depression comes insomnia. i feel ya brother keep grinding!
I know Jimmy Kimmel was being funny when he said, 'And I'd like to thank sleep, or as I call it, death practice.' That actually struck a cord with me. I realized that's how I was feeling.
Replace 'sack of shit' with 'failure' and that's about right. I have no idea how so many people generally do well in their lives, you know - relationships, careers. I often think that it's an inevitability that some people are just meant to fail at everything throughout their lives as a way for the world to create a balance for all the successful, content people out there...an example of yin and yang in practice.
Pretty much. Though even a sack of shit could be objectively more useful than us.
> the world thrives with you in it.  Please, that the most bullshit statement a person could say. I get you're trying to help, and maybe I should see a therapist, but I don't see the point. *Everyone* is expendable in today's world. Not every person plays a vital role in society. 
Capitalism may trick you into believing the majority is somehow undeserving and useless. But we're actually all valuable humans contributing to society in one way or another.  The nihilist crap is only cool in Fight Club. In the real world we're all part of a society, and we should be all solidary to one another.
Capitalism may trick you into believing the majority is somehow undeserving and useless. But we're actually all valuable humans contributing to society in one way or another.  The nihilist crap is only cool in Fight Club. In the real world we're all part of a society, and we should be all solidary to one another.
Because society is definitely built on the kindness and altruism of others.   We should be, but we aren't. And that's why everyone on this sub is here. Sorry that the world isn't as bright and compassionate as you thought.
So are mine. I'm not bothered to fix it. I do like lying down though.
I like to sleep to escape reality. I escape my life in dreams. 
Sometimes I can't tell if Reddit is ruining my life or the only thing keeping me from ending it.
Yup. So true for me the last two months.  
yeah. it sucks because i know it's just me being never good enough by whatever thing i'm judging myself by that day. the specifics are almost arbitrary. in the end, all it is is me hating myself and needing reasons to justify it.
You can never objectively be good enough for anything because there will always be someone better than you. And with something like depression, where it tears away your self esteem and leaves you thinking you have no worth, your parameters for judging yourself will be by the abilities of others and how your abilities impact others instead of your own improvement.  At least, that's how it is through my experiences. Maybe I've given some insight to how you feel.
You can never objectively be good enough for anything because there will always be someone better than you. And with something like depression, where it tears away your self esteem and leaves you thinking you have no worth, your parameters for judging yourself will be by the abilities of others and how your abilities impact others instead of your own improvement.  At least, that's how it is through my experiences. Maybe I've given some insight to how you feel.
yeah, i know. i don't actually compare myself to others. just to an imaginary better me i can never reach.
yeah, i know. i don't actually compare myself to others. just to an imaginary better me i can never reach.
At least you can imagine a better you.
I beg to differ. I really am quite worthless.
Well, I know exactly how you feel, but try to remember that feelings and thoughts aren't always the truth. I'm confident that you are not worthless. In fact, I'd say you have plenty to offer. What are your interests? Do you have any hobbies?
Well, I know exactly how you feel, but try to remember that feelings and thoughts aren't always the truth. I'm confident that you are not worthless. In fact, I'd say you have plenty to offer. What are your interests? Do you have any hobbies?
It's not like I'm doing anything of worth. What are my interests going to contribute? I watch anime and TV shows and play video games. Occasionally I write. Nothing is going to come out of these things.
You only have to value yourself.  
Surprise! I don't.
Yeah same, and when I finally manage to post something, I keep thinking about what could be different or better about it, and I’m always just like “well that’s shit, but I would think that even if it wasn’t, so shoot it”.  Usually I end up not posting, or just deleting what I wrote after about 2 minutes of intense overthinking, and then I feel bad about it. Doesn’t help that English isn’t my first language, so I’m always worried I got something wrong  Edit: got something wrong
Haha your edit is appropriate :).  Yeah I also contemplate what I write because I overthink it too. But your English is pretty good so that’s a plus. 
We are all connected by our individual pain. Your typing is someone else's erasing. Your erasing is someone else's typing. We all feed off and help each other through these tough times.
That’s a very good way of putting it but sadly a lot of us are too scared to communicate with each other. 
You’ve just written almost exactly what is on my mind. For a moment I wondered if I wrote it. I know that’s no help but I hear you 
I wondered the same thing, I thought 'I don't remember posting that' and had to check out the username to make sure
I wondered the same thing, I thought 'I don't remember posting that' and had to check out the username to make sure
Same boat. OP: you can PM me anytime you need to vent. I know what you're experiencing. I feel like it would be easier and better if sometimes, I could just not be alive.
I'm bouncing between these two all the time. You open the floodgates and then feel horribly ashamed, which in turn will make you isolate yourself and feel even worse.
I can relate so much. When i try to socialize something bad happens and then i get sad again.
I can relate so much. When i try to socialize something bad happens and then i get sad again.
Amen. Also get the feeling that when drunk/high (if this ever happens), that miserable part of your brain just refuses to shut the hell up? 
Amen. Also get the feeling that when drunk/high (if this ever happens), that miserable part of your brain just refuses to shut the hell up? 
No, sorry i can't relate to that, i don't drink or smoke
I can't let people see my symptoms because they're all emotional or mental. I've found myself recently wishing a lot that there was some technology that allowed us to let people feel exactly what we feel so that people would understand that I'm very *not* okay and that I need help and support. I'm sorry you have to hide things from people. I know how frustrating it is for nobody to really understand what's happening.
I've thought about this too. I'd like someone to experience the void feeling around my heart, just for 5 minutes. Then they could understand that I have that feeling with me all the time, and it corrodes at you after a while.
I've thought about this too. I'd like someone to experience the void feeling around my heart, just for 5 minutes. Then they could understand that I have that feeling with me all the time, and it corrodes at you after a while.
Exactly. It's awful.
I've told my friends for years that I'm a different person when they aren't there. They never believe me really, and no one actually notices because I only really hit rock bottom when I'm alone.
That is exactly me! 
I can relate to this. I usually get the 'it'll go away on its own' or 'you'll get over it' type of response when I mention my symptoms so that led me to just suffer in silence. What I hate about this is, the longer I feel this way, the more I start to think that maybe I can try to snap out of it and it really is just 'all in my head' like they said.
And then when you do start feeling slightly happy, it comes with a sense of worry that maybe it really is easy to 'get over it' and this whole time you were just being lazy
And then when you do start feeling slightly happy, it comes with a sense of worry that maybe it really is easy to 'get over it' and this whole time you were just being lazy
I feel this so hard. I've been having a series of good days and last night I broke down because I felt like a lazy, pathetic faker and like I'm wasting space for people with real problems. It probably makes no sense lol. 
Last month, I told my boyfriend that think I needed medical help after 15 long years of consistent symptoms. His response was, you're not that bad, antidepressants change you into someone else. I wish he could feel the numbness, the disconnect, the rage and the chaotic episodes that he doesn't see when he's gone 
His attitude sounds a bit like the one I had towards myself.  Now I think that the Citalopram I take makes me my best, or at least better, self.
His attitude sounds a bit like the one I had towards myself.  Now I think that the Citalopram I take makes me my best, or at least better, self.
That's pretty much why I avoided it for so long. I thought that at the time, it was just my toxic family and other things around me, but then I moved out, things got better situation wise but it still followed me.   
serious question: what if we don't have 'the good people in your life who will listen?' i wish that wasn't the case for me, but i'm actually homeless and going through this 100% alone.
Oh man, I am really sorry to hear that! Are there any local resources or groups you could get into? There are all sorts of support groups online as well. Not as good as in person, but it can help. Maybe look into meetups.com for local mental health meetups? Feel free to PM me any time! I actually help run a mental health support group so I've build a pretty decent collection of therapy materials and worksheets, although I'm nowhere near a professional!
Oh man, I am really sorry to hear that! Are there any local resources or groups you could get into? There are all sorts of support groups online as well. Not as good as in person, but it can help. Maybe look into meetups.com for local mental health meetups? Feel free to PM me any time! I actually help run a mental health support group so I've build a pretty decent collection of therapy materials and worksheets, although I'm nowhere near a professional!
thanks; i truly mean this when i say, your saying that ^ is one of the only loving/encouraging/genuine things anyone has offered/said to me in at least 6 months. i've never been homeless before so i'd love a collection of resources. this is pretty scary.
Baby steps, I was at that same stage a few months ago. Getting up and showering is no small accomplishment when you're very depressed. You should be proud!
Thank you
Thank you
Having to mention that you took a shower sounds redundant, but when spoken by a depressed person it can mean a world to them.  Great job, mate!
I wage little wars between tiny boats and ducks. It keeps me entertained, but was awkward when my gf walked in, but she brought me my captains hat so it was cool.
You have an odd girlfriend and I love it.
Only someone who has been depressed can understand the significance of this. Or of getting out of bed. 
Getting out of bed put me in tears.
Getting out of bed put me in tears.
You've done well.
You've done well.
Thank you.
hey, good on you. I've been in this situation before, and I always give up and get back into bed if the tears come. It may seem silly to someone who isn't depressed, but I truly think this is something to be proud of. Depression takes a lot of willpower and courage for the simplest things.
I couldn't agree more.
All I had to do was read the title and I knew exactly where you were at. It made me smile because I know you're making progress. You're not alone! 
Same. When I (was going to say 'would' here, but remembered I'm coming out of one now) have an episode, showering is... It's like the holy grail of accomplishments. Psychomotor retardation is probably my second biggest symptom, so I totally get how it feels to finally move and go stand under that warm water.   It's important to see it as a form of taking care of yourself as well. Loving yourself. 
Same. When I (was going to say 'would' here, but remembered I'm coming out of one now) have an episode, showering is... It's like the holy grail of accomplishments. Psychomotor retardation is probably my second biggest symptom, so I totally get how it feels to finally move and go stand under that warm water.   It's important to see it as a form of taking care of yourself as well. Loving yourself. 
Sometimes, it feels like you're washing the darkness off. I feel that way when I have an episode and when I'm sick. That first shower afterwards is like all the bad being scrubbed away. 
I brushed my teeth today.  I am too ashamed to tell you how long it had been.  I wholeheartedly recognize your victory. 
I have the hardest time bringing myself to brush my teeth
Nice one! What kind of soap did you use?  I bought some soap the other day that sounds like gravy, it's got rosemary,mint and honey extracts in it apparently.  Anyways, good work! You've taken an important step towards finding your happiness.
My soap was blue berry scented:)
My soap was blue berry scented:)
\^\<\^ I'll bet you smell really nice! (Was that creepy? That might have been creepy...)
\^\<\^ I'll bet you smell really nice! (Was that creepy? That might have been creepy...)
I smell much better than I have been smelling lately :)
It's mindblowing what one or two underproduced chemicals in the brain can do. I've been through periods like this, barely able to manage the basic things. It feels like the brain is the enemy.
I second that. Showering and eating are 2 everyday things that I some how can't bring myself to do.
It's really amazing how such simple, easy things become so burdensome and difficult when you're depressed. It's definitely a big deal, and you should be proud of yourself!
Thank you:)
Awesome man.  Best advice that helped a friend of mine who was suffering: find the positive in everything you do.
It was seriously climbing a mountain getting up out of bed.
I know how you feel. I started doing little things like just making my bed. Now I have a series of things I have to do when I get up. Routine helps eliminate that overwhelming thoughts that bring me down. 
I am not that far yet, but i put on real clothes and am going to eat a meal tonight.
I am not that far yet, but i put on real clothes and am going to eat a meal tonight.
we're here for you! 
I totally agree.  I fantasize about having only a short time left. 
I wouldn't mind contracting a terminal illness. 'You only have one month to live, I'm so sorry.' And I'm like 'About freaking time. Hallelujah!'
I wouldn't mind contracting a terminal illness. 'You only have one month to live, I'm so sorry.' And I'm like 'About freaking time. Hallelujah!'
'you have ten months to live'   'three, or no deal.'
man, I see your pain. I know not having a good job is a huge source of anguish and misery. But take my word for it, you are better off being single. It will only add to your misery to have a family at this juncture. 
kids are cute and all, but they're also expensive. sooooo expensive 
With Anhedonia it feels like I've already lived my whole life. No enjoyment from anything, just going in and out of the days. I feel like I died a long time ago and my body just hasn't realized it.
> feel like I died a long time ago and my body just hasn't realized it.  Took the words right out of my mouth.
It's normal for you. It's normal for me. You're not alone. <3
why are we like this
why are we like this
I wish I knew. Part of me thinks it's because my parents didn't prepare me for the world and part of me thinks I'm just a worthless piece of shit that doesn't deserve to feel any other way.
I wish I knew. Part of me thinks it's because my parents didn't prepare me for the world and part of me thinks I'm just a worthless piece of shit that doesn't deserve to feel any other way.
I think for me it's the latter. My parents were great but damn still I hate myself.
Flawed neurochemistry.   Edit: And thought loops. 
110% this, personally when my negative thoughts get really bad, I have to remind my self of this over and over. I didn't cause any of the negative feelings, they come from something that I don't have a direct control over.   Just as important is to remind myself that though my neurochemisty will always fight me, with medication and self care, I can fight back.  It's a problem I never asked for, but with proper management it's one I can overcome
It's not? 😢
Not YET, but the number is growing at a horrifying rate.
Not YET, but the number is growing at a horrifying rate.
deleted  ^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^0.3251  [^^^What ^^^is ^^^this?](https://pastebin.com/FcrFs94k/78520)
deleted  ^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^0.3251  [^^^What ^^^is ^^^this?](https://pastebin.com/FcrFs94k/78520)
By sudden suicides. You always hear 'But they were doing so well...'.
Is it normal to hate yourself and your race?
Probably not, but it does make me judge one race over the other a bit more. I'm mixed but I feel your pain I just wish things were different. 
Probably not, but it does make me judge one race over the other a bit more. I'm mixed but I feel your pain I just wish things were different. 
Sigh... In the end we all become dust anyway.
deleted  ^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^0.1725  [^^^What ^^^is ^^^this?](https://pastebin.com/FcrFs94k/65427)
I live in a country with 97% my race. I just don't like some things I see.
Sometimes when I go to sleep, I wish I would never wake up, because there is too much bullshit I have to take care of. And sleeping is the only way to avoid these.
That's why I become pretty much nocturnal. But the shitty thing is being awake all night and realising how alone you are.
I'm lucky I love showers. I've taken three+ a day before, just because it's so comforting. 
I used to do that, now i just cry in the shower because im alone with my own thoughts again
I don't do anything. I'm currently failing out of my final semester of college and my parents are beginning to shun me.  
Dropped out of College after just getting an associates.  I couldn't take the class room any more and any presentations/speeches makes my anxiety to go up the roof.  Just not good for my health.
Dropped out of College after just getting an associates.  I couldn't take the class room any more and any presentations/speeches makes my anxiety to go up the roof.  Just not good for my health.
I got a presentation this thursday and i'm scared as shit.   Edit: Presentation actually went great, thank you all for the advice! :)
I got a presentation this thursday and i'm scared as shit.   Edit: Presentation actually went great, thank you all for the advice! :)
You can do if! Just practice a lot 
Same. Failed one class last semester and passed the others with a bunch of Ds. Missed a bunch of tests this semester in my classes and I'm pretty sure I'm gonna fail again. Last night I begged myself to show up for a test this morning (even cried myself to sleep), yet this morning I woke up at 2pm and didn't even care about the test anymore.
Sounds like my failed college experience on a full music scholarship.
Same boat. I just don't have any passion to give to anything or anyone recently. Been googling how to get rid of apathy, hopefully we can pull ourselves out of this rut, and find something to work towards. 
Here's to that! 
Oh god, are you me? I don't know how I'm going to tell my parents I might need another semester. And the loans! Oh god, shoot. I'm going to sleep instead of working on my projects.
I just told mine tonight. Pretty much worst case scenario. 
Hey I failed out twice. Parent's were pretty upset both times but when they knew what I was going through they understood.
My parents told me sarcastically 'well, if you're so depressed then maybe we should drive down there and commit you'
me too :( im supposed to only have 3 weeks left but i haven't gone to any classes and all of my grades are awful. ive already officially failed one so im basically shooted
Yeah. I should be graduating but instead I'm just here. Not caring. 
Does your college have a counselor or therapist you can visit to talk about things? I know many colleges do, and if yours does, I think it'd be worthwhile to give it a shot. 
One relevant point to this is that sometimes they will only help you if you are currently taking x number of credits, though they might be able to point you in a better direction if you don't meet that requirement.
Please finish, especially if you're so close to graduating. It so important, especially since you've come so far. Tell yourself u can be a slug  a f t e r  graduation. You can do it!!  
There's no way for me to graduate on time but I took steps today toward finishing next semester 
There's no way for me to graduate on time but I took steps today toward finishing next semester 
Good for you. Hang in there. 
It's a choice between forcing myself to do things and scrounging for the slightest sense of purpose from the hollow satisfaction they bring ... or laying on the couch and brooding in shame.  Today's menu is an offering of shame stew. Tomorrow I may sample a thin soup of meaningless activity.
Described it perfectly 
i cant do anything, i know i should read or something but i just cant, it feels like my mind is screaming at me silently and all i can do is listen. i spend all day on the pc cause hoping something comes up to distract me.
The worst part is when you've looked at everything interesting there is to on reddit and then there's nothing to do anymore. So you go back to sleep.
This really describes me.  The weirdest part is being aware of the fact that this way of living is making things worse. I feel at this moment that I am also not sure I can break the cycle either.  I had no idea I was such an unreliable person until recently. This behavior just seems retarded, for lack of a better term.  Hope you pull out. 
Yup. I feel retarded and unreliable. I hope you do too
I find that I, also, lose my favorite things (reading, writing) first and then take the longest time to regain interest. It's incredibly frustrating.
Me too. Reading short things on internet is all the concentration I can sustain at times
It may sound trivial but you could try to force yourself out of routine? If you wanna visit Frankfurt, Germany, I'll offer you my couch and a talk.
Whoa that sounds awesome. Would you pay the airfare too? :) you have a couch in Madison, Wisconsin friend
Whoa that sounds awesome. Would you pay the airfare too? :) you have a couch in Madison, Wisconsin friend
I can't, unfortunately. But I'll pay for a beer/spliff/tea/apfelsaftschorle. :)
Yea, that's me. For the past year, I've done nothing except go to work, sleep, watch tv/movies, eat, and play games. Everything else seems like a chore. 
This has been me. And when it gets really bad,  even watching television or playing games seems like a chore. I can't commit to anything and everything seems like too much work. 
At least you're able to go out of home. I would be glad to be on your place..
The grass always seems greener
I have been just sitting on my couch the past hour doing nothing but staring at my phone. Friend's are all going to a local bar for trivia night, and i just feel like doing nothing.
I have been moving around the country for the last two years and it has been the most brutally lonely time of my life. You may not want to hang out with them right now, which is fine, but you're very lucky to have them.
[I made an award for you.](https://i.imgur.com/xQr7X1B.png)
That is so sweet, that award!!❤️❤️❤️🎈
[I made an award for you.](https://i.imgur.com/xQr7X1B.png)
You made me smile with this. You are a lovely human being. I hope you stay that way. 
I feel the same way. Also another award should be given out for having a shower
im hella proud to have made it into the shower today
My dogs force me to get out of bed, I get up feed them, let them out and play with them a bit. It’s not much longer before I find myself back in bed. 
the best way to wake up is to a dog's face right in yours panting in a way that asks 'is it time for breakfast????'
yes
it sucks so much
it sucks so much
It's the feeling that I get when waking up, which is why I dread to go to sleep   Also the feeling when you feel even more like shit than usual, and then you drop something or say something wrong.
It's the feeling that I get when waking up, which is why I dread to go to sleep   Also the feeling when you feel even more like shit than usual, and then you drop something or say something wrong.
I never know what to do when it comes on, because I feel nothing but everything at once. It’s unbearable at times.
Not just my chest. My whole body feels like a hollow shell. A soulless husk of a person that is just going through the daily motions. The all consuming emptiness and not being able to feel anything other than anxiety becomes a bit more agonizing with each day that passes. I feel like a shooting cornered animal with no way out other than to end it all myself.
There are other ways.  You are literally deficient in the things that allow you to feel normally.  It might fix itself, but it would be best to get help. You’re worth it.
My body feels empty like I could just reach where my chest would be and there would be an empty cavity, but my head pounds like someone is taking a hammer to it with every pulse of my still beating heart.
Hallow body? Yeah, that's me. But you heart is 15lbs and weighing me down. I feel it's visible to ours and that's when the panic attack comes on. 
you sure that’s just not anxiety? those are all symptoms of anxiety and sometimes anxiety and depression can be mistaken?
I’m sure I suffer from both MDD and GAD but I suppose it could be a mix of both at the same time, which I never really thought about 
This was me all day and I had to work. I was like that all day and still am
It’s horrible when you have to force yourself to do things when all you probably want to do is lay down, it’s exhausting
I have had severe depression for about 3 months, and I screwed up attendance to a class, and now I can't fix that.
i loathe how much attendance effects grades
If I can be very honest with you now, I'll say this. I've had depression for 14 years now, and one of the things stopping me from 'beating' it, is the fact that I then have to choose to live. For a guy who has more or less lost the last half of his life, what the heck would I know about living? About responsibility? Relationships? Employment, and finance? The answer? Not much, that's what. Jumping off a bridge seems like the more appealing option. 
Been there way too many times to count. The one good thing I can say is that the longer you stick around, you realize really noone knows anything about living - we're all flailing about guessing how to survive and still have some fun in the mix. :)
This is me right now. Been out of the office for nearly two weeks and am going back in the morning. Dreading having to go back and catch up and put the mask back on to deal with people all day. 
People were surprisingly kind when I returned to work. I was terrified of going back, but it was ok. I just had to remember to take it one step at a time and just get in the door. Good luck to u.
You completely described how I feel and where I'm at; down to the expensive computer and recently purchased doom. I like it and I love videogames but I hate my comfort zone and that I won't do anything to leave it
A bit off topic, but as I understand it, snapmap already has some cool co-op maps. Feel like steaming it up and playing some? 
What about Humble Monthly Bundle? 
Oh yea, that! Such a steal. I keep meaning to sign up for that.
buy counterstrike and try and get good at it i promise you that if its your thing you'll put that computer to good work... after i tore my acl skateboarding it was literally the only thing i even could think about caring about on my computer
I avoid pvp multiplayer games like the plague, I can't take loss (especially to other people) in a healthy manner and I've really tried. Regardless of how much I exposed myself to multiplayer games, I could never respond to them properly and I would get so angry and frustrated that I would see floating dots in my eyes. That angry. Eventually I decided to quit it altogether for my own protection.
Just wanted to say you seem incredibly mature for a 15 year old. Writing style is clear and articulate. You should take up writing.
It's also a testament to the utility of creating first and even second drafts.
Losing interest in general, sucks. I laughed inside when I read the title, because I understand, and because it's my life's greatest joke.
I don't have interest in anything anymore..hopefully u fellas still have a few hobbies u enjoy
What are you doing instead? It's normal. 
Nothing anymore, I was addicted to benzos for the last year and also smoking weed everyday. I just get paranoid smoking now, so ive been wallowing in self-pity and total depression for the last month and have broken out in acne from stress/anxiety. Ive been waiting on a call from a psychiatrist as well, because I realize now I can't move forward without being medicated in some way shape or form, my baseline is worse then I could have ever imagined.
Unfortunately, your imagination dies as you grow up.
I disagree with this completely, children don't write their own fairytales. Also, video game, movie, literature, art industry is full of old people with unlimited imagination.
Just wait.
Don't be so pessimistic, can't you stand seeing somebody happy?
Tell that to the thousands of middle aged men who kill themselves every day.
How is that relevant to having a good imagination? Killing yourself doesn't depend on your imagination. Honestly I think my depression have made my imaginaton a lot better because I want to live in another worlds more often, than in real world.
Not only do I do that but sometimes I accidentally start mouthing and gesturing the conversations while they are playing in my head. My girlfriend has stopped me on numerous occasions to ask what I was doing.
This exact same thing happens to me. I'll start gesturing as if the conversation is actually happening, though I'm always alone when it happens. I suppose if I wasn't alone I wouldn't really be doing it in the first place.        Edit: Am I the only one who also voices other people in my head? Not just me talking, but taking on the role of everyone in the conversation?
This exact same thing happens to me. I'll start gesturing as if the conversation is actually happening, though I'm always alone when it happens. I suppose if I wasn't alone I wouldn't really be doing it in the first place.        Edit: Am I the only one who also voices other people in my head? Not just me talking, but taking on the role of everyone in the conversation?
You're not, I do the exact same thing, in fact I think I'm doing it all the time, it has become ingrained in me by spending all the time alone. I thought I was the only one who did this but after seeing this post I'm 'relieved'
Phew glad to see it's not only me. I've done this for years, since I was a child, always had an overactive imagination. Sometimes I would even start actually acting it out, standing up and moving around like i was putting on a one person play. I always felt crazy. Maybe I am...
I do the exact same thing.. all the time. 
Oh wow I do this.  Glad I'm not alone.
Nope, always thought I was crazy.
It's a huge coping mechanism for me to just ramble on to myself and tell myself fantastical stories. I internalise it if people are around, but it's still there. I hope I never grow out of it, personally 
The main time I do it is at work. My mind just kinda fades out into a conversation and I loose all sense of time. Its quite relaxing, its kinda like sleep.
Its a bit embarrassing, but yes. I frequently talk to myself. Sometimes other people notice it, too. I do it because, to be blunt, I don't have any friends and I am very lonely. So, I kind of imagine myself in social situations I never really find myself in, and I just role play and enjoy myself. I also make weird gestures all the time, too :P
Story of my life! I always look at people and then put myself in those situations and frame proper conversations.
There's a word for having a conversation in your head with someone as a way to plan it out and express yourself perfectly. I can't remember what it is for the life of me, but it makes it seem more like a poetic gesture. Anyone know? 
Let me know if you find it :)
I talk to myself every day at 12 am for some shooting reason. Imagine golum from Lord of the Rings. That's how it shooting looks but it helps xD
Lol! Thanks for making my morning. That was funny.
Lol! Thanks for making my morning. That was funny.
You are welcome! *Yes you are welcome my treasure*
Oh welp looks like im ultra shooted.
Why?
Why?
Because that's me 101.
Have been 'living inside my head' since the past 10-12 years. That's the only place where I find some sort of comfort.
Omg same! I can't believe it sometimes that it's been so long! I'm 21 and I've actively done it since I've been in grade school.. Mostly it's not cause I'm not capable of talking to others it's cause I'm naturally asocial and get embarrassed easily and also the conversations in my head are 100 % more entertaining than anything in the real world... 
Omg same! I can't believe it sometimes that it's been so long! I'm 21 and I've actively done it since I've been in grade school.. Mostly it's not cause I'm not capable of talking to others it's cause I'm naturally asocial and get embarrassed easily and also the conversations in my head are 100 % more entertaining than anything in the real world... 
I am 22 and have been doing it since like 3rd or 4th standard? And the reasons you've stated on your comment are the same reasons why I literally live in my imagination! 
Too real! I've always turned to daydreaming (like making characters and alternate worlds) when im doing anything, even driving. Cause if I dont, i'll self-loath and having constant suicidal thoughts.   And when i dont have any of those thoughts, I'll overthink a certain past event or think up a future version of myself that will never happen. I also think up creative ways to kill myself, just cause.   
Have you thought of journaling or writing down these characters/alternate-worlds? 
Have you thought of journaling or writing down these characters/alternate-worlds? 
Some... most are copies of themselves just altered to a different universe, personalities and powers.   Unless they're totally different from prev ideas and i thought they were cool, i'd draw them down and write a character sheet each.
Even when I'm, well, about as present as I get, I'm pretty stuck in my head. When I get 'bad,' though, I become basically mute. I minimally communicate. People are a mild irritation at best and even when they address me directly, it's difficult to break out of my thoughts enough to muster a meager response.
Same, I get pretty caught off guard/surprised easily when I'm daydreaming like this and someone from reality tries to talk to me. Or like, one time, I was making waffles and daydreaming at the same time. I was standing in front of the toaster while doing so, and when it made that *POP* noise, I was pretty startled. 
It sucks. You think you have it the worse and then you see someone who tops it. 
Yeah the first couple of minutes I was like 'holy shit I DO NOT deserve to be here'. They have been through quite a lot. 
Yeah the first couple of minutes I was like 'holy shit I DO NOT deserve to be here'. They have been through quite a lot. 
Every experience is unique. Just because someone else has gone through worse shit, doesn't mean you don't deserve to feel how you feel. We're all suffering and trying to cope in our own ways.
Every experience is unique. Just because someone else has gone through worse shit, doesn't mean you don't deserve to feel how you feel. We're all suffering and trying to cope in our own ways.
Yep, my feelings are valid either way.   I did appreciate that it wasn't ever a 'one-up' kind of vibe in the group. We all were trying to relate to each other without trying to make it seem like the other person has it worse. 
Yeah it makes me sad seeing all the posts that go unnoticed on here. I want to respond to them but most of the time I don't know what to say.
Same
Yeah it makes me sad seeing all the posts that go unnoticed on here. I want to respond to them but most of the time I don't know what to say.
I often feel like I have nothing particularly valuable to add, so say nothing. It's not even a depressive or confidence issue...sometimes I genuinely just.... for instance, right this second, I nearly didn't comment! And in hindsight, will probably feel I shouldn't have!   Anyway, I'm going to make a point of commenting on more posts that have no traction.
Yes and downvotes seem to be totally random. Reddit is like life itself, there is not a reason why something sometimes works and why it fails. It's random.
A lot of those random down votes are actually automated- something about reddits algorithm 
A lot of those random down votes are actually automated- something about reddits algorithm 
It's to prevent people from knowing when they are shadow banned.
When you actually talk about your feelings, no replies.  When you talk about reddit and how nobody responds to your feelings, you get DOZENS OF REPLIES.  &nbsp;  That's how reddit works
The irony is, that's the most times anyone has paid attention to me on reddit lol 
a lot of people read threads but have no idea how to respond. trust me, you're not alone  i spent one whole night out of pure boredom making sure that every single new post had a reply because i felt the way you do, so maybe you could do the same sometime if you feel like it
I do this sometimes. 
I often sort posts from this sub and r/selfharm as 'new' instead of 'hot' in the hopes of reaching out to people who get less attention.
that is what I have started to do in certain threads too. Most of the time I do feel like OP, and in the 'fun' threads I remain on the hot-tab to not have to wade through a bunch of annoying reposts and off-topic posts, but in threads for mental illness and [/r/suicidewatch](https://www.reddit.com/r/SuicideWatch/) I try to support the ignored ones.
Danging tell me about it. I made a post here last week about feeling cripplingly lonely and didn't get a single response. No upvote or downvote. Nothing. I've since deleted the post, but way to help perpetuate the way I'm feeling.
Exactly why I never tried to post on here and pouring it out, because it's still very much a test of charisma and articulating things. I'm just not a charismatic person on the internet as well as outside of it.  Danging sucks.
what time did you post? 
It was the middle of the day.
It was the middle of the day.
Best to post early in the morning. By mid day the shit that's going to be popular that day is already popular. Ya feel?
It's largely random. Upvotes beget upvotes and comments beget comments. 
I've had similar comments in the same discussion receive **both** negative and positive votes before. 
Even the top post of this week on this sub has barely 700 upvotes. I looked at your profile and can see almost all of your posts are here in this sub. If it's meaningless points and karma you are after, you need to post interesting things that people want to read or look at.  
Or more accurately, bullshit they want to hear anyway.
Or more accurately, bullshit they want to hear anyway.
Not necessarily. every sub has its niche and if you serve some value by showing people something new within that niche or just starting a discussion - it'll happen organically. if you're posting and commenting with karma etc. in mind, then you will be sorely disappointed. it's not bullshit. it's peoples interests and humour. it's what staves off boredom for some, helping to take their mind off a lot of shit in real life. 
Hey, how come you want to die?
I wish I knew too
Sometimes a post can truely make or break you
What?
This is very nice. You have talent.
Very talented indeed.
Very talented indeed.
Thank you both!
Thank you both!
You're very welcome.
The black dog
I wish I knew what you were referencing here. Is this a reference?
I wish I knew what you were referencing here. Is this a reference?
It's how Winston Churchill described the depression he suffered from all his life, it's also been used in a series of books with pretty good illustrations by a fella named Matthew Johnstone   http://www.amazon.co.uk/Matthew-Johnstone/e/B001IODNX8
That is so very striking. I love it.
Thanks :)
My ex girlfriend had schizophrenia. She recently killed herself due to it. The hallucinations and voices were too much for her.  I don't understand the illness, but I wish I did. This is a wonderful picture. Thank you for sharing.
I'm sorry to hear that; so many people with schizophrenia take that route. I can't say it hasn't crossed my mind, too.  I'm not sure anyone can say they really understand the illness. I certainly don't. I understand how it affects people, though.
I'm sorry to hear that; so many people with schizophrenia take that route. I can't say it hasn't crossed my mind, too.  I'm not sure anyone can say they really understand the illness. I certainly don't. I understand how it affects people, though.
Have you heard of this [new treatment/study](http://www.guardian.co.uk/society/2013/may/29/schizophrenia-mental-health)? I heard a story about it on NPR a few weeks ago. Therapists make computer-generated avatar of the voices to give the person a physical 'person' to talk back to. It helps the person feel more in control and some of the patients stopped hearing the auditory hallucinations all together.
This is amazing. I struggle on and off with depression and I wish I had some creative outlet.
Poetry dude.  I suck at literally everything but poetry is one thing I feel I am at least okay at.  My English teacher loves it and reviews it.  He suggest I look into getting published.  I thought I sucked at it first but it's just something you can pour all out in.  You've gotta try it!
Poetry dude.  I suck at literally everything but poetry is one thing I feel I am at least okay at.  My English teacher loves it and reviews it.  He suggest I look into getting published.  I thought I sucked at it first but it's just something you can pour all out in.  You've gotta try it!
I may look into that. I've always wanted to try lyrics or making rhymes, just to see what I could come up with.
Writing, poetry, story telling, sketching, drawing, singing, instruments, crafting...there are tons of things you may be good at! Just because you aren't Picaso doesn't mean you have no creative ability :)
I've tried them all and I was never as good as I had hoped haha
I've tried them all and I was never as good as I had hoped haha
What instruments have you tried? I find that ukulele is a really great outlet because it's really easy to play, and can either sound really happy or really sad. Plus, you can get them really cheap.
I get this painting. I know you said that you see a wolf but I can relate to this picture in a way. Depression is like the wolf - always lurking, ready to tear you to pieces.  I'm not very good at it but I also find painting to be therapeutic. Keep up the good work - it's obvious you have immense talent.
I have struggled with anxiety and depression for a long time. I've been around artistic people my whole life but the devil on my shoulder always told me I could never do that. recently I went out and bought some canvases and started drawing/painting and have been so surprised to find how under-critical I am being of myself, how much I am thoroughly enjoying the relaxing and hypnotizing effects of painting, and that I would recommend it to absolutely everyone. 
Wow that is really impressive, even more so after reading the description. It's interesting and very well done  /r/Art and /r/Heavymind  would really appreciate this too I think
Thanks, I'll share it over there too. /r/heavymind seems like an interesting place.
Thanks, I'll share it over there too. /r/heavymind seems like an interesting place.
It certainly is, one of my favourites and I see you're at the top where you belong :)
This is really beautiful.  Did you paint it with real paint or did you use a computer program?
I have a basic drawing tablet that I use for digital painting. I didn't use any automatic effects though; I just use the basic brush and pick colors.
I don't even know if you intended the painting as you did, but it describes my life perfectly. This sir, is a painting of true meaning to so many people. As soon as i looked at it I broke down for the first time in, lets say a while. 
Wow... I don't want to say thank you, but... thank you. You're welcome? Stay in school. ...I'm not good at this.  That means a lot to me. That's why I painted it; so that I, and others, could feel understood. I hope you meant the good sort of breaking down, anyway.  If you ever want me to paint you something, let me know. 
Whoa.. that's really good, and somewhat terrifying.
I found it kind of comforting.... maybe because I find comfort in my dogs?
I found it kind of comforting.... maybe because I find comfort in my dogs?
I love dogs too.  But, at least to me, a wolf != a dog.  I liked the tail on the head though.  
Love love love this! Well done OP! I'm a Professional Counselor and a big advocate for art therapy.. especially for client's who experience AH/VH.. to me, you are an inspiration!
I haven't showed this to my counselor yet... I'm not good at being fawned over in person, so she doesn't always see what I draw :p  I am also an advocate of art therapy. Fun fact. Or art anything, pretty much. 
This really speaks to me. I've used games to ward off the darkness of depression for pretty much my whole life. My darkness may not have a form, but it's hungry and scary nonetheless.  
'This really speaks to me.' I had to chuckle at that, since... you know, schizophrenia.  I love games for this reason, and because it instantly gives me and a complete stranger a common experience that we've shared. I don't get out and talk to people that often, but if I can talk about a game, I'm suddenly very outgoing.
Great composition. That wolf reminds me of my mental illness keeping me up at night, always in the background. Austin State Hospital a few years back did a show of photography by its patients. This would make a good addition to a collection of artwork of people who battle mental illness.
Thank you. I can't even say I expected this to be received with such aplomb, so your comments means a lot.
Thank you. I can't even say I expected this to be received with such aplomb, so your comments means a lot.
You're welcome. Your picture meant a lot to me. It stirred me. I think this means it's good art.. ;-) Message me if you ever put your works up for sale.
You're welcome. Your picture meant a lot to me. It stirred me. I think this means it's good art.. ;-) Message me if you ever put your works up for sale.
If you're interested in this one, I could technically enable prints for it. I have them disabled for now because I didn't know anyone would be interested. Alternatively, all digital downloads on my DA page are free, so feel free to download it from there.   I'll likely post more of my expressive works here, so you'll at least see those, but they don't happen unless inspiration strikes.
I love the colors. Not sure why.
Maybe because they are awesome? Just kidding. ...sort of. (See, this is what happens when people give me compliments. I'm going mad* with power!)  Thanks!  *crazy-person joke, it's okay to laugh
While this painting applies to you, I see an additional meaning in it for those of us with depression. The wolf could represents the feelings of self loathing and doubt that those with depression struggle with each day. It could also represent suicidal thoughts, and the game represents whatever coping mechanism we use to stave off those feelings, at least temporarily.  Then again, this is my opinion on the matter. Others might see it differently, but this is what I see.
I definitely see the metaphor in it. For me, an important detail is that the wolf and I form a circle with each other. We are both part of me.
I definitely see the metaphor in it. For me, an important detail is that the wolf and I form a circle with each other. We are both part of me.
The same can apply to many people.
awesome picture. i'd put that on my wall without hesitation!
You can download it for free from my DA page, if you'd like. They also offer prints, but those cost money.
You can download it for free from my DA page, if you'd like. They also offer prints, but those cost money.
oh cool! thanks! 
I was wondering what would happen if you tried to touch a hallucination, would you feel it? Have you ever tried?
I have tried, but only with this wolf because it's pretty much the only one that doesn't scare me anymore. I just go right through it; it usually causes it to disappear, but it can return when I turn around.
I really like it. Would you mind showing us more of your work?
I don't have anything else like this that I'd like to show... I'll sometimes draw as raw expression, but that's always on paper, and it tends to be hard for me to look at the next day.  If I paint anything more like this, I'll be sure to share it with this sub. For now, I've got a few projects on the go that should end up on my DA page in the next month or so.
They say time waits for no one. I can't help but feel so guilty that I spend half of the day sleeping and still feel tired, so I lay in bed all day. What's worse is that when I stay in my bed alone, I get bombarded with dark thoughts, which in turn make me tired.   When I was younger, I thought I would become someone great, yet I waste my time fighting my mind...
Laying in bed all day makes me tired, sitting on the couch makes me tired, going to work makes me tired, hanging out with friends makes me tired....there is literally nothing that doesn't seem to make me tired. 
How amazing it would be to wake up one day and get out of your bed...happy, for a change.
how amazing it would be to wake up one day and actually get out of bed
how amazing it would be to wake up one day and actually get out of bed
How amazing it would be to wake up dead one day.
For a few days I've been waking up and wondering what the point is. I'd go to school. Get bullied. Get betrayed. Go home. Do nothing. Go to sleep again. What's the point.  
Join a sport like track
I'm not a sport person. I'm of average weight (maybe a slight underestimate).  But I can't be bothered to do that. Also. We don't have track I school. And you'd have to pay to do anything out of school.
I'm no where near an athlete and I do track. It's fun. Do whatever sport you can do.
That would be nice. Neither the 6-8 fitful hours I get on nights before I work nor the 8-12 fitful hours I get on nights when I'm not working the next day make it go away. When people ask me if I'm ok I can legit say I'm tired though (I brush off a lot with 'tired'). 
Same haha
I drink it a lot because I love coffee, but it doesn't really give me any energy or buzz or whatever.
Same, people tell me how jittery they get because of the amount of energy it gives them, but for me it just keeps me from falling asleep for a few hours at most if I'm lucky.
Story please 
We need details!!
Feels good, doesn't it? Happy for you, man.
Feels so good. There's still hope for us all! Even in our darkest hours some kind of hope will still remain even if u dont believe in it.
Feels so good. There's still hope for us all! Even in our darkest hours some kind of hope will still remain even if u dont believe in it.
Yeah I don't know about me to be honest. There's nothing more undesirable than feeling undesirable like I do. It's a pretty bad vicious circle.
Awesome dude! Hope things keep going up for you :)
Thank you!
This makes me feel depressed, for many reasons...
Well, just because he kissed a girl doesn't mean you can't, if it helps. It's not like there's a limited number of kisses. Keep the faith, I know it's hard.
Well, just because he kissed a girl doesn't mean you can't, if it helps. It's not like there's a limited number of kisses. Keep the faith, I know it's hard.
It feels great, but it could never cure my depression.
It feels great, but it could never cure my depression.
Yeah :-/
Congrats buddy! :) 
Thank you!
And people have always told me that happiness cannot be influenced through the actions you share with others...  You have been proven wrong  People always say 'love yourself' 'don't worry about other people' (including the people you love or have a crush on) 'only you can make yourself happy'  Maybe people say this on purpose to keep you in the dumps and away from people because they want you to be alone....
People say this because if you can't manage yourself, relationships tend to go sour. If you get reliant on someone, and then they leave you, it can lead you to very very bad consequences. Really it means you need to find a way to internally make yourself feel good without needing external things to do it for you. Because people and life suck and can* always backstab you hard :/
People say this because if you can't manage yourself, relationships tend to go sour. If you get reliant on someone, and then they leave you, it can lead you to very very bad consequences. Really it means you need to find a way to internally make yourself feel good without needing external things to do it for you. Because people and life suck and can* always backstab you hard :/
Exactly. The point is not to keep people down, the point is that you build your happiness on a solid foundation. While other people can certainly add to our happiness, it is unwise to base your happiness on one person. As *soon* as something in the relationship goes wrong, there is a high likely hood you'd end up worse than you were before. It's okay if you needed that positivity in another person to spark that light but don't let that person *be* your light. 
I don't know about you but I'm feeling 22 Everything will be alright, if you keep me next to you... sorry :D im 22 too, happy birthday 
Hey thanks. I’m sorry for being a Debby downer 
Hey thanks. I’m sorry for being a Debby downer 
Happy birthday! I turned 25 just a few days ago.   And it hurts. Be careful who you give your heart to, because you might never get it back. I'm still waiting for mine to return :(
Happy birthday! I turned 25 just a few days ago.   And it hurts. Be careful who you give your heart to, because you might never get it back. I'm still waiting for mine to return :(
Yeah I’m not actually expecting him to come back. I just feel bland that he wasn’t willing to wish me happy birthday 
Hey thanks. I’m sorry for being a Debby downer 
Girl. I would love to be 22. But hindsight is 20/20 and depression is a bitter pain. You seem pretty amazing. Think about you today. Drink up. I'll have a glass or 4 for you, Doll. 
Girl. I would love to be 22. But hindsight is 20/20 and depression is a bitter pain. You seem pretty amazing. Think about you today. Drink up. I'll have a glass or 4 for you, Doll. 
Thank you darling! Drinks up 
Happy birthday! Treat yourself, no one needs friends to have a 'me' kinda day. 
Hey, you’re right 
Absolutely. Wine alone sounds depressing, but when you add in candles, a bathtub, perhaps an audiobook or perfectly curated playlist...that’s just a lovely evening.
Oh wow. Come join me! 
Oh wow. Come join me! 
OwO what’s this 
Happy birthday, count yourself lucky you had this happen at 22 instead of 28 like me this week, I guess at least she waited until after my birthday, but if I was 22 at least I’d be young enough to feel like I had time to figure out a new life. By the time I recover I’ll be at the age all of my friends (old friends I mean, I don’t have any close friends) will be married with kids instead of now when it’s just the majority.
Aww thanks. It was truly, remarkably hard. I appreciate you 
Happy birthday! I hope things get better ❤️
Oooooh I’m trying. [Meeseeks voice] Thanks again for your help  
same, 21 today happy birthday
Happy 21st!
Happy shooting birthday!! Do something nice for yourself (: 
ty never really do anything on birthdays so just sat around watching tv
ty never really do anything on birthdays so just sat around watching tv
I feel you, birthdays dont mean much to  me either so I usually stay in. At most maybe Ill stuff my face with some good food. 
happy birthday! dont let 22 make you feel old. they say life begins at 40 so you’re basically a fetus now :)  have a good day! 
Omg you’re so funny 
I wish I was even in your decade! 22 is crazy young. You have so much ahead of you!!!
Awww you’re awesome though 
Haha I like your witty comment and smile 
I like you.
I feel like I'm sometimes an alien on this planet. Everything seems foreign to me. People live their lives, they go on to do their businesses. Every morning they wake up, go to their job or school, and then what happens? They engage in their hobbies, spend time with family, and generally have a fulfilling life. To me, I just think.... is that something worth fighting for? PM me anytime if you want to talk.
Yeah. Even I've had this feeling of not belonging. Like I'm something different. Like humans are a different species that deserve happiness and I don't. I've resigned myself to killing myself once I get my things in order. Because there is no way that I'll ever amount to anything in life. Will never get a SO and so on. 
I feel everyone can be saved except me. Maybe its true. Who knows. 
What if i feel that way, too? That means i think you can be saved, and that you think i can be saved. Hm.
Same here. When I told my therapist my views on society and on life, I noticed a worried glance for literally half a second. She knows I'm shooted and theres no hope for me left, but she keeps on smiling for some goddamn reason lol. I'm also convinced that I'm going to kill myself at some point.
Same here re: killing myself. When I think of the future, I don't see myself living that long. I'm already overweight and diabetic. Whatever. 
Same here re: killing myself. When I think of the future, I don't see myself living that long. I'm already overweight and diabetic. Whatever. 
Yo type 1 diabetic here who has recently gained weight - sedentary job. As much as going to the gym sucks it equally is just as great. I joke about not living long all the time to my girlfriend but at the same time I’m kinda not joking. Even though most diabetics live just as long as a “healthy” human nowadays anyway...  Edit: to add, I feel like the way diabetes works in your body we are kinda prone to depression which is shooting horseshit. 
Yo type 1 diabetic here who has recently gained weight - sedentary job. As much as going to the gym sucks it equally is just as great. I joke about not living long all the time to my girlfriend but at the same time I’m kinda not joking. Even though most diabetics live just as long as a “healthy” human nowadays anyway...  Edit: to add, I feel like the way diabetes works in your body we are kinda prone to depression which is shooting horseshit. 
Joslin has done studies, and yes, any of us hit by D are [4x as likely to be depressed.](http://www.joslin.org/info/are-diabetes-and-depression-linked.html)  Me: T2 who was diagnosed at the same time I was admitted to a hospital for severe depression/SI. Hilarious double whammy which added an extra week in the psych ward because they wouldn't release me until my numbers were stable on the first course of meds.
Shit. So *that's* the look I've seen on a couple of my previous therapists' faces before. I always thought they might know deep down that I'm screwed and they are hiding from that truth themselves. I feel strangely validated by reading that I'm not alone in having that feeling, so thanks for mentioning that.
I thought that look meant “this person is a suicide threat”
I do and I know I will be dead before 30.
Can't decide if I want to make it to 30
Wow this is incredible!
Thank you so much :) 
Thank you so much :) 
You should really consider making an Instagram. Post your stuff and get some feedback. I think it will motivate you. I think you got what it takes. I regularly look through hundreds of pieces of work to create DeepDream art. And your painting is one of the best I've seen today.
You should really consider making an Instagram. Post your stuff and get some feedback. I think it will motivate you. I think you got what it takes. I regularly look through hundreds of pieces of work to create DeepDream art. And your painting is one of the best I've seen today.
Thank you :D I have Instagram with my photos and paintings, but its hard to 'promote' myself and what I do. 
You're so talented! It's like a combination of beauty and tragedy. I love it ❤️
Thank you so much<3 I cried a little when reading your comment. Happysad tears.
As a fellow depressed artist, remember the feeling of pouring your heart onto the page. How you let it flow without judgement, and your bravery for sharing it with others. Remember THAT feeling that you created in yourself and make your next piece!
Thank you so much :) I will try. Its really inspiring with all your comments. Makes me cry, and gives me courage to make more, and maybe post it to. :P 
This is fantastic.  Seriously.    Clearly you have SOME will to start, (otherwise the painting wouldn't exist at all.)  Do you have more stuff?
Thank you so much! Yes, sometimes i can force myself to start something, and Im happy for that. I have some out on my instagram, but not much, :) 
This is wonderful! I hope you continue creating and  posting your art. :)
Thank you :) 
It could be something came out from Silent Hill, it's so disturbing and everytime I look at it something new pops up, like the face near the legs of the girl, on the left. I love it, you should paint some other stuff with this style
Thank you so much for that :D I love creepy paintings and drawings. 
Very nice. Raw, unpleasant, coffee stained and memorable.  What's the reason for this figure?
Hmm. Just what I was feeling that day and almost all the time. Prisoner of my own selfdestructing mind. Feeling like im sinking and floathing at the same time.  I dont know. Better to paint it. :P 
tomorrow is my birthday. I don't expect much.
Happy birthday in advance! 🤗
Happy birthday in advance! 🤗
Thank you! I appreciate it.
Hey, happy early birthday!
Thank you!
Thank you all for the birthday wishes. Even if they're pity wishes they still really made me feel better, and made my day less shitty
I don't think it's pity, friend. It's empathy. Your pain is shared, here, we feel it too.
Happy happy birthday you!! Use their guilt tomorrow and leverage it to finagle a better present!
Great idea haha, gave me a good laugh
Hey it's my birthday too (I turned 19 yikes!!) and I feel similar, but cheer up! Happy Birthday Birthday buddy, there is a beautiful full moon tonight, shine just as bright as that today! Its another rotation you have completed since you've arrived on the planet, the world is yours!
Happy Birthday 🎂!!! 
Grow up man, it's just a birthday. You're crying over your 'friends' not wishing you a happy birthday, big deal. Most friends at that age end up being acquaintances after high school anyway. Besides, you got taken out to a nice dinner at a fancy place by the people who truly matter, family.
You clearly missed the point. 
Your point is that you're sad because your friends didn't wish you a happy birthday, did I miss anything?  
It wasn't just about the birthday. It's the bigger picture...why are you on this sub?
Initially when I read this I felt like that's maybe not the best reason to get a dog BUT then I realized I would probably have killed myself 1,000 times over if it wasn't for the fact that I couldn't do that to my dog. He needs me and I feel like I made a promise when I adopted him and I won't break that. I sincerely have an unhealthy attachment to my dog and I'm okay with that. 
Unhealthy? Sounds very healthy to me, given our alternatives.  Yes, I'm a mad cat person. What people don't realise is that I was already mad before I had the cats.
Yes, I hate the 'look'! I do clinical rotations for school so I wear scrubs and specific shoes to the hospital and when I put those on, he knows. I always tell him I'd much rather be with him though and that I have to go to school so I can have a good job and buy him nice things :)
It's funny you mention that because that's what I say to my dog all the time! 'I'm leaving you so I can buy you nice things and treats! Stop giving me the look!'
I love this. I have a rabbit for the same purpose. She has a longer Amazon wishlist than I do.
Do you keep her as a house rabbit? We've kept ours living free in the house for going on ten years now, and I couldn't imagine it any other way- they're just such wonderful pets.
Do you keep her as a house rabbit? We've kept ours living free in the house for going on ten years now, and I couldn't imagine it any other way- they're just such wonderful pets.
She's a house rabbit for sure!
She's a house rabbit for sure!
Fantastic!   I don't know how anyone could keep rabbits in hutches for their entire lives. They're some of the most active, inquisitive animals around. 
My parents bought me a puppy as well when I first got out of the hospital, it was probably the best thing to happen. Like you said, it does keep you busy which is great! Also, I've met a lot of people in my neighbourhood while walking my dog and now have some puppy playdates, so I'm hoping that you'll meet some nice people too!
Definitely this! My whole family has met some neat people at the local dog park - one of our dogs loves it there, and even if we don't keep in contact with the other humans, the conversation is always wonderful and generally dog-centric.
Dogs are great in that they can sense your feelings and are very empathetic.  Very happy for you, and wishing you and your pup the best.  Can we see a pic of the little guy?
They are very very sensitive to people's emotions! I'm crate training him right now and he knows when I'm talking about him or even paying attention to him just by subtle cues. I put him in the crate while cleaning hoping he'd take a nap, and whenever I'd even look over in his direction or talk about him (without using his name) he'd pop his head up and start whining!  [Here's the little bugger (lemon for scale)](http://imgur.com/wKVyhJj)
They are very very sensitive to people's emotions! I'm crate training him right now and he knows when I'm talking about him or even paying attention to him just by subtle cues. I put him in the crate while cleaning hoping he'd take a nap, and whenever I'd even look over in his direction or talk about him (without using his name) he'd pop his head up and start whining!  [Here's the little bugger (lemon for scale)](http://imgur.com/wKVyhJj)
I love the derp ear!
As everyone else has said, this .was an excellent decision. Here's my Mocha. She's a booger but she keeps me sane. http://i.imgur.com/jvqSTOq.jpg  Edit i do not Internet well 
Are you sure you didn't rescue her from the set of Gremlins? :P
Are you sure you didn't rescue her from the set of Gremlins? :P
I KNOW RIGHT!!!!! I've never seen a Chihuahua look so ridiculous. She gives me the giggles. Here's another one. http://imgur.com/hVPDRdc   
Sounds extremely familiar! My girl also keeps me running which has improved my chemistry and complexion immensely I feel. Always helps to have a high energy breed for those sorts of things.   [Here's a pic of her.](http://i.imgur.com/RdE4BAK.jpg)
Oh my, she's adorable! German Shepard puppies are just cute as ever with their huge paws :D
Cute dog. Dogs are great to have around, once I have the chance to live somewhere where I can keep a dog, I'm adopting one for sure.  It really helps my loneliness as well, and it would give me a running partner that never flakes. 
You can get an ESA note from your therapist! They are considered medical so you can't be refused housing.
I'm allergic or I would have gotten a cuddly ball of fluff a long time ago :(
I'm allergic so my sister did some research and rescued a Pekingese/Poodle mix for me. I highly recommend looking into a poodle mix. I have never had any problems with allergies with her.  
Purebred or specially bred animals are very expensive most of the time :(
There are a lot of breed-specific rescues, because of the plague of folks who get a puppy, and throw them away when they're less cute.  Usually the dogs are very affordable - the cost usually includes things like neutering, microchip, and vaccinations.
Oooh, what kind of breed is he?
He's a Jack Russell mix :). He's only 5 months, 7 lbs. and very tiny now but he's supposed to grow to be 25 pounds! 
He's a Jack Russell mix :). He's only 5 months, 7 lbs. and very tiny now but he's supposed to grow to be 25 pounds! 
They still stay small! My mom has had several. They're pretty high-energy, so make sure you're prepared for that. Without a means to spend their energy they can get grumpy and mean. Otherwise, they really want to be lapdogs.  And Jack Russells are smart! The one my mom currently has likes to grab a blanket, and curl himself up in it on his doggy-bed.
That's adorable, what's his name?
Snoopy!
I got my dog when I was 8, so that wasn't the original intent. But when I developed depression, she became the reason I couldn't leave. She was a therapy dog for hospitals and nursing homes, but no one knew she spent most of her therapy services on me. Sometimes the best kind of love is that of a dog.
http://1.bp.blogspot.com/-Q1FS-WW2jpk/U-DDcF487lI/AAAAAAAAL4U/PhzaqKLlP5E/s800/leunig.jpg  I personally believe the second point listed is the purest form of happiness available to people like us.
http://1.bp.blogspot.com/-Q1FS-WW2jpk/U-DDcF487lI/AAAAAAAAL4U/PhzaqKLlP5E/s800/leunig.jpg  I personally believe the second point listed is the purest form of happiness available to people like us.
My therapist brings in her massive, fluffy Samoyed to sessions sometimes and it makes me so shooting happy.
Congratulations. A lot of times I end up crying in the bathroom before accomplishing that. 
Thank you! :) It's the small accomplishments that get me through. I'm currently going through med changes too, so it's difficult. But I did it! Yay!
Thank you! :) It's the small accomplishments that get me through. I'm currently going through med changes too, so it's difficult. But I did it! Yay!
Med changes are the worst!! Good luck getting through the tough bits! And good on ya for making food!! It seems like a normal thing for most people, but we all know how hard it is to do even the smallest things.(laundry,cleaning,dishes,getting groceries....) And thinking about doing those things makes you more upset! Be proud of yourself and hopefully you can carry that momentum :)
Or end up eating peanuts, like i'm doing right now.
I assume you don't have severe allergies...or else would suggest suicide hotline
I always make soms Nice eggs when down it tastes so good 😊
I know, right? Yum! :D Yay eggs!
I made it into the bath finally and its 6pm. I've been so useless this weekend. 
It's ok. Sometimes it's hard to get the energy to do anything because your brain is working overtime to keep you going. Be proud of what you did get done.
Yay! Congratulations! Any victory is a big victory when you have depression!
It really is. I was feeling pretty low since I'm not in school right now. I've been writing more recently, though, so that's helping, and small victories like this, of course. :D
No pulp. :D
ohhh I love pulp. I always feel like the oddman out.
Awesome. I try to actually make myself eggs literally every single day. If I don't get a good breakfast, it pretty much ensures I'm going to be in a shitty mood all day long.   Good on you, keep up the good work!
It's amazing what a good breakfast can do, not to mention, if it's incredibly well-rounded it can last practically all day until you get hungry again! Or maybe that's just me. 
<3 I'm glad I could be an inspiration to you! Go cook some eggs! Do what I didn't do and add some cheese! So good! Unless of course you're lactose intolerant, in which case, maybe some olives (green) or sausage, or something else you like in/with/on top of your eggs! :D
Unfortunately I don't usually eat eggs, my version of what happened to me today was I had a shower and went to Tim Horton's to read my book. I smoked some weed and it helped me have a profound change of outlook towards the whole rest of my day.
Congrats, dude. It's the little things.  
Definitely! Thank you so much! I try to do little things, but this depression has had me down for a good while (several months) and I'm trying so hard to pull myself out of it. 
thats a huge step :)! great job!
Thank you! I really feel like it is. I have to do the dishes...piles and piles, but I am very slowly working my way towards that since I won't be getting any help with it. 
Way to go!! I'm so proud of you! :)
Thank you! :) I'm proud of myself too! It has been a hard battle but I am an egg-making warrior! :D
continue on your path! everyday it will get better if you want it to be!
Yes, while I agree with you, I do know that some days, it doesn't matter whether or not I *want* to be happy, I can get depressed beyond reason and just sleep days away, which really shooting sucks. This is also somewhat implying that I want to regularly suffer from depression, which I don't. I understand the positivity of the message you sent, but it can be read another way, and I'm just letting you know. :)
We intend our 'tough love of any description' rule to cover this, so if you see 'it could be worse' responses here, please click report and we'll deal.  
Cheers. It was a PM though (don't know if that counts) & the response I've gotten here has made me feel very forgiving as this is quite lovely. This community is brilliant sometimes, no?
Cheers. It was a PM though (don't know if that counts) & the response I've gotten here has made me feel very forgiving as this is quite lovely. This community is brilliant sometimes, no?
> This community is brilliant sometimes, no?  Often, in my experience :-)  > It was a PM though (don't know if that counts)  We don't have any control over PMs, and sometimes people who are convinced they know better than we do use PMs to circumvent our moderation policies.  
Another one that needs to stop is telling people there's nothing wrong with them, or that they have no reason to feel sad. Depression is more than being sad. It can be lack of motivation, endless thoughts about dying, self-hatred, any combination of negative emotions. I hate how people try to oversimplify something as complex as the human mind. Newsflash: it's a mess. 
My depression was the endless thoughts about dying and also feeling exhausted. I used to sleep all day and people thought I was being lazy. I don't think I ever actually felt sad.   I know what sad feels like and depression did not make me feel it. The only word I could use would be helpless.
Move to another country permanently. Quite a few that went to school with me in the mid '90s left the U.S. permanently and left their student loans behind.  
I want to move to Canada SOOOO bad. Have wanted to for over a decade now. 
Yeah, I personally think that benzos are like a crutch, and they're addictive. It's definitely not what I would recommend for OP, especially not in the long term.   I'm just saying that OP believes he can't get some sort of mental health help because he was screened and because he's afraid of disciplinary action, but he definitely can. Lawyers see shrinks just like the rest of us. 
He needs more like a gallon of Xanax
I hated my first job post college, then i went to uni for a second time and graduated and job prospects are pretty bad because my country is bankrupt. So, you may have debts because u are American but you can also make money because you are American. Much better than having debt and not being able to make money, as in much of the world.
well atleast you have nice food in Greece. If that counts for something.
Oh, sounds really tough! Aren't there any other professions available than being an attorney? I'm neither American nor a lawyer of any kind, so this is not a rhetorical question or the like. I just think it sounds like a stupid educational system if you need to pay that much for your education and then you're stuck to one profession.    How long would it take for you to get rid of your loans, if you keep working the way you do now?
This is not a joke, but... 25 years to pay off my loans. 
i imagine going to law school is pretty limiting in decent paying jobs that aren't that.
I was one of the lucky few that got a job.  There are alot more like me but with no job.
I was one of the lucky few that got a job.  There are alot more like me but with no job.
thats the job market for ya :/
I'm sure there's some way of coasting and using your qualifications to get a relatively easy, well paid job. Like if you're a Doctor, just be a GP.
There totally are. Go learn about health care law and  corporate law then work as an in house lawyer for a hospital or hospice.  Source: I know a few at different health care agencies.  They admit that most of their job is just telling other people not to be ass hats and follow the law they already know. 
Same  I'm hopeless, even without the depression
I extend my comment to you as well my friend. I don't think you're hopeless - peace can be difficult to find, but it can always be found, someway. 
I extend my comment to you as well my friend. I don't think you're hopeless - peace can be difficult to find, but it can always be found, someway. 
I don't believe so, I'm just too awkward and uncomfortable, I don't know how to not look down on myself  I've been like this for too long, my chance to fix this was 20 years ago
I don't believe so, I'm just too awkward and uncomfortable, I don't know how to not look down on myself  I've been like this for too long, my chance to fix this was 20 years ago
Maybe I'm not as old as you are, but I was stuck in a rut myself of character flaws and tragedies that I thought I could never get out of. I never would have been able to predict I could become what I am now, really it's amazing how little of the future we know. Your chance to fix things is in every moment you are breathing. Fulfillment and redemption never escape our reach.
on Sunday, a girl told me to go to dinner together today, she didn't spoke to me so i wanted to eat pizza alone in my room but i finished playing league of legends and having dinner with my mother... Not bad at all, right?
Can't go wrong with pizza and League
I would play League, but my depression has suppressed the euphoria from playing it.  Edit: I'm feeling a little better and might play a few games before I had to bed. 
Try stardew valley. I played a lotta leauge but stardew just calms me down when I feel kinda naff
The chad batmen have friends and social lives but we have memes and live in a society. Gamers rise up.  But nah, you feel lonely right? I usually just focus on the pain and shut everything else out, don't try to ignore it. Eat some junk food, watch a movie you loved from your child hood, and if you want to talk about anything I'll be here all night too.
Chad is the worst, am I right?
It sucks. A bunch of people I know went downtown to see the whiteout, but I didn't go because my ex was with them and I don't want to see the person that broke me. It would have been a good time, but I'm used to those no longer being there.
I feel you. It sucks knowing she's perfectly happy and she doesn't care that I still haven't left my room since Friday morning
Hey, some of us have to work Saturday!  In all seriousness... friends cost money, you just saved 30 dollars at the bar! 
at this point I'd spend thousands if it could change me
And they make it so you can either participate or die. Dang people
Or, if you don't participate and act out in a subjective strange manner, you're subject to being kidnapped and forced to talk to some overseer to determine your hotel stay.
Or, if you don't participate and act out in a subjective strange manner, you're subject to being kidnapped and forced to talk to some overseer to determine your hotel stay.
I hate crisis centers too
I hate crisis centers too
Crisis center? I was referring to 3 hots and a cot.
And they make it so you can either participate or die. Dang people
I don't forget that they shame those that choose the latter option.
i agree, shoot existence
reality continues to ruin my life
reality continues to ruin my life
And life ruins and alters my reality.
I know, society is shameful, and there's no way to fix it. Anyone with a niche hobby, interest, or career is scolded and laughed at by everyone. Creativity is frowned upon in schools and most jobs. This world is horrible.
I do wish creativity was more valued and respected. Things that are produced by creative means touch so many people and my own processes of creativity are a huge part of my life.
I do wish creativity was more valued and respected. Things that are produced by creative means touch so many people and my own processes of creativity are a huge part of my life.
Its apart of the population control mechanism.  By creating a taboo type vibe around anything creative, they have successfully dumbed society down to not even use one half of their brain. The side of their brain which bares arguably the most importance.  Its actually scary how wide spread this is now.  If everyone was creative, they wouldnt find fulfilment in mindless entertainment and useless material desires.   Its one of the most effective mechanisms used on society. But in the end its only destructive... 
Nihilism is a very freeing concept/belief to get into. I hope you don't kill yourself anytime soon. Not because society says it's bad or whatever. Dang society. You do you and enjoy your existence while you have it. Enjoy it on your own terms. 
My philosophy is absurdism, a kind of nihilism. Yes, the world has countless flaws. Just relax and enjoy the shitshow.
My philosophy is absurdism, a kind of nihilism. Yes, the world has countless flaws. Just relax and enjoy the shitshow.
Sucks that you're getting downvoted but yes absurdism helps in making the shittiness of life more tolerable
Yar dude i'll enjoy been shooted the ass with a spiked bat? I'll enjoy squabbling in the dust for scraps?  The shoot are you talking about. 
Who is shooting your ass with a spiked bat? 
That's not what nihilism is.
I know that. I wasn't defining nihilism, just making a statement
I came too a Decision in my mid 20s, after feeling like you since age 8 or 9. I decided to participate in the world on my own terms. Smoke as much cannabis as I want. I agree with all your sentiments, except I plan to race to the top. Hope things improve.
Drug reliance would be nice, but it brain locks me and is more debilitating to function than without it.   Best to you.
I love and enjoy illegal shit which Nixon decided to ban in the 70s because some parents were scared. But no, can't have a career in that without someone knocking with a steel fist.
Nixon banned it to arrest 'hippies and the blacks' as he put it. He just scared Suburbia to justify it.
Lol! It'd honestly make things more interesting, which I'd be down for.
I am ready to trade lead and brass as the new currency. 
The planet doesn't suck. It's actually quite a beautiful place. It's people and society that screw it all up. Ever see 'The last man on earth'? I want to live in that world.
The galaxy and atom collection is spectacular. The atoms that became hairless amino acids is a whole other story.
I love that show and that's one of my ultimate fantasies-living in a world where a huge percentage of people are gone. 
Me, too, on both. I'd thrive in that world. Do anything you want any time you want, not being held accountable to anyone. First episode, anyway. 
Want to feel better? Start by getting clean and sober. 
Enlightening.
Enlightening.
It isn't rocket science, but it does work. Obviously there's a bit more to it than that but it's where you start. Worked for me and countless other people who got tired of living and feeling that way.
It isn't rocket science, but it does work. Obviously there's a bit more to it than that but it's where you start. Worked for me and countless other people who got tired of living and feeling that way.
So by stopping use, all problems magically stop?  
>Where's the free land for people to settle down without disruption or the requirement of paper.  Have you ever *tried* farming?  It's probably the most miserable, thankless occupation there is.
There are many people who produce goods and services who arent thanked. What's your point, if you have one. 
Same here. Do you have a lot of free time? Only thing that helps is weed, but it costs too much here, and I don't drink.
Yep lots of free time and lots of weed I dont really drink that much either weed is a struggle to get sometimes where I live tho
Yep lots of free time and lots of weed I dont really drink that much either weed is a struggle to get sometimes where I live tho
Not so difficult to get here, but not working means little money, which I spend on that to self medicate. It litterly makes me function. It's not like I have it and do shoot all. I have it and suddenly I'm able to move again (physical problems) and concentrate (mental problems).
Legit me. I go to school then don't have the energy to do much of anything when I get home. My weekends consist of sleeping, eating, and entertainment. I sleep as a hobby because nothing amuses me and it's better than the feeling of my brain constantly burning with a combination of insomnia, depression, and anxiety.
This is literally me too.  My day: *wake up for school depressed af* -does school -comes home *tired af* -goes to sleep *wakes up at night to eat and play video games* 
This is literally me too.  My day: *wake up for school depressed af* -does school -comes home *tired af* -goes to sleep *wakes up at night to eat and play video games* 
Same. The mornings on school days are the worst. I just want to hide under my blankets and sleep. These days though, I've been sleeping too much I forget to eat since it's my summer break.
Disagreed. Short term this is a fine solution but I've woken up hungover far too many times which just ruined my day thereafter. Short term alcohol is nice, but long term wrecks you. I don't have the answer myself, still working through it but i KNOW alcohol will long term not help.
Don't get hangovers from weed. 
Go to church. Doesn't matter if you don't believe in god, just go to be around people.
i wish there was a church that wasn't tied to a religion. maybe more of a positive space since i like the idea of church - people praying & sending positive energy out - but i could do without the expectations, sinners, talk about hell, etc. 
I braced myself for a post with a completely different  message.  Congratulations! It feels so good to hear about people overcoming their illness, whatever it may be!
We need a 'success' tag or something so people can see the number of posts like this. This is not the first one I've come across.
We need a 'success' tag or something so people can see the number of posts like this. This is not the first one I've come across.
I will second this wholeheartedly. When I wrote the title, it was with happiness. I thought to myself 'it's not goodbye forever, or 'today I will kill myself''. However, it was still trouble for readers and for that I truly apologize. 
I hope to be where you are one day. Godspeed.
I hope you are too.  And hope is what kept me going this past year :)
I'm so relieved this isn't a suicide post. I'm very happy for you OP! Well done! 
I'm very relieved too!  I've been there a few times and it is a very dark chasm.  Thank you so much :)
I am SO GLAD this post didn't turn out the way I thought it would. And so glad to hear your life has turned around. If you do ever relapse, know that we're still here waiting to help. :)
You and me both. It was worrying there for a moment, especially with all the comments.  A real betterthanexpected.jpg moment here. I hope he sticks around to share and talk still, no amount of support or positivity is unneeded I think. 
Thank god!  I was worried.  Now: I never want to see you back here again!
I'm going to put my official hat on and disagree with you.  I think it would be great if /u/mikachuu came back to visit and used their experience to offer support to others.  
I've done that but shooted my sleep schedule up, which made the depression worse.
Either I stay up and go to sleep from 4-7, or I sleep from 12-2 then stay up the rest of the night. My sleep schedule is ruined and there in no way for me to fix it. I procrastinate all through the day, tell myself I'll do it at night, then in the morning, then never.
Doing it right now...
How's it going fellow sleep deprived friend?
How's it going fellow sleep deprived friend?
I'm doing this too. Up since yesterday... 
I'm doing this too. Up since yesterday... 
Do you mind if we talk? I have screwed up sleep..
No, I prefer to sleep because I don't have to be awake with my thoughts. 
I wish sleeping felt longer than it does. Whether I get 4 or 8 hours, I don't notice a difference because I'm asleep (obviously I feel better though when I sleep longer). Staying up is a way to postpone the next day.
You're not doing yourself any favours by not getting enough sleep. Sleep is super important, and goes a long way in helping you feel better.
The initial sleep deprivation can help. Staying up 20+ hours removes my anxiety and depression to a degree. However it's not sustainable in the long run.
The initial sleep deprivation can help. Staying up 20+ hours removes my anxiety and depression to a degree. However it's not sustainable in the long run.
They actually did a study where depressed patients stayed up all night and the next day they didn't exhibit any depressive symptoms. When they woke up the next morning, however, the were depressed as ever.
They actually did a study where depressed patients stayed up all night and the next day they didn't exhibit any depressive symptoms. When they woke up the next morning, however, the were depressed as ever.
Sleep depression reduces activity in the dorsal nexus in depressed patients acting as an antidepressant, if I remember correctly.
I know exactly how you feel, Mate.
For me, its more like:  MMMEEEEEHHHHHHHHH!
As I lack the motivation to ahh properly, I shall nod in agreement.
I'll give a thumbs up from my bed. Now, let me continue sleeping..
AAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHH
AAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHH
AAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHH
AAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHH
AAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHH
AAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHH!!!!
ughhhhhhhhhhhh
Uuuugggggggggghhhhhhhhh. 
It isn't just on Reddit. A medical professional recently threatened to discharge me from their service because I wasn't 'engaging' and making any progress. I was like... 'So let me get this straight; the 'help' you are giving me isn't working, so you're going to help me less?'     Bravo the NHS :/
'I'm sorry, but I didn't think it was going to be this hard to help you. Bye'  Edit: 'Oh, and you can give my secretary the check. Thanks'
'I'm sorry, but I didn't think it was going to be this hard to help you. Bye'  Edit: 'Oh, and you can give my secretary the check. Thanks'
^ everyone on 7 Cups of Tea
I'd end that relationship with a kind reminder 'you're pretty shit at your job by the way. Go tell your own counsellor that.'
I'd love to be able to do something like that but I don't have the confidence - any kind of conflict sends me to pieces. A formally worded email request to be assigned to someone different was as much as I could manage.
I will say that for some reason on places like tumblr, young people are genuinely pretending to have mental illnesses for attention, in some sort of weird fad thing. I'm talking serious mental illness and these people think it makes you cool or it is somehow desirable to have a terrible diagnosis.   Unfortunately it is certainly not helping people who have serious issues who just are trying to reach out to anyone who might give them a sliver of help. 
How do you know who is faking it? Are you sure? 
Wow! Dumbest thing I have read in a while. 
Almost as bad as being told I was bipolar b/c I wasn't praying hard enough. 
Unfortunately the 'toxic depressed people' scenario is a problem in real life too. Those who haven't felt depression just assume we are a negative group of people that bring everybody down with our self pity. I don't like to get angry at them or hold it against them, they're lucky and just don't understand.   
Yeah, I suppose I shouldn't hold it against them simply because they can't understand. But it's hard not to get angry when I see the hypocrisy between 'depression is a real illness and we need to take it seriously' and 'stop having a pity party and do something about it already'. Like I said, it seems like most people will only empathize with depressed people who still have some hope and optimism in them.  
Yeah, I suppose I shouldn't hold it against them simply because they can't understand. But it's hard not to get angry when I see the hypocrisy between 'depression is a real illness and we need to take it seriously' and 'stop having a pity party and do something about it already'. Like I said, it seems like most people will only empathize with depressed people who still have some hope and optimism in them.  
Oh yes angry is the totally logical emotional response, not trashing you at all it took me being an idiot to a lot of happy people to realize I'm probably better off letting them be ignorant. Also, you are totally right. People only empathize with the happiest and least defeated of the depressed people, which is unfortunately the group that needs it the least. 
Oh yes angry is the totally logical emotional response, not trashing you at all it took me being an idiot to a lot of happy people to realize I'm probably better off letting them be ignorant. Also, you are totally right. People only empathize with the happiest and least defeated of the depressed people, which is unfortunately the group that needs it the least. 
Haha sorry if it sounded like I was offended. I agree that it would be best to just ignore them. I should definitely work on that skill.
They don't understand that everyone experiences depression differently. They just don't understand, my friend.
Ugh. I know. And I know I shouldn't even take what they were saying seriously because you're right, they don't understand. But I just got so frustrated looking at the thread that OP linked to I guess I just had to vent. But shh...don't tell anyone. They don't like when we do that lol.
Who would've thought depressed people aren't happy?
I would guess that it's self-explanatory. But apparently not...
Not surprising, when I saw the thread title I knew this subreddit would be mentioned. Maybe they are right, maybe it is because society wants the depressed to go away. 
They absolutely do. We bring everyone down. Just pretend everything is fine and never bring it up
Can't argue with you there.
Ehh, I've given up on people. Don't expect any positives from people and you will not end up disappointed. Of course people don't expect anything out of me for the same reason. 
Ehh, I've given up on people. Don't expect any positives from people and you will not end up disappointed. Of course people don't expect anything out of me for the same reason. 
See, other people would call you cynical for saying something look that, but my experience tells me the same thing. Though I'll be honest and say that even if I do expect the worst from people, I'm still always disappointed in the end. 
Here we have a place to speak the things we dare not speak out loud. Just communicating our dusty old thoughts is insightful and often times it turns out to be  the release that we need in a moment of disparity and weakness.
Yes! You phrased that well. Sometimes it's therapeutic to be able to say everything on your mind without being judged for it, which is why tons of people are hesitant to opening up to people in real life. After all, a large part of a therapist's job is being able to listen well.
'See, I have no problem with depressed people... Unless they're, like.. really depressed. In which case, shoot them and I hope they die.'  Yes, I see what you mean. Very eloquently put, too.
>See, I have no problem with depressed people  I think that's giving him too much credit. In his post, every slight form of acknowledgement of depression directly precedes the word 'but'. Kind of telling, don't you think?
And this from someone who has suffered from some variety of depression and anxiety for most my life.  *So maybe they have a point?*
So let's have it your way, then. What strategies of getting better do you propose that everyone here hasn't already heard? Because I doubt this sub would be any better if every post was met with [Advice like yours ](http://www.reddit.com/r/depression/comments/1byws2/today_i_realised_i_hate_therapists_i_really/c9blnz4?context=3)  So of course you agree with them. The only difference between you and the people I linked to is that you also have a superiority complex because you 'made it' and we didn't. At least they have their ignorance as an excuse. 
Really sucks how one thing can throw your mind down a black hole
It's like tripping down stairs.
It's like tripping down stairs.
Ivefallenandicantgetup.jpg
Yes.  For me it can be something as mundane as seeing flowers in a store...simply knowing that I don’t have anyone to buy flowers for anymore...and I’m off crying for two days.    All the while, my closest “friend” tells me to “suck it up and put on your big boy pants.”  Oh yeah, great advice.  Why didn’t I think of that.    You sum it up very well with “Dang, man. Dang.” 
Omfg I feel you so hard. I get this when I see any of my friends even remotely finding success in the love lives. I'm just like, 'shoot I'm alone and I'll always be that way.'
Flowers really ? You must be going through hell then if just by seeing flowers in a store sends cripples you for days. 
It’s weird little stuff.  I can’t really predict what it will be.  It’s like walking along and suddenly getting punched in the chest. 
It’s weird little stuff.  I can’t really predict what it will be.  It’s like walking along and suddenly getting punched in the chest. 
Its the memories man. I don't wish this upon anyone. 
Yes. I've cried for hours numerous times because of a seemingly harmless comment someone would make to me. 
I'm sorry that happened to you and you felt that way.   I feel so bad when stuff like this happens. I just feel like giving out hugs to prevent someone from feeling bad.   In the same boat with depression. I really wish you the best
I'm sorry that happened to you and you felt that way.   I feel so bad when stuff like this happens. I just feel like giving out hugs to prevent someone from feeling bad.   In the same boat with depression. I really wish you the best
I've been doing a little better lately with my depression and I gotta say, people like you are the reason why. Your comment made my day loads better. So thank you and likewise. I wish you only the best. You deserve it, and you have a kind heart. 
Due to your typo I read the first sentence in a pirate voice. 
Lol I still can't figure out what it says
Never heard that metaphor. I like it, think I'll use it from now on.
I'm pretty sure my elevator has been stuck for years
I'm pretty sure my elevator has been stuck for years
Same here. Kind of waiting for someone to get me out, but I don't think anyone can hear me.
It's also just a silly phrase in general.  If you had a temporary problem with your roof leaking that'll end as soon as the rain stops, you'd still look for a permanent solution, right? That way it won't happen again?
It's a 50% recurrence rate for depression. Higher if it's already happened more than once, and each time tends to be worse. I wish people would stop trying to deny that depression is a very real, very resilient, problem.  I manage to live because knowing these facts lets me navigate my future. Discontinuing treatment, bc it was temporary and solved, is one major predictor for a relapse.
Not really, you can still change your roof back or into anything else if you want to for some reason, permanent means it is the end, there is nothing else no other possibilities.You can still do whatever tf you want with your roof but maybe I am getting too literal.
i think you're being too literal. it's still an appropriate analogy
The real question is most people's definition of the word temporary. I'd like to think that not anyone thinks temporary is 20 years or so. They are severely shooting mistaken. I can understand maybe a year or two being temporary, but certainly not any longer than that. 
temporary => not ubiquitous in regards to time  20 years of A out of 21 years means A was temporary  (I'm just a fan of words)
To add to your statement, and I still say it, meds are also temporary solutions to the permanent problem that is our depression. Meds are just a facetious veil over ourselves​.
Not to mention the shooting horrible side effects of most of them. I was on medication almost 10 years ago now and I remember how awful of an experience it was. 
Not to mention the shooting horrible side effects of most of them. I was on medication almost 10 years ago now and I remember how awful of an experience it was. 
I've never been on them because of hearing of experiences like that.  I wouldn't want to even feel like that. I'd probably forget to breathe while under the effects of that shit.
I've never been on them because of hearing of experiences like that.  I wouldn't want to even feel like that. I'd probably forget to breathe while under the effects of that shit.
I've only ever taken one medication which helped me without doing anything overly horrible to me, and even that med stops working if I take it every day  Serotonin stuff did nothing except mild nausea, norepinephrine stuff gave me severe insomnia, 'mood stabilisers' (aka antipsychotics) had me in bed 80% of the day and struggling with akathisia the other 20%...
I've always despised this statement. Doesn't everyone WANT a permanent solution to a temporary problem? The permanent solution is what MAKES it temporary. 
Holy shit. What did you just do to my way of thinking.
Yeah I'm never not gonna be trans. My body is always gonna be disgusting to me. It's as permanent as suicide would be, and at least with suicide it would limit the number of days I would have feeling like a shooting monster. Screw this shit.
is transitioning an option? 
is transitioning an option? 
What the other person said... I have transitioned. Still waiting for surgery, which is agonizing. Even after that, my body will still be pretty shooted up from having gone through the wrong puberty. I look at other women and I just want to cry.
Very true but I am forcing myself to believe it is temporary anyway, I have to
I have been waiting since I was 16, I'm 33 now, tired of waiting.
I have been waiting since I was 16, I'm 33 now, tired of waiting.
Since I was 15 and I'm 26 now, 60+ more years with this seems unimaginably hard.
Statistically it is very likey to be temporary.
And also likely to come back as I have experienced myself, but like I said I have to force myself to hope it will stay gone.
I guess I won the shit lottery. 21+yrs and counting. 
18 here....
Weird description, because that sounds really great.   'Something bugging you from time to time? Get rid of it forever. '
That's why drugs are so compelling for the chronically depressed. It's more like: 'Something bugging you all the time? Get rid of it sometimes.'
Also not my problem. 
This.  If I'm dead, I don't give a flying shoot anymore.  Plus, if my loved ones knew the amount of gut-wrenching, soul-crushing, heartsick contempt and sorrow I hold inside of me, I'd hope they'd treat me like a cancer patient and end my suffering. 
Im surprised more people dont try ECT. It worked for my sister. Her problem was temporary and yes she tried suicide. She now lives a fruitful.life. This statement rings true for her situation.
Maybe because when it fails it can be catastrophic and ensure you will never really recover
What is ECT?
Shock treatments
When I was 16 I was so deep in this shit I couldn't even seek help, not even by posting something on the internet. You might think that what you're doing isn't much, but keep doing it. Don't think about finding an excuse, just post anytime you feel like. I hope someone here says something that will make you feel better because I suck at this.
Well good job for trying.. It's all any of is can do, aye?
If it means anything, I'm a fellow depressed 16 year old. So, you're not alone on here.
Thanks. 
Ugh I remember being 16 and having severe depression. It's the worst combination of hormones and already delicate self esteem, plus high school bullshit, and depression when you're so young can be very isolating because no one understands. I've had panic attacks and depression, as well as other diagnoses, since 5 years old, just wasn't diagnosed with anything till 16. Message me if you want an ear to listen.  Edit: I also tried to kill my self at 16. It's the worst feeling. 
Okay. Thanks. 
Okay. Thanks. 
I mean it too 
I mean it too 
Please could you message me instead? I know it's weird, but.. Yeah.. 
28 and the roller coaster is going up. My job isn't as stressful as it used to be, although I am bummed that with my new schedule I'm not getting as many hours as I was before. Sleeping in a little longer is nice, though.
> the roller coaster  So freaking accurate. One day you find yourself having the worst day ever, arguing with everyone, the next minute everything's suspiciously fine.
Hi! I read your title and clicked your post. I have a question: are the numbers in your username just random? Or do they have any meaning?
They have meaning. I'm the 273326th student to attend my school district. 
They have meaning. I'm the 273326th student to attend my school district. 
Oh I see! Thanks for telling me. How was your day?
Oh I see! Thanks for telling me. How was your day?
It may come as a surprise seeing as I'm making a post on a subreddit for sad people, but yes, I'm actually doing TERRIBLE today. How was yours? :)
19 . no friends , no skills , severe anxiety, didnt go to school this semester , no purpose in life at all, i dont know what im doing . 
I feel you.
No.. But my mother is upstairs and I'm thinking of telling her I'm not safe with myself right now. 
If you think she would be there for you, I think it is a good idea
i'm 18 years old and depressed, but mostly lonely. most people don't bother sticking around me, but hey, maybe we could be friends or something. misery loves company or something like that.
I like that song. 
its my 17th birthday today and pretty much all of my friends forgot and my mom is passed out drunk on the sofa, so my days going great. Hope you're doing okay, i know how you feel.
Happy Birthday~. I wish I could come over and celebrate with you. I know how much it sucks everyone forgetting your birthday.
Hey! Thank you. I'm seeking help because of anxiety and I'm getting anxious over the appointment haha. :) I know I will feel better once I'm there and I'm also lucky enough to have my fiancé follow me there. :)
No worries, it's awesome that your fiance will be there to support you as well =) Congrats on the engagement and best wishes to you both!
That was actually a really catchy title.  Have you ever thought about becoming a writter?  Maybe just doing a few short stories in your free time at least?  I think your be good at it.
Yes. Look through my post history. I say stuff there 
Hey Darlin, You are loved. I don't know you, but I love you. 
Well, thank you. :)
I'll be honest, I'm bad at talking and giving advice so I send you hugs and a cookie. I'm sorry things aren't great, no one deserves to go through that. I believe things will get better and I believe you're strong enough to kick depression's ass. Don't be afraid to ask for help. I believe in you *hugs* 
I like hugs and cookies. 
Hey, how are you doing? 
Terribly 
Terribly 
What's up? Anything I can do to help ya out? 
What's up? Anything I can do to help ya out? 
I made the same mistake I always do 
Am 16, am depressed, suck at life. How you doing 
Still pretty shitty but last night was eventful 
I'm 15 and also depressed. I'm doing better than yesterday but I'm still miles below where I need to be in order to function properly. That's what scares me, that no matter how hard I try, it will never be good enough and I will never be saved.  
And maybe you won't. But you've made it this far. Whatever happens, be proud of that. You have done so much already just by breathing.. Maybe read my post 'these scars are not medals' just stalk my account 
I'm here for you!
Oh hi Anna. I think. I hope. If not that's really awkward then 
i'm feeling good af rite now
I don't know why you're being downvoted for this! :(
I don't know why you're being downvoted for this! :(
likewise my dude. what's wrong with feeling good when you're usually depressed? 
likewise my dude. what's wrong with feeling good when you're usually depressed? 
I think it's because people are upset you're doing it on my post, when usually people are supposed to comment for OPs benefit.   I don't mind though, I'm glad you're doing good. 
Exactly, or I can kill myself and not have to deal with it. I can't deal with THIS, so if it gets worse, then I might as well quit while I'm ahead, eh? 
I tried to kill myself when I was 17. I'm glad I didn't really give it a full effort because a few months later I found a fantastic girl and started college and had the time of my life.  Things get better. Give life a chance to turn itself around. It helps if you pretend to have healthy self esteem/confidence until you actually have it.
I tried to kill myself when I was 17. I'm glad I didn't really give it a full effort because a few months later I found a fantastic girl and started college and had the time of my life.  Things get better. Give life a chance to turn itself around. It helps if you pretend to have healthy self esteem/confidence until you actually have it.
I tried three days ago.. 
Wow. You just put my feelings into words.
I'm sorry :/
I'm sorry :/
Don't be
Look at the bright side, maybe in a few years you'll say the same thing for you now. 
Still looking for the bright side haha.  Thank you for making me laugh
Maybe in a few years I'll have the courage to end it. Still haven't come up with a solid plan that can't be intervened. 
Life's gonna end anyway, might as well spend the time finding things you enjoy in the meantime, rather than ending things sooner and missing out. That's my philosophy anyway.  Finding things one enjoys whilst depressed is the difficult part.
A psychotherapist asked me when the last time I was happy, and I thought it was last summer but I realised I wasn't happy just less depressed. 
Yes! I had a similar experience not long ago with my counselor. She actually made me repeat myself and then pointed out I wasn't 'happy' in that moment, I was just happier than I had been prior to that moment. It's like an escalator. I'm never grounded on the floor level, but every floor down is still better than being at the top floor of anxiety and depression. 
Wait what? I don't get it
You know how you thought you were fat when you were 5kg overweight? Then now that you are 30kg overweight you'd do anything to be only 5kg overweight again.  Do you get it now?
You know how you thought you were fat when you were 5kg overweight? Then now that you are 30kg overweight you'd do anything to be only 5kg overweight again.  Do you get it now?
Ohhhhh man.. yes :((
I'm sure there are many more people who would miss you, too.
You are worth so much more then you believe 
Or the whole place just goes out of business.
Nah, some people like the job. Good for them. Just let me go home. 
Not a job I signed up for -.-
But we won the race... 😬
But we won the race... 😬
We didn't. Others had to break down the egg or something like that. We were just lucky enough...or unlucky enough to make it in
i dont get why life hasnt fired me. i clearly cant do this job right.
you can always resign
The worst thing I hate hearing is 'stop being a negative thinker'
'Be yourself!'  'Quit being so negative.'  pick one
'Be yourself!'  'Quit being so negative.'  pick one
Be yourself. Yeah OK, which one? 
Is renting a room at someone's house a possibility? 
Eh, I've thought about it, but honestly I'm only home for maybe 2-3 weeks out of the year, so while it sucks, at least I don't have to put up with it very often. Don't get me wrong, I love my family and I don't mind helping out, but I'd come home a lot more if I had some real freedom. Even tried going back to the military so I could have some stability and a paycheck without all the traveling, but sadly they won't take me back.
It's worse because least a job I can quit and find a new one, but I only have this life.
The benefits suck and it's every hour of every day. The closest thing I can find to a vacation is a fifth of gin. 
I very often hope a bomb crash on my house.
I was on a flight just two days ago, and halfway through there were some turbulences and the seatbelt signs lit back up; nothing unusual. But I started smiling like a madman because, as ridiculous and unlikely as I know it is [especially given that I'm a frequent traveler], the thought that the plane could at any point be on its way down (and I don't mean landing) and that it'll all be over crossed my mind.
do what i do just slack off and itll be better
I've not found that to be the case.  Though that's not to say that working hard is any better.
Jesus. Your mom is a real piece of work. I'm sorry she said that to you.
Got news for ya OP. Your mom has mental illness. It’s quite obvious by reading her response to you getting accepted to College. You need to separate yourself from that negativity and do what’s best for you. 
I'm sorry that woman is your mom OP. I'm also sorry she is a mom, period. 
If you look around these days, it's usually the idiots, the ones you thought would never have anyone ever because they are so ugly inside, who are the ones blasting out kids like a machine gun. It's the people like us that actually care about people and have empathy that won't be parents.  New for 2018:  ''empathic' guys finish last'  
God that's awful. My dad is one of those people that doesn't believe in depression or mental illness, but has the good sense not to talk to me about it. 
i shooting dont get people like this. i mean you never hear of someone not believing in cancer just because there not actively dying from it... what dont people get. emotional pain can be just as real as physical pain
i shooting dont get people like this. i mean you never hear of someone not believing in cancer just because there not actively dying from it... what dont people get. emotional pain can be just as real as physical pain
In fact, emotional pain *is* physical pain very often.
This is exactly why my parents will never ever know about my mental shit
I'm pretty sure my father would say something along those lines.
I believe both OP and you would find /r/raisedbynarcissists to be helpful and relatable 
Damn, there really is a sub for everything. I’ve come to terms with it a long time ago, and even laugh at it sometimes. But I’m still going to check it out.
That’s pretty much what I’ve done. We don’t talk much anymore. But I see them once in awhile for the sake of my sisters and giving them the family gatherings they want/deserve. It’s honestly funny to watch them get drunk and look like idiots trying to belittle people. It makes you realize how small they are as people, now that I’m older.
Yeah but at the same time it's really depressing. I can't help but feel second hand shame around them, like thinking how awful I would feel the next day if I got wasted and made a scene at christmas dinner. 
Are all depressed people physicists or are all physicist depressed?? My major is physics also and you're not the first I've found here. Lol. And AWESOME this is the first step to something awesome. 
  >Are all depressed people physicists  No, some of us are software developers
  >Are all depressed people physicists  No, some of us are software developers
I'm trying to be a software developer too. Well once I find another college.
[deleted]    ^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^0.9494   > [What is this?](https://pastebin.com/64GuVi2F/39197)
Start with C++, it'll help get you ready to learn. Start with codeschool.com then go to codecademy.com once you know what you're doing and practice. 
I actually want to major in astrophysics, haha. Thanks! I'm finally getting back to where I was.
:0 I want to major in astrophysics too! I think it stems from my depression though, because I don't believe in a religion. And astrophysics always helps me explain why.
Some of us are engineers 🙃
Sooooooo only STEM careers?
Sooooooo only STEM careers?
Go you! My focus on science did help my mental health a bit :) I major physics and chemistry 
Those are some beautiful notes! Even at my best, mine are insanely messy but I can tell you put real effort into this. Keep at it a little at a time, even if it's just for you.
Thank you! Making my notes look nice actually helps me focus for some reason.
Thank you! Making my notes look nice actually helps me focus for some reason.
I've had concentration problems for a while as well, and I eventually discovered that rewriting notes helps me concentrate and remember stuff so much better. I don't know if I'm just a more kinesthetic learner or what, but a session of rewriting notes compared to just reading feels so much more productive. It's also nice because you can organize it in a way that's more conducive to you as opposed to how your teacher presents it. 
Your notes are beautiful!
Thank you! 
If you drop out of high school, what options do you have to continue education? Is GED the only option or can you actually.go back to school?
I'm just 'homeschooling'. I'll take the SATs and such, and I'll have to take tests to prove what I learned. I'm also taking courses at my local community college.
Keep it up OP! Even when you feel absolutely horrible, dive into it for 10-15 min and see how you feel after :) good stuff!
Good idea, small wins like this really help my mood. Thank you!
Thank you! And I hope so too, I had to take my last AP test before I was able to see a therapist or get a prescription.
Honestly the best thing you could have done is getting the help you need! Your well being is more important then a grade on a paper... So kudos to you!  But I'm still glad to hear you been doing well!   Best wishes to you! 
I've been taking Prozac for about 5 months and Abilify for one, I stopped one week ago and since then I have been able to concentrate better. I'm not 100% yet, but I'm making progress. Finding interesting projects helps me as well, I recently started making a conlang, or constructed language. 
oh, medication can definitely help. Yeah .. maybe I should .. I'm 41 so I kinda feel like I made it this far without it :P  psychs are expensive in the US. :-/
oh, medication can definitely help. Yeah .. maybe I should .. I'm 41 so I kinda feel like I made it this far without it :P  psychs are expensive in the US. :-/
It really helped me in the beginning, I went from suicidal to neutral on Prozac, then actually happy on Abilify. I have psychotic depression, so I mainly got on the Abilify for its use as an anti-psychotic.
Yeah, and then I do it anyway and end up regretting it, which is even worse.
I don't think I've ever felt relieved after truly admitting to how I'm doing. 
I don't think I've ever felt relieved after truly admitting to how I'm doing. 
Yeah, it's useless, because most of the time people don't understand and you can't blame them, and even if they do they most likely can't even help you in any way which is kinda sad, I guess for some people it's a relief that someone knows about their struggles.
Yeah, it's useless, because most of the time people don't understand and you can't blame them, and even if they do they most likely can't even help you in any way which is kinda sad, I guess for some people it's a relief that someone knows about their struggles.
Sometimes regardless of whether they were sympathetic or not, I always have this lingering feeling that they're judging me, think I'm making a huge issue out of nothing and ultimately assume I'm not trying hard enough.
Why regret it? I am willing to help you.
What? I don't know, I guess I feel exposed and vulnerable so people just start judging me.
I don't talk to anyone about it because I don't feel like anyone gives a shoot. And even if they did, what could they do?
My thoughts exactly. I feel like they will brush it off and honestly there's not much they can do about it. Feels useless.
It's natural to be willing to wear a mask so as to feel some human compassion but i don't think that it really helps in the end cause you are not expressing your real feelings and therefore you aren't really communicating.
True. I'm scared that people will leave the depressed guy that is me tho. But in the end, if they leave me, they aren't worth it anyway and it's just a relationship based on a facade. Man, it's difficult. 
Have you considered calling a hotline or seeing a therapist? Having that plan behind me in the past when reaching out has always helped a bit when things didn't work out.
I saw a therapist and psychiatrist, it didn't really help. Antidepressants make me feel completely empty. As far as a hotline, I'm just really bad at speaking with people and don't know what I'd say 
What I do now is just let myself ramble about it and apologize along the way. It's people speaking casually about it that'll stop the stigma. Ask for forgiveness not permission lol. 
Works well enough to get people to pause and think, and the awkwardness makes it stick out! (I'm not making fun, I do the same thing.)
I've been working on how I talk about myself to people for some time now. They key is to talk in terms of other people's interests. If someone hasn't expressed to you they're interested in microbiology, don't go explaining to people how much you love the flagella movement of micro-organisms and love watching paramecium being eaten. That will kill the conversation more than telling people how you're depressed.  I'd highly recommend reading *How to Win Friends and Influence People* to get better at dealing with people.
Yeah, I've read the book and I really disliked it. In my experience, talking in terms of other's people's interests leads them to talk about themselves in one-sided statements.
I think depression today is exacerbated by the weakening socio-economic situation. I know many friends who sort of skate with ho-hum mediocre jobs and live with their parents without any plans to become independent or even have a real career. A lot of people seem to have given up because there doesn't seem to be any hope anymore, and the election is not helping matters...
I am fairly well off and still suffer from crippling depression. It makes it even worse because in your head you're thinking 'why the shoot am I sad all the bills are paid and I have a few thousand bucks in my bank account'. That's when you realize it's not about your predicament, it's an illness.
I am fairly well off and still suffer from crippling depression. It makes it even worse because in your head you're thinking 'why the shoot am I sad all the bills are paid and I have a few thousand bucks in my bank account'. That's when you realize it's not about your predicament, it's an illness.
This is me, and I think I'm just realizing this and I don't know what to do 
The worst thing is the people that say naive stuff like 'just get motivated' or 'be happier' or other Pinterest bullshit 
'Do something that makes you happy!'  Well nothing makes me happy that's the shootibg problem. Ugh it's terrible 
'Do something that makes you happy!'  Well nothing makes me happy that's the shootibg problem. Ugh it's terrible 
'oh but surly there has to be SOMETHING'  no there shooting isnt, if there were i would be doing it
'oh but surly there has to be SOMETHING'  no there shooting isnt, if there were i would be doing it
'Well there is drumming, but lately I've just been so terrible it's not even worth it I should just give up and sell my kit and never touch an instrument again cause I suck.'  Ugh. 
Do you uave any idea what you'd rather people say?
'I'm always here if you need me.'  'I love you.'  'Do you want a hug.'  'I'm happy to listen anytime you wanna talk.'
I had a doc once ask me when was the last time I felt happy. I honestly couldn't remember. 
Gotta include the VERY little things... like enjoying a decent meal or something.
Gotta include the VERY little things... like enjoying a decent meal or something.
Not just with happiness, but the feeling of achievement.  Mini fist-pumps.  Got out of bed? Mini fist-pump.  Made a coffee? Mini fist-pump.  Had a shower? Mini fist-pump.  We're playing the game on hard mode. Even beating the first level is a worthy achievement.
Absolutely. Long term depression is miserable Iv been dealing with it for 10 years now. I had two good years but that ended when my ex broke up with me. That through me back into a depression. It's been really shooting hard this time around. I thought everything was going well in my life for once but of course it couldn't work out and now here I am. 
Holy crap. Same. Depression since I was 13, I'm 23 now. Scary thing is, it's always there. It's never really /gone/ you know? I just want to go to bed and wake up not feeling tired and looking forward to life. 
I talked to my boss and was just about incredulous when she said that she has never felt the urge to end her life. For me, that seems so strange. 
I wonder what I'd be like to wake up and feel good everyday.
I didn't suffer depression until couple years ago around about 25-26 years old. This truly the most hardest thing I've been through. I have no words for it really apart from its changed me forever and completely killed my personality and isolated me so much that I can't even bare it anymore. 
It's unimaginable. No words can properly express how exhausting and painful depression is. Been dealing with it for most of my life. 23 years old and the majority of my life has been me feeling sad and alone. I only get one life and this is how it's gonna be it's terrifyingly disappointing 
It's unimaginable. No words can properly express how exhausting and painful depression is. Been dealing with it for most of my life. 23 years old and the majority of my life has been me feeling sad and alone. I only get one life and this is how it's gonna be it's terrifyingly disappointing 
It's truly a awful illness. Before I suffered I thought  I was clued up and understanding about depression. I wasn't at all. It's very hard to explain into words. Some days the loneliness kills me other days it's the numbness and not feeling anything other days it's the no energy each day a part of depression wears me down and reminds me that I'm not the same person anymore 
Absolutely. Just today I went to a little Halloween party, and when it got to about 8:30, i just got so sad and tired when everyone else was so happy and energetic. 
I wanna be invited to something. But I know the feeling of not having the energy for friends or anything els. Depression is exhausting. 
To be fair depressed people also don't realize a lot of things they are lucky to have or be grateful for
Many depressed people often dwell on the idea that they 'shouldn't feel like this' or 'other people have it worse', and those thoughts only make the depression feed and feed. It's an awful cycle.
Many depressed people often dwell on the idea that they 'shouldn't feel like this' or 'other people have it worse', and those thoughts only make the depression feed and feed. It's an awful cycle.
That's so true! I hate when people tell me things could be worse it's like yeah I know trust me Iv thought about it and feel guilty about it. And that guilt only adds to my depression. Maybe thinking like that works for situational depression but for me I'm chemically imbalanced. 
Well part of my belief system and my observations of life are that everything actually changes. It's just our ego and our fixed thought patterns that trick us into thinking things don't change, even depression. But guess what, after any of die, any of the things we feel and experience in a fixed or mutable manner, do change. Hence, the logic of suicide.  i.e. 'If I were dead, I wouldn't have to experience this pain.' 
Well obviously as a scientific law things change,  existence literally wouldn't be otherwise. But the average human life, past a certain point,  nothing much changes. I was going to say individual ability to change decreases even as we age but thinking more I think it's just that the things we can change change,  and opportunity available taints the perspective of being able to change. 
Crazy how happy you used to be when you were younger, than you realize in the past 3-5 years ...  How did things go so wrong?   
I went from being carefree and constantly jovial to withdrawn, introverted and self conscious in the matter of 2-4 years.   I agree, how in the world did things come this far down? 
I went from being carefree and constantly jovial to withdrawn, introverted and self conscious in the matter of 2-4 years.   I agree, how in the world did things come this far down? 
Me too man, me too!   I think maybe you just get burned too many times by life or find out the hard way why people are callous, rude, and self indulged.   I'm still trying to get back to my carefree/jovial spirit. 
Thank you! This sub is just one giant pity party. 
This sub is a safe place for people with depression to discuss and relate to one another. It may look like a pitty party and maybe to an extent it is but humans need to feel like they can relate to someone especially when they are dealing with painful thoughts and emotions. This is the only place other than therapy I feel like I can be completely honest with how I am feeling and not be judged as crazy or overly dramatic. 
The problem is the depressed you is a different you and perceives yourself differently. You aren't your disorder. You are much more than that, and I think it's important to give others that care about you some credit that they may see more than you see in yourself right now.   Most people aren't going to understand totally, and you shouldn't deal with abusive people, but eh. I think it's important to notice when people stick by you and support you when you are at your worst. 
Please listen to this ~~guy~~ lady, OP. I'm not trying to hijack the top comment. I'm on a continuing battle w/ depression now. My upswings is what surely_youre_joking describes: I know I am more than depression, I know I can do anything, I am loved and lovable.  Downswings are your pictures. I'm just saying that... At least in my case... this ~~guy~~ girl is right.  **Edit** surely's gender.
Do you honestly know yourself at all?  Depression has a nasty habit of twisting you into something you're probably not. Getting to know who you really are and what you're honestly about may be a key step in putting depression behind you. I know it's hard, but try to hold onto the things that bring you joy.
>Depression has a nasty habit of twisting you into something you're probably not.   And it tricks you into thinking that you're this other person, who's miserable and doesn't care about life or people or anything nice. And you start to believe it. And it makes you not want to try to get better.  And it shooting sucks.
I'm unemployed while my friends are out there working on their jobs. I feel the same as you OP, I just feel so worthless
Same here. Sitting at home every day while my family goes to work and my friends go to school makes me feel like such a pathetic failure.
Same here. Sitting at home every day while my family goes to work and my friends go to school makes me feel like such a pathetic failure.
Today I skipped all three classes and instead sat in my car for hours so that my roommates wouldn’t think I’m just a complete loser. I feel so pathetic.   Are you doing anything to get help? For a long time now I haven’t the energy to get help or talk to anyone about my true problems 
Today I skipped all three classes and instead sat in my car for hours so that my roommates wouldn’t think I’m just a complete loser. I feel so pathetic.   Are you doing anything to get help? For a long time now I haven’t the energy to get help or talk to anyone about my true problems 
Help for depression? No, I don't think I'll ever do that just because I don't want to have to depend on pills to live, I've heard antidepressants can have awful side effects, and as far as therapy I don't want to have to pay someone to care about me. It just feels fake to me.
I had to do some classes like 3 or four times before I aced all the pass/fail test bullshit. I thought I was dumb as shoot until the info sunk in and I got it all. 
I'm not from the US. Studying is free here, but you only have 2 chances for each class. If you fail the exam twice then it's over and you can't study the same thing again.
I'm not from the US. Studying is free here, but you only have 2 chances for each class. If you fail the exam twice then it's over and you can't study the same thing again.
So, pass! Dedicate at least 30 mins a day to studying. If you haven’t gotten any done by 8-9 PM, bust out the books for a half hour.   The goal is to mentally replace your depression with studies so your brain noticed that there are additional things missing in your daily routine 
So, pass! Dedicate at least 30 mins a day to studying. If you haven’t gotten any done by 8-9 PM, bust out the books for a half hour.   The goal is to mentally replace your depression with studies so your brain noticed that there are additional things missing in your daily routine 
>So, pass!  *Cue: Depression*
Yup that’s why I’m pulling away from my friends I can’t deal with it 
Me too. They apparently asked my boyfriend why.  Because you're all happy and successful, and I don't fit in with you. That's why.  Fundementally incompatible to be friends with these people. I want nothing but all of the happiness in the world for them.  But speaking to them on a daily basis makes me absolutely miserable.  And obviously it's not their fault! It's not their fault I'm a failure. And I miss them.  But I just can't.
LOL they actually just message my gf last week about what was going on so I was like fine I’ll respond and basically just said I’m ok just stressed to get them off my backs. Tbh I still like them to varying degrees but I just don’t wanna socialize at all with how I’m feeling these days. And when I do I don’t wanna talk about career moves and big picture stuff
It’s such a burden to meet up with old acquaintances and friends because I feel like I’ve achieved nothing while everyone is busy listing off shit they’ve done and having all these cool funny stories. While I just keep quiet and hope to god no one asks me a specific question about myself.  
Dude i'm doing the same and they keep asking why i don't hang out anymore. It's sad because in this sub i see a lot of people without friends, and i'm doing the opposite..
Yeah I know. And I’m not someone who is good at making friends so I know I’m stupid to ruin these friendship because I’ll probably regret it one day. It’s a combination on one hand one of them is just kinda an idiot and since I’m more irritable now I can’t deal with it and then the rest just have things going on and seem happy I can’t stand it it just gets me down and makes me feel worse. 
All my friends are having their careers and I'm doing a dead end job. I feel you. I have no choice but to stop contacting my friends just for making myself feel better or at least fine.
I feel you. My two best friends both graduated now working really good steady careers, while I struggle to scrape by taking 9 hours so maybe I can graduate in 5.5 years. I am very afraid that I’ll give up once again and fall into despair. 
Remember it's not a race, it doesn't matter how fast your friends are going.    Just remember that eventually you'll get there, and by there I mean a place in your life where you are comfortable and happy  
I hear this idea a lot and, while it's comforting, I don't get it.  I can't just ignore my friends and family.  
I hear this idea a lot and, while it's comforting, I don't get it.  I can't just ignore my friends and family.  
Ignore it's a bit harsh  Anybody should NEVER ignore someone who cares for you.   But we need to stop comparing our achievements with them, you are not them, you are you. 
Ignore it's a bit harsh  Anybody should NEVER ignore someone who cares for you.   But we need to stop comparing our achievements with them, you are not them, you are you. 
I have to deal with this as well, I'm basically the failure of my generation in my family as far as career success goes. My two best friends have successful careers going too, and they're well paid. I'm 34, dealing with depression, currently unemployed on Employment Insurance. I know I've got a lot of things going for me, but I feel like a loser half the time. Right now I'm studying programming on my own to hopefully break into web development.
Yeah, it's not a race, but if you don't do things fast enough, people will abandon you.
Can't get abandoned if you don't have anyone in the first place haha
that's how I feel, one part of me wants to get out, do stuff, meet people, but I just I can't, the other part it's like, why? we are better laying on bed doing nothing.   I would describe it like a limbo, i don't feel nothing and I don't want to do anything (either good or bad).
It's almost like being depressed is now more comfortable than trying to better myself. I know exactly what I need to be doing to be happier but I just /can't/ do it. 
More like there are two people, but one is far bigger and stronger and keeps the other subjugated at all times. Every now and then the dominated one will pick his head up and try to act but it doesn't take long for the bigger one to shove his face back in the dirt.
Yeppppppppp!
Also happy birthday ily
This almost made me shed a tear, you're the first person to wish me a happy birthday today so this actually means more to me than you'd think.  *Hugs*
Yeah I'd love to be a clueless happy little kid again. Just play and watch TV all day.
I'm 17 years old and I feel that is gone too. Although being young, I'm scared I'll lose more. I just don't know it yet.
I'd like to go back to 1963. I wasn't alive in 1963. 
deleted  ^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^0.0750  [^^^What ^^^is ^^^this?](https://pastebin.com/FcrFs94k/67348)
deleted  ^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^0.0750  [^^^What ^^^is ^^^this?](https://pastebin.com/FcrFs94k/67348)
Lol
I want to go back to unconsciousness.
That's why I look forward to sleeping. Too bad it always ends.
I feel the same as you... about six months back, I was completely normal. I loved life, and was always out having fun. But now, I just feel broken. I am not who I was months ago.
If you survive this, you will be a different person...
What gets me is seeing other people with all the good things life has to offer, and thinking, why not me?  I want those things too but not getting them try as I might is super depressing.  Is that entitlement, to want good things and to think the work I'm putting in is sufficient to get them?  People deserve good things, why not me?  But you're right, can't go back, only forward.
It's luck. Luck from someone in their past that set their future on the course, or luck for them. Little hard work, lot of luck!!
I understand the place of being still depressed/being a loner but at least feeling a sense (no matter how small) of some kind of hope for the future. I'm in a similar spot myself, although by the time I started college the depression was there more than I thought (especially when consuming alcohol recklessly and having it manifest itself in the ugliest way.)  I personally wish I were 5 again before I actually had true awareness of the world around me and how cruel human nature truly is. 
'how cruel human nature truly is'...we truly are the most dangerous animal.
Ever read Paradise Lost?
No, I haven't.
No, I haven't.
Read Paradise Lost.  If you don't end up routing for Satan, you're doing it wrong.
It comes down to choice and taking responsibility- not laying blame.
Do you mean blaming in general or just passing blame on something/someone else? Because there isn't a day that goes by where I'm not blaming myself.  It's easier to take choice when you have a purpose in this world and the ability to change your situation. I don't. Everything I do sends me further down the slope.
Does it help you to sort out thoughts alone first? Maybe so some free writing until you find yourself expressing what is on your mind. When things are more clear to you, then you can share ideas about what is bothering you with others.
I'm usually thinking it out all the time but none of its ever related. Just hundreds of random thoughts that want to get out at once :/ I did try writing stuff down but but I have issues remembering to carry a pen or notebook. It's another thing I need to remember to do 
I'm usually thinking it out all the time but none of its ever related. Just hundreds of random thoughts that want to get out at once :/ I did try writing stuff down but but I have issues remembering to carry a pen or notebook. It's another thing I need to remember to do 
I actually practice small talk and *conversations* all the time. Although when it comes time, I just go blank.
You may have ADHD. See a therapist.   edit: not sure why this is getting downvoted. There are tons of symptoms of ADHD/ADD which most people don't realize. Having extreme difficulty putting your thoughts into words, forgetting things quickly, not being able to write things down because your mind keeps changing thoughts are common traits of the disorder. All I'm saying is that you might have ADHD so it would be a good idea to talk to a professional about the issues you are having. 
As someone with both ADHD and depression, what OP is describing is much more in line with an emotional pain associated with depression than the chaotic thoughts that come out of ADHD. Still, it does sound like the kind of thing a therapist would be useful for. There's something running around the subconscious that needs saying. A therapist might be able to help it emerge.
Very much this. I dont think ive ever been able to get across how I feel through words to anyone. It feels like you are trapped and everytime you attempt to try and talk to someone, the words just spill out wrong and dont make sense or convey the feelings your trying to get across...
Yeah and even when I can get words out, they just don't seem like the ones I'm thinking. It feels like I'm trying to describe something I didn't know existed...
Yeah and even when I can get words out, they just don't seem like the ones I'm thinking. It feels like I'm trying to describe something I didn't know existed...
Oh god, this is exactly how I've been feeling for a while. I guess there is some comfort in knowing I'm not alone in feeling this way. Good luck OP hope you feel better.
Oh god, this is exactly how I've been feeling for a while. I guess there is some comfort in knowing I'm not alone in feeling this way. Good luck OP hope you feel better.
Yeah it is comforting knowing I'm not alone. Thanks I'll try
I feel exactly this way.  I feel dead inside.  I feel like if I spoke to a therapist I wouldn't even know where to begin.
Yeah when I did have a therapist ever session started with complete silence and me just saying I didn't know what to say
I find it's hardest to talk about something when you don't really understand it yourself. You just feel like something is off, but you can't pinpoint what exactly is. So you just sort of pull different ideas from different places and try to make them fit together to make some sort of coherent sense, but it just makes your mind a mess. 
That's exactly how I feel. Sometimes I'm scared I'm just copying other peoples thoughts since it's the only way I can figure out how to describe stuff
The thing is though no matter how many people, or how many times I hear it, my mind just assumes that they are lying about it to try to make me feel better or something along those lines. This in turn makes me feel even worse about it all.   Danging vicious cycle.
And that's exactly why I was hoping it could help someone else. Because I feel like people are lying to me too when they say it. But maybe someone out there needed to hear it.   I'm sorry you're stuck in this vicious cycle too. 
[There, there bear.](http://i.imgur.com/Ze8BF.jpg)
*hugs*
This is great. Thanks.
You're welcome
I'm so glad you did, it helped me. You know that fluttery nervous feeling you get in your chest/stomach when you're hating on yourself? Maybe not, but it happens to me when I'm sure I'm not going to be good enough and this just about slayed it. Thank you. 
I do know that feeling. I'm so glad it helped you! 
I keep telling that to my (I hope soon-to-be) *gf*.  She always refuses that I'm that idiotic, so dumb and ... idiotic.  And still I'm not sure if she means it or just keeps telling me to not feel as bad as I feel all day the whole day.  I hope this works out...
I hope it works out too.   You're an awesome person. Remember that.
Thank you. Really struggling today and this made me grin. I appreciate it.
I'm glad I could help!
Wow. You literally typed out what I wanted to say. OP is probably smart. I can see he has awareness; which is a rare thing. Most people are actually very stupid.
Sometimes I wish I wasn’t self aware
Parents pushed me into studying something I didn't really want and that's useless. It took me four years just to get a stupid bachelor and I broke down a lot during it, even though it wasn't a hard subject (for others. I'm just too stupid).   Absolute waste of time. I wish I'd be strong enough to find something that I like.   I'm sorry I can't tell you more.
Same here, except it is not the parents who pushed me. It was the college.
Is that what you really want to study?
It used to be. Now I realize I convinced myself I wanted to study it after my parents pressured me into it (because dentistry pays well).
Try to think of the future when this whole college time will all be a memory, that's what my parents would tell me... personally, i feel like i'm going to feel this way forever, no matter where i go.
I'm always trying to think about the future but sometimes it's impossible. I had an anatomy test today and almost had a panic attack. And I totally agree about feeling like this forever, when I was in high school I was always thinking 'when I'm in college things will get better, I just have to endure this'. Now I'm in college and I don't even have anything to look forward to. 
Then don't go. It's actually really easy to make it without a degree. 
How? I'm just here because I have no idea how to 'make it' and a degree seemed like the safest bet.
Never bring up depression in the workplace.  It will only be used against you.  Many of us have had to learn this the hard way.
I’ve learned that if you show any sign of perceived weakness they will always use it against you. Kinda like in the wild.
That's a really shitty situation. It's so difficult for those of us struggling with mental illness, because there is still stigma attached to it. Employers can be the worst when it comes to mental health issues. Some of the view it as an excuse to leave/miss work, despite the fact that we are genuinely unwell.  It is possible to find a workplace that'll treat you like a human being. I work for one such workplace, and they have been nothing but understanding of my issues. There's hope.
For my boss it's like I'm not a man because I have depression. Suck it up and deal with it is all I get from him. Thanks for the encouragement. I'm looking forward to getting out of this situation. 
For my boss it's like I'm not a man because I have depression. Suck it up and deal with it is all I get from him. Thanks for the encouragement. I'm looking forward to getting out of this situation. 
I know how you feel, its the same in my workplace. older generations have this mentality of 'suck it up and work through it' and talking about your mental health is a sign of weakness. I shooting hate it 
Complain about your boss. For no reason can anyone hold you at your place of employment against your will. It's not right.
Complain to who? I live in an at will employment state. They can fire me for no reason and I have no recourse. I have another job lined up. Just have to try not to explode and get fired before then.
Complain to who? I live in an at will employment state. They can fire me for no reason and I have no recourse. I have another job lined up. Just have to try not to explode and get fired before then.
Do you have an HR department? They’re in place so stuff like that doesn’t happen. It may be considered discrimination if they fired you for mental illness, and if you have that documented you have a case with the department of labor. 
Do you have an HR department? They’re in place so stuff like that doesn’t happen. It may be considered discrimination if they fired you for mental illness, and if you have that documented you have a case with the department of labor. 
From experience because you are at will they just won't have a reason.  They don't need to.
I’m sorry dude do you have a nest egg to fall back on?
Nop. Moving back in with my mom. 
Our culture is sick.  Danging sick. 8 hours a day, 5 days a week. Be a good worker bee or you don't get to live! Submit Slave!
seriously......and many people work more than 8 hour days and sometimes more a week
I don’t wanna be “that idiot,” but you just gotta suck it up. It’s not right, but that’s how this world works. No workplace is going to care about your mental issues. Most don’t even care about physical issues. This sounds ridiculous, but scheduling times for anxiety might help. At my last job I had 2 three minute periods where I knew I could go in the bathroom and cry or have a little breakdown. It helped me get some stuff out and it didn’t impede my work quality.
no downvote here  employers dont give a shoot, everyone is replaceable. their interest cost their pockets bottomline
It's like you're me. Right now.
Same.
Same.
Same here, just came here cause I'm crying. Feeling lost and unloved. For almost 9 years I'm suffering and I know life will be like this forever. 
Same here, just came here cause I'm crying. Feeling lost and unloved. For almost 9 years I'm suffering and I know life will be like this forever. 
It won't be like that forever if you try and do something about it. Grab your depression by the throat and take control. We're here for you man (and OP)
This sums up how I feel daily. I'm only 17, these are the years I should be enjoying but depression takes away anything good.
there is nothing that makes me more anxious than the knowledge that i'm wasting what are supposed to be the best years of my life
there is nothing that makes me more anxious than the knowledge that i'm wasting what are supposed to be the best years of my life
the feeling you get knowing you've gone and wasted them already isn't any better!
you sound like a little girl
And you sound worse, since you're belittling a person who is obviously in extreme pain.
Way to go!! Good luck! I hope you get along with people at your work place.
I do :) thank you so much!
I do :) thank you so much!
So-o, whats your job? Do you like it?
So-o, whats your job? Do you like it?
I make subs at a local shop :) i like it a lot! Everyone is really nice and the boss is very understanding!
Congratulations! I hope I can find one soon! It must feel so good :3
Thank you! I believe in you! Don't give up, you can do it! :)
Woo!!!! That is awesome! ❤️
Thank you!❤️
Congrats dude!!! :D thats a step to success😁🎉
Yes! Thank you :)
Yes! Thank you :)
No problem!(:
Congrats, I wish I could but I just shoot it up and never go back. 
I believe in you, you gotta believe in yourself man. Best luck to you
What job did you get? 
I work at a local sub shop :)
Congratulations!  A huge step toward independence and the amazing confidence it gives you :)  If no one else has told you, I am proud of you!
I am very excited to have the independence and confidence that I've been lacking, thank you so much! Have a nice day pal
I am very excited to have the independence and confidence that I've been lacking, thank you so much! Have a nice day pal
Dont tie your confidence to your job! You are you, no matter what some shitbag with a tie says. Good luck with your job :D
Dont tie your confidence to your job! You are you, no matter what some shitbag with a tie says. Good luck with your job :D
Thank you for the advice :) i love everyone in this sub
I am so happy for you! I can understand the hard phase you got out of. If you have any tips, I'm open to them. Thank you! Congratulations! 
Just put yourself out there. It took years for me but once it happened i was euphoric. Be very flexible and very nice :) best of luck to you!❤️
Yay! Thats great news! :) Congrats. 
Thank you bunches!! Have a nice day :)
Congrats! Nice work...keep it up
I will try friend! :)
Congratz!! 🎉❤️
Thank you❤️
Amazing! Good luck on your new job! :)
I will need it! Thank you :)
Good for you! I need to do the same! I've been slaving away at a shit ass dead end job, too scared to apply for real world shit because I have no confidence and am scared no one would hire me. But I have to keep trying until things fall into place!
That is very true!! Do not give up friend I believe in you!❤️
Thats great dude! Good luck and congrats!
Thank you :) the positivity I've received is amazing. Much love to everyone 
This made my day :) I don't know who you are, where you are and what job you got, but I'm extremely happy for you :) I am actually smiling with a lot of warmth. *hugs*
This is the most genuine thing I've heard in a while :) thank you so much! Im so happy i could make you smile considering you're on this sub, means a lot to me!! Have a nice day/night ❤️
This is the most genuine thing I've heard in a while :) thank you so much! Im so happy i could make you smile considering you're on this sub, means a lot to me!! Have a nice day/night ❤️
:) Stay happy! Ride this wave strong :) 
:) Stay happy! Ride this wave strong :) 
:) thank you❤️
SUUUWEEEET!!!!  Congrats friend!  Work hard, play hard!  All the best climbing that success ladder.....you can do iiiiiiiiit!!!!!
Awe thank you so much :) have a nice day friend
You go OP!
Thank you!!
Awesome! Great job!
Thank you bunches friend!
On the way to success! Keep up the good work. Dad's been nagging me about getting one recently (and I only turned the legal age allowed to work a month and a week ago .-.). Wish you luck!
I wish you the best of luck as well! I hope you find a good job :)
Today was my first day at my new job! It was not helping my depression that I was jobless for 2 weeks for the first time since I was 16. I was very stressed and I'm sure you were too but I'm happy for you and hope you have a great time and enjoy it!
Thank you! Im very proud of you :) best of luck to you, friend❤️
Congratulations buddy! You got this! 
Thank you pal!!!
Got a denial letter from an internship today, it's for the best though I'm not at all interested in the work 
I hope you find work that suits you pal :) best of luck to you
'Why are you so quiet?' So annoying!
'Why aren't you?'. Gets em everytime.  
Oooh I HATE when people tell me to smile. Makes me so irrationally angry. Like I'm so deep in my own thoughts and then someone interrupts to basically just insult me. 
But, come on, cheer up, smile, it might not happen. /shootthesepeople
[You can't fit more douche into a picture.](https://cdn.shopify.com/s/files/1/0275/6675/products/Roman-Black-Classic-Ta_1024x1024.jpg?v=1447773222)
NO
Those people are loudmouths who need to shut the shoot up and learn to listen.
No kidding. If I had a dollar for every time I wanted to beat the shit out of someone who clearly is all talk and no listen and in turn will not shut the shoot up I'd be amongst the 1%. If I was lacking such superb self-control every last dollar to the last red cent would be necessary to pay my legal fees.
'Get out of the house. Don't become a cave dweller. I can see your shell growing'  Man that one really shooted me up today.
Just another brick in the wall
Don't most animals with shells live outside or underwater? 
I guess it was a wordplay on being a hermit (crab)
I guess it was a wordplay on being a hermit (crab)
That makes them look doubly stupid since hermit crabs don't grow shells. 
'You look happy'.    Dang off.
'Eat shit.'  Don't mind if I do.
O Silent One, what is your problem?  ~My mother when I was about 16 and I got so depressed I stopped talking for two months. 
It looks like she was tryimg to approach you with a sense of humor. Some people are truly clueless but mean well.
It looks like she was tryimg to approach you with a sense of humor. Some people are truly clueless but mean well.
My mother's sense of humor was barbed. Text does not convey tone of voice :/
My teacher took to calling me Silent Man in Year 6. One time in assembly in front of basically the whole School/Year. The nickname followed me to Upper School.
What an idiot.  I'm sorry that happened to you.
It's the most annoying thing to hear.  'You are so quite,  what's wrong? ' im tired of listening to you! 
Why do you get offended when someone asks you how you're doing? Or to take a step further they're actually concerned for your wellbeing? 
Why do you get offended when someone asks you how you're doing? Or to take a step further they're actually concerned for your wellbeing? 
Its more about how being depressed makes talking feel like weight-lifting with your mouth. The irritation comes when somebody who although is well-meaning doesn't understand how hard it to plaster on a smile and converse when your brain and mood is that low. It's nothing against the person who asked, its frankly just another reason to feel guilty at yourself, for turning away a well-meaning person. 
Because self loathing?
I understand that when someone says 'you're so quiet!' because I'm very aware that I'm quiet and socially awkward. But if someone asks about my well-being that just means they care.
In this world you simply cannot win. Damned if you do, damned if you don't.  I remember a couple years back at a workplace (no longer work there), one of the guys goes 'smiiiile m8, cheer up!'  Literally the next day, I was feeling somewhat better, and was smiling, same guy walks past and goes 'wtf are you smiling at?'  Gotta' say it killed the soul a bit.
Sorry if this is indelicate, probably just my warped sense of humour, but that made *me* smile.
I hate this. Half the time I've just got nothing to say. Or I'm distracted. 
For me its more just small talk. I really struggle with it, plus just general social anxiety.  I worry that I come off as an idiot unless I'm close so someone and they know about my depression (though most of the time I feel like everyone knows anyway...), but I really don't have the energy or the inclination to natter on about the weather or who some rich Kardashian shooted this week.
'shoot off'   ^try saying this in a british accent (assuming you dont already have one). it is somehow far more satisfying.
That's the reason it's such a valued phrase in the UK !
oh god yes  my mom always tells me 'if youre ever feeling depressed/down/suicidal, please tell me!!!' and then when i do tell her she sobs about how she hates to see me like this so i just keep it to myself 
hahaha just what every suicidal/depressed person needs... a crying mom.
hahaha just what every suicidal/depressed person needs... a crying mom.
It honestly sucks. I take after my mom a lot and seeing her cry when I talk about how I feel just seems to make it that much worse. 
It honestly sucks. I take after my mom a lot and seeing her cry when I talk about how I feel just seems to make it that much worse. 
so very true. I have nobody else to speak too, so almost all the time I keep my feelings to myself, but when I cant no longer and need to express myself, it brings my mother down and then comes the guilt...
My best friend is struggling with depression. I wish she would talk to me because I know she's hurting and I know I can't make it better, but she shouldn't have to deal with it alone. Your thoughts and problems aren't meaningless to you and that means they aren't meaningless to someone that cares about you. 
make it extremely clear to her that you really do care. I would love to have someone like you as a friend...
I think I'll set up an appointment with one soon. Thank you. 
Stick with it for a while even if nothing seems to be changing. Antidepressants are essentially magic, we don't understand how or why they affect different people differently, and that means you might not find the right one straight away. 
This is too real. I can't remember the last time I felt genuinely happy either. I hope you you choose to get help. ((hugs))
Part of me hopes it gets better too. But then part of doesn't know if I could handle things getting better (if that makes sense). And part of me is convinced that things will never get better. I just feel like a robot. 
Part of me hopes it gets better too. But then part of doesn't know if I could handle things getting better (if that makes sense). And part of me is convinced that things will never get better. I just feel like a robot. 
Makes total sense. I didn’t know anyone else felt like that 
yes person I never met or known but who I feel closer to than anyone else  in life, yes I feel the exact same way. I do want to die and hopefully all the pain would stop but I dont have the guts to do it. or maybe i have the guts not to do it. its so confusing. and Im so numb to all the things in life. I get triggered of course though, all the negative thoughts are just waiting to come out of me anytime. 
Don't get me wrong, I love my family, I love my partner. I have stronger feels towards them than a stranger on a street but there is just a......disconnect there- like I don't really know how to explain it to most people.    But I also feel so numb to all thing in life.
I used to feel this way all the time!! Literally exactly like this. So you're def not alone. I was depressed and now I'm on medicine and feel amazing 👍🏼👍🏼 do the same!!
Yeah whatcha On? I've been on 100mg Wellbutrin 3x a day for a few months and the depression sneaks up on me from time to time still
It would hurt, right? I'd rather just buy a van and be out there... /r/vandwellers. But if I'm too much of a coward to commit suicide, I'm too much of a coward to do that.  Bless you.
Yes. I've always wanted a tiny house and to just travel in it but I am also a coward. Maybe one day. Probably not. 
So if you want something, which implies being alive to get it, why commit suicide?  
It's not that I want to commit suicide. I just don't want to live (if that makes sense). Plus a tiny house wouldn't be feasible for me anytime soon. Maybe in a few years when I finish school and have the money to build on. So I'm the mean time it's hard to think that it'll actually happen. Which makes it hard to have something to look forward to. Make sense? 
Just for everyone's information. I know 3 guys that I am very close friend to that have NOT kissed a girl and they are 20 years old. If you include me I know 4 guys. So everyone that thinks they should hurry up and get kissed by a girl should relax. Everything has its time. Just wanted to make this clear. 20 isn't late. Peace out.
well that's a relief i'm 30 with no hope in sight
well that's a relief i'm 30 with no hope in sight
At least you are a wizard now
its 0530 here and this brought a smile and a giggle to my face, ow, that hurts, 31 and kissless over here, but hoping a girl I overheard this week at an AA meeting will show up again, thinking about asking her out.
Do it man!! I have faith in you, even if you don't have faith in yourself! Even if it doesn't work out, you'll have done a thing. And doing a thing puts you one step closer to the victory line, however you define it. When everything within you tells you not to ask her out, say shoot it and claim those 5 seconds of courage as your 5 seconds of freedom. 
Good old 13th step. I love it!
she was complaining that she couldn't find any guys in their 30's who had no kids, at least thats what my brain heard, could be mistaken, but hopefully not
Good for you my man, keep at it ! That last statement gets to me so hard because everytime I try to make a move, especially with girls, I get gutted but I'm glad you are on a higher level than me bro !!
I promise I am not on a higher level than you haha! Something that really helped me in this situation was imagining how badly future me would have wanted this to happen. How, even if this went terribly, future me would still be proud. Taking the worst case scenario and making it into something that is still better than not doing it at all helped greatly. Even if I was a terrified little boy in that moment :P
Mah Man!
Mahn idiot wrist watch!
Very happy for you, but unfortunately something like this doesn't give me hope. I hope and I'm sure it will for many others, and sorry to complain but I just thought I'd highlight it. I've never kissed anyone either, but I just don't care about it that much. I don't think it would change that much for me. Again, I'm happy for you though.
I get it! I'm the exact same way. I never had any interest in it, ever, until I met this girl and knew I wanted to share this first with her forever. Whether you have hope or not might end up irrelevant when you meet that one person you can't help but imagine yourself with. Then, in that moment, hope doesn't matter. Nothing else matters, except for that 5 seconds of courage to do something about it. 
Congrats, I have lost hope now.
You can't lose hope. You're THE pokemaster. You're the very best, like no one ever was.
I can relate to this. I still maintain an idealistic goal and moral compass, but it's tempered by the cold truth of reality. I have resigned myself to the fact that no matter how much I invest myself in people, that investment will never truly make a meaningful return.
Here here. I feel exactly the same way. I'll keep trying my best to be kind and honest, but it would be nice if there was some reciprocity.
'Everyone else gets [their lucky break]'?  What about people who are starving, or in war-torn countries, or are the victims of human trafficking or slavery?  It's one thing to think your own life isn't great, but to say everyone else is fortunate is simply inaccurate.
Dude seriously? U apparently don't know this feeling!   
I think it's because those who have felt more pain tend to be more sympathetic to other peoples' pain. 
Precisely. We're all lonely together!
Precisely. We're all lonely together!
That’s exactly the expression I use to describe my marriage.  Both myself and wife have bouts of severe lifelong depression, so we lean on each other!  We are stronger together and wrecked without.
That’s exactly the expression I use to describe my marriage.  Both myself and wife have bouts of severe lifelong depression, so we lean on each other!  We are stronger together and wrecked without.
That’s awesome that you have such a strong love for each other and you two can lean on each other !
it might be the opposite too though. like you had enough and no longer care.
I think it’s one of those two, but those people usually don’t bother responding to posts here
Or, it's joyous that, despite all the pain inherent to a life lived fully aware,  we are still loving and fully human.  Pity those without compassion.  I vacillate between this and your point of view.
> despite all the pain inherent to a life lived fully aware, we are still loving and fully human.  Are we? I barely feel like I'm operating as a functioning human even 10% of the time. 
> despite all the pain inherent to a life lived fully aware, we are still loving and fully human.  Are we? I barely feel like I'm operating as a functioning human even 10% of the time. 
Hang in there, go through the motions, work to find the brightness. It comes around.
Hang in there, go through the motions, work to find the brightness. It comes around.
When thou?
i always wondered why i have been so empathetic since a young age. But i slowly feel myself growing colder as each second passes. I'm young and confused with life right now. Depressed, bored, frustrated, in debt...I am well and truly lost.
Same... lost describes it pretty good at least for me. I'm lost in life. I don't know anymore.  
Same... lost describes it pretty good at least for me. I'm lost in life. I don't know anymore.  
I hear you, friend. So lost to the point where I/we find comfort in the heart of strangers on the internet. I hope you get better.
I can relate. I feel like I didn't grow up since 12, however I'm already 23. Everything is so shooting hard. And the conditions of being a functioning adult, in this society, is so shooting many. You have to be positive, organized, outgoing(I know some people disagree with this, but look at those hiring posts on job hunting websites), ambitious, full of energy, full of passion. Wtf.
I wish more people would question more of this BS. Please millennials rebel against what has been done to us all. Drop out. Go back to older and more laid back ways. All the requirements are BS and exhausting or even disabling some of us.
I wish more people would question more of this BS. Please millennials rebel against what has been done to us all. Drop out. Go back to older and more laid back ways. All the requirements are BS and exhausting or even disabling some of us.
I wish we could. But there are always some millennials act like 'See I'm millennial but I'm this successful because I'm hardworking, creative and never give up! There are still people like me in millennials! Those millennials complain about the society are just not hardworking enough like me! They deserve being wage slave!' and ignore the fact that how unfair the society have been treating us and not everyone has the same conditions.
Like, sometimes I feel that even such a thing as making food for myself is too much. Some days just laying in bed seems like the thing that makes the most sense. 
Im the same way. My girlfriend makes 90% of my food when shes here. Otherwise ill just grab something thats ready to eat like cereal or bread because shoot making food. I dont have the energy for that shit.
Yeah and society will neither let you die nor give you money to live without making you do what you don't wanna do (both are achievable, but very very difficult). Feels like there is no escape, we're just not accounted for and bound to suffer.
This is exactly why I think everyone should support unconditional basic income and euthanasia. There should be at least one of them. You give money to people to make them survive, or you make them be able to choose death. 'You can't commit sucide! What? You need money to live? Nah you're on your own.' sounds like an idiot.
One time I was driving to community college and I realized I forgot water bottles at home and I start crying and screaming at myself and I had to go to Walgreens at 9AM with tears streaming down my face
I know how you feel PC, sometimes I get up forget something minor that 'normal people' wouldn't forget and I just melt down, silently hoping no one would notice if I simply stopped existing
I dont know. Sometimes I think other that being a bit weird Im a right man **ALWAYS IN THE WRONG PLACE**
I understand this too, I feel like no matter what I do I can't seem to stop the fear of anything I do being WRONG.   Every time I do something it upsets someone in some way or another, I can't help but wonder if I somehow am infecting 'normal' and 'functioning' people with my inadequacies.
I understand this too, I feel like no matter what I do I can't seem to stop the fear of anything I do being WRONG.   Every time I do something it upsets someone in some way or another, I can't help but wonder if I somehow am infecting 'normal' and 'functioning' people with my inadequacies.
I can relate to this, so so much
I also can relate.  Just dissatisfaction all around.  I skipped college classes today, but I'm not any happier than had I gone.  I just want to sleep all the time. 
Dude I just skipped my 6th class this semester for 3 of my classes, I'm seriously surprised I am even passing anything at this point. Feel like such a loser.
Dude I just skipped my 6th class this semester for 3 of my classes, I'm seriously surprised I am even passing anything at this point. Feel like such a loser.
I spent most of my time in college skipping classes to sleep 15+ hours a day. Took me 6 years to get a bachelor's degree. I know exactly how you feel.
I spent most of my time in college skipping classes to sleep 15+ hours a day. Took me 6 years to get a bachelor's degree. I know exactly how you feel.
Year 6 here too. I don't fail so much as I take a really low course load or just take the wrong courses entirely so I can stay in school. I don't know what I'll do when I finally graduate this semester, I don't think I could function in a real work environment but the job I have now isn't really enough to support me on my own.
Like I heard once, it's the feeling of missing home but you don't exactly know where home is.
For me, it's exactly this. 
Me too. Feels like my life is just sleeping and killing time until I can sleep again. 
Agree
I live with my grandparents because my mother and father didn't want me or my brother i'm always depressed and constantly think of killing myself some nights are worse than others but my grandparents have always been understanding of my depression and i never felt once like they loved me any less for it being there they let me stay home because of it and i feel like there's someone who still feels like i'm worth a damn.
Grandma is the best, get to stay at hers anytime with no judgement, damn this thread has so many relatables
Can relate, skipped college classes for my whole time here, no interest in them, feel like i will become homeless and a disappointment to family but don't care enough about that to change, no career interests, have hobbies but not interested enough to develop them into a skill, enjoy reading, not interested enough to apply what i have learned.  Where do we go from here?
shoot I relate to everything you just said. Feel hopeless dunno wtf to do
In the same boat as you man. Currently in school for HVAC and I skipped 4 days last week and 3 days the week before. Only got roughly 3 hours of sleep last night because my mind was going insane. 
Happened to me last night. Went to bed early because I knew today was an important day at work but I still ended up getting no sleep because of the stress of work and the stress of life and I couldn't shut my mind off. Sucks. 
Everything is freaking shitty.  But, I can attest that certain situations are better than others.  College kind of sucks.  Call center work sucks.  Being a programmer is kind of cool and I like this job.  But I'm still a depressed person in a cool job, if that makes sense.
Makes sense. Feel the same way.Helping the world's logistics run behind the scenes as a Sys. Analyst but still feel like shit. Work helps distract me. I dread the weekends where I'm allowed to freely overthink.
Wow this hits home. In the peak of my depression I made an omegle buddy. We skype chatted (just text) etc. Helped me through a lot of stuff. Encouraged be to get real help. I trusted him a lot. I even lost my phone and had no way to call it so I asked him to do it. He did but you could tell he felt uncomfortable about it. We chatted a few more days after than. Then he blocked me. 
If you ever need anyone to talk to, I'm here. I'm a very good listener, and I'm on the other side of experiencing what you are/were.
You can PM me as well, I've been fighting the difficult fight for a while now..
Same here.  15 years struggling and mostly out the other side.  I know the power of one perosn giving a shit about you first hand.
Same here.  15 years struggling and mostly out the other side.  I know the power of one perosn giving a shit about you first hand.
Honestly, one person saved me.  That's all it takes, I try to return the favor when I can!
Is there more to the conversation or no? The person sounds like a troll I hate to say.
I was worried it was a troll at first, but I looked for all the troll signs and he didn't really seem to have any. He was having trouble getting all the words out. I'd rather assume it's a real problem and reach out than a troll and do nothing.
Probably not. But I've got this here, I spent over an hour asking around on Omegle, I have a Tumblr post out. I hope that's enough.
The world should consist of more people like you. :) I thank you for the support that you give even though you have no idea who that person was.
The world should consist of more people like you. :) I thank you for the support that you give even though you have no idea who that person was.
I'm not ashamed to admit that Spice has made me tear up here.  I've fought my way through severe depression and I know the power of someone caring.  With that said, Spice, if you need to talk about it and this is buggng you just IM me ok?
I had a conversation kinda like this on omegle.. the person I talked to really helped me. They ended up being a neighbor down the street and now he's my best friend.
Wow! What are the odds of that? I'm happy for you.
Wow! What are the odds of that? I'm happy for you.
Thanks! It was a while back but yeah :D
Your sincerity and adamance is heart warming. However, my advice to you is to accept the unlikelihood that you'll talk to this person again (on that note, be wary of trolls/idiots who might pretend to be this person for sh*ts and giggles), but remain positive in the hope that this person will find the help and guidance they need, and that even without direct contact your positive thoughts will manifest into positive energy.
Yes, I resigned myself before I went to bed. I couldn't let it go before then, though, on the off chance that he wasn't trolling and genuinely had trouble finding the words to say. Maybe he'll be looking on this subreddit sometime and see this.
Good luck finding him/her OP
Thanks. I spent another hour on Omegle asking if they were this person. I haven't found them yet. I'm going to keep trying.
Thanks. I spent another hour on Omegle asking if they were this person. I haven't found them yet. I'm going to keep trying.
You seem like a good person.
You seem like a good person.
>You are a good person.  FTFY
Emily. Did you use to run an advice email? 
No, but I remember how hard it was to talk about being depressed and hurting yourself. So I cruise Omegle sometimes trying to be nice to people.
No, but I remember how hard it was to talk about being depressed and hurting yourself. So I cruise Omegle sometimes trying to be nice to people.
Oh...=/ there was someone named Emily that was as helpful as you. Care to PM?
Oh...=/ there was someone named Emily that was as helpful as you. Care to PM?
Sure!
This person sounds quite out of sorts. I've struggled with depression, but this is odd. Like a cry for help. It doesn't sound like anything i've heard of depression before.
It's very thoughtful of you to post this here, you're a good person.
Ehm...I was reading this conversation, but I don't see the reason why you are searching for him/her. To me it seems like a bad joke of 'stranger'
Because they are decent people who have empathy for someone going through hell. perhaps?
I do this too. I can't stop.
We do it because it helps us forget about our pathetic lives, even for a couple of minutes
imagine yourself being someone who can stop and live that life LOL
That would destroy the person I am.
This is pretty much how I got through life at this point. Its the most comforting thing and the only way I can even if just for brief moments feel ok. 
here's the problem with current mental health bullshit: *'oh, does it make you feel good? stop that! that's wrong! here's how to live life!'*  if it helps you, keep doing it till the grave
here's the problem with current mental health bullshit: *'oh, does it make you feel good? stop that! that's wrong! here's how to live life!'*  if it helps you, keep doing it till the grave
It's all about conforming to be what some people define as 'normal'. But, honestly who wants to spend their only life being normal? That sounds boring as hell.
Holy shit. I have done this my whole life. You have seriously just changed my life by posting this link. 
Me too. On reading this post, I was like damn! I have a day dreaming problem that I didn't even realize. Makes me feel so irresponsible. If this is bad how do I cure myself? What works? My dreams are the one part of my life I love and I totally control. What do I do without it? The mere thought gave me jitters. 
Me too. On reading this post, I was like damn! I have a day dreaming problem that I didn't even realize. Makes me feel so irresponsible. If this is bad how do I cure myself? What works? My dreams are the one part of my life I love and I totally control. What do I do without it? The mere thought gave me jitters. 
Me too! Holy shit. 
Me too. Been living in dreams instead of...living, since middle school. I write out goddamn *lists* of key developments in my daydreams so I don't forget them, and can easily pick up from wherever I leave off later on.
I've actually thought of writing out my daydreams into books because they are so well developed. 
This reminds of those guys in Inception who would rather spend their lives dreaming than awake. I've found myself looking forward to going to bed so I can fantasize while falling asleep, and potentially dream up something nice (extremely rare).
Exactly what I do. The couple of hours before sleep have always been the highlight of my day.
Hey that powerball winning is mine! 😁
I get this one.  You can get the next one!
You might want to consider practicing mindfulness. It's a method to be present In your own life. It of course won't be as dramatic and enjoyable as your day dreams but it will help you to spend less time in your fantasy world. You wouldn't have to give up your day dreams altogether, you could just spend more time experiencing the real world and living your actual life.
can you be more specific about what you mean by mindfulness? im asking this as someone with a long background in Taoism, Buddhism and Zen. How are patients introduced to it in a clinical situation?
can you be more specific about what you mean by mindfulness? im asking this as someone with a long background in Taoism, Buddhism and Zen. How are patients introduced to it in a clinical situation?
Here are some good resources from a clinical perspective  http://mindfulwaythroughanxiety.com/  http://www.amazon.com/The-Mindful-Way-Through-Depression/dp/1593851286  Please note that if you have been studying from a more religiou perspective you wil find that though the western psychological science if mindfulness is inspired buy buddhism it has many differences too
I daydream about having a S.O., or talking to someone about my feelings, or not being trash.
Hahaha, me too. But, I doubt you're 'trash'. I reserve that for people that gaslight and abuse innocent animals.
I do this 24/7, but in lecture format. The lecture turns into a full-blown daydream when I'm not looking. Then I pace around the house for the next 3 - 4 hours.  I didn't know it was so common. I thought it was one of those things only a handful of people did, and couldn't tell anyone without embarassment.
Crazy, right? That's how I felt when I discovered this was a thing other people experience. I do the pacing too.
This is me.  Your post is terrifying.  I don't know how to stop it.  Nobody ever told me daydreaming was bad, I was just always 'really creative,' or 'in my own world.'
Is it negatively effecting your life? If not, I wouldn't jump to terror right away. 
I do this all the time! It's fun at night. 
I used to stay up all night to day dream because that was when everyone in the house was asleep. Now I day dream whenever I'm alone in a room. I guess I can't control when my day dreams happen anymore. I don't even choose to day dream. I'll just be alone in a room, then a switch will go off in my head telling me to day dream.
But what's so bad about daydreaming? Why should external stimulus (reality) be higher regarded than internal stimulus (fantasy)? I might be far out here, but I honestly don't know why red pill is better than blue pill.
I think it really depends on whether it interferes with your ability to function and take pleasure in your life. For some people it does, for others it doesn't.
This analogy is uncanny. I'd add when you seek professional assistance often it is like calling a useless tech support line in another country. At the end of the call you have not resolved anything and they suggest the issue be escalated to the next tier. At that point you are beyond frustrated so you just go back to staring at the blue screen with an overwhelming feeling of hopelessness.
Have you tried turning it off and on again?
Have you tried turning it off and on again?
lots of people attempt this. but there is some kind of technical issue that prevents the 'turn it back on again' part from working.
makes me think of [this](http://qkme.me/3p802x).
Oh, Clippy, I miss you.
Oh, Clippy, I miss you.
Me too.  ...this is probably the first time I've realized exactly how lonely I am. I'm gonna go boot up my old edition of Word.
If this ever happened on my computer, I would call in someone who knows about computers to try and fix it. The same applies to people; if you feel depressed please try to talk to a psychiatrist or doctor about it.
Psychiatrist didn't do shit. He asked questions that were pretty much yes and no, prescribed me some pills and let me go, checking up every once in a while.   I'm thinking my low testosterone could be a reason why my depression hasn't been lifted. 
Psychiatrist didn't do shit. He asked questions that were pretty much yes and no, prescribed me some pills and let me go, checking up every once in a while.   I'm thinking my low testosterone could be a reason why my depression hasn't been lifted. 
Find a better doctor. There are good psychiatrists and bad psychiatrists, you need to find one that is going to help you.
Then there's Skype, the program that never closes.
Ha, skype always closes on me.  It doesn't run well on Ubuntu 
Ha, skype always closes on me.  It doesn't run well on Ubuntu 
It only closes when legitimately try to use it. 
True, however nothing replaces good security practices. Sometimes it takes those antivirus and malware software to kick you and start learning best practices.
Interesting.  I've never really thought about 'best practices' for avoiding depression. 
If only I were Hindu or Buddhist, then i could just get another computer.
IIRC, Buddhism is not OK with throwing your computer and getting a new one if it gets infected with a virus.  Buddhism encourages you to preserve your computer, even when it gets old or infected.
I'm not trying to be insensitive, it's just that some days I NEED deflective humor to keep me going :/
Lol, though I always run into problems when I can't tell whether they want all the outdated explanations we now know to be incorrect, or the explanations that are more current and have more recent evidence to support them. Sort of how like only in 1990 they thought depression only ever involved lack of sleep and under-eating XD.  Next thing I know I'm explaining why it's believed the monoamine imbalance hypothesis is inadequate to describe depression and the professor has no idea what I'm talking about.
Lol, though I always run into problems when I can't tell whether they want all the outdated explanations we now know to be incorrect, or the explanations that are more current and have more recent evidence to support them. Sort of how like only in 1990 they thought depression only ever involved lack of sleep and under-eating XD.  Next thing I know I'm explaining why it's believed the monoamine imbalance hypothesis is inadequate to describe depression and the professor has no idea what I'm talking about.
Lol there was a true or false question about the monoamine imbalance hypothesis in the test. Our university in particular focuses on the more recent evidence based material, but I get you...There are some professors that are still ignorant enough to believe that what they were told 20 years ago is still applicable today.
I've run into this with psychiatrists and not knowing the name for drug generics. And Freudians. : p
Freudians, don't even get me started.
The proverbial silver lining...  Congrats on cracking your exams, heres wishing you the best for the rest!
Thank you :)   Mmm yes sometimes I think I should just have studied poetry...I've got the melancholic,depressed mood down that's required...now I just need the red wine.
I wish my CS final had questions on habitual sleeping  and loneliness hahaha.
Hahaha! I'm presuming you are at Expert level :P
Fellow med student here. Guess what: This exact thing happened to me on wednesday. I knwo how it feels when you have to drag your ass towards class and make the best possible performance on a slow brain. Cheers for being brave and getting ahead with your life. Have an upvote :D!
Than you so much. It's been and still is a major challenge. Every day is different regarding my anxiety levels, but I just feel that if I can get a degree WITH having these issues on top of that...I will be freaken proud. All the best for you :)
Maybe the only time, but any optimism is good I guess hehe
because of my social anxiety I avoid anything involving people pretty much. I got out of going to a friend's party. The cops showed and a lot of people were arrested. I was abit happy for that.
because of my social anxiety I avoid anything involving people pretty much. I got out of going to a friend's party. The cops showed and a lot of people were arrested. I was abit happy for that.
Hahaha I like your dark humor! I'm forced to talk to people because of my chosen profession. It's still very debilitating to me when I get a panic attack when talking to a patient, but I've learnt to ignore it.
I love this because I've had this thought many times before as well. I'm actually in an abnormal psychology class currently, and me having depression and anxiety has definitely helped me in the course and vice versa, really. 
Got to love the irony, right?
Victory Dance!!  I'm depressed! I'm depressed!  Boogie!  Boogie!  Boogie!  Boogie!  
I want whatever happy pills you have :P
I have the same issue. I am not sure if the brain fog I experience with Cymbalta makes it better or worse. I am still not as smart as I used to be and thinking and organizing thoughts seems like too much work sometimes and sometimes I fail anyway. 
Is brain fog a symptom of Cymbalta??
Is brain fog a symptom of Cymbalta??
its also a general symptom of depression 
its also a general symptom of depression 
This explains so much. Ugh.  edit: i knew this was a symptom and i completely forgot about it.
>I have days where I feel better, and I seem to be able to think better then too. Do you experience that?   No, I'm an idiot every minute of every day.
I'm sorry you feel like that. 
This sounds very serious and extreme, I don't think just depression alone can ruin your ability to read. 
I have the same problem as them. I dont know if its a depression thing but my therapist is shit so I guess I wont know until I find one that actually does their job.
You had some form of success. 
And now it's gone :/
I definitely have this problem and I think that the SSRI I take makes the problem worse. I am also not creative the way I used to be.
And this is what shakes me to the for so badly. It makes me feel like I'll never be as creative as I used to be ever again. It's like knowing this young person with so much potential and then they just died or disappeared... It hurts to even ponder this because it feels so true
And this is what shakes me to the for so badly. It makes me feel like I'll never be as creative as I used to be ever again. It's like knowing this young person with so much potential and then they just died or disappeared... It hurts to even ponder this because it feels so true
> It's like knowing this young person with so much potential and then they just died or disappeared..  Oof yeah that thought hurts. I always get scared I'm going to waste my life, and that I already have wasted so many opportunities, because of my depression. I don't fee I'm able to do anything 'fully' and ever be fully present and I'm missing out on life. It's scary. 
Man, I'm in the same boat as you. I used to have a fantastic memory, could remember even the smallest details of things. Ever since I became a depressive mess though, I forget things so damn easily and I just don't have the brain power anymore, my mind is always exhausted.
Yes and it makes you feel like less of the person you used to be. Like there was so much potential and then boom, you shooted up your own life without even knowing about it. And you can't function like a normal adult because you can't remember where the shoot you put your car keys ever, where any of your money is, where your important documents are such as social security card or id...
I'd look into what I'm eating to make sure I was getting all my micro and macro nutrients.   I'd also do vigorous cardio for 30 minutes to optimise cognitive function.   Do you read everyday? 
I'm getting free food right now so I can't make any changes to my diet. I try my best with what I have and drink a lot of water.  I try to read, but I've only been able to finish a couple books in the past few months. I used to read multiple books in a week.
Are you on meds or smoking pot?
I tried meds and hated it so much. With depression I only feel something maybe 10% of the time, but with medication I felt nothing. I couldn't even masterbate because I was completely numb inside and out.   I don't like smoking and don't have money for it anyway. 
I feel you. I'm about to turn 26, in the 'prime' of my life and all I have to show for it is debt and being  a flake to everyone around me. We can be losers together 
This age is a tricky one, no longer am I granted the 'luxury' of being depressed at home. I am expected to 'suck it up' as if age magically gave me to ability to conform to the outside world.
Honestly I feel the same way but we have a lot of time to steer the boat into a better path. 
i like your outlook on life, you'll get places buddy (: 
Your twenties aren't the prime of your life. Yeah you have the whole youth thing going but people usually rate their 40s-50s, or the period where they have a stable career that they feel satisfied with and a family, as the best period of their lives. 
I didn't know wtf I was doing during my 20's or 30's... at the time I felt like I would never be better off even though I was immensely depressed.
Not a single day goes by where I don't fantasize about going back in time to the age of 5, live my childhood again but this time with adult me's mind. 
Yup, same here. But I would choose 9 or 10.
I don't think I could enjoy life as 5 year old me with the mindset I have now though.
I didn't enjoy my childhood anyways, but at least this way I wouldn't be haunted by the knowledge that I wasted over a decade and a half barely doing anything productive or worthwhile. 
Every day is a reset button. My mom started college in her 40’s and found the love of her life in her sixties. Before that she had a nervous breakdown, an abusive marriage, single parented three kids in low income, and remarried an alcoholic who commit suicide in front of her.   Things can change. There is hope   
See this is the kind of story I need to hear, someone who went through real shit. Can your mum come and talk with us? :)
Some say even if we could reset everything we'd make the same choice all over again... But who knows... Btw You're not worthless. We all have something to offer
Yeah you'd probably have to reset and change one factor no matter how big. 
Stay! Help those who need it. Not only will it help you even further, but it'll help others as well. 
r/watchpeopledie did more for me than this sub ever did.   Edit: I'm not saying this sub is useless. What I'm saying is that other subs can be more useful.
r/watchpeopledie did more for me than this sub ever did.   Edit: I'm not saying this sub is useless. What I'm saying is that other subs can be more useful.
I hadn’t heard of this sub before and I regret clicking because seeing those horrific things makes me realize even more how awful the world is and how I don’t want to live on it anymore 
why can’t i see anything in this subreddit?
Nsfw filter on
Unfortunate it might get banned, it's helped a lot of people.
I don't think it's going to get banned, since they added a couple rules in a compromise with the admins. 
I just want to beat the shit out of people who think like that. 
Sadly you'd be beating the shit out of half the population or more...
Sadly you'd be beating the shit out of half the population or more...
It's shooted up.
I guess no one else sees the irony of this statement.
My responses are a tad twisted, yes. I always have the urge to physically abuse abusers as an attempt to defend their victims. A 'let me show you how that feels' thing that just stays with me.  It comes of having siblings to protect i think. Focus stealing as a means of shielding others.
I am so sorry you were abused and that your friend laughed. I hope you can educate him (if you feel inclined to do so) on this topic.
We ain't friends anymore. 
We ain't friends anymore. 
Good man, he's obviously a shitty bigot. I hope you can find someone who will listen to you and comfort you. If you want, you can PM me and we can talk.
We ain't friends anymore. 
Good. I once told an ex-boyfriend that I was sexually abused by several men (it happened around the same time because they all lived in the same home). His response? 'I just can't believe you would put yourself in a situation like that.' My response? I bawled my eyes out - and like an idiot, still stayed with him for awhile.
That is, to put it bluntly, shooted up.  *offers a hug?*
I'm okay, thank you. It really disheartens me that sex imposed on a male child victim and the abuser is a women it makes it less of a issue. Like everyone would lose their shit if the roles were reversed. 
I'm okay, thank you. It really disheartens me that sex imposed on a male child victim and the abuser is a women it makes it less of a issue. Like everyone would lose their shit if the roles were reversed. 
Justifiably.  Just remember, there are just as many people out there who think it's shooted up regardless of the genders involved.  I'm one of them.
All my life I have been ridiculed by my family and friends for not being 'man enough' and for not going outside like 'normal' kids. 
We get told we have choices yet we are told to follow a specific model in how genders should act and think
You should pay a homeless woman with nothing to lose to rape him. See how he feels about that... Fkn idiot doesn't deserve to be your friend. 
It's society which failed us all
It's society which failed us all
I really admire how you handled that horrible comment, OP. I'm so sorry this happened to you. You deserve love and support from true friends, please don't  forget that.
Never related to a comment so much.
Lol yeah
Valid point, but most people grow up to live their adult lives like this. Go to school, get an office job, get married, have 1 1/2 kids, buy a home in the suburbs, buy a minivan. That's what expected by society and that's IMO what schools are trying to prepare kids for. One size fits all education. Ever hear the song 'Ants Marching' by the Dave Matthews Band?
How does one have '1 1/2' kids? What happened the other 1/2?   o.0'''
How does one have '1 1/2' kids? What happened the other 1/2?   o.0'''
Haha. That's the average I believe. Or so I read somewhere. 
I would do this, but I’m Asian and my family has already paid for my college and have high expectations of me.
I’m currently finishing my MFA and applying for teaching positions. What I’ve learned is that education is a business and there’s a lot of admins and teachers who don’t care about genuine learning, just pushing students out the other end with numbers high enough to make themselves look good.  Your undergrad gpa only matters if you plan on going to grad school. Stay strong. And for the love of whoever, make sure you study what you want to, not what your family wants you to. 
I would do this, but I’m Asian and my family has already paid for my college and have high expectations of me.
Just so you know, college is nowhere near as bad as high school. Cs get degrees. 
Just so you know, college is nowhere near as bad as high school. Cs get degrees. 
Tell my parents that... They still think companies ask for your grades... All they care about is the paper you get afterwards
Dang them. It’s not illegal to just drop out and run away from your family. You’re going to die one day, could be tomorrow, do not waste your precious time on earth to satisfy other people. You only get one shot to be satisfied with life.
It’s not illegal but most of have a whole lotta love for family lol and can’t just run away 
Lol “freedom”
Yeah no one is going to arrest you and send you to a gulag if you split from your family and do something that fulfills you 
I don't know about that. I've seen grossly under-qualified people get handed great jobs because of their degree. So whether it was meaningful preparation or not, it may well correlate with success regardless.
Oh, I'm not trying to say a degree is useless, there's definitely valuable knowledge that you need to know for a lot of careers that you learn through studying. I guess my main point was to say that the belief that only great marks and a degree gets you anywhere isn't true. I imagine the people you refer to probably had some sort of skill in handling interviews as well? That's usually what gets you over the line.
I agree, the science domain is definitely the area that is looking for people that are achieving excellent results. Otherwise, in other areas like business, grades don't even matter that much. People want good interpersonal skills instead, and it does makes sense. The issue is that people have become convinced that everything comes down to grades, it doesn't. It comes down to luck and being able to develop yourself as a person, but that isn't encouraged that much.
Ive good interpersonnal skills but I can't stand company type of ppl :o I should have done psychology, I was sure of it before
That's life. School prepares you for the real world. And the real world is the same thing. Lather rinse and repeat. You go to the same job 5 days a week and do the same crap.
Yeah, the real world as in a job. Unless you figure out a way to work for yourself.
That's a form of OCD. Are you taking medication for it? Some SSRIs are very good at tamping down on that sort of thinking.
I wouldn't be that quick to call it OCD and recommend meds for it. I get this way over things and I know I don't have OCD, I just get get stuck in my head too much because I live a really isolated life that's mostly filled with dealing with depression.
Danging eh, man. I hear a certain name, and I break down into tears and want to die. Along with a ton of other shit. 
I get like this too. Some phrases and a bunch of songs that are linked to my dad. It's like the backlog of an abused kid's childhood. I go so numb and inactive, and I quite often loose the ability to move or talk. It's horrible. 
Days? I'm envious. I've been destroyed by rejection for months, years even. Probably why I'm so scared shitless to open up to anyone for so long. Not a healthy mindset to have but there it is. Really wish I could break out of it. It can really mess you up inside.
Same here.
Cbt might be really beneficial for you here. Stay strong brother <3
what is cbt
what is cbt
Cognitive behavioral therapy
Cognitive behavioral therapy
thank you
It puts an extra layer of processing in there.  The 'I need to think about how I am going to feel about this' layer.  It does help, but like everything, it's a learned skill. It's not something you pick up in a week. And it's something you have to work on consistently.
And that's the part that makes me think I wouldn't be able to do this. Finding the motivation to make the effort to think differently... constantly. I do want to get better, but there are times when that doesn't matter. Days when it's difficult to even find the energy to get out of bed in the morning. Knowing what will help me get better and actually finding the motivation to do it are not always the same.  
I am the exact same. It's really sad because one of the few things I used to like about myself was my compassion.
I used to look and sound permanently happy and my mood never changed from that happy, funny, stupid personality. I'm still like this to some people but when I get home I'm so drained from acting all happy that I look and sound like a real downer, with my tone dull and head down. It really scares me and makes me upset that I've changed. I'm not even depressed but I want to return to my old self
I'm slowly starting to see that I get annoyed by happy people too, especially happy couples. Oh well
Same! Like how can one even be that happy? I didn't even know that was possible.
I’m sorry that all the replies to your post so far have been negative. I personally feel the same. I’m much more snappy and short tempered, I have less tolerance for carefree happy people and am easily exhausted by things that should be a joy to me. It’s quite difficult to reconcile my short periods of recovering and strengthening with the complete dejectedness I feel during depression. 
Me too, would help anyone. Now my tolerance is almost nothing and on Lamictle (spell?) a mood stabilizer that helps a bit, but known for nasty side effects if taken long term. Love to be closer to normal and miss that shit soon...
Me too. I accidentally did something a little inconsiderate last night, and froze some chicken my mom was planning on using for dinner tonight. She told me about my little mistake when I came home. My poor, aging mother, who works so hard to provide for the family. I didn't even give a shit. I honestly really don't. All I feel is total apathy. If I get thrown out into the streets I deserve it.
Try to make it your focus tomorrow to be a little bit nicer to her. By writing what you wrote, it's clear that you love/care about her.
It doesn't make me feel better knowing people have it worse.  It just makes me remain depressed and then I get sad for people who are more shooted than me.
I so agree to this.
A-shooting-men.
Took me a moment to realize you were saying Amen and not A Men
'Some people have it worse' ?  How the shoot does anybody know that some people actually have it worse ? Like do you know how they really feel ? These kind of advice are one of the shittiest advice ever exist.   Saying something like that is the same as dismissing everyone's feeling. Also these people doesn't realize that using that quote will induce a bigger guilt to the depressed people.
That's the thing though our experience of life is so subjective, there's gonna be poor kids in Africa who may be poor in quantifiable ways and who actually love life and laugh and feel good all day and then there are rich people in first world countries who are rich in every measurable sense of the word but their existence of life itself is painful.  Strange world.
I always think about the second part when told to me.  How is someone else's misery going to make me feel better?
Oh you have to get your leg amputated? Well at least you didn't have to get both amputated like some people!!!
Oh you have to get your leg amputated? Well at least you didn't have to get both amputated like some people!!!
See . But the fact it .. my leg still gets amputated and the person talking has no idea since it never happened to them..
See . But the fact it .. my leg still gets amputated and the person talking has no idea since it never happened to them..
Sorry that's kind of what I was eluding to... not sure if you caught my sarcasm.
my mom already destroyed me with compare
Mine too
I would rather be poor than have to live with the depression I have I feel terrible all day
You wouldn't, really. Take it from me, someone who is poor AND has depression.
You wouldn't, really. Take it from me, someone who is poor AND has depression.
Yeah but you've both. They're saying one or the other. Really sorry about the shitty situation you're in, though.
All it does it make me feel more like shit. 
 I feel angry when i hear something like that as an pathetic counter-argument, but if i show my wrath, they bash you for that too. It's like 'hey, you are shooted up either way, because my flawed logic is unbeatable'.
I avoid talking about my depression with family and friends completely now partly because of this and partly because when i reach out for help I get alot of tears and 'I love yous' but no help.
Most people don't know how to help or support someone when they ask for help.  Even when people asked how they could help me, I didn't know how to answer. 
My fiance does this shit. And she has the nerve to get upset if I call her out on it.
Most likely because you're just shooting down her attempts at making you happier.
That's great man. I feel like if anyone wants to commit suicide, they shouldn't involve any innocent parties. Even getting hit by a train would cause a lot of inconvenience to everyone. I wouldn't wanna leave the world like that. I really wish I could just die in my sleep. I've been telling myself that everyday for the past 2 years.
Literally the best way to go out.
I think that sometimes but other times I think 'well I'll be dead, so I won't care  either way' ad other times I think, 'shoot the world, I don't owe them any favors'  TBH a train suicide is pretty much top of my list because living in the UK there's no easy gun access. IDK any super high buildings either. 
I know a high building but I’m afraid that I might survive, because of changing my mind while landing. I can’t deal with this shit anymore. I want to kill myself so bad but I can’t get enoguh courage to do it. I always thought that those who killed themselves are strong enough to do it. I’m not saying they made the right decision, I’m just saying they are strong in my point of view while many people see it as weakness
I’ve audibly said to kill myself very often. Almost like a Tourette’s tick or something, I find myself just whisper screaming it to myself sometimes. 
This, always.
The only reason I haven’t commit suicide is because I’m a pussy and I want it to be painless
Knowing my luck, if I tried I would survive it. 
For me it's not even particularly that I want to die. I just don't want to exist. Like I'd prefer it if I just hadn't been born at all.
Mama oooooo  I don't wanna die...  I sometimes wish I'd never been born at all... 
I go for walks in my shitty neighborhood and just kind of hope I get mugged and shot or run over by a drunk driver but mostly I just picture myself getting blown away like a mound of sand  And then I just manage to feel bad about myself because “they’re not real suicidal thoughts since I don’t really want to do anything”
I imagine myself just going on a shooter, i dont care if you kill me, i hope you do. But that would also require me to be in public (and not be a pussy)
I imagine myself just going on a shooter, i dont care if you kill me, i hope you do. But that would also require me to be in public (and not be a pussy)
A guy sexually assaulted a friend of mine in a bar and after sticking up for her he told me he had a gun on him. The words just fell out of my mouth 'Go ahead shoot me. I'm not worth anybody's time anyway. You won't do it. Come on. SHOOT ME!' He stared at me and then just ran away. 
I like to go driving in shitty road conditions and hope I get hit by a truck, or go on solo ski trips without telling anyone where I am and and go through all the sketchiest treed areas hoping I'll have an accident... 
You must be a really good skier. 
I disagree, if I ever had a pistol of any kind in my hands, thats the first thing I'd probably go for. 
SAME!   This right here!!  Whenever people ask me why I don’t own a gun. I always tell them it’s because if I ever got one in my hands it’s over. 
I have stopped taking my meds to work up the strength to kill myself.
i would recommend not doing that, i would say youll regret it but you would be dead. please do not do that, i would recommend talking to some of your friends before you even think of it
Yeah, I love my dogs but they're so destructive. Somehow, they still can put me in a good mood haha.
Good thing you don’t have a bird. I’d argue that my little Cabbage birby is way more ruthless than a little dog.
I'm in your exact position, I'm trying my absolute hardest to keep wearing a smile all day so I can cry and sleep when I get home because I don't have any friends here
Are you an international student?
I just cried the whole period while doing chemistry homework.   I really hope whatever you're going through gets better :)
Oh my God, I hate chemistry so much. I feel like I'm the only person who doesn't understand. I hope you start feeling better too!
Oh my God, I hate chemistry so much. I feel like I'm the only person who doesn't understand. I hope you start feeling better too!
Oh, believe me. It's reassuring to hear others have difficulty with the subject. I include myself in that group. Hope you are feeling immensely better!
If you want a little laugh, this video about a cat reacting to the sound of a can opening made me chortle pretty hard.   https://www.reddit.com/r/aww/comments/7rhugi/i_know_that_sound/
i can't tell whats more weird, the fact that you just the word 'chortle' or the fact that its an actual word. but i'm grateful you did use it cuz now that i'm aware of its existence, i will be using it every single time i can, it's just that funny. also i love the way the cat sat up so fast, that boi was quick af.
not even in a dating sense....i just want that friend that calls me for everything...i am straight...but as a guy, i want that guy friend that yeah we are closer than brothers. He invites me before anyone else (first choice) something i have never found before, and at college, with so much more possibility i am still struggling to find and starting to retire on the idea of it happening 
You have to work on it. Other people don't have perfect relationships (including friendships) and they definitely don't spontaneously happen. The more you talk to and invite someone places the more they're going to do the same. What you see in other people's relationships is just the surface.
You have to work on it. Other people don't have perfect relationships (including friendships) and they definitely don't spontaneously happen. The more you talk to and invite someone places the more they're going to do the same. What you see in other people's relationships is just the surface.
Don't judge the people you hang out with. Whether it's their intelligence, appearance, or talents. You'll notice you keep friends longer and your relationship strengthens.
Someone please tell me we all find it one day. 
Noone can promise you anything. But there are tons of people around. Also nothing lasts forever, not relationships or people. The less you cling to these things, the less weight you'll carry through life.
Noone can promise you anything. But there are tons of people around. Also nothing lasts forever, not relationships or people. The less you cling to these things, the less weight you'll carry through life.
I'm in this midset right now, but I don't want to be. I want to have people in my life again, even if in the past people never stayed.
That would be a nice feeling, wouldn't it? 
I hope that we could feel it too. I hope.
What do you mean by 'without having to try'?
Not having to try and be something they're not. To be able to just be themselves.
tinder in a big city  not being ironic
Only if your a women. Telling depressed men to go onto tinder to find love is the most toxic advice imaginable. If your a women you won't understand.
This is true. I found my very supportive boyfriend on tinder. I'm not funny and very very awkward (diagnosed anxiety) but he thinks I'm alright ¯\_(ツ)_/¯ I was very lucky, I don't think we should've met. 
Tinder works extremely differently for straight guys. Your average guy would have nobody picking him.
Tinder doesn't work for everyone. But doesn't hurt to try also.
It can ruin your confidence. 
It can ruin your confidence. 
Ruined what I had of mine. Had the app for over a month. Had my best pics up, where I thought, I actually looked good. 0 messages, 0 matches. I deleted it.
You want something but you dont want to try and attain it? Ok.
Do you know what subreddit you're in? Half of us know what we want but don't know how to attain it.
This could be great for therapists too, as they could have the opportunity to meet many new possible clients.
I was just thinking, this would be a really great way for newly-licensed therapists or therapists-in-training to build up their client bases.
I was just thinking, this would be a really great way for newly-licensed therapists or therapists-in-training to build up their client bases.
True. I wouldn't want a panel full of newbies. If an experienced therapist is doing it right (as in helping people not to need therapy) there should be openings in their schedule for new clients.
Such a great idea. I have been to so many and each diagnose me as something different and change my meds. I would like online therapy sessions too via skype or something. I have a hard time going. Especially when my agoraphobia is full blown. 
> I would like online therapy sessions too via skype or something.  This exists you know. Just Google 'skype therapy + your country'. (I don't want to be an idiot that gives you a lmgtfy link, but since I don't know where you're from or what you have, I can't really do much else.)
I don't think you can get to know a therapist that quick. 
Nor is a therapist's quality discernible in 10 minutes.
Nor is a therapist's quality discernible in 10 minutes.
When they are late for the first session it is.
I don't think 5-10 minutes is even close to being enough time. I'd want to spend 1-3 sessions with them before making a decision. 
My old insurance allowed you to 'test' therapists. Your first three sessions with one would be free and you could switch to another and get another three free sessions. I would imagine there's a limit/abuse protection clause on it, but I thought that was really respectable.
yes. only dogs. people are fake 
I love dogs. They don't judge, they only love. I wish more people were like that.
I love dogs. They don't judge, they only love. I wish more people were like that.
I like dogs a lot, but I adore my cat. It's easy to say he only loves me because I feed him, but I know better. He has separation anxiety and wails when I'm not home. He sleeps next to me and headbutts my face while purring like a motor. I think that's what absolute acceptance looks like. 
..and there are dogs who are absolute idiots. Nothing is black or white, it's always shades of gray. 
Yeah. My experience with dogs are 70/50. Lots of nice and adorable ones, others are just aggressive for absolutely no reason. I change nothing about my approach. I love doggos overall though.
They will love me again if I can get a job. Before that they just pretend. I'm glad that they're willing to pretend. They're so kind.
'Quit sulking and get to work damnit! I'm tired of you eating my food and staying home on the internet all day.'
'Quit sulking and get to work damnit! I'm tired of you eating my food and staying home on the internet all day.'
Yes. I believe that's what they think whenever they see me eating, drinking, sleeping, playing video games, watching anime, or just sitting there doing nothing.
Music is the only thing that actually likes me as much as I like it... Give it a try when you see the fake world around you excelling without you. 
if u guys like music i recommend learning an instrument if you can afford it. Piano does wonders for my mental health.
As my dad would say, 'the only one who cares about you, is you'
pfft i dont even care about me
Yes but it's been such a long time I'm almost numb to it now.
'Comfortably numb' hits home pretty hard.
I hate you 
Me too
I promise you that's not true. It's a mindset that can be caused from depression. I really recommend seeing a therapist so you can have someone to vent to. It's a really nice thing to have. Stay strong buddy 
This sounds nice but it is certainly true for some. Including me. If you have no family, friends or a relationship then the chance that nobody gives a shoot about you is pretty high. It's not hate or dislike either, usually. Just indifference.
This sounds nice but it is certainly true for some. Including me. If you have no family, friends or a relationship then the chance that nobody gives a shoot about you is pretty high. It's not hate or dislike either, usually. Just indifference.
Maybe I misunderstood his title a little but I took it as he feels like everyone dislikes him. But what you are saying is true. Many people just have to realize most people you see and meet will just feel indifferent towards you, not hatred or disdain.
Yes. But it's not true.
I'm pretty sure nobody really likes me  they don't hate me or anything, they're mostly indifferent
God damn I wish my mom would read this comment. She's in a fit because I don't want to do what I'm good at (science). I just want to be happy and that would be success for me, but she views that as failure.   Do you mind if I ask what you do now? 
Something common and lower-skilled, but point is that if a 'shit' aka low-income job makes you want to wake up each day then its far better than a great job that makes you want to buy that gun and off yourself each day.
Welcome to capitalism.
more like American Dream
for the record though, there are ways to increase your odds of finding a lucky break etc.   as much as I despise 'networking' with regards to buisness, the practice is at least rooted in some amount of rationality rather than being a purely self-serving thing. 
'Networking' is sooo important, but sometimes can be incredibly draining to one's soul XD
People used to tell me the same. Well if I'm so smart, why can't I stop crying xDD
I wish we had the ability to turn off feelings like that sometimes, you know the useless depression where you're depressed in a situation where you don't want to be. You just want to enjoy the moment you're in right now, but you can't because for one reason or another and you can't make your self forget so now you're depressed and you just missed a great moment that you would have enjoyed. Dang man. Sorry for the rant this took a turn for the worse xDDD
Yes that's me too. All the myriad people thinking I was smart when deep down, I knew I just wasn't smart enough... can't overcome the perpetual disappointment and shame I feel.
I still hear it. For gods sake my BOSS wants me to figure out what I want to do in the future and think about it at work when I'm not busy.  He's trying to be encouraging but god damn. I don't want to be reminded of how unsatisfied with my life I am, and how overwhelmingly unprepared I am to try anything else.
To quote fight club, 'you are not special. You are not a beautiful unique snowflake.'. People say shit like you're beautiful or your smart to try to make you feel better but in the end all it does is get your hopes up so they can fall. 
Haha I'd wish. I'd wish I'd be the same crap as literally everyone around me. But I _am_ different. And not in the good way. 
Haha I'd wish. I'd wish I'd be the same crap as literally everyone around me. But I _am_ different. And not in the good way. 
couldn't agree more. I feel really, really different. 
Do you exercise?
When I don't waste my morning lying in bed.
Dude, a girlfriend AND a puppy? You're basically set for life now!
The puppy helps get the gf. :)
The puppy helps get the gf. :)
Women love  sensitive little girls 
Yep, they love  sensitive little girls 
 Idiots get Idiots
Congratulations, but do be careful! Your potential for emotion - both good and bad - has just increased ten-fold. Make sure you can be happy on your own too. Don't invest your entire identity and hope for the future into her, and try to avoid unrealistic expectations.
Solid advice. Congrats /u/Someguywithapuppy
How the shoot do depressed people get girlfriends?  I want one so bad but I just can't get one.  Dang, I'm crying again 
Being depressed =/= being ugly; as much as it hurts, that's the truth. I'm ugly as a pile of dog shit, and I've kinda accepted that having a relationship or being loved in general by someone outside my family is just not gonna happen. And at least I still have a family that cares, no matter how little time I have left with them (they're elderly). Damned are the ones who don't even get to have that.
Being depressed =/= being ugly; as much as it hurts, that's the truth. I'm ugly as a pile of dog shit, and I've kinda accepted that having a relationship or being loved in general by someone outside my family is just not gonna happen. And at least I still have a family that cares, no matter how little time I have left with them (they're elderly). Damned are the ones who don't even get to have that.
Been spending more time with my dad lately for that reason. I don't even wanna think about what will happen when he passes. 
Hold on to her and don't let go, don't make the same mistake i did just because i have depression. Congrats and good luck.
But don't be super clingy or obsessive either, I hear that's bad.
But don't be super clingy or obsessive either, I hear that's bad.
I want one of these so called clingy guys other women complain about. I always get ones who are emotionally unsupportive/unavailable and too busy for me :( it would be nice to be made a priority/have someone there for me when I'm having a bad day and need a hug instead of 'too bad, I'm going to sleep. See you in two weeks' 
I second this. Don't let depression make you forget what's important. I let my girl slip away, its pretty easy to just stop trying. Congrats OP, and best of luck!
It's way too easy to stop showing affection, I got quite the scare a couple days ago when my girlfriend broke down in tears asking me if Im happy with her. Op don't be too clingy but be sure she knows you care.
Running is my anti-depressant. Seriously. 
When I ran I listened to really intense metal and kept thinking to myself, 'This drummer has been going shooting crazy through this whole song, and I'm tired after running for a few minutes? MAN THE HELL UP!'
When I ran I listened to really intense metal and kept thinking to myself, 'This drummer has been going shooting crazy through this whole song, and I'm tired after running for a few minutes? MAN THE HELL UP!'
Wait until you're in good shape, and running becomes easy(er). You'll still get tired, but you're able to comfortably get your miles in every day. Then, do that to the point of being in *great* shape. Not only will you look and feel better all the time, but you'll go for runs where you feel like you're floating. It's something else. 
I rarely listen to music when i run, but the only time i ever ran 9 miles i decided to listen to Abigail Williams and Slayer. I only planned on 3 or 4 miles
There is just something about metal that makes it feel less like a chore and more like an epic struggle.
Doc suggested this for me.  I had a stepper machine that I used and hated every single second of it.  I hated it so much, Doc suggested I stop because it wasn't helping.  Never saw any benefit from the E-word, although I hear about it all the time.
'E-word' meaning endorphins? Get off the Stairmaster and get out to a trail you can drive or run to. If that's not doable, hit the sidewalks/streets. Being outside and actually moving is a key part.
'E-word' meaning endorphins? Get off the Stairmaster and get out to a trail you can drive or run to. If that's not doable, hit the sidewalks/streets. Being outside and actually moving is a key part.
Exercise.  Absolutely hate it.
I made it a 1/4 mile today.
The hardest step is the first, and you've done it. The rest is cake. Be determined, follow through, good luck!
Dang yeah! I just [started working out](http://www.reddit.com/r/Fitness/comments/14h635/first_real_intense_work_out_today/) and had that euphoric effect, but for me it quickly wore off. My gym's closed until after the New Years so I'll be waiting until then.
Don't wait! Try and do stuff around the house or get outside if the weather allows. 
Some times I don't know if I'm depressed or bi-polar.  I feel like a normal guy for a few hours and then some shit goes bad and I sink down with it. The feeling stick around for hours on end and only really goes away unless I sleep it off, even when I wake up I feel as something heavy is on my chest but I don't know what.
I sometimes wonder this too. I'm pretty sure I'm not bipolar though, since my mood only ranges from 'okay' to 'emotionally dead'. I don't remember the last time I actually felt better than 'okay'.  As far as I know, though, depression comes in waves for most people.
I sometimes wonder this too. I'm pretty sure I'm not bipolar though, since my mood only ranges from 'okay' to 'emotionally dead'. I don't remember the last time I actually felt better than 'okay'.  As far as I know, though, depression comes in waves for most people.
For me it's more of a depressed/distracted or very depressed 
I feel the same.  I love everything no mater what and can be so hyper and excited about everything.  Then it hits me I get anxious and start to think of future things and then get depressed.  I don't think I'm bipolar but I'm definitely an emotional roller-coaster.  
Same here. I get really hyperactive and social when with people, but it's when I'm alone that I feel like dying. Double edged sword really, since no one suspects anything is wrong with me because of my energy level when I'm with them, but at least I haven't become unable to function socially like I know a lot of depressed people do
Yup. Yesterday, I felt like I actually got my shit together. Today I just want to curl up and die. 
I know the feeling, today has been a good day. Idk if I can wake up tomorrow... 
I know the feeling, today has been a good day. Idk if I can wake up tomorrow... 
I often feel overloaded after having an active day. Being busy is something I'm so unused to both physically and mentally that I often find myself grumpy and exhausted the following day, even if I sleep well that night.
I feel you dude. I was happy and playing a video game with my bf then all of sudden my feelings are blank and he's getting pissed at me because I won't tell him what's wrong. But I don't know what to say. Ya know? 
Be honest and tell him what's up. Try to, at least. Or tell him you can't talk about it *at that moment*.
I find the hardest thing is knowing I've been triggered and that I'm feeling bad about something kind of dumb and insignificant, which just makes me feel worse, which makes me feel worse, and so on... 
Realizing that I'm having a distorted thought helps me realize that it's not really as bad as I'm thinking it is, and that if I continue to feel bad about it it will just snowball and make things even worse, so the best thing to do is forgive myself and move on as if it didn't happen. I can change the way I'm feeling now. But it takes awareness.
You said it yourself: 'similar things have happened to my friends.' It's normal to say a bad joke sometimes and happens to everyone. After all, no one is able to say a good joke 100% of the time.
I know, but the fact that it shouldn't be affecting me this much just makes it worse. I understand people make bad jokes, I understand I'm not the only one, but I can't help the feelings of worthlessness and depression that follow when I shoot up something so small and dumb.  And the fact that it does affect me this much makes it worse.
*Computer lags* 'Oh you know what I'd rather just die'  *Sees people making quick glances at me on the street* 'Oh shit they're looking at me why the shoot do I exist I'd rather be dead'  My internal thought process  
Your comment about people glancing at you resonates with me. I feel like people are looking at me all the time. The anxiety is so overwhelming, I just wish I could disappear off the face of the earth.
I definitely get this, especially if I'm in a group chat and I make a comment that no body replies to. I think it's a sign that I'm just really insecure and need validation from people. 
I realize that I need validation from other people and I hate it. If I get what I want I'm over the moon, if not I'm crushed. Even with people who don't deserve my admiration or time.
All it takes is a dream about my ex. It's been 5 years and I'm starting to wonder if I'll ever get over her. The contrast between how I feel in the dream with her, like I can do anything, compared to waking up alone knowing I'll never see her again is a brutal way to start the day.
Five shooting years?! Oh jesus! It's only been 6 months of this hell for me. My friend told me to start dating again soon or I could be like this for years but I'm too damned neurotic.  Damn I wish suicide booths were a thing.
Yes, it's driving me insane. I used to have amazing self control with my feelings but now one remark, one misstep in the wrong direction and my anxiety and depression are spiked to an all time high the next week. It shooting sucks.
Oh my God I hate that. Anxiety says 'OH MY GOD THE SKY IS FALLING', depression says 'Lie down and take it like the worthless stupid girl you are'. Every. Time. FOR NO REASON.
my depression triggers when the camera on my phone turn on ..
I swear face camera is the meanest invention in modern years
I hate it when I tell a bad joke. The average person just kind of turns into an idiot when reacting to a bad joke.. It's like just fake laugh or something, no need to be an idiot. But even nice people can becomen idiots when faced with a bad joke.
Yeah people can be surprisingly ungraceful in these everyday situations. I notice when I'm not so depressed that I react in a way that makes their gracelessness not matter as much (a playful 'yeah, yeah, yeah' or something instead of a hurt silence). Unfortunately there's just no way to force that nonchalance when you're down in the dumps.
What was the joke?
OP please deliver 
When someone I consider a friend blatantly ignores me, and then acts friendly in person. I struggle with feelings of insecurity and loneliness. 
I have that too, except it triggers me first into panic PTSD gonna show up any minute mode, *then* the depression kicks in. I must have said something wrong. I must have done something to make them hate me. They can't be incorrect. It's me. I'm the bad friend, I'm worthless, I'm nothing. Aaaaand hello again, pit, how are you doing? Room for one more?
Blunt was a bad idea haha.. How are you dealing with it ? I'm just spiralling down until the end
You should start by disassociating yourself from things that trigger your depression. Remove her from all social media, and cease all contact, if possible. Then, its just a matter of time, and finding other coping mechanisms (preferably not drugs). 
I had an ex that did that. He would hit me, cheat on me, and mentally abuse me. I'd break up with him, and he'd threaten suicide. And since I've been suicidal before I'd feel bad and get back together with him. It is definitely a selfish thing to do in that situation. It messed me up worse than I already was. I don't trust people worth a shit anymore.
why not just let him kill himself?
Truly speaking, one owns his or her body. One has rights to his or her life.  Technically, legally, and fundamentally, suicide is not selfish.  To think someone should have to endure an agonizing life just to be with you... That is selfish, but my god it's also extremely caring. That shows that someone wants you.
Signed.
> Truly speaking, one owns his or her body. One has rights to his or her life.  That's pretty much the definition of selfish:  'Concerned primarily with one's own interests, benefits, welfare, etc., regardless of others.'
Sleeping is selfish. Eating is selfish. Breathing is selfish.  Ridiculous argument.
http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Suicide_legislation#United_States  First setence.
Why are you here? Why are you attacking the opinions of people on a subreddit of opinions you don't share? What's the point of that?
I only count it as selfish if you have people depending on you, like children or someone you look after.  Dictating what choice people can make with their own body, trying to make people who suffer through depression everyday feel guilty over wanting an total exit from the pain is a pretty shit thing to do y'know.
Bingo.  If you partake in suicide being solely responsible for yourself it takes a different meaning all together.  It comes down to context and perspective.
It means you are focused on yourself, and not other people. Which is not always bad.
That would be self-centered. Selfish means putting your wants and needs ahead of other people's, in a way that is excessive or causes harm.
Edit: Sorry. I just realized what kind of impact my words may have. I apologize.
It's not selfish because nobody else has the right to expect you to not end your life. The gruesome deaths we see result from illegality, the familial shock from taboo. Don't you think if suicidal thought was allowed and talked about we wouldn't be having those consequences?
High five, broheme. Power to you and huge respect for your new lady!
Thanks man!
Holy shit man SAME!!! I recently told the guy I had been seeing about all my trust/commitment/mental health issues, fully expecting him to run the shoot away. But nooope. He actually said this, I shit you not, he said 'I want to date you, which means I want to date all of you, depression and all'. WHAAAT?!?!  He is now my boyfriend. :)
Similar here, were on eight years and she's my fiance now. Having that stable 'rock' has easily been the most important thing in dealing/overcoming my depression/mental health.
did she say that ? 
Well...she didn't, but, that's the general trend I've felt, since I'm black, girls don't even recognize me as an option. Honestly, I've come to hate my race a lot.
Some women have an incredible amount of love and share with us when we don't even know how to like ourselves.  I found one ten years ago and it's still hard to fathom.  I'm way happy for you.
Thank you kindly!
Reasons why I don't even try dating or finding friends, but you found one, awesome!! 
Don't give up! Please! Don't. One of the best pieces of advice I can give is momentum. The moment you stop trying it becomes that much harder to get rolling again. I'll be praying for you, for what it's worth.
hey man, im glad you're still around.  i tried to kill myself in august and things arent much better for me either but i believe we'll find happiness soon!  best of luck to you
Dang depression bud.   That's the shitty part, it doesn't suddenly just get better. In reality it is just surviving until something happens (hopefully for the best.)  Keep fighting, if anyone needs a buddy, message me, I've got your back.
I suggest talking to your husband seriously about what you’re going through. Hopefully he can understand and you both can work something out. This seems like a problem that can be solved with a situational change, maybe you can work part-time and put the kids in daycare. You might spend all the money you make on daycare, but it may help your sanity to get away from the kids for a few hours per day. 
When I was in high school, I had a 'daycare' class where we planned and taught a preschool for local kids ages 2-5. Maybe see if there's is something like this around you at a high school? I want to say the daycare was 2.5 hours long, so while it's not a huge amount of time, a decent break 2-3 days a week is better than nothing! 
I don’t think he has a cake walk up there in any way. I know he works really hard. Which is part of the reason I feel so guilty about the way I feel. 
Pay this user no mind. You never suggested your husband's job was easy. This person is just looking for an excuse to be a dumb idiot and you should not feel guilty about expressing your frustrations here of all places. 
Can we stop talking like if being a SAHM is the ~haaardest~ job in the world? No one actually believe this. She said her husband works 16 hours a day. Her husband can't simply decide to stop or half ass his job because he is exhausted and depressed, unlike her.   I don't say this to be mean, but because women create expectations for what they are doing that are clearly not real and then they end up being depressed. 
Sorry dude, but you’re wrong. 🤷🏼‍♀️
I'm always looking for people that actually care about me instead of another pushover of a 'friend' that leaves at a moment's notice when they realize that I don't watch the latest uploads to facevook or play basketball.
Lol, the latest uploads to tinder? I didn't know that was a thing.
Lol, the latest uploads to tinder? I didn't know that was a thing.
you get the shooting joke lmao
Im depressed and it makes me boring. Im boring and nobody wants to be around a boring person, so I get more depressed  Where the shoot is the exit for this god damn ride? I want to get off.
I completely lack a personality anymore. I can't make new relationships and I've lost EVERY relationship I had when I was functioning. No one stuck around to care. Now I am alone, in both my social and love life. I'm going through bankruptcy and living with my parents. I have nothing to live for and this pain is too much to bear. I'm planning my suicide as there is no escape from the pain. There is no other exit to this God damned ride. 
This is so me. I have a job interview in less than four hours and I still have no idea what to say when they ask me questions about myself. I can list everything I hate about myself but when it comes to good or interesting things I'm at a loss.  The only person I can have a conversation that lasts longer than about ten minutes is my sister, and I still feel like we never talk about anything meaningful. 
I hope your job interview went well
Pretty much the same. Not much to add here. Funny part is that in my teens I was thinking the most important part of life is self-culturing and expanding your knowlege base, educating yourself in general to be a better and more worthy human being. And then I ended up like this.
You just described me as a teen. I had such great hopes for the future and I've become this.
I actually like talking to people who are the same way as me. 'Boring' people I guess. Ill take it over the overly excited, happy people a lot of days.
I've yet to meet another person like me irl, makes me feel like an alien.
But a temporary symptom to a temporary problem. If you want someone to talk to man, you can talk to me or anyone else on the internet 
Okay not true. Often is not a temporary problem 
Okay not true. Often is not a temporary problem 
also, cannot talk with 'anyone else.'  sharing vulnerability is something done with discretion. 
also, cannot talk with 'anyone else.'  sharing vulnerability is something done with discretion. 
Also there are soooooooo many people here. Most people who post don't get a lot of attention. My problems aren't unique or interesting, what right do I have to share them. Posting to reddit is screaming into the void
Once I open up, people stop talking to me.
I have similar experiences. It gets hard keeping it all in sometimes.
That could be because the people you open up to notice something about you that is probably annoying or irritating and since you opened up and are now vulnerable they are being nice enough to just stay away rather than expose you to what you can't see about yourself.  Like I never knew I always talk in a condescending tone, I still do, but some things are very hard to change.
something I do is annoying and I have no idea what it is.  Funny thing is, people under 30 really like talking to me, it's just anybody over 30 doesn't seem to want to do it for very long outside of my husband and a few good friends.  I'm 57.
something I do is annoying and I have no idea what it is.  Funny thing is, people under 30 really like talking to me, it's just anybody over 30 doesn't seem to want to do it for very long outside of my husband and a few good friends.  I'm 57.
I'm 21 and since I was 18 all of my most meaningful friendships have been with people 30+. We don't talk everyday or even once a week but our conversations are good ones. So I appreciate them. I just think I have better friendships when I don't have to see or hang out with the people all the time. Right now I'm trying to fake it to keep my sanity. 
For every nugget of common wisdom, there's another nugget that's mutually exclusive.  Nobody knows anything.
> Nobody knows anything.  See, that idiom is more my speed and much more accurate.
I think the 'cut out negative people' advice is more in reference to people who like to bring others down to their level, rather than people who just have negative feelings. Just talking about how you feel, 'I feel like my life has no purpose.' Is much easier for people to listen to and sympathize with than 'all lives are pointless.' Which is telling someone who may be fulfilled by their life that their feelings are invalid which may begin to make them depressed as well. 
> Which is telling someone who may be fulfilled by their life that their feelings are invalid which may begin to make them depressed as well.   I highly doubt it. Anybody who is content with their life is not going to become depressed because of that alone. I just think it's garbage that we have to be careful expressing ourselves around happy people so that they don't become slightly less happy.  #\#NoLivesMatter
> Which is telling someone who may be fulfilled by their life that their feelings are invalid which may begin to make them depressed as well.   I highly doubt it. Anybody who is content with their life is not going to become depressed because of that alone. I just think it's garbage that we have to be careful expressing ourselves around happy people so that they don't become slightly less happy.  #\#NoLivesMatter
It depends.  Some people are really fragile,  and only act happy and positive as coping mechanisms. Out of sight out of mind,  ignore everything they don't like about life and live in ignorance. 
You can open up without being the negative the other advice talks about.  'Everything sucks, is pointless and we will all die' is needlessly negative. 'I feel as if I have no purpose or direction in life and often am very frustrated because of this' essentially says the same thing.  Open up by talking about it in terms of how you feel and not in absolutes.
> 'Everything sucks, is pointless and we will all die' is needlessly negative  Who determines it's needless? It's also true.   > 'I feel as if I have no purpose or direction in life and often am very frustrated because of this'  If people didn't want to listen to the first thing, they don't want to listen to it wrapped up in a more philosophical context. 
I hope that the original advice was meant to cut out people who were holding one back somehow but it's been dumbed down to surrounding yourself with like-minded happy idiots but I could be wrong.
I think that's pretty much what happened. 'I don't need negativity in my life' essentially means I don't want anybody expressing negativity or who has a negative outlook on life.
Feelings are subjective, if you feel it, it's real. No matter what others are telling you. 
This. Everything is in your head because... everything is in your head.   Everything you see, smell, hear, feel, think ends up going through your brain.  So either everything is real or everything is fake.
To what degree do you control your feelings, and to what degree do your feelings affect your actions?   What is 'you'? 
 >What is 'you'?    This is something that I've been asking myself lately, I don't think that it has a real answer.  A scientist might say that it's the integrity of your brain.  A priest might say that it's your soul.  I think you got the point, it's all subjective. 
That is scary familair. 
Yeah, I felt like I was reading that about myself
Mental Health in general isn't taken as seriously as it should be. 
I think part of the problem is Special Snowflake Syndrome. So many people take mental illness lightly and self diagnose themselves with shopping lists of disorders for attention. This is offensive and takes away from people who truly suffer from mental illness. When you say you have depression, or bipolar disorder, or anxiety people are going to think of the special snowflakes and call bs instead of taking you seriously. Those people are doing a disservice to us 
I think part of the problem is Special Snowflake Syndrome. So many people take mental illness lightly and self diagnose themselves with shopping lists of disorders for attention. This is offensive and takes away from people who truly suffer from mental illness. When you say you have depression, or bipolar disorder, or anxiety people are going to think of the special snowflakes and call bs instead of taking you seriously. Those people are doing a disservice to us 
very few people are actually like this. the most common i see is when people say they're OCD though.  edit: im not dismissing that this is a problem though. i just think the major problem has more to do with the stigma of mental health sufferers as being 'ill' and their demonization.
very few people are actually like this. the most common i see is when people say they're OCD though.  edit: im not dismissing that this is a problem though. i just think the major problem has more to do with the stigma of mental health sufferers as being 'ill' and their demonization.
OMG I just organized my whole wardrobe by color! I'm so OCD!
I hate this so much. My Mom will say stuff like 'I get down too but I force myself to be happy, it's a choice'. Not only is it not helpful but you also feel guilty because you can't just change yourself to be happy
I think this happens largely because people think that they understand depression. They think that theyve experienced it and can empathise.  Obviously they dont understand that depression is an illness not just feeling sad. If they could truly empathise they wouldnt call it a choice
Anyone who tells someone with depression to 'get over it' or 'there are people worse' off that you deserves a slap.
Or the person who says 'You know, everyone gets depressed at some point in their life'.   Depression =/= 'I have a sad'. 
Or the person who says 'You know, everyone gets depressed at some point in their life'.   Depression =/= 'I have a sad'. 
Today my aunt today me 'life has its ups and downs but once you get to a better place you look back and think I'm glad I didn't give up'. Thx for that auntie. Thats like telling a guy with a broke leg once it heals you will be better, that doesn't help now.
Today my aunt today me 'life has its ups and downs but once you get to a better place you look back and think I'm glad I didn't give up'. Thx for that auntie. Thats like telling a guy with a broke leg once it heals you will be better, that doesn't help now.
Your auntie gave you a friendly platitude.   How do you know your depression is the mental equivalent of a broken leg? Have you seen a brain x-ray or blood test that shows this, or do you just kinda sorta feel it?
And if a depressed me tells myself this? xD
I've told myself that before - depression has this knack of making you feel unworthy and undeserving of help.  Would never have said it to anyone else though.
I've told myself that before - depression has this knack of making you feel unworthy and undeserving of help.  Would never have said it to anyone else though.
Depression is a shooting liar. It will spin stories or outright fabricate reasons for you to feel like infectious human waste that needs to be scraped from society's shoe. Depression is an idiot.
Judging by how often I see this, I'm beginning to think that people take rich, white men the LEAST seriously.
People who have no real power over anything don't take rich white men seriously. But we know it's not a joke when they're throwing the entire global economy in disarray, or starting another genocide, or passing laws that deny kids sex education. 
i don't even go outside feel proud homie 
Just go outside for at least 1 minute every day. You don't even have to talk. Just embrace it for a bit.
I commend you for having the balls to ask her out.  Too many of us men lack the confidence to do such things.  Rejection or not, it took courage and it will go a long way for you in life.  I once heard of a mens secret society that made their initiates ask 100 women for their phone numbers, so they grew their confidence.  Props to you friend.
Wow imagine being one of the 100 women. Terrible really.
Go you!   As a female it only becomes creepy when after saying no ( for me anyway) if they keep asking or if they make sexual jokes, or advances or keep trying to touch you. 
I'll second this. I once was asked out (in a really appropriate way) by a coworker. I want single so I told him that, and he was like 'oh OK, just thought I'd ask.' he then went back to being a chill friendly coworker and remained friends even after I got a new job. I always thought, huh, he's polite and he listens. Probably a good bf. 
First of all good for you. And if you feel like you were a creep to her you could always just ask and apologie if you were most people seem to be understanding of these things but its no guarantee.
Don't apologise. That makes it look like he did something wrong. He didnt.
Don't apologise. That makes it look like he did something wrong. He didnt.
Not exactly what i meant. I mean ask her if she felt creeped out by him asking and then apologizing for creeping her out. However i get what you mean and it may not be the best course of action
I think the “good” comes in the aftermath of rejection. Its less intimidating to ask girls out in the future if you have already experienced rejection. That’s what I’ve been told. 
Can't disagree. Just, I only approach girls I really do like. If I'm rejected by them, its gonna f with me.  I can't help but to imagine them getting smashed by dudes that they let have them.   Fate is such a b.
Hey mate   The reason you feel like a creep is because you're not supposed to just ask them out like that, you need to flirt a little bit first and gauge what their reaction is. You need to be able to detect if they're romantically interested in you, which really isn't difficult to do, you can sense it from the way they look at how / how much attention they give to you.
I thought I did that part...I guess not well enough. 
I thought I did that part...I guess not well enough. 
You probably did fine, not everyone is going to be interested in you thats what makes relationships special
Well what were your conversations like?  How was she behaving with you?
Light hearted, some jokes here and there. She did not seem bothered by it, she laughed and responded to me instead of trying to close conversation quickly. But maybe I’m just stupid.  My therapist and one of my friends both told me to get better, i need to get out there, meet new people, maybe ask someone out. They both suggested to ask out someone from a class that I talk to often, and this girl seemed to fit. But maybe that was not what they meant. 
you just did something so normal... and you had a normal response... like a yes would also be normal..  you are a normal person.
I wish. I was kind of in a “shoot it”mood. But its probably a good thing in my case. I’d hate to be in a relationship with me. 
25, almost in the same boat. My mom would be devastated if I killed myself so I'm waiting until she passes away until I do it
Same. I just can't wrap the idea of making my parents heartbroken around my head. Funnily enough, at this point if i dont kill myself and continue down the path im going on, i am going to break their hearts anyways so it's a shooting tough situation lmao
Same. I just can't wrap the idea of making my parents heartbroken around my head. Funnily enough, at this point if i dont kill myself and continue down the path im going on, i am going to break their hearts anyways so it's a shooting tough situation lmao
Unfortunately for us one is significantly worse than the other..
Unfortunately for us one is significantly worse than the other..
It really sucks to be stuck in a mental look that leads to your self destruction.
Thanks for the uplifting reply. I am just struggling a lot right now. I'd be interested in talking to you if you don't mind.
Sure man, I'm here for you, you can message me privately if you like or just on here. what ever works for you. :)
Sure man, I'm here for you, you can message me privately if you like or just on here. what ever works for you. :)
This is why im on reddit. The humanity on reddit is more real than the one in real life. 
You can talk to any of us if you want. I personally don’t mind.
HMU too if you need to.
Thanks man. I'm 29 and all this hit close to home. I'd definitely have to come back and read this from time to time.
No worries man, If you ever want to talk about anything feel free to message me .  Our suffering isn't unique, We are all going through trials in our life, But if were all here together helping each other and giving advice to one another, it can ease our pain :)
No worries man, If you ever want to talk about anything feel free to message me .  Our suffering isn't unique, We are all going through trials in our life, But if were all here together helping each other and giving advice to one another, it can ease our pain :)
Thank you so much! I might just take you up on that
> The crazy thing about life is how quickly it can change.  This is true. Life is always moving, don’t lose hope. Turning 30 means nothing. 30 is still young. 
Depends on the circumstances.
Programmer for a living here. That doesn't work.
Programming is perhaps the worst carrer for depressive. If we don't take into account secretariat (wich is more hell for anxious ppl).  Just stop thinking about intelligence and do something outside. But... Ambition 
Programming is perhaps the worst carrer for depressive. If we don't take into account secretariat (wich is more hell for anxious ppl).  Just stop thinking about intelligence and do something outside. But... Ambition 
Caan you elaborate on the programming thing?
>'wow, your brother and sister have so much personality. You kind of got shooted over, didn't you?'  That person sounds like a serious shithead. Who even says that when they meet someone for the first time? I'm so sorry that you had to put up with that in front of a group of other people. That's mortifying. 
Thank you. It's alright, i'll get over it eventually. It does take a special type of shithead to say something like that lol.
I can relate so much. Pretty much my only defining feature at this point is that i'm 'quiet'.  Whenever someone talks to me, i try to keep the conversation going, but all i can really manage are short, vague responses. It gets tiring, i can agree.
Do you mean you're soft-spoken? I find myself trying to raise my voice to I guess, 'normal' decibels.. then I get self conscious and uncomfortable because it sounds awkward in my head 
I hate it when you can feel boredness radiating off them as they talk to you. I feel like behind my back they talk about how I have no personality at all and I'm just a drag to be around. 
Or that they just tolerate you because they feel sorry for you. I have a lot of pride for no apparent reason lol. Sadly, I've lost many friendships over the years because of this. 
This is EXACTLY me. And then I stress about it for days/weeks afterward.  I've tried to confide in my fiancé about it but he doesn't understand which makes me feel even worse about it. 
Days/weeks/years after, i went on a might out 2 years ago i spoke to my friends friend and said something like 'oh i recognize you did you go to so and so school' He replied no and i cant remember what else happened and now i get horrible flash backs to this moment when ever im feeling down .... i dont know why 
Days/weeks/years after, i went on a might out 2 years ago i spoke to my friends friend and said something like 'oh i recognize you did you go to so and so school' He replied no and i cant remember what else happened and now i get horrible flash backs to this moment when ever im feeling down .... i dont know why 
That happens to me too! I lay in bed at night and relive all of the painfully embarrassing/awkward moments of my life.
You can even be social at poke stops that have lures going off. Always people hanging out doing the same thing.
Went out last night with a friend and we set up a lure at a stop where we were taking a break, and it was insane how many people just popped up! By the time we left there were at least 15 people there lol
Its called objectifying. My dad did it to help over come his depression. Everytime something happens like a guy cuts you off in traffic just tell yourself 'thats interesting'. Forces your brain to use its logic and reasoning centre instead of your emotions. 
Even though this is really good advice, it's not as applicable for me as I wish it were, since objectivity/rational thought is (what I would consider to be) my main strength, and even with an uncanny ability to see things as they are (or so it seems to me), and be unaffected by emotional responses/thoughts, I still suffer quite a bit from depression.
Even though this is really good advice, it's not as applicable for me as I wish it were, since objectivity/rational thought is (what I would consider to be) my main strength, and even with an uncanny ability to see things as they are (or so it seems to me), and be unaffected by emotional responses/thoughts, I still suffer quite a bit from depression.
I tried for a long time to intellectualize it and use logic and reasoning to put it down. But what happened was that my own reasoning was warped by the depression itself, in the end serving nothing but to build up under it and erroneously validate the illegitimate concerns my depression grew out of.  I need reasoning from the outside.
This is beautiful, and I don't mean to make light of anything, but woah. You read playboy for the articles.
Only when I'm linked there, really. I'm also gay, if that makes a difference ;)
I like how this prophetic view on grief is posted on playboy's website. Not that it detracts from Colbert's message it's just ironic :)
Not that ironic. Playboy has awesome articles!
That's literally the oldest excuse. hahaha
Because back then the articles in Playboy were worth reading. You know all the TIL stuff that gets posted about Hef? It goes back to stuff he did in the articles of Playboy back then.   That legacy still continues it's just less frequent. 
Is Colbert really Catholic or is just his character religious? I always thought he wasn't spiritual.
Yes, he is Catholic.
I'm feeling the same way right now. So afraid of the future. What am I going to do when all the people I depend on are gone?
Lately I’ve been opening up to people in my life that I see a lot but  I haven’t ever opened up to before.  I’ve been surprised by how many people are going through the same stuff. 
i totally feel this. i’m sorry. i know it’s such an awful feeling.
It really is...makes it so hard to go on...
It really is...makes it so hard to go on...
i understand. i’ve had a really hard time lately and over the last few years in spurts. therapy helps a little but i’m still me. 
I am just like you. Everyone has labeled me similarly. 
Why do people do this? We didn't ask to be like this. Why do they have to make it worse? Some of them may be paranoia but I heard that sometimes people outright say someone is a loser to their face. Dang em.
There’s nothing in your nature stopping you, people can and do change all the time, and things get better for so many... please reach out for help if you can find it in you. I’m rooting for you
I'll consider it, and thanks.
9 hours, almost 300 upvotes... People did acknowledge this post.  I can totally relate to you. That's the most I've related to anyone as far as I can remember. I guess many people do, but we're so isolated that it truly feels like we're the most miserable person in the world. I sure hope we can find a way out of this cycle, back into life. But if that's any solace, know that you're definitely not the only one who feels that way.
I honestly didn't think this post would get so much attention haha. Yeah, it's a little comforting to know I'm not alone in this. I guess it's just hard to really comprehend since it's rare to see others experience this in day to day life, because they're isolated as well..
Don't believe there should be worth to life. You are born the machine starts running and adapting to its surroundings. It looks for s way to pass the DNA forward then stops. 
I mean thats true but you can still find personal worth in life. If you like kids you can be a teacher and feel full filled, if you hate suffering you can be a doctor and feel valuable to others, if you whatever u can do it and be happy
I'm 23 years old. I should be a grown adult at this point, which makes my situation even more pathetic.
There are no adults. Everyone is winging it. 
There are no adults. Everyone is winging it. 
I used to think that too, till I realized I'm actually a manchild retard.
I'm sitting upstairs listening to the woman I love pack boxes as she prepares to move out. Every day I get to watch things slowly disappear into boxes knowing that at the end I'll have to watch her leave for the last time. This is the closest I've ever been to having a family.  Thank you for putting this into words, I get where you are at. 
Stay strong.
what does that even mean
Don't kill yourself and try to keep living your life in the hope for a better future I think.
Depression is a Thief with leveled 100 Sneak, Pickpocket, and Security. It's too shooting good at taking things away. But, unlike any normal thief, it also leaves things in place of stolen items: where there once were confidence, excitement, aspirations, and happiness now lay disappointment, anxiety, hopelessness, and self hatred.
Hahaha I like that analogy a lot 
Hahaha I like that analogy a lot 
Makes me think of something from The Elder Scrolls. 
you're not alone, i'm in the same situation... i feel so guilty about disappointing my parents because of my lack of motivation to study and finish my master  
Oh. It saddens me because we had such huge dreams as kids and teens and as we grow up, we have to end up making compromises because we just cannot deal with going out of this made-up shell of procrastination and sadness.
It hurts, everything just hurts. You try to be happy and be optimistic about life but in the end, all you've got is depression with you like your own shadow. I know I will eventually overcome this shit. I just need to hang on.
You got this. You really do.
Goddamnit I can feel the pain in my stomach like a heavy boulder. really SUCKS
It weighs you down and it rears its ugly head in the worst of times, at a birthday party, at school, at work, anything really. It doesn't care and it will destroy things you never thought you'd lose.    I'm so sorry that you feel this pain
To be forgotten is worse than death 
To be fair at this point a lot of things are worse than death like facing my problems (HA!). Sorry just my poor attempt at humor :) 
i deleted all my social media. facebook instagram snapchat younameit. the less i see people and the less people know of me the better.  i am sick of everyone and everything.
Me too. I went off the grid in January this year. Dang. it. all.
Literally had an existential crisis over this last night. 22 years old and never been to a single party or so much as invited to one. 
Tbh, you don't miss much imo. I'm 21 and I stopped going to party because it's just loud with drunk people and music I don't like. Picture on social media arnt real life. they are fraction of a second of hours of social hell.
Tbh, you don't miss much imo. I'm 21 and I stopped going to party because it's just loud with drunk people and music I don't like. Picture on social media arnt real life. they are fraction of a second of hours of social hell.
Good way to describe party pics. So true. 
Yes. One of the many reasons I deleted Facebook. I had nothing to post because I hate myself, and everyone else seemed so happy. 
Cant even express how true your post it. But it does feel nice knowing there are people who feel just like me
Yep. I try to stay off social media during this time. I hate how it makes me sad seeing all these awesome Halloween parties and people out socializing. I love seeing my 'friends' tweets talking about how much fun they're all going to have and didn't bother to ring me. I know I'm not going to get invited everywhere but gosh it looks like I'll be on my own this entire holiday season.
I know that feel all too well.
Yeah my friends hang out with each other and never invite me to hangout. Hell I can see why I'm not a likable person to be around. 
This is exactly how I feel right now. 
Delete your Facebook. You will feel much better.
But that just makes me feel even more distanced and alone. Having a facebook is the only way I get invited to anything in the first place. :(
Stop using facebook. Believe me, it'll make your life 10x better. 
I went from dreading deleting it to forgetting it exists.
Pfft. We are the lucky one, my friend. My husband and I never go out. We are in our early 30's. Prime partying age. But no. We don't. Why? Because A: it's cheaper to drink at home B: we play video games C: we don't like people.
I want what you have so much. A gf to drink with, game, and be all 'shoot the world' with 
I understand you there. In all honestly, I don't really like people who post about how much fun they are having at the time. Also. I understand how hard is it. I really do, But you are saying you are sitting at home doing nothing. You should go outside for a walk. Maybe work out a bit? Go to the mall, Talk to strangers. How is your day? Stay stong. <3.
My day hasn't been that bad actually, just boring. Thank you for asking! I do go to the gym occasionally and just yesterday I walked to Tim Hortons just to give myself something to do. I just feel so alone most of the time I guess.
Try to look on the bright side, at least you are not wasting time by acting like a child dressing up in costumes. I cringe looking at the front page 
Lighten the shoot up, it's just people trying to have fun. I know it's hard for us to get out, but there's no sense in criticizing other people for things they can actually do.
Oh I think you have me confused.  What I meant was adults dressing up in costumes for Halloween! I know as a child it is socially acceptable, but once you reach the legal age of adulthood, it's one of those things to let go of once you reach a certain age, you should outgrow  childish things like you outgrow a diaper.  Sorry for the confusion
'When I was ten, I read fairy tales in secret and would have been ashamed if I had been found doing so. Now that I am fifty I read them openly. When I became a man I put away childish things, including the fear of childishness and the desire to be very grown up.' - C.S. Lewis
[Reminds me of this](http://www.icounsellor.co.uk/files/2014/03/LOTM-blanket-nest.png)
I love this every time I see it.
Yeah, in a single word, it's hopelessness. I find it easier to cope when I can single out the feeling.  A lot of us feel the same as you.  Hi!
Hey, thanks for the reply. I honestly felt a smidge better by just writing it down.
Hey, thanks for the reply. I honestly felt a smidge better by just writing it down.
We all do. It turns that swirling mess in our heads into something tangible and somewhat measurable. It kind of puts things into a different perspective when re-reading it, too.
Same here!!! I feel like I'm not passionate about anything. I'm not particularly talented at anything and I would rather kill myself than work some typical 9-5 job. I got into film school thinking it was what I wanted to do, now I'm in the final semester and I am extremely close to failing because I can't motivate myself to put in the effort it deserves. Maybe I'll end up a nobody doing nothing. 
I completely understand. I'm actually in the same boat and while I was thinking about all these questions that got to me I was neglecting some very important work. I don't know why I do it because it's like I want to be successful I guess I just can't picture myself being that, idk. I feel ya.
I feel the same as you. I thought I was gonna be a computer programmer, then I decided I wanted to do music instead, and now I'm just stuck unable to imagine myself doing anything.
I feel ya, I'm in my senior year of computer science and for some reason I just neglect my work, I just have no interest anymore. And I don't know why it might be that for some reason, now,  because sophomore year I was kinda psyched. Thanks for the reply.
I feel ya, I'm in my senior year of computer science and for some reason I just neglect my work, I just have no interest anymore. And I don't know why it might be that for some reason, now,  because sophomore year I was kinda psyched. Thanks for the reply.
Are you me. I'm also in my senior year studying computer science and I'm completely lost. I honestly picked this major kind of randomly and didn't put much thought into it. Haven't had any internships and am basically unsure what I'm gonna be doing with my life. Doesn't help that i suck at the major too, everything in it is so hard for me.
Honestly don't know if it's even this day and age, in order to survive you simply have to ignore the wants and needs of others. It's why honesty and goodness is so rare.  Thank you for your response and it is sad, I have another friend who's struggling very much at the moment and it's effecting me at this point. Very much a bummer, but 'that's life'.
I agree, I phrased it badly. It really has always been like this. I feel like social media has increased the competitive factor in comparison to the past.   You're welcome. I hope your friend feels better too. Life really does suck sometimes. 
I agree, I phrased it badly. It really has always been like this. I feel like social media has increased the competitive factor in comparison to the past.   You're welcome. I hope your friend feels better too. Life really does suck sometimes. 
I would disagree. what social media has done is make us all so much more aware of the negatives because of confirmation bias while simultaneously giving an avenue of connection.  Steven pinker gives a great TED talk about it. People used to regularly string cats up and torture them for entertainment. Although there are still examples of bad things happening, there is far less of this kind of behavior, we just see every example of it because people are good at picking out the things that arent normal.
You came to the realization that nothing matters, but that rubs you the wrong way? Why should it? Nothing has ever mattered when you get right down to it―not in any *objective* sort of sense anyway. Yeah, society sucks and is full of narcissists, but why should society matter to you? Society, for the better part of human history, has been dead wrong on just about everything and I don't see that changing any time soon.
It sucks because I'm extroverted, I feel happy and get energy from attention.  I get literally painful anxiety when people stop talking to me. Wish I could get over it, as of late it hasn't been as bad but I still have issues with being alone.
This is precisely how I feel. I see a psychiatrist and he tells me to have more self-compassion... but for some reason I just can't anymore. I used to be so comfortable with myself when I was overweight, had a bunch of friends and a boyfriend. Now, I'm almost underweight, extremely healthy, exercise everyday, meditate, read, work, and go to uni ...but I talk to nobody at my university and broke up with my ex and I'm more depressed than ever.
Yeah I can see myself stumbling into your situation. I'm currently borderline overweight, but I'm working my ass off to fix it. It feels so shitty despite people constantly saying how much better I'll feel doing it.  I want people to like me for me. To be attracted to me because of who I am, not how much I lift or what I eat. Unfortunately my personality is pretty shit, so I have to rely on looks basically completey.
Hey, um, this is gonna sound weird but do you think I can use some of this in a book I'm writing? I feel like this text post needs more attention, but of course if you don't want me to, I understand. 
Go ahead :)
I think shortening attention spans is a direct cause of depression. Happiness is just when you're distracted enough with life. Depression is when you're unable to be distracted anymore. 
Well said
I'm actually investigating ADHD right now for my own lack of focus. I've had two friends who suffered from the same issues who have been diagnosed with ADHD and it sounds a lot like what I'm going through. After hearing your story, I'm even more glad that I brought it up with my counselor this morning. Hopefully I can try medication for it to see if it actually helps or not. :) Thanks.
I've had ADHD my whole life and was just diagnosed with MDD. I feel like my ADHD led to me developing MDD over time in a lot of ways (because of both nature and nurture).   If you have ADHD you're more likely to develop depression, anxiety, bipolar disorder and other psychiatric conditions. 
yeah. i didnt even realise it, but feel like my accumulated 1000 tabs are kinda telling. you have no idea how mch all this sounds like me.
This really sounds like me as well. So many tabs of reading material, youtube videos, tutorials, art blogs, web comics, all this entertainment that I can never bring myself to read, and yet I can not bring myself to close them because I know it's all good material. I need only glance at the tab and suddenly get the urge to just go to sleep and disappear.
yeah i pretty much just sit and eat anymore
My weight has been ever steadily increasing over the years. Eating is the one thing I can fall back on when there is nothing else I feel like doing. I feel so guilty but it's the only comfort I have left. 
New Years is always my worst day. I spend it alone, I cry, I shake, I give in to my anxiety, I break down. The next day, I always think: 'Maybe this year will treat me better'   Then, on the first day of the year, I am always reminded why I want to commit suicide. 
>New Years is always my worst day.  Man, so shooting true. For many others, it's NYE - but for me, the first day of the New Year, the first of many days that just will not be good is absolutely terrifying.   
>New Years is always my worst day.  Man, so shooting true. For many others, it's NYE - but for me, the first day of the New Year, the first of many days that just will not be good is absolutely terrifying.   
I should also specify, it's usually NYE/New Years. As in, around midnight. That's when my anxiety attacks start to lose their shit.
I should also specify, it's usually NYE/New Years. As in, around midnight. That's when my anxiety attacks start to lose their shit.
I couldn't sleep at all last night thinking like that. I feel ya bro. 
Do you take any anxiety medications by chance? 
No, I've never mentioned it to my parents. I want them to be happy and not worrying about me. Should I tell them and get meds....?
No, I've never mentioned it to my parents. I want them to be happy and not worrying about me. Should I tell them and get meds....?
Yes tell them. If you think they won't understand, start doing some research to provide them. It took a while for my family to really really understand. And although my mom is sad that I have to live like this, she also has been very supportive. And you need that. Medicinally and emotionally. 
Yea, saw some fireworks walked home and cried three hours straight without being able to stop. For the last three and a half years that has been my holiday routine. I hate my life.
Aw man that's shooted, I'm so sorry :( like, actually. My heart hurt reading that, and that's rare. The image of crying to fireworks... Man that's like a brilliantly morose movie scene or something...  I cried watching new year's concerts online. So much cheer and everyone hopes...
Yeah, these holidays are bad for depression. Many of us are single and when we see everyone together for the holidays, it reminds us of how lonely we are. And I'm so glad 'The Holidays' are over, but then remembered that Valentines day is a month and a half away. Shoot!. I was friend zoned about a month ago now. Valentine's day is gonna be such a bitter and horrible thing, especially this year.
Second this but without the friend zoned part (add fearing never meeting someone to connect to...) 
This sub is completely useless for helping depressed people. 
Unfortunately I think you're pretty right about that. A lot of threads go without responses. Responses themselves are often not people trying to help OP, but trying to receive help themselves. I don't know. This place does give people a place to vent and feel like they're not alone with their problems. That's something at least. 
Unfortunately I think you're pretty right about that. A lot of threads go without responses. Responses themselves are often not people trying to help OP, but trying to receive help themselves. I don't know. This place does give people a place to vent and feel like they're not alone with their problems. That's something at least. 
I come here to read people's venting when I'm at my worst. That helps me get through these nights  So it is definitely something 
Feel you buddy, only 20 hours in to 2017 and shit's already happening  even though i'd rank 2016 as the worst year of my life i've a feeling this is gonna be worse :/
But it has a 364 in 365 chance of not being worse.  How hopeless that sounds.
http://evanweppler.com/wp-content/uploads/2012/12/depression.jpg
Reminded me of this, too.  It's seems so hard for people to understand, that even though you don't see the disability doesn't mean it's not there or any less severe than, in this case, drowning or losing a limb.  You don't simply just swim back to the shore, grow another limb or have a liver transplant when your entire torso is in necrosis.  And OP: this is an excellent analogy.
Reminded me of this, too.  It's seems so hard for people to understand, that even though you don't see the disability doesn't mean it's not there or any less severe than, in this case, drowning or losing a limb.  You don't simply just swim back to the shore, grow another limb or have a liver transplant when your entire torso is in necrosis.  And OP: this is an excellent analogy.
I often use the Migraine analogy.   both are cuz of your brain trying to kill you, both involve laying in bed with a comforter over your head, wishing you were dead. Both can be held at bay with medication. Both can NOT be over come just by grit and willpower.  
If it feels any better, I'm drowning along you too.   :)
Lets all drown together
Lets all drown together
I'm with you brother. Let's drown together.
I'm with you brother. Let's drown together.
Got room for one more?
Sometimes I wish I would just drown already so they'd take me seriously.
I know that feeling
I don't know if it was on purpose, but in the drawing the head and arms are above water.  So, technically they aren't drowning.  They might be in over their head, or likely to drown eventually, but their head needs to be a little closer to the water to drown.
This seems unnecessary. 
What's shocking to me is that I'm a graduate student in psychology and even my colleagues will take this approach when I'm describing my experiences to them. Shocking. This attitude is so pervasive that even researchers in the field sometimes don't have empathy for those going through it.   Some days just getting out of bed is an absolute triumph, but it feels like no one recognizes it. 
http://i.imgur.com/xPP201q.png  I put this as the background on my phone when my depression flares up
http://i.imgur.com/xPP201q.png  I put this as the background on my phone when my depression flares up
My lock screen has three messages that I read everytime I use my phone and have to unlock it, and though they're thoroughly depressing, they tend to calm me.   'It's better to burn out, than to fade away.' - Part of Neil Young's song 'Hey hey, My My', also used by Kurt Cobain in his suicide note.    'Expectations always disappoint.'    'La tristesse durera toujours' - One of Vincent Van Gogh's last few words, meaning 'The sadness will last forever'.
http://i.imgur.com/HrDNydV.jpg
After seeing the picture, I was going to post this..I'm glad I checked to see if anyone else had. 
this is so on point. that's great man. I do art and, if you don't mind, i might go paint or draw up a version of this. I'll post it if it comes out well. 
yeah dude that would be awesome!
http://hyperboleandahalf.blogspot.com/2013/05/depression-part-two.html  also has a good illustration on how it feels. 
i've read this before and i absolutely love it. spot on.
'Just swim out already! If I can do it, then you can too!'
'everyone gets water in their lungs every now and then. you shouldn't take it so seriously man'
'everyone gets water in their lungs every now and then. you shouldn't take it so seriously man'
'So what if you never learned to swim and your arms are frozen, it's all in your head!'
Accurate as shoot.
More accurate than Robin Hood on Ritalin.
More accurate than Robin Hood on Ritalin.
Thanks for the chuckle. I needed that. 
My life too I’m alone all day. It’s very painful. You understand. Most don’t. If you don’t have a pet and you could take care of one, I highly recommend a cat or dog. They’re good little companions.  
Nothing worse than being depressed & allergic to cats & dogs:) oh joyyy to the world
Nothing worse than being depressed & allergic to cats & dogs:) oh joyyy to the world
I’m allergic but have a cat anyway. I just take constant allergy medication. :)
I’m allergic but have a cat anyway. I just take constant allergy medication. :)
I have a cat too but she's so worth the allergies 
That sucks.  At least I have a job M-F, that keeps my mind & feelings at bay.  But the weekends are so difficult.  Posting a comment here, or maybe in a twitch chat, is the extent of my social life.
Why? How about friends at work, same city, etc?
I'm in your situation, but i spend my life playing videogames, for me it helps.
Same its nothing but xbox everyday for me 
Same its nothing but xbox everyday for me 
I see a lot of people give shit about this but you can honestly make really good friends playing video games cause really it's just a bunch of people enjoying something they have in common
I will be your friend no strings attached no judgement pm me 
Same here! Sending virtual hugs
Hey you're not alone in being alone. There are a lot of us out here that are all in the same boat together, even if the boats are sort of floating on their own. This may be a bit silly, but I've found that talking to bugs about your day really helps me personally. If nothing else it helps me laugh. Best wishes.
It’s not my thing, but I’ve heard plants work too
It’s not my thing, but I’ve heard plants work too
A lady bug just appeared on my keyboard; they like me cuz i pet them with the feather i pull out from the pillows. I gotta keep them hidden from the cat or else she will eat them!
 'end up talking to creeps' what does that even mean 
I'm assuming OP is a female and so she trying chatting online with people but since she is female she ends up with a lot of material for r/creepypms
I totally get this. Depression is a switch that turns off you ability to care, including about bad or annoying stuff. When people around me are getting pissed (justifiably) for whatever reason, I just can't help but shrug and accept it.   It's like a lame superpower in some ways.
Never fear, here comes depression man! He generally doesn't care that much.
Here comes Captain Careless ! He will watch you get mugged and maybe do something I guess. I dunno, why do you ask me ? 
Police mugged the snow woman.
Anxiety is overthinking every little shit.   Depression is not caring at all.   So, if you have both... well.
Stressing about the future, not caring about the present. 
Well yeah it work to a degree, but no sure it's healthy. Spilled my coffee, whatever. Annoying co-worker, whatever. I don't have a reason to get out of bed, whatever. I hate myself too much to eat, whatever. I have nobody who loves me or I can love back, whatever. I wish I wasn't born, whatever.   I might not see the point or just being edgy or something, but I don't see it as a good thing. For some things its okay, but otherwise, it's kinda crippling.
In my case it's more of a 'I'm also not letting these small things bother me, because I have much larger issues.'  Personally it makes it easier for me to actually get out of the house, if I adopt the mentality that other people/circumstances that are sort of beyond my control, can't affect my mood. That being said, you would think I could adopt this to my internal destructive thoughts, but noooo. That would be too easy.
In my case it's more of a 'I'm also not letting these small things bother me, because I have much larger issues.'  Personally it makes it easier for me to actually get out of the house, if I adopt the mentality that other people/circumstances that are sort of beyond my control, can't affect my mood. That being said, you would think I could adopt this to my internal destructive thoughts, but noooo. That would be too easy.
That's a reasonable approach, but if I have a small pebble in my shoes, it still bothers me, you know what I mean ?
That's a reasonable approach, but if I have a small pebble in my shoes, it still bothers me, you know what I mean ?
I completely get it. Sometimes I even tend to get absurdly focused on the small things, which is why it's been a relief for me to let things go.
Or talent!  I remember when I started my web dev course when I was 21 years old and there where some guys, years younger than me but way more experienced and talented in programming and even in graphics.  I wasn't this depressed back then but I remember how it bothered me and how it made me feel insecure about myself.
I am mediocre or below average at most things and I can't stand how there are so many talented people out there. What will I even do in life?
People aren't born with talent. It's the result of hard work. 
Eh, I disagree. That's what prodigies are. People that have a natural inclination for something.
Eh, I disagree. That's what prodigies are. People that have a natural inclination for something.
A prodigy is hardly representative of the average person though, and comparing yourself to one is just asking to chip away at your own sense of self worth.   It's like comparing yourself to a king and getting sad that you don't live in a castle. 
being born with it is literaly the definition of talent 
I stand corrected. 
This is bs  and everybody knows it.
People are born with a natural aptitude for certain tasks. The talent comes from experience and learning. 
This is definitely something I could've written. It's fairly frustrating. I work as a developer, but I really don't have any motivation to get better and try new languages or designs, but I work with people that do and I have disdain for them. I go home every day and spend time with my wife and daughter, watch tv and/or play ps4. I want to have a constructive hobby or project. I just don't have the motivation. 
> I go home every day and spend time with my wife and daughter  Being a good husband/father is an excellent (life-long) constructive hobby/project.
I totally agree. I dropped out of college because I honestly don't see the point in spending so much money for getting a degree in something I have no passion in. I thought I liked Graphic Arts but every day in those classes sucked away any enjoyment I had for the field that I originally had in High School. My two sisters made it through college and my mom is pressuring me to go back and it just baffles her that I just don't have a passion. 
I'm in community college right now just taking the required classes and I have no shooting clue what I'm going to major in. I know I have to make a decision soon but I don't know where to start. It's so overwhelming that I shut it out anytime it enters my brain. 
I have no talent.  My passion is researching immortality, longevity and youth. It isn't any art or music, so I get made fun of for being such a boring person. No one wants to be my friend because I'm boring and have no talent. I can work hard,  but my direction is unclear.  I just got mocked at yesterday for not having any 'real passion'. I just want to live life and do stuff. 
> My passion is researching immortality, longevity and youth  may i ask why you research immortality if you're depressed? It's an interesting topic but it seems kind of counterintuitive 
> My passion is researching immortality, longevity and youth  may i ask why you research immortality if you're depressed? It's an interesting topic but it seems kind of counterintuitive 
I don't want to achieve it. But I feel I have wasted so much time that it would be, not a remedy, but a way to offset it... Or a trap...
Everyone deals with depression differently, my friend. Most people are suicidal. I rarely contemplate suicide.  I want my youth back. I spent it 24/7 studying, doing school assignments and trying to get good grades. I never had fun. Life does have some fun things to do but I can't do them because I'm shackled to responsibilities. I just want to be free. 
ah yes I too long for the days of my childhood 
I feel a bitter jealousy and increase in self loathing every time I see a happy transitioning trans girl.   I just sit here and wonder why I'm incapable of achieving my own dreams. 
yeah I transitioned and I still want to kill myself. I don't understand trans girls who are actually happy and well adjusted
You're not, I do it a lot, mostly because I'm always alone and I even 'participate' and 'act' in the conversations.
I do the exact same actually, sometimes I whisper scream at myself for making myself angry 
I converse with myself so much that I suddenly notice someone standing there watching me. This usually happens at work and it's rather embarrassing.
Ah,yes. The whole 'I was so wrapped in my own conversation, I didn't realize someone one was there' awkwardness. 
I do this too. I've started telling coworkers that if I don't talk to myself, nobody will. Ha!
thisss.. 
Yeah, sometimes I need expert advice ;)
Lol is this a common joke? Cuz I swear I've made the same one and I don't remember copying it from someone
yeah, everyone does to a degree I think.   But lately my mind is rambling to itself alot. constant chatter usually about the same event/ person. It needs to chill cause Im getting tired of listening to it.
honestly I don't even react to the thoughts that much anymore. It's like 'oh its this insecurity again' or 'its that event again.' Like my head  needs to stfu its just annoying at this point
Yep, it seems to be from a combination of stress and having a lot on my mind, at least for me.
Same here.
When I wanna get sad I remind myself I'm annoying and needy to people and that usually gets the tears out
And the pain in my chest that I hate yet find it comforting
And the pain in my chest that I hate yet find it comforting
Yes! Exactly that. I hate it but love it at the same time
And the pain in my chest that I hate yet find it comforting
I straight up like it. It makes me feel closer to death.
Same
Same
Same
Same
Same
Same
I'm the exact opposite a lot of times. Getting out of bed initially is awful, but once I'm up and moving my sleep anxiety starts to kick in and the last thing I want to do is lay down and close my eyes.
Sleep anxiety? Can you elaborate? Never heard of someone refer to it as this.
Sleep anxiety? Can you elaborate? Never heard of someone refer to it as this.
Genuinely terrified to fall asleep. I can't explain it really. I've only recently started seeing a psychiatrist so I haven't even really delved into yet with him, but I tend to average 3 hours of sleep a night until exhaustion just takes over.
Genuinely terrified to fall asleep. I can't explain it really. I've only recently started seeing a psychiatrist so I haven't even really delved into yet with him, but I tend to average 3 hours of sleep a night until exhaustion just takes over.
I can relate :/ it's either that or dtsp not sure.
The happiest people on the planet probably share this sentiment. We're humans. Sleep rules. Don't beat yourself up about it too much. 
Op didn’t say he was beating himself about it though 
Op didn’t say he was beating himself about it though 
Naw I know, but it's r/depression. I just hope that its not a contributing factor, that's all.
Get a new therapist, seriously. A good therapist might want to see what they can do without medication before recommending it, but they wouldn't tell you to avoid it.
You are probably right... the problem is that in my area, it is nearly impossible to find a therapist who isn't booked for months. It took a huge amount of effort just to get in with this one. I will press on though, thank you for the advice.
You are probably right... the problem is that in my area, it is nearly impossible to find a therapist who isn't booked for months. It took a huge amount of effort just to get in with this one. I will press on though, thank you for the advice.
The world is on fire, my friend.  :(  I am sorry.  I had/have the same problems.
better than my therapist. She said 'Life can be difficult!'
I suppose she isn't wrong, but wow that's unhelpful. 
Side note: Those breathing exercises seem ridiculous and initially I was hesitant to try them. It sort of pissed me off when they actually started helping me. Granted, not everything works for everyone, just some food for thought.
I had the same experience. The breathing exercises aren't a cure, but  they are surprisingly helpful for taking a moment to step back and relax a tad. I kind of scoffed at them at first, but was surprised that they actually do help some in some situations for me.
I had the same experience. The breathing exercises aren't a cure, but  they are surprisingly helpful for taking a moment to step back and relax a tad. I kind of scoffed at them at first, but was surprised that they actually do help some in some situations for me.
Ditto. If anything it's made me more aware of when im barely breathing from anxiety.
>There needs to be something which provides immediate, temporary relief from that  It's called heroin. The temporary part is what gets you.
Tell me about it. Have taken oxy a few times when I've been depressed just to get a few hours of respite. But of course, that can lead to hell.
YES!!!! I'VE BEEN WAITING FOR SOMEONE ELSE WHO SHARES MY OPINION THAT SEVERE DEPRESSION OR ANXIETY SHOULD BE CONSIDERED A PHYSICAL ILLNESS. I mean, the brain is a physical object, so are the chemicals it runs on, when those chemicals become low then that causes 'mental' illness, meaning it is caused by a physical ailment.
It absolutely is. A neurosurgeon once told me this. He said he couldn't for the life of him why there was any more stigma attached to it than someone with a brain tumour. Can't believe that in 2017 there is still any stigma whatsoever attached to it. Talk about backwards thinking. 
It absolutely is. A neurosurgeon once told me this. He said he couldn't for the life of him why there was any more stigma attached to it than someone with a brain tumour. Can't believe that in 2017 there is still any stigma whatsoever attached to it. Talk about backwards thinking. 
It also really gets to me when people say 'it's all just in your head,' I mean, if someone had a brain tumor or epilepsy I doubt you would say 'get over it it's all just in your head.' My favourite response to people who say that is 'yeah it is all in my head, you know what else is? The brain, the organ that keeps the body functioning and is responsible for everything you do.'
Yea I really hate the breathing exercise shit. It may help some for anxiety but not depression. Some guy on r/suicidewatch told me it would make me love myself, yea shooting right.
That's the stupid girl of the 'help' our society has. Our society has these systems in place to help the mentally ill and people are willing to listen, but at some point they assume the 'help' is going to kick in and the person will be able to help themselves and it becomes a serious problem because most people still can't pull themselves up out of their respective situations.   Works for some people but not everyone. 
She is actually not that wrong, but she put things in a simplistic way that will never make sense in your current mindstate. Exercise release feel good hormones and positive thoughts break the negativity thought pattern that make depression exist. Sometimes meds are needed but alone, they dont do any magic. 
If she were any good at her job, she would have put it in terms that do work in his current state. I mean, that's the whole point, isn't it?  I do agree though.
I can relate. I dunno why it is so hard to be happy that the other person has achieved something. I am always so jealous or envious, even though it is silly.
Yes, when I see someone from my alum succeeding it's a bitter pill. I'm happy when it's family, which keeps me from thinking I'm an awful person.
Yes, when I see someone from my alum succeeding it's a bitter pill. I'm happy when it's family, which keeps me from thinking I'm an awful person.
I feel bitter over friends, family, acquaintances, strangers...you name it and I've probably been jealous of them at some point or the other. I wish I wasn't such a horrid person.
Story of my life. My significant other of almost ten years left me for some rich doctor guy. It seems like every other weekend they are traveling across the country or doing something interesting.   She's happier now than she was ever with me; I guess I was holding her back. I feel so inferior. 
so sorry :(
That happens when you’re depressed. Everyone seems to be better than you but that’s not true. We are all worth something. 
I feel more like people are just luckier than me and not better per se.
But it's not just your conception that matters. The right sperm has to conceive every one of your ancestors. So think about the probability that every one of you ancestors had to have sex exactly when they did and then multiply it by one in several million to the power of a few thousand generations and you'll start to see how crazy unlikely your existence is.
I’m already unlucky as shoot, you didn’t need to make me aware of this shit as well
'everyone of your ancestors has got laid... just let that sink in...'
They didn't exactly leave me with good cards... anyway, i tried, oh well...
Hmm, I just started thinking... Why do we assume that our 'thinking' is in the sperm, not in the egg? One could think it was going to be 'you' regardless of the spermling that reached you. 
Because there's only one active egg at a time and there is more likely to be a less depressed sperm in the possible hundreds of millions of sperm cells involved I the process of having a child vs a few eggs that get cycled once a month (what, 35 years of periods is like 400ish eggs in a woman's lifetime?)
Because there's only one active egg at a time and there is more likely to be a less depressed sperm in the possible hundreds of millions of sperm cells involved I the process of having a child vs a few eggs that get cycled once a month (what, 35 years of periods is like 400ish eggs in a woman's lifetime?)
Logic at its finest 
But this doesent solve the fact I feel as if many other sperm would bring more happiness to other people, would succeed more, and would be much better members of society 
Nope. I am positive that you and only you deserve to be here! I see it all the time in my work at the ER. If you were different; if you were not here we would all suffer. You are a summation of your genetics and experiences. This makes you in a sense perfect. I know you feel like you have so much wring with you. I feel like that too at times. I know; I know you are wonderful. 
Nope. I am positive that you and only you deserve to be here! I see it all the time in my work at the ER. If you were different; if you were not here we would all suffer. You are a summation of your genetics and experiences. This makes you in a sense perfect. I know you feel like you have so much wring with you. I feel like that too at times. I know; I know you are wonderful. 
Well Damn man. Thanks.
Are you quoting Watchmen? 
Or any movie ever made
Or any movie ever made
Yeah but that's DIRECTLY Watchmen 
Can't bear to look at mirror and even my selfies if clicked by any chance at times
You're able to take selfies?
Yes. I especially hate walking into stores from outside because I have to see myself in the reflection of the glass the entire time I'm walking ugh 
Woah. I can relate to this so much. 
Agreed, man, agreed. I was diagnosed with depression when I was extremely young (single digits), and the few people I told said 'what could you possibly be depressed about at this age??'. Such ignorance. 
Ignorance around depression is very strong.... I've being told similar things to yourself, I've even had people say that depression is all in your mind.  I lost my shit and screamed at them saying something along the lines of 'of course it's in my shooting mind!, why else would it be called a shooting mental disease or mental condition you under-educated   prick'
It's the psychological equivalent of saying “you're too young to have cancer“. Also, depression does not = sadness.
I once got told I was too young to have arthritis, which I do. Guess what? Even children can have arthritis. And depression too. It's a farking medical condition!
The only time I was mentally hospitalized, I was the youngest in ward. Everyone else was 30s to 60s, and I was 20. One day, we had a group meeting, and a social worker came to talk to us. She said to me during it, 'And you're a baby, you shouldn't be in here.'  I was baffled. I've been dealing with mental illness since I was 13, and hearing her say that because I was young I shouldn't be mentally ill shocked me.
I shooting *hate* when people tell me I'm a baby. Babies don't drive cars, pay for gas and school, have jobs, or buy their own airplane tickets. I have met extraordinary people who are younger than I am, and I would never tell them they're babies. I'm told it all the time by people who are only 3-6 years older than I am.   Okay, vent session over...  Edit: spelling
I shooting *hate* when people tell me I'm a baby. Babies don't drive cars, pay for gas and school, have jobs, or buy their own airplane tickets. I have met extraordinary people who are younger than I am, and I would never tell them they're babies. I'm told it all the time by people who are only 3-6 years older than I am.   Okay, vent session over...  Edit: spelling
I hate this too. I get called 'young man' all the time. The man who assaulted me used to call me 'young man.'   Every time somebody calls me that I can see his face, and hear the way he drew out 'ng' and put so much emphasis on 'an'
The zing/burn is strong in this one. And that's how I feel about some grown ups.  But in another way.. you can't blame people for not being wise enough. Or for not having developed that mental awakening.
You can blame them, although that doesn't mean you should. Many of them are totally deserving of blame; others not.
Oh I HATE THIS ONE SO MUCH.  I have immigrant parents who have seen sides of the life that I haven't and I understand that but STILL.  My doctor even said this to me once when I told her I'm having anxiety issues. It was horrendous. 
Are you Chinese?
I'm sorry to hear people are treating you this way... This is the exact reason I don't tell a lot of people and am not very open about my depression and such. :/ it sucks arse 
If it makes you feel better, I'm quite open about my bipolar and have gotten almost exclusively supportive responses. There was one idiot who didn't quite understand it's not offensive when I call myself crazy but it is when she does, but other than that it seems to have only made my life easier.
If it makes you feel better, I'm quite open about my bipolar and have gotten almost exclusively supportive responses. There was one idiot who didn't quite understand it's not offensive when I call myself crazy but it is when she does, but other than that it seems to have only made my life easier.
I've being told directly and indirectly, hundreds of times by people to just get over it. Just be happy, try doing things that make me happy... All the bullshit... I tried being open about it... Sometimes doesn't work for some :/     
I've being told directly and indirectly, hundreds of times by people to just get over it. Just be happy, try doing things that make me happy... All the bullshit... I tried being open about it... Sometimes doesn't work for some :/     
Can I ask what geographic region this is going on in?  And tbh, doing things that used to make me happy sometimes manages to cut through the anhedonia. So while very little made me happy, sometimes it was possible to do things that made me happy, and I think they're worth pursuing.  Good luck!
My grandparents were surprised I could be depressed at 21. Their shock just reflects their ignorance. Isn't it more prevalent at my age? 
I believe it is. Suicide is supposed to be among the top 3 causes of death for teenagers and people in their early twenties. I don't think these suicides were whimsical or based solely in anything other than pain.
I remember from Psych 101 that depressed people do objectively see the world and happy people are simply delusional.  Ignorance is bliss.
No wonder, happy people are, per definition, on drugs, basically. Produced by their own bodys, of course, but drugs nonetheless.
No wonder, happy people are, per definition, on drugs, basically. Produced by their own bodys, of course, but drugs nonetheless.
Wow... that's pretty damn true. Never thought of it like that 
You perfectly described what I'm feeling currently. Also, your writing is A+ and that made me happy--so force for good, you are!
Haha thank you, it's the one thing I think I have a talent for really. Managing to put thoughts into words in a good way. I'm glad it made you happy, at least that's one good thing.
New notecard for you: you can make strangers smile (: this is such a neat idea!
And you get the same notecard from me :)
You should add: I can make other people with depression smile and not feel so alone.   Cause you totally did that for me.
It's the comments like these that make me so glad I got the courage to put these up. These comments make me cry tears of joy because it makes me feel like I'm having an impact. Thank you.
It's the comments like these that make me so glad I got the courage to put these up. These comments make me cry tears of joy because it makes me feel like I'm having an impact. Thank you.
You are, you really are. Thank you for posting this. I think I might make some cards for myself, too. :)
Keep going man. If just one of us gets happy, then depression doesn't win.
We're all going to win someday. I just know it. Stay strong.
OP you have my face. 
I have a doppelgänger?? :o
I have a doppelgänger?? :o
Apparently 
That's an interesting idea, thanks for sharing!  OP you have a wonderful smile! I never said this to anyone before but omg, you are freaking hot!
Thank you so much :)
Tell me im hot too so i dont feel ugly :(
You're hot ;)
You're hot ;)
Thank you boosted my day at work youre such a beautiful person with a warm heart :) dont ever let anythung bring you down just do what you do and be happy.
almost made me tear up at work. this is GREAT. i think we should all do something like this & share it here.  you seem like a totally awesome dude. & i love your bunny coffee mug! & your debating face. :)
I would love to see your note cards! Thank you for the compliments on my debating face and my prized bunny mug :)
I would love to see your note cards! Thank you for the compliments on my debating face and my prized bunny mug :)
i tried to think of some of these as i walked home from work tonight, & hit a roadblock. although i know the point is to focus on positive aspects of yourself, but i started to feel like most of the things i wanted to write couldn't be confirmed. 'i am kind to people'... maybe i think i'm kind, but everyone else thinks i'm a jerk? 'i'm a good listener'... what if i just think i am, but i'm not?  this is harder than i thought. /endrant
i tried to think of some of these as i walked home from work tonight, & hit a roadblock. although i know the point is to focus on positive aspects of yourself, but i started to feel like most of the things i wanted to write couldn't be confirmed. 'i am kind to people'... maybe i think i'm kind, but everyone else thinks i'm a jerk? 'i'm a good listener'... what if i just think i am, but i'm not?  this is harder than i thought. /endrant
That's just depression trying to win. You're going to win this battle, friend. Keep thinking, I promise you're going to stomp depression into the dirt. We're all going to look back one day and realize how far we've come, and then /r/depression can have a huge cry fest together, but for a good reason. I love you!
Please add 'I made a stranger smile and cry at the same time.'  Also, 'I've inspired others'
You can add that to yours as well. I'm sitting in my apartment crying and smiling. I love this community.
Keep going man.. It personally made sad cause I'm still trying to find something I like about myself.
At least you aren't alone. You have all of us here at /r/depression with you.
I did this the other day. I took it more seriously than I've taken anything in a while. Sat there for hours, thought about it for hours, and I still couldn't come up with anything that mattered.
You've got a whole community at /r/depression who love you, that's something to put :)
How has no one mentioned this guy has an excellent smile? I loved the idea. I loved to optimism. But I smiled because I saw your smile. That's a powerful thing. You should keep doing that. The fact that you're smiling is an accomplishment in itself to some of us. And not everyone has a smile so pretty :)
That makes me want to smile until my face hurts! Thank you so much :) I'm glad that I can make you smile as well! If one of us starts smiling, I think it'll start a smiling chain so we all smile forever :)
That makes me want to smile until my face hurts! Thank you so much :) I'm glad that I can make you smile as well! If one of us starts smiling, I think it'll start a smiling chain so we all smile forever :)
You're definitely on this uphill climb with me and its nice to see you're making progress. For me, its strengthening to feel like I can stand shoulder to shoulder with others.
You're definitely on this uphill climb with me and its nice to see you're making progress. For me, its strengthening to feel like I can stand shoulder to shoulder with others.
A wise musical once said, 'We're all in this together.' But on a serious note, it's strengthening for me too!
I hope this isn't weird coming from a stranger, but I'm proud of you :) 
I don't think it's weird at all, in fact it made me smile. I was telling one of my best friends yesterday how I just wanted someone to be proud of me. Thank you for fulfilling that :)
I don't think it's weird at all, in fact it made me smile. I was telling one of my best friends yesterday how I just wanted someone to be proud of me. Thank you for fulfilling that :)
Yay!
Wow! Just from reading those I think you are an awesome dude!    Also, the accomplishment of having clear pee while being a coffee/tea drinker is very good! I have much to learn from you!
Thank you! It's actually very easy, you just have to alternate water and other liquids!
How were none of them about your hair? I mean, the facial hair is great, but that hair, I'm a dude and I'm jealous.
Hahaha thanks man! I grew it myself!
Hahaha thanks man! I grew it myself!
/r/dadjokes   :P
Congratulations on the glacier, I wish I could stand that kind of cold. How hard was it to climb?
The glacier itself wasn't hard, but climbing the mountain to get there was intense. I wanted to quit after the first two days, but thankfully my guides kept me going! 
My CBT psychologist suggested a very similar thing to me - making a Positives Notebook, where you write down every tiny little mundane thing that you did that was a good thing, every day, so you build up a body of evidence to show yourself how great you are :) Sounds corny, but it really does help!
This is a fantastic idea for where I'm at with my depression, because it's concrete... There's no way to deny that I took a walk or fixed my hair or did my laundry, that shit got done (if indeed it did), but it's just about impossible for me to make a list of abstract things I like about myself. Depending on the day, it feels either like a lie or a conceit. But I could see this exercise helping me get there.
I like you. Let's be friends.
Okay :)
Congrats on finding something that helps!!  I highly recommend the book [Feeling Good](http://www.amazon.com/Feeling-Good-The-Mood-Therapy/dp/0380810336/ref=sr_1_1?ie=UTF8&qid=1384361016&sr=8-1&keywords=feeling+good) if cognitive therapy techniques work for you.  You may find it to be a good compliment to your therapy. :)
I just bought it for my Kindle :) thank you for the suggestion!
This is amazing, you made my day.
You're all making my day! I'm so glad that I stumbled upon /r/depression. You're great!
Adding my compliments: you made me smile. The things you wrote, the photos, and your comments here all brightened my day a little bit. Keep on being a lovely human being! :)
And now you've made me smile too :)
This is a fantastic idea. Brb, gonna go grab my post it notes! :)
Take pictures :)
OP, that's an exceptional hair piece...
Thanks very much! I grew it myself ;)
You should add: I'm good looking. 
You can add that you just made a 19 year old college student smile :)
You are adorable. How do you make smoke tornadoes????
You pull hookah smoke into your mouth, slowly exhale it onto a table, then raise your hand quickly. I'm nerdy so I should know the science behind it, but alas I don't. It's a lot cooler to see :) thank you!
Thank you for sharing. These are great. You've made a lot of people smile with this post, which is commendable.   You seem like a really awesome guy :)  I wish I had something to write on my note-cards.
Just keep thinking! You'll come up with something, I just know it!
You realize that you know nothing....JON SNOW!!!!!
Or.... Gadfly!
You are a babe, and pretty funny to boot :)
Thank you, love!
Words cannot express how awesome this is. You're amazing.
Thank you so much!
hey you should be drinking chai... just kidding you're awesome :)
Chai is splendid! I know they get a lot of hate, but Teavana's Maharaja Chai Oolong is amazing to me :)
Chai is splendid! I know they get a lot of hate, but Teavana's Maharaja Chai Oolong is amazing to me :)
I have no idea what you said, but you're cute so have an upvote :)
I have no idea what you said, but you're cute so have an upvote :)
It's a blend from the store Teavana! I should send you some ;)
Good job, man. What as? 
Working in a donut factory. I know it's dead end and all, but it's as much money as I need, and it'll be great to have something to occupy myself 38 hours out of the week rather than wallowing in my head alone. 
Working in a donut factory. I know it's dead end and all, but it's as much money as I need, and it'll be great to have something to occupy myself 38 hours out of the week rather than wallowing in my head alone. 
Re: Dead end, look up how to describe the position on a resume later on.   Most people hiring will have a decent understanding of what the job involved so don't portray it unreasonably. However you can still pick up keywords, skills and experiences there that will show you knew what to do with your time there instead of just slaving away. That's the part that counts. :)  Also, don't become Homer Simpson. ;)
Re: Dead end, look up how to describe the position on a resume later on.   Most people hiring will have a decent understanding of what the job involved so don't portray it unreasonably. However you can still pick up keywords, skills and experiences there that will show you knew what to do with your time there instead of just slaving away. That's the part that counts. :)  Also, don't become Homer Simpson. ;)
Thanks man :) 
Work is work, man. Don't let anyone judge you for what you do, at all, for anything - you're putting more back into the system than you take through your own two hands. Proud of you, boss.  
That's such a good way to describe it, thank you
Hey for you and anyone else feeling like this, maybe you should check out /r/dpdr too. I relate to this (and this community) but this describes dpdr very well
interesting  fwiw, I also identify with the comment, but for me the cage is just a figurative expression of my inability to participate  I feel this way because I've been out of touch with what normal people do and how they socialize for so long that I have to put on an act even for basic interactions  the things that other people seem to do so effortlessly are complicated and awkward for me, and I can't do them well enough to fool anyone 
Huh there' s a reddit for everything. How weird. My head is spinning a little bit lol.
You're never alone <3
Doubt it. If we count in how good your circumstances are v. how little you do with your life, I doubt you could take me.   We could start a club, tho.
New favorite club
I've always enjoyed nightmares. I used to take drugs before bed frequently in order to enhance them and ensure them. They sort of overshadowed everything else in my life. Helped me come to term with things. I hated having happy dreams and wake up with hope. That false hope is just the worse thing when I'm down.
I had one of those same false-hope dreams last night. This hit hard. Waking up sucked. 
I had one of those same false-hope dreams last night. This hit hard. Waking up sucked. 
The worst are the ones where you actually accomplish something or get something you really like/want and then when you wake up it's gone. They have completely ruined entire days..
The worst are the ones where you actually accomplish something or get something you really like/want and then when you wake up it's gone. They have completely ruined entire days..
Absolutely.  Or the ones that make you feel an inexplicable way and completely dominate your thoughts the next day. Like if a dream left you with a profound sadness and it wasn't even about you.
That's my situation at the moment as well. All I want to do is sleep, but I have bad dreams so often.  What are your dreams about?
I usually dream about running away from something and then thinking I'm safe then it comes out of nowhere captures me. 
YES THIS. Someone was like 'you can't do this alone - your friends are here, we all love and support you' and I'm sitting here thinking like 'HAHHHHH JOOOOOOKES yeah I have friends but too bad no one knows my real state of mind because I keep it all to myself because no one wants to be friends with someone who's negative all the time so I wear a mask 24/7 YAY TRUST ISSUES' 
I love you bro haha so true
When my kids were small and I had to teach them that the world can be unsafe and people might try to hurt them, I didn't teach them to tell one adult, I taught them to tell EVERY adult. Keep asking for help. I had to build my own circle of love and support too. It can be done. Keep asking. You only need one yes. Ask until you find it. Good luck friend.
Thanks. I'm just so alone, I have no friends or family and I never go out. I guess this subreddit is good enough for now.
life is shit shoot this world
Agreed 
The sad thing is I had people willing to help me, but I shut them out. I've never felt more alone.
I'm in the same boat. I've pushed everyone who ever cared about me away and now there's no one left. 
I shut a lot of people out who I thought were my friends, but it turned out they didn't really give a shit about me and treated me like a doormat. I can't tell if it's my fault for not sticking up for myself more though.    Sadly enough, I even miss those personal relationships. 
I have a hard time believing people like me. I always think people tolerate me when i'm around. I never feel wanted. Except when I come home and am greeted by my dog. That's the only time I feel wanted in this world.
Wow. Literally opened reddit to see this after my girlfriend told me she needs a break to figure out her depression stuff alone.
I, too, go to Reddit when I'm depressed
I know you may feel like you're alone. Spending night after night without other people, drinking or crying yourself to sleep, I know, I've been there. While you may be alone physically, you're not alone 'in spirit', many share the same hardships, sorrow and grievances. You're not alone. Find some help in a local group that fits your problems, persevere and you'll see your life becomes better with time.  Have a good rest of the week, month, year and life.
Thanks.   I don't know, but for me, I feel like I'm not alone physically as I have family and my dog, but I am alone mentally. No one around me understands. I'm doing uni, work, training my dog, life, alone. Does that make sense?
Sending love 💛
❤
need a friend? msg me I feel alone too 
can i msg you too? 
can i msg you too? 
what about me
Apathy is keeping us from a full on mental breakdown. When things get really bad for me, I go into shut down mode. My brain is like 'RIGHT THAT'S IT, closed for business, clock out now before the shit show starts'.  It's trying to protect me but all it's doing is delaying the inevitable.  So I'm repressed but volatile.
That's a really good way of describing it, I do that too.
For me, it's mostly a defense mechanism. If I can push myself into denial that I don't actually care, it makes things a little easier. But there's always something that spits in the face of that and reminds me I care a little too much about insignificant or seemingly meaningless things. 
Yeah I suppose it is a defence mechanism, and when I'm overwhelmed with anxiety or loneliness/depression I'd give anything not to feel anything anymore. I do almost trick myself into thinking I feel better...it's only when those little things go wrong and I overreact so much that I realise I'm actually not in a good place at all. 
At least you have an idea about what you feel and what's happening to you. This is just a period in your life that is gonna disappear, all you have to do is let things happen and trust in yourself. You are the only one who can move on!  
that's neither helpful nor encouraging. If you went through a depressive period and this mind set has helped you then describe it as such. Don't just throw motivational one-liners around like Gospel. things are more complex than that. 
Do you ever feel like if you could find a single person to connect with you wouldn't feel so shitty? I do. I feel like this all the time.
Yeah I do. That's why I often don't get any relief from socialising- it feels meaningless. You can be surrounded by dozens of people but feel invisible.
Yeah I do. That's why I often don't get any relief from socialising- it feels meaningless. You can be surrounded by dozens of people but feel invisible.
Connecting helps so much but unfortunately even then it doesn't make everything better. I know it's hard to get the energy to make friends when you're depressed but it's impossible to expect everyone to come to us. For all we know they feel the same way.  
I hate this so much. I hate seeing all the people around me some looking at each other as tho they have a special connection. Some in large groups talking and sharing with each other. Its like everyone is part of some secrete club intent on not letting me in 
I have this problem too. Maybe we should force ourselves in through assertiveness and trying hard?
I want that commercialized concept of love to just come at me and envelop me before I could have a second thought. But I know it's not going to happen. Life isn't a fairy tale. 
It's not a fairytale, but it can be motivating. Having just the inkling of a real relationship can give you the energy to nurture it into more.
Yeah, same here. But most everyone I know avoids me anymore.
Well maybe if you weren't such a pretentious hipster you'd be more approachable :)
You need to love yourself before you can love anyone else.  Loneliness is controllable.
This is very, very untrue.
I spend all my time in fantasies. Makes life even more dull
I daydream a lot, however, after I've realised it was just a made up story in my head, the warm feeling just dissapears so fast, getting even colder, for the fact that I keep feeding my brain fake infromation.
I pretend to be with the love of my life. I hold her hand, wrap my hand around her and try to feel the warmth of her. I pretend she is right there beside me, holding on to me. Her body touches mine, I could feel her breathing. Then I snap out of it, and start to cry. Then I go numb and just fall asleep. 
Same :(
There is actually a medical term for this. It starts with an 'M' but I've forgotten the term. I do it too. It's a form of coping and happens mainly when someone has experienced trauma or childhood trauma.
Maladaptive daydreaming?
Maladaptive daydreaming?
>to describe an extensive fantasy activity that replaces human interaction and/or interferes with academic, interpersonal, or vocational functioning.  >https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Maladaptive_daydreaming  So it's only true if it's 'excessive'? If it hurts one personal life? I mean, I do it often but not 'hours' like described in the article.   And the only way it hurts my life is that it may make it more difficult for me to reach out.  Idk. Selfdiagnoses aren't worth much.
Do you ever try to motivate yourself to do things and it works for a while but then seemingly overnight you lose all motivation to do any of it? That's my biggest issue.   I've signed up for gyms and went without too much issue for a couple weeks then overnight never go again. Makes progressing in life very hard in many aspects. 
All the time. I thought I would try cooking easy, healthy recipes, or at least something laughably simple like making a sandwich. Now I'm back to eating fast food and frozen dinners. And even motivating myself to do *that* has become a struggle lately. And I'm only 20. 
The worst part can be knowing that you ARE a little bit lazy, but then not knowing how much of that extends into depression.  I know I'm the kind of guy who likes to sit around.  I know that I prefer time inside and playing video games to sweating in a scorching sun.  So where does that end?
-off topic- I read your comment and started singing '  'Yeah im the kinf of guy  Who'll never settle down'etc. Love that song
saaaaaaame. like i have so much stuff to do and i know it and i'm like wow i'm such a piece of shit why am i not getting this stuff done
Right? For me it's *Wow, I'm a lazy shooting bastard, my parents are working hard to pay for my college education and here I am failing my classes and browsing reddit all day*
Right? For me it's *Wow, I'm a lazy shooting bastard, my parents are working hard to pay for my college education and here I am failing my classes and browsing reddit all day*
Oh god OP that sounds exactly like me right now. I'm sorry. 
Oh god OP that sounds exactly like me right now. I'm sorry. 
Especially feels worse when you see your friends graduate and land really great jobs. I've stopped going to Facebook because the newsfeed just makes me feel so bad about myself. 
I feel the same way. I just don't want to do ANYTHING. I don't even really want to play video games or go biking like I used to love to. I just want to lay on my bed and not do anything.   I used to become more 'alive' if I smoked weed, but now even if I'm high I just want to lay in my bed with room darkened and stare at the ceiling. 
Just what I was going to reply with. I *used* to love doing all sorts of things. Now I'm proud of myself just for getting out of bed when I have to.
Just what I was going to reply with. I *used* to love doing all sorts of things. Now I'm proud of myself just for getting out of bed when I have to.
It feels both weird and good to know there are other people who feel exactly like me. 
The worst thing is that it has become a chore to hang out with friends. They are left wondering if I want to hang out with them at all. I always want to, but it's just so difficult  
I also feel this way. I *want* to study and become good at math and chemistry, but it feels like just putting my textbook on my desk and opening it is more difficult than solving an actual calculus problem...
I also feel this way. I *want* to study and become good at math and chemistry, but it feels like just putting my textbook on my desk and opening it is more difficult than solving an actual calculus problem...
I find that if I just take my books out and put them on my desk I get at least something done, but that first step is impossible. 
I still can't stop smoking it, I kinda don't want to stop because I think I will turn to other drugs if I stop smoking. 
I'm in this same boat and I think I'm gonna quit because I think it's part of the problem. I tend to feel a bit slower getting started the next morning when I smoke. I think it's harmless in general, but I'm starting to think that coupled with depression it results in a haze or apathetic paralysis. 
I have no idea what's wrong with me either OP.  I don't live my life any more, I survive.  I'm like some sort of stone. I don't even know.    Hopefully, we'll both get out of it some day.
> I don't live my life any more, I survive. I'm like some sort of stone.  Exactly how I feel. I don't live, I just *exist*. 
> I don't live my life any more, I survive. I'm like some sort of stone.  Exactly how I feel. I don't live, I just *exist*. 
It's like that feeling when you're sick and you know you're gonna puke again in a few minutes and you're just waiting for the inevitable.   You know there's nothing you can do to make the feeling go away yet it feels so bad that you can't concentrate on anything else. At first you can still sooth the pain by distractions until the pressure from the outside relative to your empty stomach hurts too much.   All you can do is exist.
I agree that their intention is well-meaning, but I am specifically thinking about cases where after having told someone I have moderate depression they suggest things like 'just stay positive!' and then are upset if I can't.
I actually laughed in my coworker's face when I told him I had depression and he said, 'really? But you always seem so positive and you have a lot going for you. You seem so happy. How can you be depressed?'   Um, it doesn't work like that. Even if a person has a lot of positives in his/her life it doesn't mean that person isn't depressed. The more I tried to explain it, the more confused he looked. 
Laziness is different. You can be lazy say about cleaning your room but you get excited say to see a movie, eat your favorite food. Depression on the other hand, you feel like you have no energy. In bad cases, cannot even bring yorself to shower. And most things do not gve you joy.
But there are some things I look forward to, like eating, sleeping, or watching a good movie. Those are things that I genuinely enjoy that can get my mind off my problems, at least temporarily. But as you said, I still have no energy, and the things I listed don't require that much energy, so I guess that's why I can enjoy them and not feel lazy.
But there are some things I look forward to, like eating, sleeping, or watching a good movie. Those are things that I genuinely enjoy that can get my mind off my problems, at least temporarily. But as you said, I still have no energy, and the things I listed don't require that much energy, so I guess that's why I can enjoy them and not feel lazy.
That's the sole reason why I used to drink so much almost every single day for over a year. It felt great to be enthusiastic about something for once again. But obviously, it's a horrible path to follow as it's only transient and got me nowhere.
...I haven't showered in 5 days.  I'm gonna talk to my therapist tomorrow morning.
Please do. Hugs.
Thanks for sharing cause this is my issue every single day. It's getting worse too since looming deadlines. I don't know, I hope I'm not using depression as an excuse or something. Logical me knows it's really the depression, a chemical issue that I can't simply fix. But yeah it's getting harder to convince my depressed self of that. Best of luck to you OP, I know how it feels.
Yeah, I worry about using it as an excuse too. I always wonder how much control over my mind I really have, and if maybe I *can* just 'snap out of it' if I try hard enough... And all of that just makes me feel more worthless and less willing to do anything.
I drank a red bull today to see if that would prevent me from wanting to sleep, motivate me to get up and work...nope. Just had really fast dreams.  I don't tell my friends and family I'm depressed, I just say I'm tired.
'Ohh, you're always tired. Just get some sleep.' After having to explain the dark circles under my eyes every day.
'Ohh, you're always tired. Just get some sleep.' After having to explain the dark circles under my eyes every day.
Same man
I'm sorry but I laughed at the image of you having really fast dreams.
It was pretty ridiculous.  I only slept for two hours or so but had a bunch of really quick dreams, like 2-3 minute each, quick-talking, 20's era, Abbot and Costello-esque dreams
Wow, thanks so much for putting that out there.  I feel exactly the same way.  I always wonder how other people live their lives _without_ feeling despondent all the time.  The vast majority of North American society lives under these conditions, and we all face hardships all the time, yet so many people overcome them regularly, without hating everything and wanting to die.  It just makes me feel weak and incompetent -- in addition to feeling morose and tired to begun with.
Honestly, I think most people are better at rationalizing away the things that would otherwise disturb them. I think a lot of people just decide there's nothing they can do to fix these problems, so they don't worry about them. That's certainly healthier for them as individuals, but I also believe that without us (depressive realists) worrying about these problems and trying to draw attention to them, there would be no hope of ever fixing them.
I was just thinking about the difference between the two right before I came to this sub. This comic made me realize why I (and other people with depression) sleep so much. It really is a way to get a break from this world. Especially when you're a vivid dreamer like I am. Sometimes I wish I could just live in dream world all the time and never wake up :/
do you remember your dreams? You know, many people think there is meaning in them. 
Man I feel like shit today and that last frame with the tear makes me want to cry in my own bed :(. 
I'm crying on the couch like I'm 7. 
How do I stop being tired? 
Let me know when you find out how, because all I can think of is 'die', and I'm pretty sure that's not supposed to be the answer.  All I want to do is sleep  and dream and feel safe and warm and loved again...
Let me know when you find out how, because all I can think of is 'die', and I'm pretty sure that's not supposed to be the answer.  All I want to do is sleep  and dream and feel safe and warm and loved again...
I flirt, probably too much. I play games until I get tired of them. But it only helps stave it off, so I'm looking for answer too.
Well, you've officially had more physical contact with women than me, so congrats 
You never touched a woman's hand?  Edit: I see I got downvoted a lot. Sorry if my comment is insensitive but it just seems weird to me to have *never* touched a woman's hand in a lifetime.  I'm still glad for OP if that made him happy.
You never touched a woman's hand?  Edit: I see I got downvoted a lot. Sorry if my comment is insensitive but it just seems weird to me to have *never* touched a woman's hand in a lifetime.  I'm still glad for OP if that made him happy.
I don't know for him, but I never touched a woman's hand. I barely talked with them 😞  , let alone touch their hand.
I don't know for him, but I never touched a woman's hand. I barely talked with them 😞  , let alone touch their hand.
*virtual high five*  Probably doesn't help, but I'd high five you if I could.
Hey everybody let's give Barney Stinson here a huge round of applause, try not to trip and fall into any vaginas on your way out. 
As if there was no middle ground between being able to touch a woman's hand and being able to get a date.
Dude, that's almost like holding her hand! Amongst my friend group (who happen to be nerds and outcasts), you'd be a legend.
>that's almost like holding her hand!  Holy shit no, there's a HUGE difference between holding hands and a quick high hive when it comes to how much affection it usually signifies.
I mean this with much love but you and your friends sound like nerds from 16 candles, sorry if you don't get that it's more of a girl movie 
But the way the TheEverestt said it though... <stands up and claps> 😃  Much love
Why is this in depression tho?
Maybe he’s depressed and this was something that made him happy. I don’t think a high five would be the highlight of a happy person’s day
Depends. But i still think its a bit unfitting
There was a lot of posts similar to mine, so I decided to post my 'uplifting' story
Sex is overrated.     Cuddling is the thing I miss the most from being in a relationship :/       Having a kitty helps a little bit.
Both are important (at least to me), but recently I've been having these depressing dreams where I just have somebody to hold; and waking up from those is just the worst. It's been a long time since I've experienced something more intimate than a friendly hug. You know, really holding someone, just to hold them (or being held).  Cuddling or stroking my cat is nice and all, but sometimes I feel a little bit awkward or pathetic when I realise that's the best I have right now.
Both are important (at least to me), but recently I've been having these depressing dreams where I just have somebody to hold; and waking up from those is just the worst. It's been a long time since I've experienced something more intimate than a friendly hug. You know, really holding someone, just to hold them (or being held).  Cuddling or stroking my cat is nice and all, but sometimes I feel a little bit awkward or pathetic when I realise that's the best I have right now.
Try putting the cat on your neck and see if that helps. Or try rubbing your belly with the cat. This hasn't worked for me but I feel like it's bound to for someone.
Try putting the cat on your neck and see if that helps. Or try rubbing your belly with the cat. This hasn't worked for me but I feel like it's bound to for someone.
Have you tried rubbing the cat on your face? It feels amazing, I'm addicted to it.
Physical contact and especially hugs are literally extremely healthy for a human body. Relieves stress, strengthens immune system and whatelse. Somehow I envy women who seem to have far more casual physical contact with others.
Same dude! I'm super jealous of the casual physical contact women have with each other. Why can't two dude hug it out without it being gay or whatever?
Same dude! I'm super jealous of the casual physical contact women have with each other. Why can't two dude hug it out without it being gay or whatever?
Apparently cultural stuff. In other countries it's super normal if two dudes hold hands from what I heard. It's not even that I fear of being called gay or what, I don't care. It's just seen as unusual and uncommon. 
Apparently cultural stuff. In other countries it's super normal if two dudes hold hands from what I heard. It's not even that I fear of being called gay or what, I don't care. It's just seen as unusual and uncommon. 
Yeah I'm not afraid of being called gay either, it's just that's it's, like you said, unusual and uncommon.
Hmmm... i think i found out why i'm constantly sick, tired, etc.
I also read some colleges have [puppy rooms](http://dogtime.com/trending/16765-puppy-room-to-help-stressed-out-college-students) to help students deal with stress.
I also read some colleges have [puppy rooms](http://dogtime.com/trending/16765-puppy-room-to-help-stressed-out-college-students) to help students deal with stress.
I wish this had existed when I was in college. I did get to pet a therapy dog when I ended up in the psych ward senior year though, so there's that...
This is why I want to date but at the same time, how can someone like me if I don't like myself? 
Reminds me of that depression comix one: 'My thoughts would scare anyone else that heard them.. - they scare even me.'
As cheesy/pathetic as it sounds I think a pet helps a lot with that. My cat has to sleep near most of the time (to the point where if I turn to the other side she'll jump over me to sleep at the side I'm facing) and crawls under the blanket.   Just being able to be near something warm and breathing while you're sleeping helps me feel much better and less lonely than I usually am.
My puppy is the best for that! She always curls up next to me on the bed and demands snuggles. If I don't give her enough scratches she paws at me until I continue. One of my cats is also super snuggly and will burrow underneath blankets so she can lick my face. So cute and makes me feel loved 
What happened to that someone?
That someone found the arms of another. I eventually found out about it and in the end, I had to move away.   We don't really talk anymore. But to this day I still think about that special someone that had my heart but dropped it.
That someone found the arms of another. I eventually found out about it and in the end, I had to move away.   We don't really talk anymore. But to this day I still think about that special someone that had my heart but dropped it.
It's hard to forget someone like that. Sorry for your loss, bud.
I don't how cuddling is like but I bet it would feel amazing sigh I haven't even received a hug from anyone in so so long
Well shit, stranger.  If we lived close, I'd suggest we meet at a neutral safe space and I'd be happy to give you a hug.
I wish I could cuddle this girl I fell in love with. Not naked, wearing oversized sweaters in a cozy place. And it's just us two talking about how we should escape the Western society and move to Iceland or French Polynesia, so we can be alone and free. 
Iceland is very much in the West 
i literally have dreams about cuddling. like not sex, just cuddling  dang i'm lonely
I get them too. Then I wake up alone and disappointed.
I get them too. Then I wake up alone and disappointed.
'hahah oh.. oh right, I'm... yup, by myself...    ...yup.'
'hahah oh.. oh right, I'm... yup, by myself...    ...yup.'
'Hey, thank you. I really hope we can keep in touch...huh...what... were did she go...oh I am still alone... just that dream again.'
In Japan there is a service exactly like this.. You pay for a girl to cuddle you.. You can ask for a schoolgirl, nurse, maid, 'caring mother' ryōsai kenbo, girly girl yamato nadeshiko, childhood friend, etc.. But on the other side there is the yakuza.. Not very good if you think about that..
There are also 'professional huggers' in the USA.  It really is a sad world when you have to pay someone to hug you.  It makes me really curious about those studies that claim people enjoy 13+ hugs a day.  I always wonder who these people are and where they get all these hugs.
I wouldn't know.
Same. I don't think I've even touched a human for years other than for a handshake. I don't remember the last time I got a real hug. That's probably bad, right?
Virtual hugs to anyone who wants it
Calling dibs for one. I'm feeling very depressed lately and any hug is appreciated.
Calling dibs for one. I'm feeling very depressed lately and any hug is appreciated.
(((((((((((((((((((((((((((((squeeeeeeeeze)))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))))
Is there something stopping you from getting a dog?
Mmmm apartments here don't allow one, nor would I probably have the money to support that. When I go home over seasonal vacations, well, the parents' don't want a dog either. Trying to convince them though!  If life ever turns around, will definitely get one in the far future though. Seriously could use the unconditional affection right now though :(
I think this is why I really want a relationship or whatever. i could give a shoot about anything else but cuddling is just amazing. 
This is what I want. I don't even want sex. I just want a girl to be there for me and knowing that one girl feels the same way I do about her. And to listen to me. To rest her legs on me. To let me kiss her neck as she makes breakfast. To know that a girl. One girl. Is mine to keep. 
I'm honestly so socially detached if even managed to get into a relationship I probably wouldn't know what to do. 
My sources tell me what you have to do is put it in the pooter.
I agree, I haven't had someone to cuddle since my dog died 3 years ago. My best bro. My best friend even..
He appreciated you, as much as you appreciated him. Cheers for giving him a good life, sounds like he deserved it.
Very much so. Especially while in a 4000 mile long distance relationship. Cherish the cuddles :) 
Please tell me your secret, how did you make it work? I couldn't even get 500 miles to work out and I offered to fly there every weekend. 
I'm constantly hugging my friends. None of them seem to take the hint and hug back though.
Dang em. My friends don't care either.
I really need to move so I can get a dog!
I moved in with roommates who have two dogs and sometimes there's three! We also have cats. It is exactly what I needed! :) 
That's great to hear :)  I always take such huge solace that to my dog, I am the most important person in their world. It's amazing that an animal can enthuse such affection isn't it?
Hit the nail on the head there, mate. What did we do to deserve dogs. 
Hit the nail on the head there, mate. What did we do to deserve dogs. 
I think it's the universes way of apologising for all the other crap that happens :)
When we got a dog, it helped me a lot. Now I had something that made me get out of bed, and go on the streets. It did wonders when I was feeling a bit better, but now that I don't at least I get distracted for a couple of minutes. 
I'm such a shit owner. I walk my dog like once a week. He's cooped up in the house so much. I can barely take care of myself, let alone him. I selfishly got him for my own need for companionship but don't take care for him as I should. Yet he's so shooting happy all the time even when in neglecting him most of the time. I hate myself. And even though I'm aware of this I still don't change.
I'm such a shit owner. I walk my dog like once a week. He's cooped up in the house so much. I can barely take care of myself, let alone him. I selfishly got him for my own need for companionship but don't take care for him as I should. Yet he's so shooting happy all the time even when in neglecting him most of the time. I hate myself. And even though I'm aware of this I still don't change.
Think about the guilt you will feel for the rest of your life when he dies. 
Neat! Taking a walk always helps me clear my mind. Keep it up.
Yeah especially when the weather's good. Just being around my dog also really helps. 
Yeah especially when the weather's good. Just being around my dog also really helps. 
I'm really thinking about getting a dog - it would definitely help me feel less lonely, but I'm not sure if I'm responsible (and financially stable) enough to look after it. And I could never abandon it, so if I get one it's there to stay. What do you think?
dogcreature? that's your best friend. your dog will be your second hand up till the day it moves on, always and forever. They're only a glint in our lives but we are their WHOLE life.
Well, he's a pug. So not a dog per se. I'm not even sure if pugs are from this world.   But yeah, he is my best friend and we are together 24/7.
I would have killed myself months ago if I didn't know how bad it would shoot my mom up.
years ago
Yep. Try to see it as a blessing that's prolonging your life and allowing you the opportunity to heal.
depression is forever, healing is temporary. the only real cure is death
depression is forever, healing is temporary. the only real cure is death
Reminds me of what I read one time in regards to the saying 'Suicide is a permanent solution to a temporary problem.' Life is the temporary problem. It's a pretty grim outlook on things but I can't help but agree with it.
I go to class seeing everyone so happy and 'put together'. I envy the way almost everyone holds themselves with so much confidence. When I see them I'm reminded how much of a mess I might seem. I can't talk right, I feel stupid all the time, and I'm swamped with so much negativity about myself it's hard to be around other people. They're fine and I'm just a pretentious, dimwitted, drama queen. 
I recognize that feeling.  I just started college and everyone in my class seems so put together and they know so many stuff. And then I come, the 'outsider' as I see myself. The shy, weird, lonely person everyone avoids, drowning myself in self hate, wanting to get friends, but just unable to grasp out to them.
It really seems like a common feeling between people suffering. I think of it less as scuba gear and more like boats. My shitty canoe broke apart in a storm a long time ago and I've been clinging on to the few pieces I could grab for the past few years treading water. People sail by and ask me what I'm doing, tell me to get it together... what can I do?  
i get that from my mother.. get over it..and i spend some times crying.
[Relevant](http://i.imgur.com/UytbJ.jpg)  No need to apologise really, are you sure this isn't just one of those people that click like on everything their friends post maybe without even reading it first? That could maybe be the case here and you aren't attention whoring or anything. We're here to talk and listen and sometimes speaking to a complete stranger is the best way so anyway I'm here if you wanna chat
The way I've seen that quote is 'make sure you are not, in fact, surrounded by idiots.'  I like this better than the way your graphic has it, because it puts the responsibility on the idiots more than the person who's depressed.  Either way though, it's a great quote and very relevant to this situation.
The way I've seen that quote is 'make sure you are not, in fact, surrounded by idiots.'  I like this better than the way your graphic has it, because it puts the responsibility on the idiots more than the person who's depressed.  Either way though, it's a great quote and very relevant to this situation.
I like your thinking
>We humans walk around forcefully blowing air out of holes in our face, and by manipulating the flow of air just so, we can link brains. And by doing so, we realize that we aren't alone.   Just beautiful. I love that sentence so much. 
goddamn now i have to go outside and try to not remember that i'm forcefully blowing air out of tears in my face that just appeared so that I could use shooting *air* to make actual *energy* out of shit I put into the other hole in my face   But seriously, I don't think I've been moved by a comment on Reddit like this in a long time. Keep on fighting the good fight.
I agree with your main point, but it seems that grammar isn't the right word to use. Spelling mistakes, punctuation mistakes, and other such things *are* bad grammar -- those things make up the definition of grammar. Of course bad grammar doesn't make you stupid, nor does it make you inept at the language. However, it is technically incorrect.
Rules;  They are made,  To be Broken.
The first sentence is supposed to be, 'I talked to a few of my acquaintances in my grade about depression, something which I shouldn't have done.'  I know my grammar is terrible and I forgot a word. I'm sorry about that. I was too stupid to proofread the title.
Its a tough thing to try and deal with. Many uninformed people see depresions an emotion, happy is to sad as depressed is to exatatic. It helps to try and talk sometimes, dont let the fact you may have chosen the wrong confidon detur you. 
Fun fact: Normal people don't understand depression or mental illnesses and will act blissfully ignorant about it. You're better off without them.
Agreed. The more I think about it, psychology should be a requirement in high school. Hell, I deeply regret not taking it but I atleast read about mental illnesses frequently online.
Stupid people in high school :/
I remember reading a status that said, 'Depression isn't an illness, it's a feeling!' One of the many contributing factors to me leaving Facebook for good.
I'm a musician, and it's cripplingly depressing to see how unbelievably mediocre I am.
Me too. I absolutely adore singing, but I hate the sound of my own voice so much I normally delete my recordings before I can put it on YouTube/soundcloud/bandmix to show anyone. 
I think listening to your own voice over and over and over and over and over again can kind of help desensitize your own ear to how dismal it is. That's just my experience.
I have been since I was little. It doesn't help. I also get compliments all the time about my singing, but it's like a brick wall. Nothing good gets in my head. 
'Sucking at something is the 1st step to becoming sorta good at something.'
OK, Jake. But if you've been doing it on and off for 10 years and still suck, maybe it's time to admit that you'll never be good at it.
OK, Jake. But if you've been doing it on and off for 10 years and still suck, maybe it's time to admit that you'll never be good at it.
That might be part of the problem. Doing it *on and off* instead of dedicating one's self to it.
That might be part of the problem. Doing it *on and off* instead of dedicating one's self to it.
It's awful hard to 'dedicate' when you have mental illness
I love it! Thank you for sharing, please post an update when it's complete
I will! Thanks so much :)
I personally think she's a jerk, but if she's helped you cope, then she's done something right :)  here's to a new life, this one clean :)
She does tend to come off that way, yeah. Her books are still fantastic imo. Thanks!! :) I move in to college tomorrow too. Big changes-hopefully for the better! :)
It looks beautiful, OP.. 
Thank you, I really respect the artist for not judging me in any negative way.
Is it weird that I have the urge to lick your arm?
Yeah 
Every day of my life. Sometimes I think more than depression, I have a ridiculously hyperactive guilty conscience.
I have that plus the lack of hope in change. I could deal with guilt if I knew when it would go away, but indefinite guilt leaves me hopeless, which is the worst part of depression for me - not having hope that this too shall pass. 
I have that plus the lack of hope in change. I could deal with guilt if I knew when it would go away, but indefinite guilt leaves me hopeless, which is the worst part of depression for me - not having hope that this too shall pass. 
Ah, you are so right. Exactly that. I knew there was something I couldn't identify in those feelings. You've put it into words for me.
The worst is that when I'm not depressed or hypomanic or manic I can't tolerate reading this subreddit because it's often so melodramatic (this is not judgmental - I completely understand and relate; that's what happens when you are severely depressed) and just makes me super uncomfortable.  Get to hang out here when I feel like shit though <3
At first I was like, I don't like this guy, but then I was like, he's right.  Bad things seems so much worse when you're in a depressed state of mind, even if you can see it's not that bad. Your brain is just more powerful.  It's not logical, it's biological.
http://www.imgur.com/fj901.jpg
Hahaha, I haven't seen this one before.
No, why? 
It's infamous for a nasty monster who ruins an otherwise-sweet episode with his habit of eating people, then letting them live on as [faces poking out of his body](http://fran900.files.wordpress.com/2011/01/abzorbaloff1.jpg). 
I'm 17    I'm going to get help. I'm going to become what I've always wanted to be and do what I love. I'm going to get better. 
I'm really glad to hear that you're going to get help. You can do this!  Live your life to its fullest my friend. 
Um, how do you remember all of this so perfectly fine after taking so many drugs? Makes me curious.  No, really. When I tried killing myself I didn't take any drugs but the adrenaline made me forget almost everything about that day. 
It all feels a bit like a dream... Like it didn't really happen.... Its very vague but I remember it mainly because of just how emotionally shocking it all was
I overdosed a lil over a month ago, and when my family came to the hospital they were nasty to me. When I was released, I was yelled at that it was my problem and they weren't going to change anything about themselves for me. They just wanted me commited. First night home I was yelled at twice and ignored. .. No love, no hugs nothing I'm glad you had people that love you and showed you as such, good luck to you ;)
That's horrible, I'm sorry you have to put up with that.  *hugs*
Maladaptive dreaming. I do it all the time.
oh...so that's what it's called  I figure it's better to have imagined experiences than none at all
oh...so that's what it's called  I figure it's better to have imagined experiences than none at all
Relatable stuff right here.
Checked out the wikipedia page for it and, yup, that's what I spend most of day doing. Didn't know it had a name, though I did know I wasn't the only one to do it.   *(Wish I Could Fly Like) Superman* by the Kinks would be what I would call its theme song.
It's so common - I mean I feel like more people do it than they would care to admit.
This is similar to me except I create fictional worlds and characters in my head. I have conversations with them, create their own personalities. It's strange, I know, but it helps me forget about the world around me for a few minutes.
Guys, you know who else does this? People who write great novels. 
Guys, you know who else does this? People who write great novels. 
I wish I had the ability to adapt my thoughts into novel. Sadly, only times I've shared the tales I can spin has been to a very small handful of people. They enjoyed it, however I doubt I would have any sort of audience outside of that.
I do the same thing and I ended up with crush on 30 min bus ride and said nothing.
when I first met my last crush, I had a pissed off look on my face because I felt insecure  so smooth
So many people are left fantasizing about things that ought to be normal and given - openness, intimacy, honesty, community, respect, purpose, love. The world is unforgivably deficient because it cannot provide these things for you. There's nothing wrong with you and everything wrong with the world.
I love u! omg thank u for understanding. This world can make me feel so lonesome. I get hurt a lot, even though I'm nice to everyone.  I wish more can widen their perspective.
Hi friend  >> 'You miss 100% of the shots you don't take..' ~ Wayne Gretzky  Go for it. Life is too short to have regrets =)
Pretty much.  Despite being depressed, and also my wife being depressed, we still found each other and ended up getting married.  We still fight with depression every day, but it's a lot better than it was alone.  So also, shoot anyone who says you need to beat depression before finding someone.  That's a load of horse shit, depression isn't necessarily something you beat, that's temporary sadness they're thinking of like when you drop your ice cream cone.
It helps to remember that there are leaders and followers, people who latch on to others just to turn on autopilot. Its not that you dont matter to those people, its just that they require constant watering like a flower. Extroverted people feed off the energy it gives them to be sociable, so for them its no problem to just keep in touch with everybody and organize social stuff etc. 
That kinda sounds bad. Like extroverts aren't empathetic and only maintain friendships for selfish reasons, which obviously isn't true... It's just true of some people. Don't make excuses for people that aren't putting effort into a relationship. But I'm also guessing OP is pretty young... and most younger friendships will change dynamics or fade as all of your friends grow and change. That is no one's fault, just a part of being human. Unfortunately, OP, it sounds like your depression is blaming you.
That kinda sounds bad. Like extroverts aren't empathetic and only maintain friendships for selfish reasons, which obviously isn't true... It's just true of some people. Don't make excuses for people that aren't putting effort into a relationship. But I'm also guessing OP is pretty young... and most younger friendships will change dynamics or fade as all of your friends grow and change. That is no one's fault, just a part of being human. Unfortunately, OP, it sounds like your depression is blaming you.
the point is that it's easier for some people to make plans and keep in touch, and harder for others. doesn't mean either of them are bad people. 
If I didn't count the friends I have who didn't contact me I literally wouldn't have any friends. They don't know about my mental health. Not sure what to do about it. I try not to think about it.
Same. But I've stopped considering them friends.
I am looking at the lake
I have wonderful friendships who have no contact for 6-12 months and start where they left with a little note like 'hey, I've been freaking busy. Let's get some coffee and catch up?'  No contact does not mean no friendship.
I have wonderful friendships who have no contact for 6-12 months and start where they left with a little note like 'hey, I've been freaking busy. Let's get some coffee and catch up?'  No contact does not mean no friendship.
This is how it is for one of my buddies from high school. Right now hes finishing up his senior year while i struggle to not continually fail and we have these times where no contact for a month then we start msging and gaming again and calling each other shootfaces and annoyances. One of the only people in my life that came back after i pushed them away
Danging sucks. I was in a fraternity, and after I conspicuously dropped out of college, 0/~40 have asked me if I'm even alive. 
It was a fraternity. that's why (unfortunately).
Maybe everything isn't fine in their eyes but they are humans who when someone cuts off contact with them, they think stuff like 'damn what did I do?' 'why doesn't he like me anymore?' etc, not thinking you *want* contact with them. Stopping contact with your friends doesn't tell you what they're thinking it only tells you your own actions. 
That's laziness or uncaringness on their part in my opinion. There shouldn't be one person maintaining a relationship. I'm not saying get angry about it I'm just saying realize that it's not a good friendship and try to move on.
That's laziness or uncaringness on their part in my opinion. There shouldn't be one person maintaining a relationship. I'm not saying get angry about it I'm just saying realize that it's not a good friendship and try to move on.
I'm just saying that even though it sucks and laziness and/or uncaringness could be the reasons, I don't think it's something that anyone should take personally because you really can't read their minds
I told my friends I was depressed then they slowly faded out of my life. Oh well, at least my cats can't leave me.
cats are the best :)
I just never set any expectations for any of my friendships so I don't get let down when this happens. It works, but it's prevented me from feeling close to most of my friends and I question if I can really consider it an authentic relationship. 
I think this is the attitude I've gravitated towards, and I agree about the downside being that it's difficult to close that distance. However, it does happen on rare occasions so it's not impossible.
You can't expect the world to revolve around you. When I've experienced this it was usually because they were busy in their own life or also struggling with something internal or otherwise. 
Ya but if you're always the one trying then that's not a friendship in my opinion. But people have different opinions on this apparently.
I know people like that but I'm unsure if I should call them friends.
I don't think thats entirely fair. Sure, there are 'friends,' but there are also true friends that are terrified of their friend's depression. You can't know if what you do it going to help them or drive them further down. I have been on both sides of the dilemma, and ultimately, while I will forever love and respect my 2 best friends that continuously worked to help me through, but I also love and respect my one other best friend for being terrified about making my condition worse. 
You should try messaging them and try to catch up. Just because you dont go to school with them doesnt mean you can't still be friends. 
It's the idea that they mean so much to you and yet you mean nothing to them. it's hard to get over that and talk to someone who you feel doesn't give a shit.
I like this a lot. 
Thanks, I'm glad/sad other people can relate to it.
I like comparisons the most. This way you can make depression more understandable for those who never truly experienced it
Me too, this was actually something that occurred to me as a way to explain after a therapist looked shocked when I said I hated myself
Me too, this was actually something that occurred to me as a way to explain after a therapist looked shocked when I said I hated myself
I know that look. :-/
 Try having depression AND being in this kind of scenario. It's impossible to know if my medications are working, or if I'm just in a low point, or if life just really does suck.
Reason #37 why I'll probably never get married, unless that person is also horribly depressed. Which would probably make everything worse anyway I guess
I prefer being depressed to what I was before depression though.
I prefer that too. 
He mentioned it.  divorce=suicide 
You have to kill yourself to divorce a partner you hate??
You have to kill yourself to divorce a partner you hate??
It's because your consciousness and your depression are in the same body
The worst part about depression is none of us can escape ourselves. The only way to escape ourselves is death. 
Sometimes I worry about an afterlife even though I hope/believe there is one because I don't want to be stuck with myself forever
Enjoying your job is a pretty big thing, I've never been a fan of any of mine, and I've done a lot of different things.
Even the worst jobs can be made fun by trying to do something a little different everyday. And doing something different help break the patterns of depression(for me at least).
Hey it'll get you out of the house, so hopefully it'll help you take on the battle!   Everyone is different, but sending good vibes your way :)
>:)  I am happy that you are happy. Spread the happiness around.  [This doggo demands it.](https://s-media-cache-ak0.pinimg.com/originals/ea/38/34/ea38349e9487f76fc8bb6b14f819bb24.jpg)
>:)  I am happy that you are happy. Spread the happiness around.  [This doggo demands it.](https://s-media-cache-ak0.pinimg.com/originals/ea/38/34/ea38349e9487f76fc8bb6b14f819bb24.jpg)
>implying I want to be happy
OP a job can grant you many things. I think maybe you need to rekindle your love of life again - what about a holiday somewhere foreign?  After saving, of course.
You're right. And I have a lot of plans for travels, but finances are definitely tight right now. Gotta refinance my belongings, I have a lot of crap I don't need. That's the next step.  Cheers.
I guess it's a step in the right direction?  Idk, just trying to be somewhat optomistic
Yeah it's a big step. Life hasn't been good to me lately. I was also unemployed for 3 months and I was nearing the end of my rope.
Yeah it's a big step. Life hasn't been good to me lately. I was also unemployed for 3 months and I was nearing the end of my rope.
just having someone here to go every day might help. like maybe you can be super sad at the job and then your home will feel more comforting?   and just having a reason to put clothes on and go outside. it still sucks, but apparently we're supposed to stick with it until it starts to help. haha.   good for you! i hope things start looking up!
I've thought this several times myself! I guess the best way to look at it would be that you're getting better since that's more uplifting than just getting used to being down...easier said than done, though (and being an optimist was really never my thing)
I don't think optimism is very widely spread in this sub to be honest.
I don't think optimism is very widely spread in this sub to be honest.
Strange how that works :P
I don't believe in 'optimists'. The way I see it is that optimists are just REALLY good at lying to themselves.   Pessimists know the truth. They know what the world truly holds and don't think of the world as a fairy tale.
Sounds like depressive realism, assuming you strike the balance right.
Thanks for sharing. You are incredibly strong.
Thank you, your comment really means alot to me
Thats hard to go through as a child. My deepest sorrows for you then and for you now. Stay strong friend. 
Thank you so much 
Hey I'm in the same boat. My dad od'd and left a blank note. I told everyone he had a heart attack in his sleep. The coroner even wrote heart disease on his death certificate. It's a shooted up secret I carry every day.  I guess be glad she was willing to tell you the truth, and maybe accept it's best if most people don't know.
I'm very sorry for you too. Are you okay now? 
I'm very sorry for you too. Are you okay now? 
Not really. Things only seem to get worse.
I'm so sorry you lost your father at such a young age.  Honestly, preventing the devastating effects to my young kids are the only thing keeping me alive. 
I'm glad that's enough ❤️
I lost my mother at age 8, while I’m not going through now the wound you’re having reopened, your strength is incredibly admirable and I know that you’ll come with strength to accept this. Please don’t feel like you have to accept this alone.
Thank you for your comment
I was on Paxil for depression back in the late 90s. It shooted me up way worse, and I became suicidal on it. Got off of it, and it made it worse.  Sorry for your loss.
I'm happy to see you got away from paxil 
Thank you. How are you doing now? 
I'm doing ok, thank you.  It will get better for you!  There's a ton of emotions that you're probably going through and it's hard to sort everything out. It will get better though.   If you have any questions, feel free to ask any time. 
Dang your Mom's boyfriend!  You're dad was clearly fighting some demons and was in a really bad place.  Please consider talking to a professional about this if you aren't already doing so.
I know. I doubt she's going to break up with him anytime soon. But I don't plan on ever speaking to him again.  And I am seriously considering going to see a professional  
I hope my depression gets in a fistfight with my social anxiety so my depression can beat it to death, then when my depression isn't expecting it I can curb stomp him to death 
I need that to happen for me too :D 
Depressception
this actually made me laugh lol
I hope my suicidal thoughts get suicidal thoughts.
I hope so too I've been having plenty of those lately.
depression is a negative, a negative * negative is a positive, lets go !
Now that's the kind of math I like!! 
My brain is an idiot. I demand a refund.
Can I refund my heart, too? Because they both shoot me up in unison right now.
Urgh that comment is so true it hurts 
It sucks some gigantic balls when the shooters tag team up on you and you don't have the strength to fight back.
This made me laugh. Thank you.
no problem a small bit of joy always helps :D
And yet some people think depression is 'cool'  to have or we just have it to avoid our problems. No shit heads, I'd give anything to deal with my problems like a healthy person. You're basically telling someone with a broken leg to 'walk it off'. Shit doesn't work that way and just because you can't see my illness that doesn't make it not real. My illness is about how it affects MY life negatively, not yours. 
That's what I try and explain to people. They give me the same bullshit of 'Smile and everything will be better' or 'Someone else has it worse'. They can't comprehend that this is an illness and not a feeling that can be subsided with smiling and guilt. 
What bothers me isn't adults calling all teenagers depressed, but so many teenagers saying they're depressed without diagnosis/just bc they had a Bad Day or feel tired. Mental illnesses have somehow become 'in', because people think they make you special. They don't. They break you and make you struggle.
I mean good point, but rhetoric like that ends up causing actually depressed people to doubt themselves harmfully. Gatekeeping mental illness always has that effect, never a good idea.
I mean good point, but rhetoric like that ends up causing actually depressed people to doubt themselves harmfully. Gatekeeping mental illness always has that effect, never a good idea.
I agree, putting more stigma on depression won't help anyone. But for me personally it was really hard to start talking about it out of fear or being dismissed as 'edgy' and lazy. That turned out to be a pointless fear, but still.
I think I’m one of these people and I’m sorry. But I’ve been feeling like shit and disconnected for over a year now. I just don’t want this to be real in my life and get diagnosed with it. If that makes any sense. I still smile and laugh in public and with my friends but I still cry myself to sleep sometimes too so I don’t shooting know. 
You probably have depression. From your short comment it’s pretty obvious. You don’t need to be diagnosed first in order to have it.   You are sick so you go to the doctor to get diagnosed. Not the other way around.   Reach out if you feel like you can. I hope things get better soon. 
Downvoters are also people who are hurt so badly they want to bring others down with them.
I hate how true this is.
I hate how true this is.
maybe they think its too depressing for super depressed people to read(I fear on occasion how potentially powerful words can be on here) so they down it because they think it doesn't...add to the conversation?
[deleted]    ^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^0.5715   > [What is this?](https://pastebin.com/64GuVi2F/55895)
nothing about downvoting is 'right'. then again, putting too much stock in reddit karma isn't the healthiest thing either
There's usually a good reason things have been downvoted, though yeah many times on this site it's simply because you questioned a particular subs dogma. 
One comments amount of votes surprized the shit out of me. It said 'Do we *want* to be miserable?'  and it had almost 100 upvotes. I would've thought that simple comment would've been misunderstood but instead, it seemed to have the same resonant gravity with others as it did with me.   A lot can be said about others relative assumptions and attitudes that drive their actions...
it can be done, people would just have to get the mods to do so.  /r/raisedbynarcisissts has no downvotes at all, for posts or comments.
> it can be done  No, it actually can't.  Not effectively for all users. We've addressed this point recently in another thread, [here](https://www.reddit.com/r/depression/comments/4y4oui/shooting_downvoters/d6lsqk2).  
I postes here once. Never going to do it again...
I highly disagree with your choice but it adds to the conversation so you get an upvote! 
I highly disagree with your choice but it adds to the conversation so you get an upvote! 
Thank you.
by having the courage to make this post it sounds like that girl is still there
I appreciate it I experienced major withdrawals last night 
She is still there, don't give up on her. You can do it
Oh my god thank you so much I appreciate this! I really wanna do good 
I can relate. I wish I could go back in time and change so many things.. and tell her to remember to always love and care about herself. And that it's okay to feel. 
How can you forgive yourself?
I am sure she will forgive you. Once you forgive yourself ;)
How can you forgive yourself?
Other people can see parts of you that you can’t. You’ll find someone that will love you because of those parts and they’ll eventually open your eyes so that you can see them too.
This is so good, thanks 
Other people can see parts of you that you can’t. You’ll find someone that will love you because of those parts and they’ll eventually open your eyes so that you can see them too.
Yeah. No. Doesn't happen. Sounds good. But doesn't happen. 
I started fighting the depression, and just going to do the things I wanted to. One time on a hike I thought 'The good thing about hanging out with yourself is that you agree on everything' and realized that I could actually like me.  I still struggle daily, but knowing that there was just one moment in my life where I loved me means that I can get there again.
The fact is that sometimes you simply don t have something you want to do. Like me for example. When i feel bad i completely lose interest in doing anything and i could just lay somewhere doing nothing or just crying. And i can t find a way to feel better or to do something without feeling that i m doing it not because i want to but because i must. 
The fact is that sometimes you simply don t have something you want to do. Like me for example. When i feel bad i completely lose interest in doing anything and i could just lay somewhere doing nothing or just crying. And i can t find a way to feel better or to do something without feeling that i m doing it not because i want to but because i must. 
I have a list of places I want to visit or explore. My ex always said she wanted to go, but had to control where we went, so we never did my list. After she dumped me I started going to those places even though I felt like laying still and doing absolutely nothing.
I have a list of places I want to visit or explore. My ex always said she wanted to go, but had to control where we went, so we never did my list. After she dumped me I started going to those places even though I felt like laying still and doing absolutely nothing.
I don t have such thing. I don t have interest in seeing something in particular or doing something. I dont even have money to spend. I simply do what i have to do to distract myself from feeling bad. And this is pretty sad.
Think of your depression as wearing super dark glasses that block you from being things as they really are. Other people know the YOU that is under the dark cloud and when people love you they want you to feel ok. Sometimes asking a friend 'why do you still like me' helps because they remind you how much more of a person you actually are in spite of the depression.
> Other people know the YOU that is under the dark cloud  There's no one there.   That's why I'm depressed. 
My current strategy is to take a look at myself and determine what I don't like about me, what I'm dissatisfied with. Then I pick something to work on and try improving. I call it 'building a better me'.  I'm also trying to cut myself some more slack, and try judging myself the way I would a friend (less harshly).  I'm going to be hanging out with myself for a few more years, I might as well try improve the situation.
I would never say some of the things I tell myself to a friend. So I have to remind myself that I don't deserve it any more than they do. 
I would never say some of the things I tell myself to a friend. So I have to remind myself that I don't deserve it any more than they do. 
Precisely, I'd never shit on a friend over a mistake they made 10 years ago. I've been doing it to myself for years, it needs to end.
 30+ depression does not get any easier so congrats.
26 here, glad to have confirmation that it does NOT, in fact, get better like the guy that told me to wait till 30 before leaving promised it would.  I'm making the right decision.
Inspiring !! If you can do it maybe I can too :)
Boom, there you go.  Maybe this is the thing that leads you to treatment and out of depression. Make a few calls, get an appointment & prepare to kick depression’s ass.  This stranger out here in Chicago is rooting for you.
Good job! You can do it.
no u
I have severe depression and anxiety and all my grades are being excused from a semester I did very poorly in as a result of my depression and anxiety. Just get in touch with your counselors and they should refer you to a psychologist who can get you the papers you need to have the grades erased. 
This should really be higher. People understand that what you're going through is serious, and that includes administrators/teachers. Ask for help. Don't keep it all to yourself and think you'll just 'push through it'. Way more people will understand than you could possibly imagine. And they won't blame you for it. 
Do you want comforting words or a distraction?
I appreciate the option, but I'm pretty sure both of those are the same thing. I'll take whatever at this point.
I appreciate the option, but I'm pretty sure both of those are the same thing. I'll take whatever at this point.
What started this -this spiral?
What started this -this spiral?
I'm honestly not sure. Work piles up, I have relationships to maintain. Stress just kind of creeps up on me, and even when I do notice it, there's usually no way to alleviate it.
Same. In my case it was almost certainly true that in high school people wanted to screw with me because nobody liked me that much, I knew not to respond to any kind of situation like that. But I think that has carried over so I can't accept a compliment now either.
'that girl likes you'  Everytime someone say it to me, I just run to my home to play games and eat a lot because of anxiety
I don't necessarily think they're lying, although I definitely don't agree with them. Compliments make me very uncomfortable so I just say 'okay' or something.
What if I told you that saying 'thank you' makes the other person feel good?
What if I told you that saying 'thank you' makes the other person feel good?
I care more about myself than other people.
This is the classic component of depression.  It feels almost like people are slinging daggers at you when they compliment you.
Agreed. Self image is a beast of a thing to break once you have let it get out of hand. There are still some things that ive been self conscious about for so long that even though my wife says they are appealing to her I just can not believe her.
Why would they lie?   Really. Isn't it easier to accept that they actually mean it?  Even if the ARE lying, they're going out of their way to compliment you.   Accept it. You deserve it💖
Accepting a fake compliment don't turn it to true
Accepting a fake compliment don't turn it to true
It's like hearing you look good, when you actually know for a fact that you don't.
Sounds like you've been conditioned not to feel good emotions because it will lead to disappointment.  Abuse victims do this too, I've struggled with it myself.  It helps to reward yourself with something small - not food or purchases!!! - like a trip to your favorite place when you achieve a goal.  Over time you will start to feel pleasure at succeeding, because you've conditioned yourself to link it to something you like.
But how do you find something you like?
I don't even know what to say... I understand everything that you feel... I... Life is so strange. I don't think that life is meant for some people, it definitely isn't meant for me.
That last sentence is so sad :( I think I'm gonna cry... Every time I read comments here I just want go go buddy smile it's okay you'll be okay give it some time don't worry but then im like to myself take your own advice bro cause that's what I tell myself and don't listen and oh :( sorry, convoluted comment with poor punctuation
FRIGGIN SAME OMG I WANNA DIE 
Danging same stupid girl let's make matching t shirts 
Danging same stupid girl let's make matching t shirts 
Maybe.... maybe tomorrow 😂😂😂😂😂😂
I used to be so afraid of doing work because I knew it wasn't perfect. Then when I finally got to it, I would be disappointed with how it was executed and tell myself I should have done it earlier.
How did you work through this? You said 'used to'. :)
The nightmares kill me though, damn Prazosin isnt working like it used to
That sucks, the only thing I know to stop dreams is weed
If you get drunk enough the pillow next to you might help. That all I got and it helps sometimes.
My pillows are my cuddle buddies, and my cavapoo is always there. The poor fella also gets nightmares, I think so at least he twitches and whines in his sleep.
then when i wake up, depression gets doubled. shoot me
I remember when the darkness doubled.
I have a terrible sleep schedule because if I stay up all night I don't have to worry and I can sleep when I have responsibilities.
Literally me. It's 4:40 am rn and I'm still up, and when I finally do sleep I'll probably sleep at least 14 hours.
Sometimes I can't help but sleep because I feel so emotionally//mentally exhausted that I don't want to face the world or speak to anyone and it takes a toll on me physically. My whole body just feels tired. I try my best to motivate myself to just be ... but if it wasn't for my husband who is a constant support and motivation I probably would be  in bed all day.  
Try to be there for himas well. Maybe it takes a toll on him too. This has happened to many couples and has separated them. Be strong and try to regain your zest for life. I'm not here to preach to the congregation, I am a failure but please.
I do this far too often... and when I wake up feeling like I'm in outer space I just roll back over and sleep.
The worst is not being able to sleep anymore cause you've outslept yourself and then having to get up just to wait to get tired again :(
The worst is not being able to sleep anymore cause you've outslept yourself and then having to get up just to wait to get tired again :(
Oh lord don't remind me. I end up laying there for as long as possible and then getting up and doing a few tasks before Im exhausted again. 
Oh lord don't remind me. I end up laying there for as long as possible and then getting up and doing a few tasks before Im exhausted again. 
I've developed a technique where I avoid moving as much as possible when I wake up, and don't open my eyes, and mentally whisper go to sleep again...
So do I. Sleep my whole day away. Basically only get up for an hour or two to eat on bad days. 
Had about 3 months like this. 
I tried and I ended up insulting myself 3 times. 
I'm sorry, this made me laugh out loud. Pretty much what I do.
I wish I would be able to just sleep every hour that I'm not working 
Why not make it all hours 
Or staying up late having a couple to drink and just binging cartoons on Netflix.
That doesn't sound half bad right now.
better than drinking your liver away
Also me though
Also me though
Same. Sometimes I wonder whats the point of taking care of myself when I don't really know if I even want to live. You know?
Same. Sometimes I wonder whats the point of taking care of myself when I don't really know if I even want to live. You know?
Everyday. I know its bad for me but at least when i drink i feel something other than the bullshit I'm used to.  Gotta keep surviving though. For my parents, not for me. 
I cant sleep anymore I have nightmares I just want to die
Currently awake at 6am for this exact reason.   Awake=shit. Sleep=nightmares. 
Currently awake at 6am for this exact reason.   Awake=shit. Sleep=nightmares. 
I had an extremely vivid one recently that seemed more real than reality itself. It was horrid. 
I had an extremely vivid one recently that seemed more real than reality itself. It was horrid. 
Mine are always super detailed and sometimes they run together. Like I'll wake up, and the next time I sleep it'll pick back up. Like 'welcome back to the shit storm'
i do the opposite i havent slept in over 24 hours, i dont even feel that tired
Yeah most months seem to be a combination of both of these sleep patterns 
I ended up sleeping from 11pm until 3:30pm the next day (today) because I just couldn't face the music at work. One of these days, shit is going to catch up to me. Dang. 
My sleeo schedule is so shooted up. Its either 11pm to 2pm, or 6am to 2pm. And im still *so damn* exhausted all the time.
I find the greatest way to cope with this crap is to get up and socialize. Find someone you trust and let them know how you feel. When I did this my friend was so helpful and she in some way gave me hope and has asked me to talk with her periodically. It helps me
I'm glad you have a friend like that. That must be really awesome 
They're just ignorant asses who don't know shit about what it's like to be going through something like this. They probably think you're weak or an attention seeker or something like that for cutting, which you are definitely not. Just ignore people like this, they're immature.
That's why all my scars are hidden, I don't want people to see them and judge me like this. I do have scars both down each wrist; however, those scars were from accidents.
That's why all my scars are hidden, I don't want people to see them and judge me like this. I do have scars both down each wrist; however, those scars were from accidents.
I have stopped hiding my scars about two years ago and my experience has been incredibly positive. Most people don't seem to notice/care. Most if the people that ask you can divert by making a joke about having fought a lion or similar. And those that are persistent usually have friends or family that self harmed as well and therefore know a little about the topic and are actually very understanding.  I can only recommend it.
I have stopped hiding my scars about two years ago and my experience has been incredibly positive. Most people don't seem to notice/care. Most if the people that ask you can divert by making a joke about having fought a lion or similar. And those that are persistent usually have friends or family that self harmed as well and therefore know a little about the topic and are actually very understanding.  I can only recommend it.
Stopped hiding mine since mid last year and so far when meeting people I can clearly see them taking notice of the scars but few has ever asked about them. I usually never know what to say when people ask. .-.
>:(  Level 7, haven't even seen the silhouette of a Jynx  Anyway, screw those guys.  It should be legal to dropkick anyone who acts like that.
Common you just read a characterization of idiots and violence being a last resort. You are better than that. Just ignore people like that.
Pokemon Go by itself is an amazing game, but it has the negative effects of bringing out absolute sociopaths who would otherwise stay indoors. A very small part of the population just suck. They just shooting suck. There really isn't a better way to describe people like that. I just hope you know that the overwhelming majority of PoGo players would never judge you and if you lived close to me I would totally catch some Pokemon with you. Cheer up and don't let them bother you! Happy training!
I have been diagnosed with traits of ASPD and even I am not that idiot as the guy what OP wrote about. But yeah some people just shooting suck. Pokemon Go community is awesome and they never judge unless it's the 1-5% population of idiots.
Dang that guy
Nah, he'd probably enjoy it. I doubt it happens to him very often 
He actually seemed fairly put together and had social prowess. He just felt it was okay to target me for his friends' amusement.
You know, i really don't understand how a stranger have the guts to target other people that they literally just met. I don't care if this gets downvoted but i hope he gets to feel what you feel, so he can stop being an idiot in the future.
Nah, they has just graduated high school. 
are you sure they graduated?
Joking about suicide is ok. Lol I have depression and I do it all the time
As long as you are joking about it in general or about yourself, it's fine. When it is targeted, it's much more personal.
he was probably hitting on you, trying to get your attention, and just being real idiot about it. He likely has no social intuition.
We don't know what he was thinking or what he was trying to accomplish, but you are spot on that the kid likely lacked any and all social intuition 
Not saying what they did was right but maybe try putting like cover up or a bandage over it.
I understand where you're coming from, but OP shouldn't have to wear bandages on his arm for the rest of his life just because somen idiothead might be an idiothead about it. 
There's always going to be someone out there who has it worse than you do. That should never negate what you feel. Plus you don't know me and I don't know you so why should you care if I say something mean and down vote your post. Plus if luck would have it I could really relate to your story and be able to share what worked for me. Why not post? You got nothing to lose.  
Agree. I often have feelings of depression, but I know other people have it a lot worse. But you can't compare yourself. You should express how you feel regardless. 
It's a two way street, isn't it?
i am sure you can look it at that way and have reasoning, i am trying to go for the positive road
I'm actually quite the opposite.  I see people post about trivial things (IMO) and I sit here going 'that's it...that's what your depressed about.....you're not depressed, you're just sad.'  It 100% makes me a hypocrite because I'm failing to understand them when I turn around and think other's don't understand me.
Well hope you're improving on that! Best of luck!
That happens to me a lot too especially since I used to be an artist so occasionally I come across old work. I end up thinking to myself gosh those were the days, I was a champion I was on top of my A game. I will admit though when this exact thing happened to me last week I kind of had a realization that those times weren't that great for me either and that it really was just nostalgia.
Your realization kind of gave me a realization of my own: even if the old days weren't that great either and I'm just being nostalgic, at least I wasn't as damaged back then as I am now so, in a way, they were indeed somewhat better times.
'hey...I remember this game...it was so much fun when I was a kid. '  :(
Remember fun? Yeah me neither there's always atleast sonething negative hanging over me like a darkcloud. 
I got depressed that u you young guys refer to 3-4 years ago as the old days or when u were a kid. For me the number is more like 30  years.
lol, I'm younger than you, but I noticed that too. I'm a 90s child.
I have a feeling of excitement at first with good memories but then right to the sad part. Just remember though that we always think it was alot better than you thought at the time. Either way, I'm right there with ya. 
I hated being a kid when I was one, but now I look at the good times I had fondly.
Countless of times when trying to communicate to someone about my sad situation, but of course why should I burden them and ruin their day. I regret spilling so much to the person anyways. I just depend on my diary app so I can vent in every night. Calms me down a bit and don't have to worry about someone finding it. But here is a nice place to vent too, best not to bottle anything inside. The thoughts will keep you awake.   
What is the app called? I might give it a try 
What is the app called? I might give it a try 
The app is called Daylio. 
sad part is i have noone to write that shit to so i just think of what i would say if i had someone to talk to.
The funny part is even if someone genuinely asks if everything's alright you just say: 'Yeah I'm fine' with a fake smile 
The funny part is even if someone genuinely asks if everything's alright you just say: 'Yeah I'm fine' with a fake smile 
It’s sad that this has become my default reaction to literally everyone who asks if I’m doing alright.
👏👏👏  Best of luck to you in the next relationship. 
Thanks a million! 
People who don't have it don't understand it.
And even when the other person does have it, every persons depression effects them in different ways. Depression has an infinite amount of triggers and an infinite amount of ways to make the person feel like complete and utter shite. Only the people that love you will ever get the possibility to understand your symptoms truly.
And even when the other person does have it, every persons depression effects them in different ways. Depression has an infinite amount of triggers and an infinite amount of ways to make the person feel like complete and utter shite. Only the people that love you will ever get the possibility to understand your symptoms truly.
That's quite true dude.Fortunately, I don't have to worry about people understanding me, because nobody cares about an unlovable loser like me anyway.
That's quite true dude.Fortunately, I don't have to worry about people understanding me, because nobody cares about an unlovable loser like me anyway.
Same.
What? What do you mean you're depressed? Just get happy...duh! That kinda crap? 
Definitely, and they say so much more shit.
>'Omg but you're such a joker, there's no way you can have depression'.  Yet so did Robin Williams.
Exactly. I think it's really hurtful that people kinda have this weird tunnel vision as to what mental illness actually looks like. The truth is that it doesn't have any single look. 
Exactly. I think it's really hurtful that people kinda have this weird tunnel vision as to what mental illness actually looks like. The truth is that it doesn't have any single look. 
I'm happy enough if they don't see us as potentially violent threats because that's what movies been telling them and this is what they know.
If I'm not actively talking about how unhappy I am and how much I don't want to live, everyone assumes that the problem is gone - even though I've been like this for over a decade.  It's really shooting weird.
Right!? If I'm not crying or saying something is wrong, my family assumes I'm 'better'. They also apparently don't understand how bipolar works, but that's another story. 
The worst is when people forget that it's an ailment that consumes your entire life. It's not something you can confine into a little office to deal with it in private. My family always figured everything was okay as long as I was in therapy, so they didn't say anything as I continued to get worse.  edit: grammar
Whenever I tell my mom that I'm having a particularly hard time, she always just fires back with 'Well, you should go to therapy'.  I've been in the therapy, I know it helps.  It can also be not at all what gets you through tough times; that it is not anywhere near the shooting silver bullet that she sometimes wants to make it out to be.  It's tough... when someone is trying to be helpful, but you just hear 'Rub some dirt on it'.  
Whenever I tell my mom that I'm having a particularly hard time, she always just fires back with 'Well, you should go to therapy'.  I've been in the therapy, I know it helps.  It can also be not at all what gets you through tough times; that it is not anywhere near the shooting silver bullet that she sometimes wants to make it out to be.  It's tough... when someone is trying to be helpful, but you just hear 'Rub some dirt on it'.  
I completely empathize with you on this. 'I thought you were being fixed in therapy' is the sentiment that I closely relate to. Sometimes I need people that aren't getting paid to be there for me.
Mental illness is a spectrum that affects everyone differently, breaking a bone is pretty much the same for everyone. Even online you can find a ton of people claiming to have depression talking down to others who have a milder form, because they don't 'really' have it. So if people who actually have it can't even understand it, i'm not surprised that people who don't have it don't understand either.
Trying to explain depression is like trying to explain color to a blind man. 
Had someone tell me that 'I'm a bullshit person', said I faked my depression to get people to have sympathy for me and cut myself for attention. I ended up blocking the person, I really don't need that kind of shit being said to me right now :|
That was a very wise thing to do! Kudos for setting your mental health as a priority. It shows a lot of strength to separate yourself from negative people instead of letting them control you.
I've been made fun of for having an 'illness that requires me to sleep in til noon.' Yes, because lying in bed all day is so much more fun than going out and living life. People don't understand the actual physical and mental pain that comes with depression, they think it's just a glorified way of being lazy and unhappy.
If people think sleeping all day is fun, they are the lazy ones. 
If people think sleeping all day is fun, they are the lazy ones. 
I wish I could upvote this a hundred times. 
I hate when I say I'm depressed about X, and someone responds with, 'well, everyone is depressed about that.' Do they think that is normal? Is depression just a normal part of the human experience? I refuse to believe that this is it.
It's because most people don't know the difference between being depressed and just being sad. 
My family still thinks I'm pretending, specially my [23] older sister [34] she constantly tells me I'm a loser, I'm dumb, I'm lazy and I'm pretending to have a mental illness because (again)  I'm lazy and I don't want to get a job (I'm a student) she also says I'm never going to get a husband and that I'm going to fail my tests, etc. To her, mental illnesses are not real . 
Sorry bit your sister is a cint. Try to block her out the best you Can and keep moving forward.
I'm the same, exactly the same. I feel too proud to search for help and too afraid to disappoint myself. I I can't even enjoy the things I have because when I can do something it's never enough, I want more, I want to be the best of the best. I never did anything good enough to feel happy. I've never felt in peace with myself. 
When you don't do something, it's not enough.  When you do something, it's still not enough.  You lose when you try, you lose when you don't.   It's an endless circle. You think there's going to be a change, some bend round the corner, some new angle - but no. Your days, hours, minutes are spent going round and round in an endless formation. You're stuck, you can't get unstuck.  This is how you live. This is what depression has done to you. 
Learning an instrument is good, but my problem is that I'm very bad at seeing how far I've progressed and I'm very good at seeing how far I *haven't*. I always get too frustrated during a practice session even if I've improved.
'...I'm very bad at seeing how far I've progressed and I'm very good at seeing how far I haven't...'  My life. In a nutshell. 
If I do nothing,  then I won't screw it up.  Although, sometimes I even screw up doing nothing!
Doing nothing *makes* you a screw-up. I should know.
the pain and sadness of failure is worse than doing nothing. 
So true. Sadly accomplishing nothing gets to be a failure on its own. 
That's my reaction when I wake up in the morning and realize I'm still alive :(
tbf, if i woke up in the morning and realized I wasn't alive, i'd be a bit confused
tbf, if i woke up in the morning and realized I wasn't alive, i'd be a bit confused
Reminds me of a scene in Scary Movie 3.  How can you wake up dead?
Reminds me of a scene in Scary Movie 3.  How can you wake up dead?
How do you turn up missing?
Exactly. I wish I could just fall asleep and not wake up
My mom and I say this sometimes when things are particularly gunky in life or even just internally. Time for an extended or permanent nap.
Tfw you realize you have an assload of work due this week but you've lost all motivation.
I have 4 tests coming up in the next week, I barely finished reading 80% of one chapter(out of 4) of one subject. And I understand about 30% of it. Well shoot
Following this argument, since some people have it better than me, I'm allowed to be depressed. 
Stop having fun! Those people over there are having way more fun.
Stop having fun! Those people over there are having way more fun.
But the people over there always looks like they are having more fun..
the good old argument that you can't feel sad because there are starving African children....but i suppose we can't feel happy either because bill gates is swimming with $1000 bills in his 40 carat diamond plated Bugatti Veyron. Right?
Or, 'just be glad you have a job' when there are people with way better jobs than yours.
That's kinda weird. Why? Is it the struggle?
I can only speculate, but I know a lot of people spend their whole lives in the camps as second or third generation inmates. They might have a hard time imagining any other kind of life. Perspective really does matter when it comes to overall happiness. 
'and resigning himself to let it eat him away'   Isn't that the god damn truth. That's sad
Agreed, that was the part which struck most with me - being aware of 'the blight' on me, yet so incapable of doing anything but resign myself to the fact that it will continue to feed on me until nothing of note remains. 
“Deep into that darkness peering, long I stood there, wondering, fearing, doubting, dreaming dreams no mortal ever dared to dream before.”    Poe...
I'll see your Poe and raise you one:  'Misery is manifold. The memory of past bliss is the anguish of today, or, the agonies which are have their origins in the ecstasies which *might have been*.'   That one always gets me. So true.  
First of all, you sound like a wonderful parent.  My dad used to read the original Romance of the Three Kingdoms (Ming dynasty Chinese epic) in our home dialect.  Nothing put us (four boys) out faster.  Second of all, why fight the tears?  If a piece moves you, we shouldn't be afraid to show our emotions, especially in the safety of home with our loved ones.  It shows your kid that it's okay to cry sometimes and you may find it cathartic.
Full daddy meltdown would detract from the important business of getting to sleep.
Dickens has a way of striking you to the core. My favorite two are from 'Our Mutual Friend':  'And O there are days in this life, worth life and worth death.'  and  'But he is only stunned by the unvanquishable difficulty of his existence.' 
That shit is right up there with 'To be, or not to be'.
Omg this is me , i have talents, i got money, yet i am lost, i hv no idea where iam going .today i went jogging after ages of no exercise, i stopped running and started crying n weeping 
you were weeping because you broke the routine of doing nothing? crying is a release ...those might have been good tears. I say keep doing something different than you normally do. It will hurt and be painful but thats the old parts of you straining and breaking off.
If you were resigning yourself completely you wouldn't be here. 
That's a positive way of looking at it.
It's a sad situation when the greater part of one's day is looking forward to ending it - when going to sleep is the best part of the day and waking up is the worst.
That's why it's always been a dream of mine (no pun intended) to learn how to lucid dream. Imagine it, full control of a world of your making, once you have enough practice, its said you can do pretty much whatever you can imagine. At that point, it truly becomes a life where one only need survive the day in order to get to the world that they truly wish to inhabit. Also it would answer every question I could ever want to ask.
That's why it's always been a dream of mine (no pun intended) to learn how to lucid dream. Imagine it, full control of a world of your making, once you have enough practice, its said you can do pretty much whatever you can imagine. At that point, it truly becomes a life where one only need survive the day in order to get to the world that they truly wish to inhabit. Also it would answer every question I could ever want to ask.
You can learn! I had a natural introduction to it, experienced it before I knew what it was. Just keep reality in your mind all the time, constantly think 'Am I dreaming?' ... The only way I gain lucidity is when something  pretty impossible happens and I catch it, I'm like.. WTF?.. Omg I'm dreaming..
I dont think it is too hard to incite vivid dreaming, but it again brings up the argument of whether a reliance on escapism: drugs, books, video games etc is a healthy lifestyle.
I really hate the very idea of 'escapism'. How is anything outside of reality? If something is outside of reality, why does that mean it's bad? You would really go as far as saying lucid dreaming might be harmful escapism? You have to sleep every day anyway. If anything you're missing out on reality by not having full lucid control of your dreams as well as a more vivid memory of them.
the worst is looking forward to temporary comatose, then it doesn't come
agreed. its so frustrating.
I always daydream about getting hit by a meteor and dying.  Such a cool way to die without having to feel guilty about doing it myself.
\o/ me too! But not limited to that -- my brain is very good at coming up with awesome scenarios that *wouldn't be my fault*.
i probably shouldnt have laughed but i dont care. i have bipolar and im allowed to cause its friggin true. it sounds bad to others but there have been many days when i wish i could go back in time so i could abort myself so i dont have to deal with shit anymore. 
Yeah, but wouldn't that cause a temporal recursion loop?
Yeah, but wouldn't that cause a temporal recursion loop?
a what??? lol.....never heard of this before.
a what??? lol.....never heard of this before.
If you go back in time and actively prevent your own birth, you would no longer exist.  That means you would never be able to go back and prevent your own birth, therefore ensuring you *will* be born.  CAN'T WIN. :-(
I want you to laugh! Comedians are actually the most depressed people in the world, getting others to laugh is a form of therapy.
OMG, at first I read that as CANADIANS. 
It's not so much that I hope someone kills me in my sleep, but that I hope never to wake up.
I'd love a good, long coma.  Let me take a break for a few years, then get a chance to acclimatize to a few changes, make a fresh start, that kinda jazz.
I wish I had more than one upvote to give.  It's midnight right now, and Im excited that I'll finally be able to fall into an UN-emotional bliss for a few hours.  Because I know as soon as I wake up tomorrow, I'll be fighting the demons of depression all over again.  Rinse, repeat.   Your comic says so much, in so little.    *humble applause*
Thanks, man!
You just gave me another reason to sleep. Thank you. 
Welcome
This pretty well describes most of my current episode.  I think we're at an advantage though.  Some people can't sleep at all with their depression.  I sleep like a baby.  I think it's really important to get quality sleep if you're depressed.  It gives the brain time to neutralize garbage thoughts of the previous day, and reset emotionally.  Though it doesn't work like we think it should, it'd be much worse if we got terrible sleep.
Same here, I can fall asleep anywhere on command.  But I never, ever wake up refreshed, no matter how long or soundly I slept.  So this 'gift' isn't helping. :-P  I do, however, use it as a kind of 'time travel.'  If I'm really too impatient to wait for something, I'll just fall asleep, and boom: no more waiting!
That's interesting. I don't look forward to sleep very much. If I go to sleep it means that the next day will start sooner and I don't want that to happen. Days are scary.  Oh, and could you x-post this to r/fffffffuuuuuuuuuuuu/ maybe?
That's how I feel, too. I can't sleep because when I wake up I'll have to deal with an entirely new day full of shit-tastic funtimes.   But at the same time, I don't feel when I sleep. The idea of sleep tears me. 
It's not unusual for depressed people to be the smart child. It makes you wish you were ignorant somehow.
I think what's actually going on, in many if not most of these cases, is that [being praised for nothing they did or chose is a major factor in their depression](https://www.reddit.com/r/depression/comments/6gl0pn/i_dont_want_to_be_called_smart_ever_again/diraah0/?utm_content=permalink&utm_medium=api&utm_source=reddit&utm_name=depression).
Exactly. I always get placed on a pedestal by friends and family, that 'Jelly-Senpai is smart, and going to college, blah blah'. Meanwhile im struggling hard and feel like I know nothing. I'm not smart at all, yet professors, parents, family keep thinking so and saying so. Why put me on a pedestal? It will only make my inevitable fall that much harder.
Because they don't really care for you.. i have experienced the same thing. Or they do.. but they lack any intelligence or self criticism to actually realize the words they are saying. 
I can relate big time. Didn't walk at graduation either (both for that same reason and because of severe social anxiety/stage fright)
Same here with the social anxiety as well, which contributed largely to my highschool experience being so unpleasant.
I know it is a daunting task but sometimes the risk is worth the reward. The only way to find out if things will get worse is to try, fail and try again. (i cant always do it myself but I usually try)
Ya but I'm tired of feeling bad about myself, yes, I know I'll only feel better by trying, but that's what got me here in the first place, trying and failing. I just don't know if I have the drive or committment to try and live out each day doing the best job I can.
Sixelona? I rarely see you outside /r/mindcrack, and I must say I enjoy your work. Funny as ever, although this time it hits close to home.   
I creep into other places from time to time and once in awhile when my anxiety doesn't eat at me I try to help here. Thank you Doc <3
I have used this excuse more times then i can count all though high school.
I don't even think about saying 'Yeah, just tired' anymore. It just comes naturally to me, reflexively to me. That scares me.
I don't even think about saying 'Yeah, just tired' anymore. It just comes naturally to me, reflexively to me. That scares me.
I know exactly what you mean. It really developed into a reflex for me as well. Almost instinctive, actually.
The first word I noticed was 'selfish'. Be as selfish as you need. Rasputin need you to help him move? Too bad, because you're not up for it. When I was depressed, I often said no to things 'Hey Emil, wanna go to the beach and celebrate midsummer?', 'I need an extra guy to help me move'. Just please, please don't say no to everything. It helps being in a positive social gathering. 
I feel like I'm selfish for even considering suicide. Suicide is ultimately a punishment to those who used to know you - I don't want to torture them with the guilt, the thoughts that they should have done something, that they should have known better... their entire lives would be marred. Yet I keep think about it and fantasizing about it...
I feel like I'm selfish for even considering suicide. Suicide is ultimately a punishment to those who used to know you - I don't want to torture them with the guilt, the thoughts that they should have done something, that they should have known better... their entire lives would be marred. Yet I keep think about it and fantasizing about it...
The fact that you are concerned about the ones you would leave behind made me smile. It is a really good thing that you care about them. But I still wish you wouldn't consider suicide an option. 
Can't expect help if you don't tell whats up.
That's easier said than done. 
That's easier said than done. 
Most people don't want to hear about it.  Even your closest friends slowly get sick of you if you complain too much.  That's why you need professional help. It sucks to realize this, but it is the truth.
Most people don't want to hear about it.  Even your closest friends slowly get sick of you if you complain too much.  That's why you need professional help. It sucks to realize this, but it is the truth.
I am where I am because I got help, but I didn't ask. My family just knew. 
While depression may be the worst, it also provides great wisdom.
Very true.
It's great that you've found the resolve to give life a chance.   If you don't mind my asking, where do you plan to go from here?
Where will I go from here? The only way I can go...forward!
So, who exactly said the 'I can't do this without you'?
My boyfriend. He knows about my depression and I guess he could tell something was up when we were talking the day before and he just said it out of nowhere. 
My boyfriend. He knows about my depression and I guess he could tell something was up when we were talking the day before and he just said it out of nowhere. 
i'm glad he did. marry the guy! he's worth it! and so are you!
Sounds like a load of bull. Like hell anyone suffering from depression serious enough to want to commit suicide would just become happy like this. 
I don't mean to come off as rude, but just where do you get off telling me this is a load of bull? What, you think I just suddenly started skipping and singing and loving life? You think I'm *happy*? No. Maybe I'm not happy, but I decided to give happiness a chance. I decided that instead of living my life waiting for the day I end it... I'm going to fight. 
>-CPA -2018 closing up, J-6D  What? 
Hes chilling in some hospital bed it sounded like.. im impressed he typed everything else so great
Whoa. Yeah. Hey. It might not be what you desired, but welcome back to the world of the living. I want to hear the full story when you can. Take care brother.
I dont expect or desire anything. Im here to share, give and take knowledge of life. I dont know how close I was, but for now I dont wanna get close ever again. 4 more hours in ICU before I can continue my computer charged time. (friggin $1,2 minute). WORTH IT. Come back tomorrow, i'll share and cope as hardly I can
I dont expect or desire anything. Im here to share, give and take knowledge of life. I dont know how close I was, but for now I dont wanna get close ever again. 4 more hours in ICU before I can continue my computer charged time. (friggin $1,2 minute). WORTH IT. Come back tomorrow, i'll share and cope as hardly I can
Sure thing. Take care, and talk to ya soon. 
Damn, that feeling when you wake up in ER is really overwhelming. You can feel really glad/relieved but at the same time a piece of shit... Not easy :/  Glad to hear you're alright, and seeing that you have that much love in your life should give you something to hang onto :)
The time I woke up in the ER I felt like 'eh, it's been poor attempt number X'.  I've overdosed multiple times with and without an ER visit, so it doesn't bother me as much.  Then I just look forward to getting off the psychiatric hold then go back to the daily grind and my lovely drugs once more..
What makes me happy are memes. Look them up. I have some OCD and depression, and I am ugly af.
Memes are the only thing keeping me alive
Memes are the only thing keeping me alive
Your name goes just perfect with what you said
It sucks because there is literally no motivation to do anything. I ask myself 'If I could do ANYTHING right now, what would I do?' All I want is to sleep. :/
yep. i feel you buddy 
Hmm, is there something you enjoy doing?
Not really, no. I used to enjoy eating and drinking, but not anymore. The only thing I can say I truly enjoy doing is lying in bed and watching YouTube. 
Not really, no. I used to enjoy eating and drinking, but not anymore. The only thing I can say I truly enjoy doing is lying in bed and watching YouTube. 
If you're like me (and I think you are), it's not that you enjoy lying in bed and watching YouTube.  It's that going out into the world and engaging with others is hard work, bordering on painful, and leaves you almost immediately in a state of wanting to get back to bed and YouTube - where your brain can disengage from facing reality.  If that sounds like you, then I'm right there with you. 
If you're like me (and I think you are), it's not that you enjoy lying in bed and watching YouTube.  It's that going out into the world and engaging with others is hard work, bordering on painful, and leaves you almost immediately in a state of wanting to get back to bed and YouTube - where your brain can disengage from facing reality.  If that sounds like you, then I'm right there with you. 
yea, I guess so. 
What kind? What's your poison? Personally shit like Nerdwriter is like shooting crack to me. You know about /r/mealtimevideos right?
never heard of either of those guys. no particular thing i just drift through mindless crap 
Yep.  It's like torture.  We have to go through all this work just have a chance at living a somewhat decent life.  If we don't work, we suffer.  But working is almost another form of suffering.  There's no way out of it except dying.  Then we ask, what is the point?  
And you can't die without making your family suffer ... quiet the conundrum
sex, good food, music, friends who are good company and don't betray you
What if you don't get sex, don't enjoy food, and have no friends?
yeah, it's pretty nonsensical, when we are young we are lead to believe anything we want to do is possible and that we have all the time in the world, as we get older: unless you are better off, extremely intelligent,  talented or attractive, you really just have to lower your expectations and settle for whatever you can get and live a mediocre life till you body breaks down into nonexistence once again
I wish I didn't know this. 
Yep, that's why adults always say to children to 'enjoy their younger years'. As kids, we had no idea it would be like this. I feel like it's faulty to give us a false sense of hope for a future that doesn't even exist. 
Yeah, that seems to have caused me great lifetime harm.  I was raised in a way that didn't reflect the way things actually are, so despite knowing differently now, I have a hole that can't be filled because what filled it previously was false.  It seems that if I wasn't sheltered and fed lies I wouldn't have expected things to be other than they are. 
Yeah, that seems to have caused me great lifetime harm.  I was raised in a way that didn't reflect the way things actually are, so despite knowing differently now, I have a hole that can't be filled because what filled it previously was false.  It seems that if I wasn't sheltered and fed lies I wouldn't have expected things to be other than they are. 
'In our early youth we sit before the life that lies ahead of us like children sitting before the curtain in a theatre, in happy and tense anticipation of whatever is going to appear. For to him who does know, children can sometimes seem like innocent delinquents, sentenced not to death but to life, who have not yet discovered what their punishment will consist of.'
But isn't a little happiness better than none? I'm not saying I'm happy about the lies I was fed but at least I know there was a point in my life I was able to enjoy before I came into awareness.
To me, that makes it hurt even more. I know everything in life is ephemeral and we all have to grow up, but knowing that your happiest and easiet days are behind you is painful. 
That's why I wish I would die soon.
Ah same :( but hang in there
Ah same :( but hang in there
Poor choice of words
Poor choice of words
Ah shit
At least your parents love you, right? That's why I live. I can't bare to think how sad they would be and how others would look down on them as failures if I were to kill myself ... if only I could die a natural death.
Maybe... They probably do... 
I realise it every day. I'm not having a family and no women are interested in me, so I have very little to try for. There is no goal. Life in general has a purpose, create more life, but if you can't do that you haven't much else in life to strive for. It's even worse when you have nobody.   Just counting down the days till I'm old af. 
I for one think it's selfish to bring someone into this world to possibly suffer as much as we do. I fear 1 day the human race will kill itself from overpopulation.
I think we've deviated so much from our caveman lifestyle that it's hard to find meaning in life, because basically we're the only animals intelligent enough to *look* for meaning in life as opposed to just living it. Ignorance is bliss.
Awareness is a curse. I talk to so many people who try to convince me to live this ignorant life by turning to God and such ... but you just can't once you become aware. You have to be pretty broken to ignore the awareness once you obtain it.
Exactly. Humanity is such a mistake, I wish we never evolved this far. So many of us are truly never satisfied. 
I agree with you 100% and often think about this. By becoming too aware we brought misery upon ourselves.
That's why I don't save money to retire. I live my days in retirement, enjoying the little things I do. Be it video games, hanging with people that care about me, or music (especially music) performance and listening. You shouldn't try to live for the end game, you should live for the journey.
How will you take care of yourself in your later years when you are unable to work and need medications, procedures, assistance, etc?
How will you take care of yourself in your later years when you are unable to work and need medications, procedures, assistance, etc?
By then, I hope most forms of manual labour will be automated by machines or I'll land a hit song. Life is too short to run in circles worrying about all of it.
If you stop and think for more than a few seconds, the sheer pointlessness of life begins to intrude on you. Our modern capitalist society is filled with lots of blinking, flashing distractions so we never really get to that point.  It's true, though: there is no meaning to it all, you're a carbon-based automaton living out its life just like trillions of other carbon-based automatons, and you will be completely forgotten after you die.  Smoke weed every day.
That awakening and awareness is probably why weed is being legalized all over the place. 
The scary part about trying to be an entrepreneur is that there is a measured amount of risk and a high probability of failure in which you will end up a situation far worse than you started with ... alas, you remain a slave to society.
Theres a quote 'you wont regret the things you did, you'll regret the things you didn't do when you had the chance' no one gets anywhere in life without taking risks
It just does not seem worth it to me anymore. Happiness never lasts.
And when it lasts you don't even realizy you are happy... 
Thank you for posting this.  This is mostly why I will not be having children.  I don't need to subject them to this life.  It isn't fair.  There is no point.  Now if I can just figure out how to get out of this life.
When you figure it out, take Trump and Hillary with you please....
Yeah but my childhood was pretty full of anxiety. 
Read the first sentence, made me chuckle sadly. Glad OP had a carefree childhood at least.
Do I realize how pointless life is? Sometimes. Do I choose to believe it? Sometimes. Is life easier when I give my life purpose and set goals? You betcha. How hard is that? I can barely get out of bed some days. When I have hope, I can achieve anything. When I am overcome with fear, I will sleep 18 hours a day. The struggle is to find something that gets you in 'flow' or 'the zone'. Reddit has some great communities to assist with this.
It's just hard to have hope when you already have awareness. It's kind of like how people put hope in a God ... but awareness tells that if there is a God, he is doing absolutely nothing.
At least that's a fun distraction.  I'm thinking I want to try a breakthrough dose of shrooms sooner or later.
Just stay away from synthetics
I dont care how hard it gets. I dont care if you think its not worth it. I have ambitions far beyond what some would consider realistic and I've already passed a point where I feel I should've died, so I'm gonna achieve my goals or shooting die trying. I've got nothing better to do so why not? My desire to help others and make the world a better place is all I have to live for.
That's all I wanted to do. Help others and make the world a better place.  Only now do I realize the wisdom of buddhist monks.
What makes a non-futile thing I wonder? When everyone is going to die, and the universe will end in heat death, what sense can be made of 'futility?'
a non-futile thing would be an individual sense of fulfillment but it is not possible to achieve with how society currently works.
Here's what works for me. There are people actually suffering in the world, not the existential suffering you're experiencing from our cushy 1st world lives. People are starving, in pain, in misery, every single day. Even if your life seems meaningless because you have ascended to having all needs met easily it doesn't mean all do so why not let a hand?  Sorry if that does not help, it usually does me if I feel sort of 'what' sthe shooting point?'
If I gave up working, I would be the person who was starving, in pain, in misery, every single day (especially later in life). It's for this very reason that I have to subject myself to this meaningless routine.
Adult life doesn't consist just of work, it has a lot of pleasures, too, plus work itself can be a pleasure as well.
Right...   8hrs is work (for the overwhelming majority, unpleasant and not pleasurable)  8hrs is sleep  8hrs is everything else, commuting, feeding yourself to stay alive so you can work, etc.
Life sucks when you're a pleb.  I think the only way to change that is to actually get out there and somehow change the world for the better, but only so many of us can actually do that. The rest of us really are just feeding the machine.
I work on sabotaging the machine as often as I can. 
Honestly, I get this feeling from a lot of people in general. No one wants to have blood on their hands is the way I see it. 
'Nobody wants blood on their hands' describes it perfectly. I always hear people say that those who commit suicide are selfish, but imo its much more selfish of them to guilt a depressed person into staying alive just so they don't have to feel guilty. If your only reason for telling someone not to harm themselves is so you can feel good about yourself, shoot you. 
'Nobody wants blood on their hands' describes it perfectly. I always hear people say that those who commit suicide are selfish, but imo its much more selfish of them to guilt a depressed person into staying alive just so they don't have to feel guilty. If your only reason for telling someone not to harm themselves is so you can feel good about yourself, shoot you. 
YESS. It's like, they say depressed people are selfish so they can just pin everything back on the person who is stricken with pinning everything on theirself in the first place! It's easy to do because it seems like you're doing a good thing by keeping them from hurting themself but like you're straight up hurting the entire population of people with depression by blaming them for their problem
YESS. It's like, they say depressed people are selfish so they can just pin everything back on the person who is stricken with pinning everything on theirself in the first place! It's easy to do because it seems like you're doing a good thing by keeping them from hurting themself but like you're straight up hurting the entire population of people with depression by blaming them for their problem
'you' in this case meaning 'society'... switched to omniscient perspective, sorry, been writing
People no longer value the quality of life, only the quantity of life. The medical industry only cares that you live, not how you live. You could spend your entire life suffering and they would say,'wow look at how we have kept these people alive!' 
Completely agree. Not only that they believe more in treatment than preventative care and try to shove medication down your throat because they're in bed with the pharmaceutical companies. Ever since I started antidepressants I have a real mistrust for western medicine in general. Not saying there aren't good doctors out there because there are but most of the psychiatrists and doctors are in in it for the money.
This is actually true for a lot of mental health workers. My mom is a psychiatrist and she complains about suicidal people because it's *her* fault and responsibility if they end up dying. In reality she doesn't give a damn about them at all, she just doesn't want to go to court because of a patient's suicide. 
Can't blame her though. The kind of work she does, it would be hard not to become desensitized to all of it.
Just curious, but why would she have to go to court?  Is it because the parents are filing a lawsuit, or some other group?
Tbh I don't know exactly, I'll ask her about it. She does go to court quite frequently though, so it's probably the patients' family.
Tbh I don't know exactly, I'll ask her about it. She does go to court quite frequently though, so it's probably the patients' family.
Well, sorry to hear your mom doesn't give a damn and that she keeps getting sued for not preventing deaths. I wish victims of emotional abuse could go to people who care and get help, but I guess that is not really possible, because the people who are supposed to care are actually too afraid of the patents, the victim fears, to help them. 
I've had people try to guilt me into more gainful employment because my family helps me out - which is something I'm well aware that I have zero entitlement to.  And yet when I talk about offing myself, they're the first to say 'no, anything but that!'. So is it about the shooting money or isn't it?    But it's really about what you present here; they don't care how you feel as long as you live in exactly the way they demand.
> they don't care how you feel as long as you live in exactly the way they demand.  My entire family.  My entire life.  FUUUUUUUUUUUCK.
Try to be curious in life. Curiosity heals depression
Not appropriate here. Check out the sub rules 
I was having a debate with my gf the other day about suicide being a humane alternative to life rather than a tragic end. I think I've started to romanticize suicide as an exit from the pain. Instead of 'the end of life' I've started to think of it as 'the end of the impossibility of happiness'.   I don't condone it in any way, but if someone were to, say, have a terminal illness I think it's a debate worth having. 
That is a very good way of looking at it. The end of the impossibility of happiness. The end to all of your functions, along with the ability to feel pain. Like turning off a shitty movie. 
That is a very good way of looking at it. The end of the impossibility of happiness. The end to all of your functions, along with the ability to feel pain. Like turning off a shitty movie. 
As someone who has dealt with depression for many years, I don't feel happiness is impossible. It's just few and far between. And those moments, and the memories of them, can really get me through the very down times.
As someone who has dealt with depression for many years, I don't feel happiness is impossible. It's just few and far between. And those moments, and the memories of them, can really get me through the very down times.
I'm pretty sure I wouldn't be able to recognize actually being happy if I happened to become happy somehow.
you could kill yourself, or you could go out get an electrical, mechanical, or aerospace engineering degree and try to help me build a space ship and go be a space-cowboy
and even if you don't want to do those things, you can still ride with us. and it will be awesome =)  [directed with love to the OP]
How will he get it back if he drops it? ;_;
Telekinesis, duh.
I wish someone would lend me their lucky stuffed bunny...
Me too. Maybe we should each get lucky stuffed bunnies and give them to each other. 
This is cute but also trivializes depression.
I just like the sentiment that even the smallest gesture of kindness can make worlds of difference. That's how I interpreted it anyway.
it's cute, but it's just a drawing. :[
But it's a drawing with a t-rex and a bunny!
I feel the same. I've never had any direction or dreams. It's a miserable and frustrating feeling.  I hope you find something that makes you happy
Desiring direction and dreams as an escape from depression is like expecting finding a partner will solve everything. I've had hobbies that have always given me a focus, but a life as a minimum wage slave that hasn't offorded me the time, money and skill to successfully complete a project. Having a desire to make something and not being able to, as hard as I try, only leaves me feeling worse. Buying a games console would've been a wiser move.
Yesssss. This is exactly how I feel. It is super frustrating and it only makes matters worse. It's like I feel like I'll never be happy with what I do. Everyone tells me to find something I like to do and I'll be happy. But I don't like to do anything :/
For the most part I have been doing what is not irritating. Like... Instead of looking for something that makes me happy, I'd try to do something that annoys me the least. Well, doing nothing usually is more irritating than other things. 
no one who is not a bad person to this society, because you cannot get anything without taking it from someone else :/ i dont have any place in this world either, and never will
That's one way to play the game. I can sympathize with this but you can make this world a better place for others too which I'm not interested in. I never got mine
Why would your dad stop speaking to you? That's seems incredibly petty and counterproductive. I'd like to think that if I was a father, I would try and give positive encouragement to my son or daughter to improve their situation, even if they were at Rock bottom. Really sorry that you have to deal with that. 
My dad is really old fashioned, been in the military all his life, and I'm kinda his antithesis. When I quit uni, he was really pissed off with the way I handled it, and until I got the dead end job I'm still in, he wouldn't talk to me.   I think since I was officially diagnosed with some issues he's been a lot more understanding, but at this point it's kinda like the damage is done. 
Why would you say you are not built for this world?  Also I wouldn’t say your pathetic everyone doubts themselves some over think more then others which can lead them to think they are worse then they are.
I just don't see any future for myself where I'm content with life. I look at society and think 'that's not me'. I'll take any opportunity not to get out of bed in the morning at this point.
I just don't see any future for myself where I'm content with life. I look at society and think 'that's not me'. I'll take any opportunity not to get out of bed in the morning at this point.
Society is a collection of different sub sections forming it. You *can* find something that gives yourself meaning or just plan enjoyment.
Society is a collection of different sub sections forming it. You *can* find something that gives yourself meaning or just plan enjoyment.
I mean, I know logically 'there has to be something' but I just don't see it at all. I see another dead end job for another few years, accomplishing nothing while still getting no enjoyment from life.
Why are we here?
The only reason we have a base over here is because they have a base over there 
Did you want to talk about it more specifically? Like how it gets pulled in?   Back when I went, people in church took an attitude that if I prayed more or 'had a better relationship with God,' I wouldn't be so depressed. I've got so much anger at the church for this-- for antiquated views keeping people from understanding health issues and receiving proper care.
I'm so thankful my church isn't like this. I mean, I'm sure some people could be, but at least my pastor basically just listens and tells me he loves me and offers to pray if I want to. He's helping me find therapy I can afford and just listens to me. He never once told me that if I tried harder or believed better it would help. I am so thankful for that. 
This is part of the reason why I don't tell me family much about myself. My mom's cure for everything is to pray is away when I need legitimate help.
Yep, same here. Although I know it's out of her best intentions, it doesn't make me feel any better.
Yep, same here. Although I know it's out of her best intentions, it doesn't make me feel any better.
Same here, I know she's trying her best but I still feel helpless
Yes.  No longer religious, but when I was, I was just as depressed, if not more so because I had people telling me that if I just prayed hard enough, God would make me happy with my life.  Pretty sure no amount of prayer is going to adjust my brain chemistry.
Isn't that sad. Makes me wonder how many suicides were motivated by the guilt and torment of essentially being told you're not worthy of God's love and forgiveness, for having depression and not getting over it. What a messed up manipulation of someone's reality. Tragic.
One girl once told me the reason i am so depressed is because i am not a christian and that i was messed up. 
You calmly get up, dust off your trousers and say Goodbye. 
Can you clarify what you mean. Are they trying to blame religion for your depression, or are they saying you need religion to battle your depression?
Religion makes depression worse not better. It only adds guilt 
Religion makes depression worse not better. It only adds guilt 
I agree, religion almost always only works for healthy people.
My therapist told me I would never get over it if I didn't believe in God. 
I'm new here and don't know a lot about this, but I'm pretty sure that a licensed therapist isn't supposed to say something like that.
Find a new therapist 
Find a therapist, you meant
My brother struggled with depression for a long time. Then he turned to religion and it helped him, and he got better. I will forever be happy for him, but now I'm alone.   I don't believe, but sometimes I wish I could force myself to. Maybe things would be easier.  
I feel that if religion works for you and gives you peace of mind and help you live a healthy, positive way of life, then no body should tell you that religion is bad. I myself am not convinced that religion is the right thing for me, but it could be so for many.
I'm religious and I think religion can help. HOWEVER.......... like, it only helps if the person who needs it is asking me about it. I bring God and Jesus up in lots of places for lots of reasons, but never as a direct response to someone's depression. It's not helpful, it's not kind. 
And it is blatantly ignorant of the person pushing religion as the answer. The nerve. Seems to me that most of the people that push, push, *push* religion as 'the answer', often have more emotional baggage than me.
I'm already praying on it, quit stuffing me into the zealot box... shooting evangelicals don't know when to stop.
Once saved, never saved enough.
You would think that religion would make people *more* depressed.
Personally, it makes me *more* angry. People that push religion as the answer to depression are the same people that sprinkle holy water on their child's photo so they'll do better on school. Absent parenting, turning to God to solve the very problems he gave us a brain for.
Therapy is a powerful tool that many dismiss as a waste of time because its benefits are not always tangible or quick. I go 2x/month and it really helps me. Good luck, having professional support is a huge asset.
Thank you! Most people I knew saw it as weakness, which is why I never tried it. By the way, I no longer talk to those people because of their ignorance. I deal with enough shit so I didn't need their negativity lol.
Yay! Good for you. That first step is huge. Well done :) 
It was hard, but I'm glad it's done. I nearly had a panic attack.
YES. So happy for you. Be as selfish as you want with your session. It’s your time to rant and dig in (or not dig in, it’s your first time) and be heard. That alone is such a relief. And you’ve still got a lot of life left in front of you to reclaim what you think you’ve lost. Good luck!
Most definitely! I've always been the listener but haven't had many people to vent to. This thread has been a lifesaver.
OMG so true I get sadder when I see or hear bad international or national news (wars, massacres, bombings, horrible murder, rape,...) I give up on humanity for a day or two and feel disgusted of who I am (same specie of killers, murderers and rapists). I know the solution is to leave social media but I tried and it didn't work. 
Thats why the news programs pump us with fear. They dont give a shoot and they do not want us to be our best version.  No one ever gained anything from watching the doom and gloom that is the news everyday.
Yeah, even existing is tiring at this point.
Pay less mind to your life in general, and more to the present. You can see more value if you look closer to it.
Pay less mind to your life in general, and more to the present. You can see more value if you look closer to it.
The presents pretty shit though idk if i want to focus on that.....
The presents pretty shit though idk if i want to focus on that.....
Specifically, on how you can change the present.
I wish I could donate my life to anyone who dies because of cancer.
this sounds like an HBO original 
this sounds like an HBO original 
Right lmao
I feel like I’ve lived forever, and I’m only 16. I’m so tired of existence. I just need a break. Maybe not even death. If I could just slip into a coma for a few weeks that would be great.
You need some time to yourself to help you prepare to face your darker emotions, and that's okay.
Exactly, every night I go to sleep at six and wake up at seven and I’m exhausted before lunch. Even the smallest tasks drain the life out of me.
Me too omg just forcing myself to shower today was so hard. :(
Yup, that's what made me finally go to a doctor. Have to get blood test etc to make sure it isn't my pituitary gland or anything.  If you force yourself to stay awake and keep a schedule, thinking 'I'll sleep better tonight and tomorrow will be different', you feel worse.  If you sleep during the day, you feel worse.  Can't shooting win.  8 weeks in to anti-depressants (Sertraline) and I feel exactly the same...time to switch...
Sertraline was horrible for me. The nausea I felt after taking them made me feel sick all day and I had no appetite.
People tell to depressive ones about a bright future, to fight for it like I care. I'm not shooting interested in get better, just let me die
Exactly, they just can’t grasp the fact that we simply don’t see a bright future for ourselves and it’s at a point where we’ve actually gone way past caring. I no longer see the point in anything (good or bad) I’d rather just not exist or disappear for good and not have deal with any of this crap 
Well,, it is one of depression's symptoms... But the worst is you are not ok to tell people you're tired. Everytime I say I'm in pain or tired I listen 'but you're always tired/in pain.'... Guess what? Being always tired or in pain doesn't make me less tired or in pain.... 
Exactly
I always felt this way too. May be a real thing after all!  Edit: typo
It could be. I don’t remember anything of course from a previous life if it’s a real thing. Sometimes I have dreams though that feel so real and it’s of other people (possibly past family) and I feel a strong connection with them. It’s weird. I have an open mind to anything could be possible. Nobody knows for certain about what happens after we die or where our consciousness was before we were born (if it’s a matter of always being here and never being gone). 
Unfortunately I've lived long enough to see myself become the villain
Hahahaha
It is really shameful to say, but I cannot until my mother dies. In Korea, where I live, if I want to make a donation, I need not only my consent but also my immediate family's consent as well. My father agreed to it, but my mother is against it. She sees that organ donation is too dangerous and she will not have her son die before her.
I'm from a Korean family so I can understand. It was ultimately my choice but my mom wasn't very happy with it. 
'Head full of fantasies of dying like a martyr?'  'Yes.'  'Dying is easy, young man. Living is harder.'
The line that gets me every time is 'I imagine death so much it feels more like a memory' 
Quite frequently. As a Police officer, who is lonely, with no kids, partner, or anything really going for me that matters, I'd happily give it all up for a just cause.
Thank you for making the world a safer place. :)
No, oddly enough enough I fantasize about dying forgotten.  
Why not both? Like that homeless guynn Brazil that died saving a hostage. Was in the news, almost nobody attended his funeral, not even the lady he saved. 
I'm sorry for your loss, internet hugs to you & your kids.
Thank you ☺️
He had great positive influence on your life; make sure you persevere to pass on and see that little bit of him in everyone around you.  Please try to get some emotional healing for yourself too, if not eventually... you shouldn't keep the burden of a straight face for too long.    Be well, and I'm sorry to hear.  
No straight faces or dry eyes here. 
Death sucks. Hug your children. Remember that people live on through you. That's love. Wish I could hug you 
This! ^^ ❤ hugs to everyone here that needs it 
So sorry for your loss. It sounds like he was a great man. 
Thank you. He really was. My grandpa and Eric were the two best men I've had the pleasure of knowing. 
I'm so sorry, definitely go to your doctor or start therapy if you aren't in it. I lost my dad 12 years old when I was 17 and never sought counseling. I still have nightmares about him. Nip it in the butt before you let yourself getting really down. 
I absolutely will. 
Man my grandmother is close to passing from cancer. It's never easy losing a close relative. 
Oh, shoot cancer. I really really hope I'm alive to see a cure all for cancer. Just so I can see it get it's ass handed to it. 
I am terribly sorry for your loss.
Thank you 
I'm so sorry for your loss ❤️❤️❤️ 
Thanks
i live in a third world country too some people think that my mental illness is a lie for attention 
People think that way in every country
People think that way in every country
In my country, too. Germany.
In my country, too. Germany.
In my country too, UK 🇬🇧 
in my country  no one give a shoot about mental illness that make my life more miserable. 
Mine too, for shoots sake. They only care when it's related to murder.
Wow, small world. US here, people shit all over mental illness. Something like 40% of the country doesn't believe mental illness actually exists. 
So wait a minute, more Americans believe the earth is 6000 years old than they believe depression exists, sorry but that's funny. Shitty but funny.
So wait a minute, more Americans believe the earth is 6000 years old than they believe depression exists, sorry but that's funny. Shitty but funny.
It's roughly equal, but yeah, it's shooted up. Intelligence is severely lacking in our country's general population. 
Yes hate to say it but most of the South Asian countries aren't too good to live. There are far too many people.
It's not necessarily the population tho, it's the complete lack of resources. Many countries were not able to participate in the great European resource grab that propelled America and Europe into the powerhouses they are today. It's crazy that people have to suffer solely because of greed.
It's not necessarily the population tho, it's the complete lack of resources. Many countries were not able to participate in the great European resource grab that propelled America and Europe into the powerhouses they are today. It's crazy that people have to suffer solely because of greed.
what resources do you mean? natural resources or human resources? 3rd world countries like indonesia and india has no problem with natural or human resources, in fact it's in abundance there.. the problem lies with their backward culture they have, 
what resources do you mean? natural resources or human resources? 3rd world countries like indonesia and india has no problem with natural or human resources, in fact it's in abundance there.. the problem lies with their backward culture they have, 
Can confirm. I actually live in a developing country and there are a huge range of issues that need to be rectified but I don't think government can do everything because it's the people and the society in general are what sucks the most. No amount of development or anything will help if people are not going to leave their backward/narrow-minded thinking behind.
I think you hit the nail on the head. It's better to be blissfully ignorant, than to know the truth and be reminded of it everyday.   I also think you see society for what it is. Unless you're in the in crowd you're mostly screwed until you die. The most you can do is make friends, and try to improve the situation handed to you. 
Thanks for replying and supporting. Too bad I don't have friends in real life, and when the internet stops working, all I can do is playing with landlords' pets.
I second that, you are nothing with out money almost everywhere in world. 
Yep. It's all money money money these days. See how many time a day you think about money. It's insane.
Which could be shut off or censored at any moment.
Which is slower than a turtle
There sounds like there's some anger in there. Turn that anger into motivation and actually get the shoot out. You can do it!
The motivation is there but it just flickers out most of the time 
The motivation is there but it just flickers out most of the time 
I second this recommendation.  Whatever motivation and strength and resources you have, use them to get out.  Whatever you do, don't give up, or settle, or get dug in even deeper there.  Don't let depression be your chains.  There must be many people who have been in your situation and who want to help you (immigration lawyers maybe?).
I second this recommendation.  Whatever motivation and strength and resources you have, use them to get out.  Whatever you do, don't give up, or settle, or get dug in even deeper there.  Don't let depression be your chains.  There must be many people who have been in your situation and who want to help you (immigration lawyers maybe?).
You need money which I don't have You need good grades from a good uni which I don't have yet I wish I could put my whole effort into that but everything around me is so draining that I just can't put my 100%
Where would we go?   No one wants a third worlder, let alone a poverty stricken third worlder, immigrating into their developed nation
I am from the US and love seeing people move here to start fresh lives. It makes me appreciate what we have so much more. Don't let our crazy president discourage you from seeing the US as an option. Most of us love immigrants because that is America in a nutshell. 
I am from the US and love seeing people move here to start fresh lives. It makes me appreciate what we have so much more. Don't let our crazy president discourage you from seeing the US as an option. Most of us love immigrants because that is America in a nutshell. 
But the immigration laws are so strict right now that that's basically not possible 
your country is still better than mine because there is psychiatrist, there is none in my country 
Which country are you from
Iam so sorry. I feel bad now (even more than normally) being such a idiot for having depression in such a rich country. 
it's not like if you live in rich country you are happy and if you live in poor country you are sad, it's just in poor country you feel there is no opportunity to be happy or change your life for better.  I live in bad country with war and I feel if I live in rich country my life will be a little better.
Iam so sorry. I feel bad now (even more than normally) being such a idiot for having depression in such a rich country. 
Don't feel bad it's not your fault 
I am from the United States. I'm not rich by our country's standards, but I have always felt a weird sense of guilt over the privilege that I have simply because I was born here. Why do I deserve this life anymore than you? I wish we could all be born with an equal economic footing.
Don't feel guilty you had no control over your birth 
>I wish we could all be born with an equal economic footing  This would've been much easier 40 or 50 years ago than today. And even then, that's not taking third world countries into account.
Want to know what makes that statement worse? Many countries were running UBI experiments that were proven successful but thanks to political turmoil of the time they all got scrapped. Such as when Canada's government imploded, or when Nixon was ousted. Then what makes it even worse is that people seem to have forgetten all about the fight for equity in that time. 
Want to know what makes that statement worse? Many countries were running UBI experiments that were proven successful but thanks to political turmoil of the time they all got scrapped. Such as when Canada's government imploded, or when Nixon was ousted. Then what makes it even worse is that people seem to have forgetten all about the fight for equity in that time. 
And the rise of crony capitalism and the death of the free market didn't help either.
My ancient ancestors made the decision to move from Europe into a wet island now named Ireland so I don't think I should feel guilty for being born in a richer land (I am poor) it is just the way history worked out, you're ancestors probably could have travelled into a different territory too but maybe they never made that decision. I should also say that my modern rich land was very poor only 3 generations ago hence all the emigration to America.
My ancestors were from turkey 
Weak men create weak times  Hard men create great times  *Get a job*
I didn't finish uni yet  If I bust my ass day and night like 16 hours a day I'll earn 50-55 US dollars a month 
Yes i do but they don't even bring me any enjoyment anymore, just play them all day because even being completely bored on a video game is still better than my actual life. 
I'm pretty much at that point too.
I threw myself into an obsession with soccer again, I play a lot of pes and rocket league .. it's very distracting from depression and PTSD
I played the shit out of Fifa this year. I've played over 2000 games, spent hours and hours doing sbc's, building my club etc. Now I'm just waiting for Fifa 18 and then I will do it all over again. I also watch a lot of Football (soccer to you)  on tv, keep up with the news/transfers, football is one of the best anti depressants out there imo
I played the shit out of Fifa this year. I've played over 2000 games, spent hours and hours doing sbc's, building my club etc. Now I'm just waiting for Fifa 18 and then I will do it all over again. I also watch a lot of Football (soccer to you)  on tv, keep up with the news/transfers, football is one of the best anti depressants out there imo
Same, I watch a ton of football, also F1 and other motorsports to distract from my depression. Going by your username, are you a Liverpool fan? I'm too.
I wanna play rocket league so bad. One day maybe
It's a very sociable game, great for loneliness
It's funny, I used to be such a gamer, but now I'd rather watch people play on YouTube. Any motivation to actually play a game quickly disappears a few minutes in. 
Same here. It's so hard for me to muster up the energy to even play games, as dumb as that sounds. And even when I am able to get myself to actually play one, I immediately feel guilty for doing something unproductive. As if watching people on Youtube is any more productive, lmao.
Same here. It's so hard for me to muster up the energy to even play games, as dumb as that sounds. And even when I am able to get myself to actually play one, I immediately feel guilty for doing something unproductive. As if watching people on Youtube is any more productive, lmao.
Same.
FFXIV. It's kept me from committing suicide numerous times. 
Ayyy thats similar to me, I play FFXV to distract me from suicidal thoughts plus depression ^.^ 
Personally I think it's less about escaping reality and more about having to feel like I'm progressing in *some way*, even if it's just in WoW, or I'll lose my goddamn mind. Not in school, no job, therapy is slowed to a crawl... MMOs are great for killing time. 
This is so accurate. Progressing feels good and it's almost therapeutic. Like 'well shoot. At least I can get my BiS weapon and beat this raid and I'm not a piece of shit loser today for just a moment' 
When I was a kid I played video games so much. But yet, I somehow never got good at them. I started feeling like shit when I play because of it. It's hard for me to enjoy them anymore.
That is the exact same feeling I have. 'Wow I've played video games my whole life and it made me a piece of shit, and I'm not even good at it!'
Holy shit, what game? 
Dark souls II Scholar of the First Sin for pc
Overwatch does it for me. 
I'm not sure how you deal with the sheer amount of toxicity in that game (in competitive that is)
At least you weren't born a MegaBlok mate
This made my day.
Defective coins are rare and expensive
Legos are pretty expensive too 
Lovely metaphor.
Thanks for bringing the first smile to my face today :)
A defective block makes for a very exciting decoration, depending on what type of defect it has. If half is missing, you can make a small window. 
yeah, but it doesn't fulfill the purpose of the block. in this society, if you aren't part of the structure, you're nothing. 
yeah, but it doesn't fulfill the purpose of the block. in this society, if you aren't part of the structure, you're nothing. 
'in this society, if you aren't part of the structure, you're nothing.'  THIS ^
> it doesn't fulfill the purpose of the block.  Who decides purpose? Who gives a shit about what the Lego manufacturers think the purpose is? We get to decide purpose the same way we get to decide our favourite ice cream and not Baskin Robbins.
>We get to decide purpose the same way we get to decide our favorite ice cream and not Baskin Robbins.  I don't know about that, mate. Baskin Robbins always finds out.
Atleast they are something special and not like every other brick
Being special isn't something people on this subreddit usually strive for. I for one want to be as run-of-the-mill as a I can. No intense emotional and mental issues, no overt social problems, nothing.
Being special isn't something people on this subreddit usually strive for. I for one want to be as run-of-the-mill as a I can. No intense emotional and mental issues, no overt social problems, nothing.
This. This right here. Why can't people accept that some of us don't strive for greatness? All I want is a job I don't hate, a place to live, and someone to love. People act like that's a bad thing. People act like I should want more, and strive to be better. There's nothing worse than waking up in the morning with the thought of 'Welp, time to let everyone down again.'
Word of advice that I discovered: Feelings are important, if you think she's beautiful say that. If you just want to go out to just get a drink, say it. Also knowing yourself is good but not necessary.
Personally I think compliments on things other than appearance are better, so they know you aren't just interested in their looks but them as a person. Stuff like I like your style or cool shoes is different than you're beautiful because they chose how to present themselves, it's not purely genetics and out of their control.  Plus many girls get told they're beautiful a lot, and sometimes it's not a good experience *(read:catcalls)*   Anyway glad you had a good experience!
Word of advice that I discovered: Feelings are important, if you think she's beautiful say that. If you just want to go out to just get a drink, say it. Also knowing yourself is good but not necessary.
As a woman I personally don't like guys telling me I'm beautiful or pretty or hot. It makes me feel like the only reason they are even talking to me is they just want to sleep with me and don't care about me as a person. But that just may be a personal issue on my part.   Being open and honest is good but trying to get too intimate too fast can be off-putting to some people.  
As a woman I personally don't like guys telling me I'm beautiful or pretty or hot. It makes me feel like the only reason they are even talking to me is they just want to sleep with me and don't care about me as a person. But that just may be a personal issue on my part.   Being open and honest is good but trying to get too intimate too fast can be off-putting to some people.  
Eh, I'd say a lot of people are like that. I'm a guy and I don't like when women call me things like, 'cutie' 5 minutes after I meet them. That shit pisses me off.
Eh, I'd say a lot of people are like that. I'm a guy and I don't like when women call me things like, 'cutie' 5 minutes after I meet them. That shit pisses me off.
I can't relate.
Not necessarily. You can compliment a person without seeming needy. Of course not in the 'omg you look beautiful Jesus I love your hair and your eyes and you're so perfect' kind of way, but rather a simple 'You look good today' or something. From my experience, that's a simple, not too overdesperate compliment to say. Always depends on the situation though.
That's different than saying beautiful though. I wouldn't call a woman beautiful until we were dating for awhile.
I tried that once but that girl just called a lier... 
that's her own insecurities talking. nothing to do with you!
YASSSSS!!!! Get it 
Dang yeah! This guy knows >=D If I saw you, I'd imagine us jumping up and with high fives.
Not sure if this belongs here, but how do you ask a girl out. I'm guessing its not 'Hey babe, you look hot, bar at 10pm Friday?'    I have a lot of trouble talking to girls outside of academic reasons. If its for a project, I have no problems, but if its for hanging out, I'm like back in grade school where I get shy and I'm stuck. 
Girls are just people. Don't be afraid to just ask them to hangout as you would a friend, as a 23/f I really don't think it takes more than that. The hard part is just mustering up the courage to do so. 
Girls are just people. Don't be afraid to just ask them to hangout as you would a friend, as a 23/f I really don't think it takes more than that. The hard part is just mustering up the courage to do so. 
I don't even have or have ever had friends woo me
I don't even have or have ever had friends woo me
You should really just say something as simple as, 'want to go grab some lunch somewhere?' 'Hey you free Friday? The new DC movie is coming out and it looks sick.' 'There's this new awesome sounding coconut drink at Starbucks that I wanted to try, come with?'   Just including them in a simple everyday activity would be a good way on getting to know them better and it also looks fun/non pressure for her because there is an activity she can enjoy with you. 
I don't even know where i would ever meet any girls.  Besides non would ever say yes. 
It's statistically improbable that NONE would say yes, sure a good many might but you'll eventually find someone who does.
depression was slaughtered?
Yep, just as many others can have many relationships that keep them afloat. Just asking a girl out helped me.
which means depression was quelled, not necessarily slaughtered.  I graduated with my secondary degree after passing my classes this semester.  It pushes my depression back (slightly), it doesn't slaughter it.
There is no room for being pedantic here. If OP feels it was slaughtered, it was slaughtered.
I want to sleep, but not to wake up.
but also not be dead
but also not be dead
My ideal would be to sleep for a decade at a time and then wake up for a few months to learn about all the cool stuff that happened. Then go to sleep for another ten years. 
My ideal would be to sleep for a decade at a time and then wake up for a few months to learn about all the cool stuff that happened. Then go to sleep for another ten years. 
i have this fear of wasting time
I'd rather sleep, so this shooting day will be over...  Then, wake up and think 'shoot'.
Yeah... sleeping is bliss. Waking up is the problem.
I don't want to go to sleep because I think it's a waste of time and I'd rather do something more interesting. The irony is that I never do anything interesting with my time. I also hate the morning.
[deleted]    ^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^0.2293   > [What is this?](https://pastebin.com/64GuVi2F/45351)
[deleted]    ^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^0.2293   > [What is this?](https://pastebin.com/64GuVi2F/45351)
It's really a fightclub thing going on, he's your tyler durden, everything you wish you could be or say but he's actually saying it.
It's really a fightclub thing going on, he's your tyler durden, everything you wish you could be or say but he's actually saying it.
I suddenly understand Fight Club now. 
I changed it by exercising before bed. I've slipped back since I'm recovering from minor surgery, but I had kept it together for 7 months straight.    I also hiked almost every day for awhile, and damn I'd get home, pass out.    Now I'm back up to being awake at 4am to feel miserable :\ But I know I can change it :)
I'm right there with you, my friend.  I know I can change it to but for some reason I've just settled into this pattern.  It's frustrating.  Your tip about exercising is a good one, I'll try to do it a bit later (I go to the gym but it's usually early evening).  Thank you for the advice.
I don't know if I agree - I've had and continue to have people who wish to spend time with me, but I have had stints of isolation and I quite prefer it. I absolutely believe that being alone while you desire or feel like you should desire company is miserable. But I really don't want and feel no pressure to be social. 
There's a huge difference between stints of isolation and 24/7 isolation which is my point. Trust me, give it a few years of being truly isolated and you'll see what I mean. 
But then we wouldn't be alone xD 
I wouldn't mind being with like minded people. 
They say that isolation leads to faster death
excelent!
That fake smile everyone sees on me every shooting day annoys the shoot outta me I don't have the guts to talk to anyone about this so I just sit pretty while my mind rips itself to shreds during classes  Dang life man just shoot it  Apologies for swearing but seriously shoot it
I have the exact same thing, I feel so dumb for putting on a smile when it's bullshit.   Whenever I feel happiness for a fleeting moment, I always have a sense of stupidity afterwards as if I'm not allowed it. 
I have the exact same thing, I feel so dumb for putting on a smile when it's bullshit.   Whenever I feel happiness for a fleeting moment, I always have a sense of stupidity afterwards as if I'm not allowed it. 
It's like a privilege to be happy. I hate the shit that I'm put through social standards in my school are shooted.  I'm English but blah blah I'm in Ireland now and the way I'm treated isn't right  So I blame myself for being too different and that backfires quickly my voice has literally changed to sound Irish  I just hate it. That's it. I shooting hate school socially  It's weirdly nice that there's more people like me out there...
It's like a privilege to be happy. I hate the shit that I'm put through social standards in my school are shooted.  I'm English but blah blah I'm in Ireland now and the way I'm treated isn't right  So I blame myself for being too different and that backfires quickly my voice has literally changed to sound Irish  I just hate it. That's it. I shooting hate school socially  It's weirdly nice that there's more people like me out there...
>my voice has literally changed to sound Irish  This is normal :) We sound like the people around us.  My mum was born in Yorkshire, when you watch home videos from before I was born you literally cannot understand a word she says. Around the time I was born they moved to the South East. She lost the accent almost completely, so much so that I have no memory of her sounding like that because I was too young to remember.
Yup, but then I can't sleep at night no matter how hard I try.
I take a bunch of sleep medication because of that but it's not like I can find a reason to get out of bed anyway when I wake up
Yup. Im tired 24/7. I basically sleep through every weekend. It shooting sucks. It's getting worse as I get older too. I'm hoping my psychiatrist will prescribe me Adderall because caffeine doesn't do shit for me anymore. 
Try asking about modafinil. I was prescribed it for excessive daytime sleepiness and it has made a huge difference. 
Source pls.
Could not find one using google. I searched for a quite a bit of time.
What a snotty, unfeeling letter. I hope whoever penned this doesn't have someone who is in despair, but is afraid of being judged for being depressed.
I think this is what's called a 'poem,' and not a letter.
I think this is what's called a 'poem,' and not a letter.
I know. I was just really upset about the harshness of the poem.
I know. I was just really upset about the harshness of the poem.
The power is in its brutal honesty. I love it.
For me, there is a bit of fear of pulling the trigger, but it's more that I can't bear to inflict the pain of the emotional trauma onto the ones I'll leave behind. Depression sucks.
Yes And they've put up with me for my entire life, so I owe it to them to stay alive. I'm sunk cost. Wish I could just melt away. 
For me, there is a bit of fear of pulling the trigger, but it's more that I can't bear to inflict the pain of the emotional trauma onto the ones I'll leave behind. Depression sucks.
I have reached a point where i dont even care about the people I'm leaving behind anymore. The only person who would truly care would be my mom. I really dont know how my friends would react. They aren't in the same country as me either way. 
 Yesssssss. I often wish to die in a car accident so that it’d be easier for my parents but I still get to die. 
I had a really bad car accident, 2 1/2 week coma scars to remember legit scars and metal hardware both sides legs and I’m still alive. Got hit head on. I say this to say not even car accident is guaranteed.
I fantasize about this but what if I live and someone in the other car dies. Then I have to live with that guilt.
This, every once in a while I have that 'Call of the abyss' feeling people talk about as being a feeling even non-depressed people tend to feel, like that 'I could just turn my wheel a little left/or right or take one step in that direction.' feeling, but I could never do it because what if you lived but hurt or killed someone else, heeell no. I couldn't live with that either man. 
A bullet in the head is all want. Life shooting sucks. Got dealt shitty cards. But I got a mother to take care of when she’s old. She’s a fighter, I can’t let her down. When she leaves me tho, I won’t hesitate to end it all anymore 
I feel the same way
But what if you meet a hot girl who also is not be a stupid girl 
Lmao
Pretty much. I'm tired of life and don't have anyone around who'd care. I feel like I don't have much of a reason to still be alive. I wouldn't mind peacefully going in my sleep or maybe some other accident but I'm too afraid to actually kill myself on purpose.
exactly how i feel... person who was my best and only friend,and my support said after  year to me that im only talking (about do suicide) and turned back to me, left me alone, let me feel like im only insane someone and he found someone better... 
I'm still alive because I don't believe in a soul. If anyone ever comes up with evidence that one exists, I'm shooting done. I'm just afraid that if I die and there really is no soul, that I just gave up my one shot at having a possibly good life. 
If a soul doesn't exist, it makes it so much better, personally. That way, once I'm dead, I'm dead. I dont have to regret killing myself. Moreover, i dont have to reincarnate and suffer all over again.
Socialising exhausts me but I also hate the feeling of isolation. A good compromise for me is internet friends
Same, it’s really irritating all my irl friends don’t play PC and I’m the only one and I find it hard to make friends online. The only friend I have online is someone I use to play Xbox live like 10 years ago. 
wow. i am the same way. i so frequently bail on plans or just avoid making them all together, that i feel like i might resent myself one day for being like this... but i cant help it. i used to always be out, having fun. 
Same that’s why I try when I’m invited places to go out because I know for a fact I will regret being like this later. Even though I don’t want to I don’t want to look back and regret everything. 
when im with friends, i want to be alone. when im alone, i want to be with friends.
It’s what I like to call the  ⭕️ of crazy which I’m always find my self stuck in 
You are strong, you have always been strong: but you are also tired. I think that that may be the 'weakness' you're feeling. I am currently struggling with a similar issue...I've just been trying to take it day by day, but that comes with its own challenges. Stay strong, friend, you are worth the battle! 
Thank you! It's just that I can't do stuff non depressed people can with ease. I don't even have the energy to lift up the fork to eat. I feel weak and tired
Thank you! It's just that I can't do stuff non depressed people can with ease. I don't even have the energy to lift up the fork to eat. I feel weak and tired
That's one of the keystone symptoms of depression, unfortunately. Try to relax and go easy on yourself and do things slowly at your own pace. And when I'm feeling that way I try something easy first. Like making the bed or taking a shower. Even those things seem like huge tasks when I'm depressed but I can't think of a time I didn't feel better after and it led to a better mindset.
Everyday you are alive, able to supress or bear with those negative thoughts is a victory. You are strong, you are fighting against a restless and personal enemy within. You should be proud you made it this far considering how easy you can let this disease drag you to oblivion.   No, you are not weak. It is unfortunatly a malfunctioning brain. None of this is your fault and you should keep going.
I needed to read this too, thank you. 
Yeah this is pretty much my life.
Have you tried to see a doctor about it?
Have you tried to see a doctor about it?
This is what I hate the most. I feel emotionally dead (granted, not all the time) but still feel the desire to help and try to dissuade others from ending up in a simulation situation. It kind of hurts at times. I just find it funny how despite being in a similar situation, you show care and empathy, even if there is no emotion behind your feelings, which may or may not be the case.
This is what I hate the most. I feel emotionally dead (granted, not all the time) but still feel the desire to help and try to dissuade others from ending up in a simulation situation. It kind of hurts at times. I just find it funny how despite being in a similar situation, you show care and empathy, even if there is no emotion behind your feelings, which may or may not be the case.
It's always a hundred times easier to help someone else in your situation than yourself. I also feel better giving advice out or talking someone down. It gets me out of my head, and makes me feel like a better person. 
Yes. Pretty much my view of life = A bunch of pointless, stupid shit I have to do before I die.
Me too and I just try to get used to it rather than fix it.  I didn't ask to exist. My mom and dad made that decision for me. Now I'm here trying to figure out what to do... until I die. =)
Me too and I just try to get used to it rather than fix it.  I didn't ask to exist. My mom and dad made that decision for me. Now I'm here trying to figure out what to do... until I die. =)
Hmm it seems so depressing but I feel in a sense it does feel like that, I hope you find happiness. If so, come back and tell me how you did it! :P 
Hmm it seems so depressing but I feel in a sense it does feel like that, I hope you find happiness. If so, come back and tell me how you did it! :P 
I find happiness all the time but its temporary. That's OK with me though.
Have you talked to anyone about it or gone to see a doctor?
Currently on medication and seeing a therapist weekly. Keeps me stable, but doesn't change my outlook.
My last, unconscious thought before going to bed is 'I hope I don't wake up.'  My first, unconscious thought when waking up is 'Dang.'  It's a shitty way to live.
Same thing here. Thought I was the only one who thought like that.
same, also most of the times when go out i hope to get mugged so i can taunt the guy so he kills me, or the bus im in suddenly crashes and im the only casualty.  the only reason why i havent killed myself its because my mom and dad would be absolutely crushed and i wouldnt dare do that to them
Exactly, I think often that the guilt of destroying my parents is the only thing keeping me alive...
Hey man that sucks, just wondering what do you do to try and control it because I find it very hard to not dissociate and I feel the same way :/
I try to keep my mind busy a lot and try to help other people when I can. I've found that helping others makes me feel less empty. 
Suicide is seriously on my mind right now, but there's just one thing stopping me. I wish it were the end of the world, why didn't it end on April 30th 2015 when it should have? :'(
Why what happened April 30th if you mind me asking?
What's been on your mind? Everyone on here has an anchor of some kind, a lot of small ones, maybe a few big ones, hell some have a few gigantic ones, and it varies all the time. What has been dragging you down?
Sorry my post was not very descriptive of anything really, nothing is on my mind I just can't seem to be happy regardless of what I try. And I just don't have anyone to talk to it about, thank you for taking the time to reply.
I feel you. Haven't had the courage to do so yet. Been contemplating suicide for 2 years now.   Keep having the 'any time now' feeling.  
It isn't that you haven't had the courage to do if. It's that you've had the courage to keep going. 
Ya, New Years always sucks for me.  This is always what I think at the beginning of a year sadly.
Too true. For me, recent NYEs (I'm on my 37th one now officially), have been much more depressing than any other holiday, such as Christmas. It's like gearing up for yet another year of 'wtf Life'.
It was the first time i seriously considered it yesterday, for 5 years straight me and the only friend I had left used to spend the new years eve together, but I haven't really spoken to him in months and I don't see a point in staying on this planet anymore. And when I opened social medias it all just got worse, everyone is out there, with friends and family, having fun     and I'm inside, crying in my room
ditch the social medias, definitely.
Some part of me hopes that I die this year...another part of 'knows' I'll die this year. I'm only 17 and already I feel like I'm coming towards the end of my life. And to be honest frankly, I welcome death.
I'm 18 and feel the same man.
Yep, and I find myself fantasizing about it, but I'm too much of a coward to do it. 31, and never been in a real relationship. Never been kissed. I was in a online relationship for a month last year, but I was too much of a coward. It's a damn shame. I really loved her, and still do.  I often wish my heart would give out, a car would hit me, or someone would do it for me.
'I often wish my heart would give out, a car would hit me, or someone would do it for me.'  Oh boy do I know how you feel
I didnt make it 2 hours after waking up today before those intrusive thoughts came back.
Those are the worst kind of days, when the dark thoughts can't even wait till night to come back 
I don't want to kill my self but if there was someway to exit this I would 
I don’t want to kill myself because I’m scared I’ll shoot it up somehow and end up in a lot of pain or being committed.   I do want to die though and the feeling is just getting worse the older I get. I’d gladly opt-in to an *exit life* option if I could. 
I don’t want to kill myself because I’m scared I’ll shoot it up somehow and end up in a lot of pain or being committed.   I do want to die though and the feeling is just getting worse the older I get. I’d gladly opt-in to an *exit life* option if I could. 
Like a suicide booth in Futurama?
Like a suicide booth in Futurama?
Precisely
the lovely realization that you don't cure depression, you just co-exist
beautiful way of putting it. co-exist.
beautiful way of putting it. co-exist.
Shitty symbiosis 
Shitty symbiosis 
Beautiful way of putting it
Yup. Feel exactly the same. My kids are the only reason I keep trying. 
Well you already won, you passed the torch. Though I'm not going to procreate because of the risk of me passing on my genetic risk of mental health issues and Type 1 Diabetes. I'm a genetic dumping ground. 
I've killed myself, od'd on purpose in 1995, been resuscitated. Died from pneumonia/sepsis complications twice. I know now that everyday I'm alive is shooting amazing. I don't want to miss anything. I want to live forever. But when depression comes back I literally live minute to minute, I know this too shall pass. Maybe if u get a pet, Something that would make you feel guilty if you left will help you.
I don't want guilt to be the reason i stay here tho
That last line is so shooting me right now. I have given up on happiness and living a normal life, I am damaged goods, a car that breaks down everything few hundred kilometers. Sure you can get your use out of me but sooner or later I am going to let you down, I will shoot up something major and you will find the means to something better.
I find that I don't shoot things up for others as much as I shoot myself out of opportunities personal and/or professional with depression driven isolation and avoidance of most of life when I'm in a down state. Unfortunately this has been happening more and more often recently.
23 year old here and I feel you... I keep telling to myself things will get better. Hell I've been saying that for the past 4 years and I'm still the same guy I was 4 years ago. I wish I could help you and promise things will get better but I can't do that...
I'm 23 and I feel like I've wasted mine. I agree with this guy. 
I'm 18 and the same thought crosses my mind daily. The best years of my life should be right now and yet I can't leave my bed to experience them. Every day I'm just deteriorating and nothing is getting better. 
If it helps you, shoot 'the best time of your life'. My late high school/early 20s sucked ass, and they did for lots of other people. Figuring out who you are and how to adult and dealing with people who are clearly stuck in middle school emotionally is shooting terrible.  My mid/late 20s were so so much better. My early 30s suck because of deaths of people close to me. But seriously everyone's life is different so shoot the notion that being young is better. It's just different. 
God. I wish I had something inspiring to say. I'm damn near 40. 
You just did. You're keeping on at it. Keep going!
You just did. You're keeping on at it. Keep going!
That sounds awful to be honest. Depression hit me when I was 23, I basically stopped trying to improve and keep having revelations after revelations that all the hope and happiness I had in my life were just a big giant lie, and the true happiness and hope is beyond my approach. Now I truly regret not having these revelations sooner.
Being in a relationship doesn't make you happy, i've seen many that do the opposite. It shouldn't be a goal in itself, but finding someone that fits with you is!
I meant being in a healthy relationship, ideally a happy marriage. I agree that bad relationships are worse than being single.
Statistically it still is though. 32+32 is only 64, so yes, your whole life could easily still be in front of you. Why do you think they call 40 'over the hill'? Because at that point, no, you probably don't have your whole life in front of you anymore.  50 is getting to be the new 40 though.
The mere passage of time is not the issue here. The issue is the increasingly narrowing range of paths available to me.
After experimenting primitive anti-depressants that only made things worse, and the therapy right now is to guess between 30 of these medicines, not to mention combinations.. It gets hard not to be pessimistic. CBT is hardly effective for everyone. It's a bleak outlook being diagnosed with treatment resistant depression.
CBT seems to be the therapy way of saying: 'Just think happy.'
Aging and being depressed definitely sounds far worse to me than being depressed right now at 21. It's more likely that depression follows an exponential graph as you age. 
shoot me then lol
Ah, I see. I used to feel the same, and it still comes and goes. I realised that I wasn't going to kill myself, despite having thoughts and living in an almost constant despair, and had to commit to being alive. For me this meant taking life sooo much less seriously, you're a group of atoms floating around in space, how silly. 
>this meant taking life sooo much less seriously  I don't see how that fixes anything.  Living is hard work.  If it doesn't feel good AND isn't important, what could possibly be the rationale for doing it?
I feel like life doesn't get better, you just get used the the unpleasantries. It tumbled and we stumble on because that's the experience, and there's a strange beauty in that.
What's beautiful about being forced under pain of death to do something hard and unpleasant?
How can you know life can't get better? At 20 you don't even know what life *is* yet. You're just out of high school...
Because he does know what life is, Its cold and bitter and lonely and it hurts you saying this isn't going to make him or anybody else thing differently if its all they know.
Yes immediately. They're the only reason I'm here. 
I'm not leaving them with my student loans
I'm not leaving them with my student loans
My exact thought. If they weren't cosigned. I would've been long gone.
Yes. I don't want my family to be sad, I keep fighting for them because I know they love me.  But, it does get very, very difficult at times..
Sometimes being in love doesn’t mean you’d die for a person, but rather that you would live another day for them.
Yeah. The thought of them seeing my body dead or at least close to being dead is one of the things I dont want them to experience.
And I don't want to hear my parents scream and cry when they see me like that. (When the suicide attempt fails)
Sad to hear about it. :( maybe it was the best for your son, but obviously i dont why he did it etc. Keep fighting i know you can do it!  Have a nice day :)
He thought so. It was his decision, his choice and his life. On good days I can accept those facts. On a bad day, I  run circles of regret, sorrow and desperation in my head. Thank you for your kind words.
I feel the same way! My parents have, honestly, done no wrong in raising me...probably I'll never accomplish anything with my life on the scale that they have, to have given me so many opportunities and a pretty cushy comfortable life. It just feels too cruel to take all of their hard work and dedication and basically reduce it all to nothing. 
Agreed word by word.
I love that feeling. I went grocery shopping yesterday for the first time in many weeks. Fantastic. If only that motivation could last huh? 
I find that motivation is important, but I also try to cultivate my discipline as much as I can. This is because motivation comes and goes for many people, but if your discipline is rock solid, than it's harder to falter.  Heck, wanting my discipline to be better is motivation in itself for me, ha.
Danging brilliant. This brought a huge smile to my face - because I've been there.  Keep going at your pace - don't over push it, don't invite disappointment. There'll still be downs with your ups, but you know how to get through those now. Yes they're shitty, but YOU DID THE FRIGGING DISHES.   You know what that means? It's NOT impossible. Tidying up just became 'difficult' rather than 'unimaginable'. It's a huge step. I think I cried too.
I really appreciate what you say when you mention 'difficult' vs 'unimaginable'/'impossible'.... very well said.
The journey of a thousand miles starts with a single step....  Congrats on taking a step...keep it going, one small step at a time...
I have a poster with this on it hanging in my bathroom to keep me motivated every morning. Sometimes those single steps can be amazing.
This literally made me cry. I've been looking for a way to say exactly this for years. Every attempt I've made to explain myself has failed. Thank you.
Wow. Now *my* eyes are tearing up...
Thank you, for articulating how I should go about helping my sister.  I wish you luck and lots of sun shine that break through your dark clouds.  
I'm so glad. I see people who truly care about me, but don't know how to help. In the worst moments I have trouble telling them how to help me. I wrote this for people like you. Hopefully you can find ways to help your sister through her dark times. :)
I'm coming over and we'll make a pillow and blanket fort and just chill out for a while. Be there in 20.
Woot! It's been a while since I've made one of those.
You have me in tears too! Mind if I use this to explain things to people I know?
Please do! One of my goals of writing it was to try to help those who haven't been depressed understand what we need.
> I don’t want you to talk about yourself, I want you to be interested in me. I want you to ask questions about how it feels. I want you to look in my eyes with concern. I want you to smile at me simply because you’re pleased to see me.   If only I could find a way to get this across to friends without making it sound like I'm an arrogant jerk.   
I know right? I feel so guilty when I start to talk about myself I don't want to look arrogant so I just always rather stop.
Right now I would like a hug AND be invited to a party. I just feel so lonely.
Aye, I have never been on party so I would probably go if I was invited even depressed.
I used to hate myself. The person I was made to be. Love yourself and accept your faults and people will look at you and like you when you do. 
Still depressed though 
Still depressed though 
:/ Me too. Shit like this helps, but recovering is painfully slow.
I feel you Forget other people They never feel your pain
Should I just keep it in?
Should I just keep it in?
Technicaly no I think if you want someone to talk to Search a therapist Or somebody on the internet
Technicaly no I think if you want someone to talk to Search a therapist Or somebody on the internet
According to my ex, i was only allowed to talk to other therapist, but never my friends and certainly not internet poeple.  I think she is wrong.
I'm sorry but that is a disgusting way to think.
I know 
Their response would have been different if you told them it's you you're talking about, 100%
Then I wouldn't know how they truly felt about people like me. It's like racist people, the don't show their true colors (no pun intended) to the people they dislike
Yeah that's the truth of how people feel about us. 
Feels shitty huh
Feels shitty huh
Well in ready to kill myself so yeah
Then my question is: Why the hell are people allowed to have children when they have so many problems? Not just the demonstrable ones, but also their mental health problems because of their youth etc. etc.  Man I don't even wanna be born, but don't wanna die either. :|
The answer is eugenics and reproductive rights. If we start saying who can have kids and who can't things get dystopian fast. I agree though, it's pretty Bullshit that my parents roped me into this.
1. birth 2. school 3. work 4. die
   5. Rebirth. 
   5. Rebirth. 
Don't wish that on me.  Don't wish that on anyone.
I know the feeling. I just feel tired all the time and I'm jealous of people who seem motivated to do things. I wish I had the motivation to do anything.
ikr when i see people so motivated like that I cannot seriously understand where that motivation comes from
The thing is everything you just said is the sane and rational perspective but the majority are willfully blind to it
I think those who are open to it see no other choice. Society gives them no other - so they just bury themselves back in the rat race because that's the only way they can survive.  I'm just not seeing any reason to keep playing the game.
You know, you mention it being different 20 years ago, and that reminded me of something: In the 90s, it was okay to feel bad. You could be depressed, angsty, melancholy, etc. Even the music on the radio was often stuff you could identify with if you weren't feeling great. Nowadays it seems like you're supposed to fake being happy all the time or you're scum who doesn't belong.
Yeah, and people nowadays have a penchant for kicking people when they're down.  It has become a cold, ruthless place.... 
yep. the world demands so much even for mediocracy. $50,000 a year job would be a shooting dream come true to me but I live that above minimum wage life so life kind of blows... especially if you are poor. 
Right? I want to be average. I want that median income. Why does it take so much just to get that?
Its difficult when you work hard & its not appreciated and you dont have much to show for it. I just want something to live for & something to come home to
Get a dog.  Your happiness will increase exponentially. 
Get a dog.  Your happiness will increase exponentially. 
I dont want a dog even though im a very doggy kinda person.  Plan on leaving here as soon as its paid for and i dont know where ill end up. It could be somewhere that doesnt allow pets or too small for a dog. Ive no idea until it happens
Life has no reward for me.  A lot of work for pretty much zilch in return... 
Same. I used to gain satisfaction from being better than people at things, winning, or making 'progress' of any form. Then I questioned things and my whole worldview crumbled. I wish I could be ignorant to it all... ignorance is bliss seems way too true.
People still have to pay a mortgage for a house they built themselves? That's crazy.
Yeah he sold our childhood home and used that money to do a good portion of the building.  He needed money to take care of the rest. One thing is that he choses to pay as much as possible so he can get the house paid off before he dies, a mortgage payment dosen't have to be that high..but generally speaking, it's still alot of money. He won't have that house paid off before he goes I'm afraid.
Yeah he sold our childhood home and used that money to do a good portion of the building.  He needed money to take care of the rest. One thing is that he choses to pay as much as possible so he can get the house paid off before he dies, a mortgage payment dosen't have to be that high..but generally speaking, it's still alot of money. He won't have that house paid off before he goes I'm afraid.
Land alone cost several grand and then you gotta buy building permits etc etc etc. It's very expensive. My dad is not a rich man, either. The house he built is a simple one story home with 2 bedrooms. He only cut corners that were safe to cut, when you build your own home you want to make sure you aren't going terribly cheap if you want it to last. 
Capitalism≠anti human, in my eyes. Sure, modern capitalism can be that way, but capitalism in the traditional sense benefits everyone. 
Free market capitalism is even worse, do your research man.
It's the bullshit in the system that's pushed me towards Socialism. At least with that, I can remind myself that it's not my fault.
I'm in the military and told my supervisor that I won't reenlist and he gave me a speech about how I have a family and how absurdly expensive insurance is and how much you still have to come out of pocket. I asked him if he supports single payer health care and he said no. 
I'm in the military and told my supervisor that I won't reenlist and he gave me a speech about how I have a family and how absurdly expensive insurance is and how much you still have to come out of pocket. I asked him if he supports single payer health care and he said no. 
That's exactly it - we're expected to work as hard as possible, or give our lives, so some other guy can get rich off our hard work and sacrifice. And if we demand anything better, we're fired.      Who the hell could possibly stay happy in that kind of system?
That's exactly it - we're expected to work as hard as possible, or give our lives, so some other guy can get rich off our hard work and sacrifice. And if we demand anything better, we're fired.      Who the hell could possibly stay happy in that kind of system?
You're absolutely right. The system is so shooted. 
Don't live up to others expectations, just strive to achieve your own.
That's easy to say until reality comes crashing down on you.
Reality is what you make it.
Work hard and took for granted or ignored isnt what you make it. Its completely screewed up my perception of work. I was brought up to think hard work gets rewarded. Now i realise hard work gets exploited, unless your face fits
Would rather let you suicide opposed to what? Danging you?  If sex is what you crave, a prostitute or escort will give it to you. If that isn't good enough, why do you think using emotional blackmail is somehow better? Both are equally willing, frankly.
Thank you, well put. Women are not obligated to sex him so he won't suicide. The sense of entitlement is baffling. I've experienced stronger urges to commit suicide when my love life isn't playing out the way I want, but that's on me, not the dudes who didn't want to put up with my codependent needy ass. 
> Sometimes depression means Ignoring every phone call for an entire month Because yes, they have the right number But you’re not the person they’re looking for, not anymore'  story of my life.
I already died, I am just waiting for time to catch up.
I already died, I am just waiting for time to catch up.
whoa.
>Because you are not allowed to call in to work depressed  This captures everything so perfectly, let us know if you can find the original source. Until then, thank you for sharing.
This. I'm so glad my teachers are understanding an actually trying to help me and listen. But it scares me to think if I still act like this once I get older how my work will respond. 
Courage is not having the strength to go on; it is going on when you don't have the strength.
then i'm pretty shooting courageous.
then i'm pretty shooting courageous.
heh, me too, apparently.
Thanks for the share.   It would be nice to have this subreddit expand on this with an articulating of their own perception of the feeling when they're at their worst. 
I wonder how an /r/depression poetry or writing collaboration... thingy would go.
I wonder how an /r/depression poetry or writing collaboration... thingy would go.
Actually I think they have something like that here, im gonna go look now
It's strange to hear about people not getting of bed everyday. I get very depressed sometimes but never enough to actually WANT to stay in bed. 
When you sleep the rest of the world isn't there.  If you can't sleep you can curl up in a ball under the covers and pretend the rest of the world isn't there.  And when you don't achieve anything that day it's because you were in bed, not because you tried and failed.
When you sleep the rest of the world isn't there.  If you can't sleep you can curl up in a ball under the covers and pretend the rest of the world isn't there.  And when you don't achieve anything that day it's because you were in bed, not because you tried and failed.
When I sleep, it's because it's the closest to death I can get. It's not that I want to pretend the world doesn't exist, but rather that I want to pretend that *I* do not exist.
Sorry just genuinely curious and not trying to be ingnorant here, I'm just trying to sympathize. So to me all of this sounds like just laziness. What would be the difference between the two?  Sincerely, Friend of a depressed person.
Laziness to me means having the strength to do something but no wish to do it. Depression is often the reverse.
literally the go to excuse whenever someone asks me if something is wrong
Yeah, nasty habit. I need to express myself a little more.
Yeah, nasty habit. I need to express myself a little more.
I just am never in the mood to get into any of it and I feel people will judge :(. I start to physically shake too
I just am never in the mood to get into any of it and I feel people will judge :(. I start to physically shake too
Shaking is something that happens to me too, i  start jittering and friends say i look like a drug addict on withdrawal. People judging is always on my mind i try and not thinking about the people looking at me but it always comes back and the eyes feel like bullet holes on my back
Honest expression = intimacy and connection.  Share your genuine self with others, and take care not to dump, mislead, and manipulate them. 
I get what you’re saying but it’s just not that easy, for me at least. Honest expression is met with blankness and contempt and in effect completely ignoring or invalidating what I’ve expressed. Experience that enough and “yeah no, I’m just tired. How are YOU?” is a much easier option. I have an amazing therapist so can express my true feelings there :). 
It's not technically a lie. I'm pretty tired most of the time. Mostly of being alive. 
Yeah feels like a blanket suffocating me
I think the fact I didn’t express my emotions properly for years is why I’m in a depressive mental breakdown. I was saying “I’m fine” when I was to avoid conflict and unpleasantness within friendships. I’m so sad now I’ve pushed people away. Wish I had been more honest with my emotions. I feel less of a person now. 
I agree, I've used jokes as an outlet to try and side step emotional questions and I feel it only makes people see less of me the more I do it.
I don’t want to kil myself but I am just tired of living.
I'm too scared to kill myself. Just waiting for happenstance to do it for me.
I completely understand. I say this so much, my friends now believe that I have some form of insomnia or something. Everyday they ask me how much sleep I got the night before, since they now interpret me as “tired” when in reality I’m just depressed. 
They seem to care. Maybe you should tell them the truth? 
They seem to care. Maybe you should tell them the truth? 
It's a trap. At least in my experience 
I've just said this to three different people at work. I wanna go home.
What would happen if you straightened your desk and called it a day? Or told your supervisor that you’re taking a mental health day?
What would happen if you straightened your desk and called it a day? Or told your supervisor that you’re taking a mental health day?
not sure tbh. I could probably get time off. But I recently has a xmas break and I don't want to keep taking time off. I'm not entirely sure if being at home would make me feel better or not. I like to feel useful and that I'm not letting the side down. When I'm actually at home I tend to wish that I was somewhere else.
Thanks guys  It does seems silly sometime even when I know I'm not going anywhere or doing anything. But it does boost my spirits a little sometimes 
I like showers, they make me feel warmer and calmer. Sometimes, I get out of bed, shower, and go back to sleep. If it makes you feel even a little bit better, it ain't silly :)
I like showers, they make me feel warmer and calmer. Sometimes, I get out of bed, shower, and go back to sleep. If it makes you feel even a little bit better, it ain't silly :)
when i get out of the shower i go straight back and lay in my bed
Me 2! It had been like a week. It left so good. And now I'm back on the couch wishing it was acceptable to start drinking at 2:30 in the afternoon. 
Yeah I usually give myself the go ahead after noon
Taking a shower seems pointless for me. I am not leaving bed so there is no point. 
I always find that it helps, even if I take a shower to just lie in bed at the end of the day I can say at least I took a shower and looked after myself a little. It also helps me not avoid anything that suddenly pops up that I have to do that day
The worst thing for me is that when I'm feeling low, I don't have the motivation to go and get help - and when I'm feeling fine, I forget that I ever needed help in the first place. Because of this, I always seem to avoid seeking help.
You are looking at the lake
You are looking at the lake
As the day approaches I go there and I feel completely fine. Therapist questions why I'm even there, and tells me I am handling life incredibly well.  I get home, realize how alone I am, and completely break the shoot down. Literally 40 minutes later.
Wow, I'm new to this sub and this is the first thing I've read that I relate to. Ty
You're welcome friend.
Hey man,   I've felt this so many times before as well. I wrote a little [song](https://soundcloud.com/user-977038152/hypocritical-curse) based upon this post. Hopefully it encompasses what you are feeling. 
Thanks dude, I appreciate this. It adds a sense of realism to what I'm feeling.
At 16 things went haywire, so ever since then.   Also, happy birthday. You may not be as happy about today as you might've been in the past, but you still survived another year.
I appreciate this, legitimately. Thank you.
http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Depressive_realism  This is actually a legitimate theory in psychology(?), that depressed individuals make more realistic inferences than those who are not afflicted.
I hope everyone that is seeing this clicks that link. It explains so much and certainly makes me feel less alone. Thank you so much for posting this! *hugs*
I hope everyone that is seeing this clicks that link. It explains so much and certainly makes me feel less alone. Thank you so much for posting this! *hugs*
Furthermore, from this TED talk:  http://youtu.be/-eBUcBfkVCo  >There was a study I particularly liked in which a group of depressed and a group of non-depressed peoplewere asked to play a video game for an hour, and at the end of the hour, they were asked how many little monsters they thought they had killed. The depressive group was usually accurate to within about 10 percent, and the non-depressed peopleguessed between 15 and 20 times as many little monsters — (Laughter) — as they had actually killed.
Furthermore, from this TED talk:  http://youtu.be/-eBUcBfkVCo  >There was a study I particularly liked in which a group of depressed and a group of non-depressed peoplewere asked to play a video game for an hour, and at the end of the hour, they were asked how many little monsters they thought they had killed. The depressive group was usually accurate to within about 10 percent, and the non-depressed peopleguessed between 15 and 20 times as many little monsters — (Laughter) — as they had actually killed.
Fantastic! Thank you for sharing this.
Is it bad that I'd rather be happy, even though I'd make less realistic judgments?
Nah, there's nothing wrong with that. Especially since that falls far closer to normality than depressive realism does.
That's basically how I see things but then I get told by some people that 'this is depression talking.' Maybe normal people don't see jobs as slavery, are content existing to work or go to school and not feeling like a waste, or not seeing loneliness as something sad. But I find that really strange. So I don't know, now I wonder if I'm depressed because I'm lonely and hate work or if I'm lonely and hate work because I'm depressed.
I think depression is something that occurs when one realizes that life can be very meaningless. This, I'm sure, is not in all cases. But it is in my case, and it sounds like it may be in yours as well.  Edit: Also, the way I view this whole 'that's just the depression talking' is more along the lines of 'that's just the realization of reality talking'. Which makes me sad.
that's part of the problem with being depressed in my experience.  it is of course only natural that people don't want to be around defeatists, but that leaves people in depression in a terrible position.  what exactly are they supposed to do? i think 'fake it till you make it' is absolute bullshit. i'm sure it works for some people but i'm not an actor. i wear my emotions on my sleeve and am incapable of being anyone else.
I completely agree with this. For the longest time I've been trying to 'fake it till I make it' and now I am at my breaking point. I can't fake this anymore.
That's awesome!! I love the feeling of a clean room; it's so soothing
I feel like it unclutters the mind.
I think I cry every year on my birthday. For my 36th, I had my students generate a list of acts of kindness, and I picked 36 to do on my birthday. It took the attention away from me and made me feel a lot better. My favorite--feed the birds. 
That's a great idea!
What could I give them to eat? I may do the same. Birthdays have been tough for several years now. 
Most grocery stores have wild bird seed. I give that to the birds in my park. 
Mine is also only a few days away. I have no friends or relationships and I don't want my parents dragging me to something. Just makes me feel worse because I'm still living at home, still being alone and only growing older while missing out. I don't want any presents either, materialism just sucks. Even if it's books, I want to pick my own ones.   I think I'm just driving to the next city and idk, wander aimlessly around. It's at least something else.
I hope you get through the day okay.
I hope you get through the day okay.
Thanks. Also hoping you get through somehow.
But I feel empty whereever I go. I carry my prison with me. Those things are hollow in the end. There is no freedom for me.   I have to be careful not spending whole days in bookstores as it was always. Only place where I am left alone and find some distraction and escapism.
Why not research the best book store you could make a day trip out of and spend the day there? If it's in a cool place, then you could check out local food or scenery
Yeah I get you. Mine is in a few weeks, I hate the attention, makes me cringe, guilty, angry, like you, becuase of self esteem issues. Ive booked a solo trip to Italy to get away for a few days, I guess im hiding by myself.
It's such a weird combination of emotions isn't it?? Italy sounds like a good shout 
Have fun on your trip, be safe! 
Thanks buddy. Gonna see The Offpsring there too, day after my bday, home the next day.
I love other people's birthdays and hate my own. (The 17th of this month.) I don't know why but it makes me feel terrible each year. Because I can't do all I want to do? Because no one ever tries as hard as I do for theirs? Because I've wasted another year of life without accomplishing my goals? Yeah, probably all of that. I don't have anything helpful to say, but know you're not alone.
Amen. Actually makes me feel a little better other people share my same thoughts.
Absolutely. Mine is on Saturday (I'll be 26) and am completely dreading it. And I can't stay home because my nephew keeps saying how much he wants to see me and likes hanging out with me. So I have to put on a brave face and force myself to be a normal person for at least half of the day. Good thing it's not today because I just don't have the strength.
Maybe your nephew will make it a great day :)
Everyone looks happy on facebook.  If you judged my life by my facebook profile, you would think I'm smart, funny, well-rounded, social, and overwhelmingly normal.  In fact, every day is a struggle for me.  My facebook page is a lie.  I bet a lot of the ones you're seeing are too.
THIS. I have over a thousand tagged photos, events attended, people posting on my wall, and all that jazz. In reality though, I feel so shooting sad and lonely all the time. Facebook is just another fake smile to hide behind.
THIS. I have over a thousand tagged photos, events attended, people posting on my wall, and all that jazz. In reality though, I feel so shooting sad and lonely all the time. Facebook is just another fake smile to hide behind.
That's exactly why I call it 'fakebook.' 
Good thing I have no friends then.
:(
Wow- I had no clue facebook was such a bragfest. All the people I know post are news articles and pictures of pug dogs with monocles.
Seriously? I'm jealous. My feed was always full of teenage drama.
Wow- I had no clue facebook was such a bragfest. All the people I know post are news articles and pictures of pug dogs with monocles.
You, sir [or madam], are blessed with some awesome friends/acquaintances.
You, sir [or madam], are blessed with some awesome friends/acquaintances.
Aw, shucks. Thanks.
Here's what helped me with my depression - I stopped comparing myself to others.  I realized that I'm where I'm at, and other people are where they're at.  Some people will be happier, some will be sadder.    I also realized there's not a fixed amount of happiness in the world.  Just because someone posts that they are happy doesn't mean they've taken all the happiness and I can't have any.      
compare and despair!  I am finally starting to understand that whole 'be true to yourself' bullshit.  I would literally not know what people were talking about for years.  
I spend my days laying down in my bed wanting the day to end.
I tried sleeping in the day for a while, and spending the night time doing my stuff so I didn't have to deal with people.  Can't say I recommend it.
I tried sleeping in the day for a while, and spending the night time doing my stuff so I didn't have to deal with people.  Can't say I recommend it.
I did that once. But since I never saw other people I started to feel very alone.
Need to talk?
I'm beyond that point, but thank you for the offer, very kind.
I'm beyond that point, but thank you for the offer, very kind.
No you're not, and no I'm not, want to talk about your problems so you can feel better?  Just to let people know, when I say 'and no I'm not' I meant I'm not kind, not that I am not beyond that point, I'm fine, please help some one else :)
No you're not, and no I'm not, want to talk about your problems so you can feel better?  Just to let people know, when I say 'and no I'm not' I meant I'm not kind, not that I am not beyond that point, I'm fine, please help some one else :)
.
Thank you, truly.
You're welcome friend, my love to you and another huge, comforting hug for good measure..
Im so sorry for your loss. were you suffering from depression before this happened?
No, I've never really suffered from depression before, I've suffered loss before, my father, and a step sister, but nothing that truly derailed my life like this. We were living together for a couple of months and now I don't even know how I'm going to pay my rent and utilities, let alone deal with everything else. Hell only about a week ago I was ring shopping, and looking through her jewelry to see what she likes.
Uh...I don't think you have depression.  Losing a loved one is a major trauma, and grieving comes with all kinds of sadness and other side effects.  Depression is an actual disease, a chemical imbalance, and is not just some temporary state caused by a traumatic event.  Sorry for your loss.
It's possible they have depression and then this happened. Don't be rude. 
at least you have had a gf
'Man. I'm sorry your dad died, but at least you had a dad lol.' - you
The fear that my future will be just as miserable as my present is crippling.
Thats my big fear, that its going to be countless more years of feeling the exact same.....I'm not sure how much i could actually take. 
You don't. Change the game and win buddy. Find out what you dont like and change that shit. 
This.  I hear so many comments like 'i know you don't think it will get better, but it will'.   Its so hard for anyone to believe things will magically get better, and that's because they wont.   You are the master of your own universe. If you want things to get better, you have to work hard for them. I fully understand that many of us are disenfranchised or have fewer options than others, but everyone has the ability to work for a better future. 
This.  I hear so many comments like 'i know you don't think it will get better, but it will'.   Its so hard for anyone to believe things will magically get better, and that's because they wont.   You are the master of your own universe. If you want things to get better, you have to work hard for them. I fully understand that many of us are disenfranchised or have fewer options than others, but everyone has the ability to work for a better future. 
I had a decent life and I couldn't find love. How could it happen when I'm shooting destroyed like I am 
The thought of my future is the only thing that's kept me hopeful and alive. If I had to stay how I am I'd rather be dead. 
Damn right brother. If not for my kids I would have the same outlook. Keep on keeping on. 
I have always wanted to be a teacher when I grow up. Each day I realize how unrealistic my childish dream was. In this day and age it would take me over 10 years after my formal education before I can get a secure job.
You ever thought about doing the big brother big sister thing? or maybe volunteer at a homeless shelter? Maybe teach some homeless people how to live in the world again?
I thought this Reddit would be people posting depressing things and the comments be about cheering them up  Seems to be just depressing comments on the post too
I think it's because the OP asked a question about people's feelings.  On a sub about depression, a lot of those feelings are going to be related to depression.
My usual response to stuff like that is 'Welcome to my life.' Funny part is people dont even think about what i just said and think i am trying to be funny. Most people would be surprised on how much of the stuff i say is dead serious. 
Ya I make a lot of suicide jokes that happen to not be jokes.
Ya I make a lot of suicide jokes that happen to not be jokes.
I've done that a few times. I think people find the idea so far fetched that I *must* be joking xD
To the people who obviously do not understand how depression works, I have 3 words: Go shoot yourself. Sorry you have to out up with that Shit.
What sucks though if you still consider these people who don't get it your friends. But it get's tiring having to explain depression over and over again because they just can't grasp it.
What sucks though if you still consider these people who don't get it your friends. But it get's tiring having to explain depression over and over again because they just can't grasp it.
Yeah, people get mad at me for not coming out and I'm like... 'Yup, that's me. Selfishly being super depressed and miserable.'
But we can't really blame them because they've never experienced it themselves, no?
Yes we can. You don't have to experience it yourself to have SOME understanding. Only to fully understand. They just need to do research.
OP didn't even say if the person/people saying this knew about OP's depression. Kind of jumping on the hate train with a lack of information.
I thought they did say they knew about it. Even if they didnt, they could if they actually payed attention and watched people for it. Its not hard. I come from a family who when I said I was depressed, said I was being dramatic. So I'm vehement about it.
A co-worker literally just told me that I can't be tired because I don't have a wife, kids, or pets -___-
I HATE IT when people use this excuse. I was once told by a professor that I shouldn't be doing so bad in the class when there are people juggling a job, a relationship, kids, all while keeping an A in the class.  I mean I *shouldn't* be doing so bad, but people really fail to grasp that people deal with things differently, and they fail to notice how much depression actually effects people.
I feel like this a lot in college. People sometimes ask why I'm not doing much, and this is is right here. 
I really feel like college is the worst place for a depressed person. Ive been depressed for a good 4 years now and Im about to graduate and I regret every shooting minute of this stupid school
I really feel like college is the worst place for a depressed person. Ive been depressed for a good 4 years now and Im about to graduate and I regret every shooting minute of this stupid school
God tell me about it. I'm in a hard program and every day it feels like hours of my work and effort aren't enough. It rips away your self esteem and I feel constantly anxious. I'm getting through, and I hope you do to. I still have hope that there's a better tomorrow after grad. 
Exactly.  I'll even accept that some people have it worse (and I know they DO!), but that's not the point. Knowing that someone is suffering more than I am makes me very sad for them, but it certainly doesn't mitigate MY problem.
Someone told me that I shouldn't think my dad is an idiot and be depressed because 'at least he didn't rape you'.   What the shoot? 
Someone told me that I shouldn't think my dad is an idiot and be depressed because 'at least he didn't rape you'.   What the shoot? 
WHAT???? Oh, how I wish you were kidding, even just a little bit.  Man, many of us have had difficult lives, but ya know, even if I wanted to play 'can you top this?', I couldn't even come close to that.  If they are supposedly a friend, they shouldn't be. I'm so, so sorry :(
WHAT???? Oh, how I wish you were kidding, even just a little bit.  Man, many of us have had difficult lives, but ya know, even if I wanted to play 'can you top this?', I couldn't even come close to that.  If they are supposedly a friend, they shouldn't be. I'm so, so sorry :(
This was on reddit so I wasn't hurt by it but more shocked that people really thought this way. I mean I have experience with people not thinking depression is a real thing, but to undermine a human experience like that... Wow.  I already fall into those pits of 'I don't even have it that bad!' With myself! But overall I know that my suffering is just the same as anyone else's.
Little victories? You did loads of stuff , important stuff, you should be very proud of yourself
Yeah, and as someone who was in the Navy (and hated all those little details they nitpicked about) there is a speech out there somewhere from an Admiral saying something along the lines of 'If you want to change the world start by making your bed' - the obvious message being if you can be disciplined with the little things then it will carry over into the big things.   So...those are great 'little victories', could possibly turn into much bigger ones with enough momentum. 
I often see people say that doing chores and cleaning up helps their mood. I fully cleaned up my room today, why didn't it make me feel better? :(  I'm honestly glad you got a win though, if you can find something that makes you feel better you should grab onto it. Being happy in the little things is a great step.
Well, the way I see it, I'd rather be depressed with a clean room than depressed with a messy room.
Well, the way I see it, I'd rather be depressed with a clean room than depressed with a messy room.
That's very true. Fatigue is often a big part of depression though and it's hard to find motivation for that stuff, which means it clearly often takes quite a lot of effort. So I can see why it makes people feel better when they go to the effort of improving something they can physically see. I just don't know why I don't get the same feeling when I still feel like it takes effort.
Same I'm tired too. Tired of waking up to the same bullshit everyday. Tired of trying to better myself and stay positive just to have everything you backfire in my face. I tried suicide I failed. I just want to fade away when I fall asleep and never wake up 
Well, at least we know now that we're not alone in this boat. It's a shitty boat, but we're chillin' together.
Well, at least we know now that we're not alone in this boat. It's a shitty boat, but we're chillin' together.
Yea.....
Yea.....
*passes everyone a beer*
It's sad that innocent people have to die in accidents. They most likely DIDN'T want to die.  They have a future and a spouse and were happy.  I'm none of those things.  I sometimes wish that it could of been me to die in an accident instead of a happy productive member of society.
I’ve been thinking the exact same thing. And with each tragedy, hurricane, fires, rogue shooters, terrorists, I feel worse. They start doing human interest stories about the victims and I always think, it should have been me. I’m needed by no one. I wouldn’t be missed. I’m alone. No friends, no family, no support. It could be months, or years before anyone who knew me, would realize I wasn’t alive anymore 
this is how im feeling right now
This is how i feel all the time. 
I would honestly be much happier in a world where people could just openly voice their real thoughts like this. That's one of the things that makes it harder. No one wants to hear it so it just gets bottled up then every few weeks it just pops. Maybe on the way to work or talking to your mom on the phone and you just belt it out until it's over, wipe the tears off your face and get on with your day.
And when I actually talk to someone about what's going on, I always feel like I'm being annoying or that they're gonna judge me, so I end up apologizing like a million times and then not really telling them everything. It sucks and I honestly don't know if I'll ever get over it
I would like to die as well...peacefully...or through some terminal illness
Terminal illnesses are often very painfull and can take quite a while to kill you. Being in pain for months and die in agony is my worst fear. 
Terminal illnesses are often very painfull and can take quite a while to kill you. Being in pain for months and die in agony is my worst fear. 
If I were to get something terminal and painful I would try to move somewhere with physician-assisted suicide and let them work their magic. 
I know this way of thinking. Still, I think it really isn't your decision whether that is true or not. If a person wants to be left alone, and doesn't act on it, that is their problem and something they have to deal with (and they really should be able to deal with uncomfortable situations involving other people). And if they don't want that, it's a win-win, right? So perhaps the best thing to do is not to think too much about this.
I'm not sure if 'not thinking about it' is good enough.  I believe that thoughts similar to the OP are the reason why I don't have any self-confidence, why I don't really make an effort to find a relationship. I just feel like there's no point, I'm too defective. If I like anyone enough to want to be with them, why would I subject them to this? They deserve better.
Running from one distraction to another...It feels like there's no other option. 
I feel like these distractions are not lasting very long anymore.  I just don't feel motivated to do anything at all.  Now that I have the financial means, though, I am trying to see a psychologist or psychiatrist, but it seems they are all too busy to even call back.  
people who do that are the ones who are most enslaved by their depression.
Maybe so but this is the only way I've been able to deal with it. I was very bad at one point cutting myself daily but I realised if I don't allow those thoughts in they can't hurt me and tbh it's working for me so far I'm back at work after a year of being at home wishing I could die everyday and I haven't looked back. 
Have any you fools tried these anti depressants? If so please comment.  I have bee  struggling with depression my entire life. 24 years. But I am finally getting help I need / deserve. I have a history with substance abuse and addiction. I have an appointment with the GP on the 19th. 
Which med are you talking about? I've been put on Zoloft, fluxetine, mirtazapine, and a few others that I can't remember the names.  Whether it help or not is base on your definition of better. If staying alive is better then it help in my case. But if we're talking about being normal again then it's not.  Everyone is a bit different though. It's good to try for yourself.
So to fight that, I started a website. It gives me a chance to do the things I love as much as I want. Even my insomnia has gotten better. If you have a labor of love, it makes things easier. 
What do you mean? What kind of website? I've been trying to get myself to build one too
Depression is an ass kicker! Try to take satisfaction in every accomplishment, no matter how small it might seem. 
Small goals helped me a looooooooooot though my depression. If i as much as went outside, i took as much satisfaction from that as possible to keep my moral and motivation as high as possible. 
It's amazing how the very things that depression can keep you from doing are the very things that can help you to feel just a little bit better. I've found this site really helpful during some moments where I felt I'd lost the way back to anything resembling normalcy and wellness.  http://philome.la/jace_harr/you-feel-like-shit-an-interactive-self-care-guide/play
That is so helpful, thank you! Sometimes I find myself just... distraught and not knowing how to help myself, but this is ideal! I just clicked through a few questions and they're all the kinds of prompts I need (that I might forget when I'm really unwell), especially 'have you remembered to take your meds'. Defo adding to my Favourites.
I have also struggled with showering regularly. The longer I go without bathing, the harder it is to bathe at all. Congrats! 
I am going through this right now. I think if I didn't actually have to leave my house I would not shower.
I am going through this right now. I think if I didn't actually have to leave my house I would not shower.
You can do it, dude. You *know* you'll feel good afterwards - I feel so much better today. Take one tiny step at a time, I believe in you!
Good going.What is your next step?
Thankee! I'm currently waiting for my Tesco grocery shopping to be delivered. Finally ordered online last night!
Thankee! I'm currently waiting for my Tesco grocery shopping to be delivered. Finally ordered online last night!
So I take it as you fighting back little by little?That's awesome!
Thank you for this theory of goalpost moving.  I learned a lot from it.  That's a technique that everyone can apply.  
Look up cognitive distortions or unhelpful thought patterns, moving the goalposts is just one of many. I carry some of their weird slimy trails in my brain, we all do. Knowledge is power and knowing the patterns helps you identify them when you do it. 
I'm proud of you for getting it done! And I know exactly how you feel.  24, live with parents. My driving text is this Saturday. I've got my fingers crossed, but there's that part of me that is so nervous.
Good luck! I was nervous too. I think you'll do great! =)
Dude, this is seriously so awesome, congratulations!!!!!!  You went out and you got a license, which is not an easy thing to do.  It requires months/years of study and training, tons and TONS of practice, and a whole lot of self-building and confidence.  The fact that you went out, committed yourself, and got it done is AMAZING!  Good for you! 
Thank you. n//n  See I wish I could be proud of myself like strangers on the internet are.
MOONCUB! YOU GOT YOUR LICENCE! CONGRATULATIONS!  Ah, I am so happy for you, I am going to draw you a picture :D
Thank you. =) I should be more happy, but I put too much pressure on myself.
Thank you. =) I should be more happy, but I put too much pressure on myself.
Tell you what, getting your licence is one of those achievements you can look back on years from now and still be proud. Don't worry about your feelings now. This is the beginning of good things, and your future self is going to be so grateful to you for doing this. I'm sure those feelings will come. Where's the first place you're going to drive?
Tell you what, getting your licence is one of those achievements you can look back on years from now and still be proud. Don't worry about your feelings now. This is the beginning of good things, and your future self is going to be so grateful to you for doing this. I'm sure those feelings will come. Where's the first place you're going to drive?
Heh to the library tomorrow to pick my brother up so my mom can watch TV. xD
How long have you been doing that for it to take effect and feel better? I do that too but feel worse when I get home  edit: stupid phone
It takes time. Find something to occupy your time at home. Play some video games, read a good book, research some hobbies. Anything to keep yourself distracted.  It's a slow fix really, but it's the best one I can give.
It takes time. Find something to occupy your time at home. Play some video games, read a good book, research some hobbies. Anything to keep yourself distracted.  It's a slow fix really, but it's the best one I can give.
>Play some video games  Bad advice, at least from my point of view.  If I keep playing video games, I'll never change, since it's too easy just to play and ignore the crumbling world around me.
Me? I feel like time is what I need to heal and let old scars disappear. I've done a lot of shitty things and I need to 'do the time' to let these memories fade out and get stronger mentally.
Old scars for me never really disappear they just fade enough so you can ignore them and move on. :3
This is so true. The thing I miss the most are my hobbies. I don't even have the energy or mental capacity to do the things I love anymore (reading and writing in particular). It's the strangest, emptiest feeling in the world. 
Yeah, now I just stare off into space for hours and hours. I'm pleased if I can just make it through one of my old favorite activities and actually feel something, other than apathy. 
yes. Every night I find joy in being dead for a few hours.
I hate waking up
I hate waking up
Yeah me too. Its a nightmare turned reality.
You're not dead, you still feel whats in your dreams. Dead would mean, to feel nothing, remember nothing, be nothing.
Thats usually why I like smoking marijuana. Makes it so I don't remember or even feel like I've been dreaming. Just being turned off for several hours so I don't have think or feel anything... its not much of one, but it can be a nice reprieve especially on those really bad days.
Thats usually why I like smoking marijuana. Makes it so I don't remember or even feel like I've been dreaming. Just being turned off for several hours so I don't have think or feel anything... its not much of one, but it can be a nice reprieve especially on those really bad days.
I just fear death more than i fear life. So when i'm feeling low i tell myself:'Death is too shitty to deal with this.'
I used to. Sometimes dreams can be worse than reality though. Not even talking about nightmares, I mean just dreaming about something you really want to be true, but knowing even within the dream that you can't have it.
Yup. That's the worst when you wake up and reality comes back to you like a punch in the face. 
Yes, I love sleeping and if I had no responsibilities, I would never get out of bed. I have always had very interesting, very vivid dreams and I relish escaping to them. To quote a lyric from one of my favorite songs, 'sometimes I greet my nightmares with relief.'
I physically can't stay asleep too long without feeling terrible. Then I have to get up and hope it will be a good day. Usually it isn't. Today it isn't. 
I physically can't stay asleep too long without feeling terrible. Then I have to get up and hope it will be a good day. Usually it isn't. Today it isn't. 
That's okay. Let's try again tomorrow.
I love being asleep. I look forward to going to sleep and I hate waking up. My dreams are always more interesting, vivid, and easier than my waking life. The person I am in my dream is happy, engaged, and free.
I also really wish I would just die in my sleep.
When I got on the proper medication, I literally thought, 'Oh my god, so this is what everyone else feels like ALL THE TIME!!!' It was incredible.
Same here. The realization that it isn't normal to feel... sucky all the time and that with a little assistance I could find a new normal- a happier normal- was like finding out that Willy Wonkas factory really exists. 
Same here. The realization that it isn't normal to feel... sucky all the time and that with a little assistance I could find a new normal- a happier normal- was like finding out that Willy Wonkas factory really exists. 
It's bitter sweet.  You regret all the time you spent in misery, but if you hadn't done that, would feeling better mean as much?  Another good quote I like is, 'It hurts because it mattered.'
It's bitter sweet.  You regret all the time you spent in misery, but if you hadn't done that, would feeling better mean as much?  Another good quote I like is, 'It hurts because it mattered.'
John Green?
Care to share which medication? I am intrigued.
if you're asking for your own potential use, it doesn't matter what this one guy says. the right medication is different for everyone and unfortunately you'll just need a little trial and error to find the one for you.
That's tough. I suffer from depression and think about suicide a lot. Sometimes i think about leaving my gf to protect her from my sadness. She deserves better
I did this. Hurts every day, shes happy with someone else now and im sitting around worse than ever...
I did this. Hurts every day, shes happy with someone else now and im sitting around worse than ever...
wanna bet she still worries about you while trying to respect your choice?   pushing people away is never the right answer. 
wanna bet she still worries about you while trying to respect your choice?   pushing people away is never the right answer. 
In some cases it might. She might have low self esteem. In my case my gf is an amazing woman but shes 38 and she thinks im her last chance. She could really really do better.
He's in a safe place. Please take care of yourself, you deserve it. Both of you are going through this. I'm glad you're sticking with him (as one who've been abandoned because of my illness), but don't forget about yourself. It's okay to feel down, it's only logical.
I hate to be that guy, but unfortunately most psych wards end up doing more damage than good. There was a recent post about it that I commented on, plus both of my good friends who've been to mental health hospitals left feeling more suicidal than when they entered. Hoping OP keeps a watchful eye on her bf and that he is okay. Hopefully he's the minority in that he actually gets better.
It sucks that you have 'to do something' consciously to die. It would be a blessing to just stop existing or to not wake up the next morning; without knowing it. 
Dying in the middle of the night while asleep would be great. Sometimes I wish that I'll just get carbon monoxide poisoned and then don't have to 'do something' to not exist.
I dream like a high-octane action movie. I wonder, if I were to die in my sleep while in the middle of such a dream, what would actually that feel like. Maybe I'll just keep on staying inside that dream and I wouldn't even know that I've died. Of course, time will be dilated and my dream will end when I die, but at least I'll never know and for me it'll be like I'm living the dream (totally pun intended) forever, per se. 
I've always wondered it too - if you die while you are asleep (say a heart attack or something), if you're in the middle of a dream does it just go black like somebody turns the lights off in a movie?
Ok. It's gonna sound weird. I had dark thoughts about ending my life for sometimes...  Then a few days ago, I went camping in the wild. In the middle of the night, there was a black bear outside the tent. I never had the will to live as much as this exact moment.  I said to myself; is it how I want to go?...nope. I'm feeling better now...
Same here, thought about suicide a lot for 2 weeks and then went over the handlebars of my bike while coming down a rocky mountain path. Smacked my chest on a rock and grazed and bruised myself but I was so relieved to be alive and swore not to do any over-ambitious mountain biking again. Anyway now I'm back to where I was before I fell off.
I keep hoping these chest pains turn into a heart attack soon
Right? Like they already feel like they are going to half the time, just get it over with already. 
That's also why I can't tell them about how I feel. I don't want to hurt them, and I don't want to burden them.
I would feel so badly and like a failure if my child didn’t come to me with this. I’m a mom and love my children deeply and would want to help them or get them help. I can’t imagine one of mine walking around with this horrible feeling. Tell her and don’t worry about it hurting her, she would definitely want to know about her baby
Relatable, but only my mom though, my dad can shoot off.
Same here. But then my dad hasn't talked to me in a year and didn't even show up when I was in the ICU fighting for my life because of my chronic illness.  The reason I haven't stopped fighting is my mom. If she'd be gone, I'd just wait for my illness to do the killing for me.
This is the exact reason I've always wanted a sibling, just so it would lessen the blow 
Uh nope? i have lil brother and sister, and it doesnt lessen the blow instead make it even bigger, since it only add the amount of people that would get shooted up if i put myself off :(
This is me to an absolute tee. It also gives off the impression I'm an idiot but I'm just shy. But I'm not a people person. I'm shooted. Definitely dying as a hermit.
Fellow hermit here. 34 yo feel like I'm living a 90 year old pensioner life
You're probably not antisocial but asocial 
It's a pretty common misunderstanding.   Very few people are truly antisocial by definition 
We should have a party that'll I'll make up a fake excuse to not go to since parties terrify me
Sorry my cat had cancer
Same with me. And at 35 y/o, it doesn't look pretty :(
34,turning 35 soon. Was fine until 30 then been struggling with depression/bp2. Used to be ok to socialize, loved to travel, now I've been back living with my parents for the past 6 months coz i cant really handle much of anything... Not alone man
34,turning 35 soon. Was fine until 30 then been struggling with depression/bp2. Used to be ok to socialize, loved to travel, now I've been back living with my parents for the past 6 months coz i cant really handle much of anything... Not alone man
The older you get, the more significant those differences become
yes. I've been going to bed at ~4am the past three nights. Horrible I know. I hate waking up. Worst feeling ever. I don't look forward to the day at all. I hate myself and it's just takes a phenomenal amount of effort to really get myself moving..  I really need to change my habits though.
Me too. I'm doing relatively well now but I still curse to myself when I wake up.  To quote Liz Lemon/ BoJack Horseman 'Everything is the worst.'
Me too. I'm doing relatively well now but I still curse to myself when I wake up.  To quote Liz Lemon/ BoJack Horseman 'Everything is the worst.'
Liz Lemon said that FIRST  Edit: Probably ¯\_(ツ)_/¯
The only time I think I'm happy is when I'm sleeping. I slept 24 hours the other day. 
Same. I just don't want to get up in the mornings. I sleep in til 1/2 pm every day. My dad forces me to get up and drives me 2 km away from the house so I have to walk home and that will wake me up..but the minute I get home I go straight to bed.   I don't go to bed because I'm tired. I go to bed to dream. Because my dreams are so much better than my piece of shot life right now..
Same. I just don't want to get up in the mornings. I sleep in til 1/2 pm every day. My dad forces me to get up and drives me 2 km away from the house so I have to walk home and that will wake me up..but the minute I get home I go straight to bed.   I don't go to bed because I'm tired. I go to bed to dream. Because my dreams are so much better than my piece of shot life right now..
Your dad is doing right by you though with the wake up and drop. I like the drop move. 
Shit man that's intense... Wish I knew how to deal with this - maybe I could help you
I'll trade you ten hours a day. I think it's just how your depression is wired. Some can't sleep. Some of us just want to sleep. 
Whoa dude that's really bad! I stay up for the same reasons for sure and I was thinking about how it could really be as bad for you as people think. But if you're not worried about your own safety, think about other people on the road
Sometimes I get plenty of sleep and it still happens.
Ok wait... who would come into your room/apartment/house?? Also you might want to look into ADHD haha
Probably parent
There's a constant duality: if I sleep then that's 3-4 hours where I'm unconscious but if I stay awake, I don't have to come to the same realisations I did the previous morning. I'm still somewhat surprised when I wake up and I'm still not happy, even though that's been my life for the last year or so.
I second this. Waking up and having all of the thoughts come flooding back is not fun. 
Yep. I do this all the time. Sleep deprivation somehow makes me feel better. 
Sleep deprivation works for me too. And, it's a thing.  Nature article, [An Unconventional Treatment for Depression: Sleep Deprivation](http://www.nature.com/scitable/blog/mind-read/an_unconventional_release_from_depression).  Scientific American article, [Why Sleep Deprivation Eases Depression](https://www.scientificamerican.com/article/why-sleep-deprivation-eases-depression/).
I think non depressed people do this as well, I remember having imaginary conversations with myself or with others....well all of my life actually.  Sometimes its a way to vent or deal with something emotional when I am not able to properly talk about it, sometimes I think its just getting a little caught up in imagination (nothing really wrong with that imo).
I thought I was the only one who did this!  Makes me feel much better, thanks. 
This is exactly what I'm doing currently. With the added bonus of browsing reddit, of course. 
I do that as well. For me the addition is watching some Bob Ross Painting videos on Youtube. 
I used to do that. Work and Netflix. I actually started running out of things to watch...
Work is escapism now?  I mean yeah i do that,  just kill time with work. But isn't that all life is anyway?  Just doing things to make time go by. 
I've always suspected that my depression and anxiety were more a result of my self-awareness than just a 'disorder' like everyone says. But I've been too afraid to ever admit to myself that my existential crises were valid /appropriate responses to life. Because that seems terrifying.  Anyway..I felt like your reply hit me on that deeper level, where a lot of my fears and doubts live, and made them quieter for a moment. Or, maybe the Klonopin is kicking in. Either way..I'm glad you posted this.
> I've always suspected that my depression and anxiety were more a result of my self-awareness than just a 'disorder'   Dang yes. This right here. I wonder this often. 
If you'd ask a depressed person that question, he's  going to agree with you.   Any other 'normal' person on the roadside would make the fallacious counter-argument that making 'depression' excuses is escapism.   The responses differ from person to person depending on how they accept reality.
'Normals' sometimes drop the guard and approach honesty: 'you _have_ to believe in something,' or 'before I found \*deity\* there was this void in my heart...' or a curt 'you can't live like that' to reject pessimistic views without considering them. 
'Normals' sometimes drop the guard and approach honesty: 'you _have_ to believe in something,' or 'before I found \*deity\* there was this void in my heart...' or a curt 'you can't live like that' to reject pessimistic views without considering them. 
There's that too. For them the 'you can't live like that' platitude is how they view the reality.
Escapism > Self harm.  
Feel like my drug use could turn into self harm if I'm not careful. 
Feel like my drug use could turn into self harm if I'm not careful. 
Depends on the drug
Depends on the drug
Ehh, pretty much any drug can be detrimental for you if you're not controlling yourself. Only drug I can think *might* be fine would be weed. But that can be detrimental to certain people, as well.  I'm not dissing drugs or anything, I love 'em. I just don't think we should avoid the truth about them, either--they can easily consume you.
Oh god yes all the time. Especially on /r/depression. A lot of people came from situations a lot more shooted up than mine and have more severe symptoms than me.  I had a shitty childhood, but then I read about someone whose childhood has been one non-stop horror show, then I feel like mine was trifling in comparison.  Sometimes I feel like a fraud posting here. I keep dealing with the urge to exaggerate what I post out of fear of being 'exposed' as one.
The exaggerating thing really resonates with me. Sometimes I feel like I have to do that too, or people will realize that I'm not depressed and I'm just a lazy idiot who can't even bother being happy. 
I agree with what you said, that could apply to my life as well.  Is it wrong that I constantly wish for something horrible and traumatic to happen to me just so I would have an 'excuse' for my depression?  
I used to wish for that and then it happened to me and I'd die to change it back to the way it was 
I used to wish for that and then it happened to me and I'd die to change it back to the way it was 
Hope you are doing ok now.  Part of me has that wish, the other part feels that if I can't handle my boring, normal life now, how would I be able to handle actual problems?  
Depression isn't a constant 5, 3, 7 or 9 for anyone. Even those who struggle the most have good moments. It just so happens that when people are at their worst, they vent on the internet. Probably because they have no one else.  I've never attempted suicide but I think about everyday it and how I'd do it. It's been getting worse actually...
Same here, sometimes I get a good few laughs in with my friends, other times I'm so shooting shitty I went 2 days without eating.  
'I feel that every person who hurts, and that includes us ourselves as well, is worthy of the full measure of our compassion.'  I completely agree with this, great point. It is easy to compare yourself to others and say 'I must not be depressed enough' but we are all so different and come from different situations. We can't compare them. And no one can tell you how you feel.  
Thanks for saying that.
Yeah, like right now I'm sitting here alone in my quiet house freaking out internally because I can't get a job and have no money yet I'm also incredibly bored. I just want to go back to bed most of the time.
It's so weird. I hope we both get normal somehow.
It's a vicious cycle. life is so overwhelming which makes you not dare to experience it, making life very boring so you try to venture outside , but life so overwhelming...
Exactly what is happening to me. Life is so hard to deal with, so I'm going back in my dark and lonely cocoon, feeling alone, bored, and useless. 
I know right! And then I feel guilty about feeling bored which makes me feel like a terrible person and the cycle of self hate continues.
Seing all the post on /suicidalwatch and /depression makes me wonder if there is something wrong about our lives and world, or if it's just that we can connect with each other so easily... I'm feeling so bad yet I just wish I could help and make people happy again, it tears my heart. 
Seing all the post on /suicidalwatch and /depression makes me wonder if there is something wrong about our lives and world, or if it's just that we can connect with each other so easily... I'm feeling so bad yet I just wish I could help and make people happy again, it tears my heart. 
Your comment made me tear up. I feel the same way.
Yeah.  Agreed.  I always feel bored and underwhelmed with everything.  I'll sit and play games or watch TV and those aren't even that enjoyable half the time.  I feel like I need to go do something that *matters*, something productive that will somehow make a difference in my life or someone else's, but then when I really think about it I freak out about it and/or just can't be bothered to because just the thought is exhausting.  
wow.. just reading that made me feel a little better. That is exactly how i feel, literally to a T. I feel like if I had something I was passionate about I could put everything into it and be amazing at it, but I just don't have a passion for anything. As you said, even my normal entertainment of video games and TV is not as enjoyable half the time.
That's how I felt for a long time at my last job. I finally had to leave and my god does it feel better already. 
Yeah I am finally getting my act together to leave. The final straw was when they gave the position I wanted (for the 2nd time), to someone who had no experience or knowledge in  the role. They also knew I've wanted to position for over a year and have been picking up training on the side from the other people in that position. 
I am an EE, and have been sober for 29 days.  I have ruined everything by drinking.  Keep up the healing and maybe you can take control of everything! 
what is an EE?
what is an EE?
Electrical engineer, I think. 
Electrical engineer, I think. 
Right E ooohhh.
I feel exactly like this- I'm young, heading towards good A level grades, a good uni, I have family, friends, a boyfriend, etc. I am really privileged, and I detest myself for not being happy. people with much less than me are happy, so why can't I be?
I feel the same way; I have so much good going for me. I should be happy with life but I'm not and don't know exactly why.
I feel the same way; I have so much good going for me. I should be happy with life but I'm not and don't know exactly why.
Talking with a therapist can help you with all that - you're right, you're very fortunate to have so many things going for you.  You also deserve to feel that as well - if you don't feel it, therapy is a good place to start working through your shit so you can get to a place where you do feel great about your life and your future. 
I love that TED talk. I've watched it at least a dozen times, no joke. There's just something calming about Andrew Solomon's voice, and I can so identify with all of his experiences and observations.  I definitely recommend it to those who haven't watched it yet.
He's such an amazing writer too. He has a really impressive book - The Noonday Demon.  
There's no one true reality. Only millions of perspectives of what reality is.   We're all delusional in a way :D
Yes, it's all a question of which perspectives you choose to emphasize.  Depressed people tend to emphasize negative perspectives.  A valuable skill for a depressed person is questioning one's perspectives and learning to see what parts of them are unhealthy and can be de-emphasized.
Yes, it's all a question of which perspectives you choose to emphasize.  Depressed people tend to emphasize negative perspectives.  A valuable skill for a depressed person is questioning one's perspectives and learning to see what parts of them are unhealthy and can be de-emphasized.
How the hell did you get that username? Wait, holy shit, you've been here for 10 years? Mother of god...
Well, i think we can all agree that the world is shit. The way i bare with it, is by enjoying the good moments that you make. The 'moments' are all the things that you like to do; play video games, watch television, hang out with your friends etc, the things that replaces the thought of your reality into something enjoyable instead. Instead of focusing on why our planet is shooted up, do what you like.  Happy in the moments, but not in life, right? Cheers! 
this. shooting this. i see depressed people, even myself, not focusing on the present enough. and its hard not too. I think what most of the depressed people will hopefully do is realize how shooted the world is, and try to do something about it. and enjoy those present happy moments along the way, bcuz like u said, they'll be gone soon. see i just did it there. 
lol, have u experienced depression?
I have depression and he's not wrong.
wish this would work for me... I still feel numb...
numb is the worst. I hope you can find happiness (and beautiful sadness) soon. 
Depression is not necessarily sadness, nor do I believe it originates from a contrast of feelings. Depression can be spontaneous and without reason. To claim it can only exist relative to happiness diminishes its significance. 
It sucks, but this is true. Clinical depression isn't really about a cosmic balance of sadness to make you appreciate your happiness... clinical depression is a disorder that takes away your ability to feel happy about much at all, and can even make it so you don't really feel much of *anything* at all.   
Anyone know what episode this is from?
It's from the season 7 episode, [Raisins](http://www.southparkstudios.com/full-episodes/s07e14-raisins). 
Are you on antidepressants? I ask because I was the same way on meds.
I've been on Wellbutrin for 4 weeks and crying was my way of letting stress out, but I can't anymore
I've been on Wellbutrin for 4 weeks and crying was my way of letting stress out, but I can't anymore
Yeah, that was an issue for me with any antidepressant I took. I became numb to any emotions at all, really.
No i am not. 
Ok, I just wondered, I got that way after antidepressants. This seems troublesome though. Do you have a counselor,  or a psychiatrist?  This is definitely something you should bring up to a professional.  
Ok, I just wondered, I got that way after antidepressants. This seems troublesome though. Do you have a counselor,  or a psychiatrist?  This is definitely something you should bring up to a professional.  
haven't been to an councilor therapist.  
Yup.  Easy savings of around $100 per month compared to budgets that do account for it. As long as those savings aren't put towards some other BS, then you're saving money!  I'm just dumbfounded by people who do go out all the time and aren't made of money-- how is that kind of lifestyle financially sound?  
It's not financially sound. A lot of my income comes from my parents and SSI. And I feel horrible about that, but, unfortunately, it's nearly impossible to get a well-paying job if you're an autistic, awkward freak of nature like me. So I kind of have to take money from my parents and the government in order to keep myself (somewhat) sane and (somewhat) healthy.
Careful, if you let yourself go hungry on a regular basis without doing anything about it, your brain will stop sending you the hunger signals.  You'll just get weak and shakey all of a sudden and remember 'right, food goes in here.'
This happens to me all the time. I won't eat for like 10 hours and then all of a sudden I'll get really shaken and really weak, and I'm barely able to walk. And I'm like WFT! And then I remember, I have to eat. There would be days where I wouldn't eat for a whole day, and then nearly pass out. 
This happens to me all the time. I won't eat for like 10 hours and then all of a sudden I'll get really shaken and really weak, and I'm barely able to walk. And I'm like WFT! And then I remember, I have to eat. There would be days where I wouldn't eat for a whole day, and then nearly pass out. 
Quick question, you don't have to answer if you don't want, but I'm a guy in early high school and was wondering if this could come from just run of the mill depression or if this is only a food disorder thing. I get these same shakes because I just never get hungry anymore but I don't really have a negative view on my weight or any other symptoms of food disorders. 
I wish my brain would do me this favor...then perhaps I could lose some weight. 
Imo the best way to lose weight is to do something for a purpose other than losing weight..neg walking to school to get to school, not to lose weight. That way you dont put ur expectations way too high from the result of each attempt whilst periodically getting better...   Loosing weight is a very achievable thing..a lot of people such as myself put the difficulty of things way higher than what it really is. Eg learning to cook
I online shop because it makes me feel happy for a little bit and waiting for the packages gives me something to look forward to 
Pro Tip: Put them in your basket, go have a smoke, a shot, or a shot of herion and then comeback. Maybe you can eliminate something you don't really want.  Edit: Sorry thought this was r/financial.
Pro Tip: Put them in your basket, go have a smoke, a shot, or a shot of herion and then comeback. Maybe you can eliminate something you don't really want.  Edit: Sorry thought this was r/financial.
You sir gave me a reason to smirk today. Please be frugal with my upvote and don't open up credit cards in it's name. 
I spend all my money on drugs to pretend im happy!
Ayy me too! I'm not lonely because I have so many drug dealers calling my phone everyday!
I can't be shooted to cook a meal though, so when I do eat, it's always fast food. I kind of really want a vegetable sometime this week....
this is my thinking most days... like shoot... when did I eat a veggie last... you're supposed to eat those right???
Not for me. Ive spent the past week playing hearthstone every day and i think ive spent like $50 on card packs. I also took vyvanse every day so i dont feel so foggy but then id forget to eat and i think vyvanse is bad for me now, so at least i quit that. 
Yeah digital items ensure I can still spend money at home, there's also amazon lol.
Tried this: didn't work. Fatass desire to consume overrode bed.
Yeah my version of depression is eat until horribly uncomfortable then don't eat for a while to let the pain subside, rinse repeat. Then my self loathing reaches critical mass and I can keep a diet together for a couple weeks and I lose some weight and feel *so* much better. Then my shitty brain wants oreos every day for a week and...rinse repeat...again. Up and down and up and down. I am exhausted.
I'm brazilian and don't know what is FMLA  For me, it's not acceptable that I am unemployed. I live alone, my family is poor, I have 2 cats, I am at my second graduation (hate my first one)  If I don't have the money for those things, it's better for me to just die
FMLA is a legal protection that you will keep your job if you miss work due to a medical condition lasting 3 or more days (or for caretaking for someone in your immediate family's illness).  You are guaranteed up to 12 weeks of leave from work per year (unpaid). 
Congratulations! I'm happy for you.
Thanks! 
Congrats!  I  washed my hair for the first time in 11 days this past Friday. Will leave it alone for about 2 weeks this time.
Is there a reason you're setting a time limit on this?  Are you sure you don't want to keep at your 11 day schedule?
Not really. I don't have a particular reason. Just the longest I can wait, without feeling utterly gross, the better. Although, it doesn't seem to bother me, even when I'm feeling gross, as much as it bothers others around me. Family members and friends, constantly telling me to shower. Such a dull task, I can never get myself to do it. Eh.
I hear you.
How long did it take to brush it out? Congrats 
It wasn't tricky because I tried to brush it out a day before, so it took only a few minutes.  Besides, I'm already used to deal with my thick hair 😉 
Congratulations :)    /r/thexeffect/ helps me stay on top of self care sometimes. 
I read that as the axe effect and thought it was group of teenagers who rave about how the suave scent of axe got them laid. However, I was pleasantly surprised. 
People forget about my birthday and that's fine by me. However for some reason I have terrible luck on that day ever year. It might be a self fulfilling prophecy or just coincidence. This last year the highlight of the day was having a cute brunette smile at me.....only after I managed to trip, fall and disrupt her class. Might add I had walked in the wrong classroom.
Yes every year for me too. Like as if gifted by the universe something always happens to make me cry or remind me that I don't matter! This is why I dread it. 
My birthdays the 29th, I'm going to be spending it pregnant and alone. I might just shoot myself, but I never make plans I just let shit happen...historically my birthday is the worst, people try to make hooplah even though I very clearly have no friends and my birthday only serves as a reminder that it's just another year of depression. I've been depressed since I was 9, I'm turning 24...shoot this shit
I'm sorry you're going through this
My birthday is on Valentine's Day and I've never had a Valentine. I'm turning 23 this year. People in school would give me their hand-me-down candy pretending they remembered, and every year on the exact day I have dinner with my mother and little brother. It's nice that they go out with me, but when you look around and see only couples and you're eating cake with your family, it's an embarrassing feeling. 
Mine's the day before Valentine's. People always say 'oh that's awesome it's probably even more special' but that's sooo not been the case for me ever. Either single and everyone forgets my birthday/too busy on my birthday because they're planning their own Valentine's celebrations, or dating someone who ends up 'forgetting' both my birthday and Valentine's like a double whammy. Only once did I get both a proper birthday gift followed by Valentine's dinner/outing in the same year.
Mine's the day before Valentine's. People always say 'oh that's awesome it's probably even more special' but that's sooo not been the case for me ever. Either single and everyone forgets my birthday/too busy on my birthday because they're planning their own Valentine's celebrations, or dating someone who ends up 'forgetting' both my birthday and Valentine's like a double whammy. Only once did I get both a proper birthday gift followed by Valentine's dinner/outing in the same year.
Oh definitely the part about people planning their Valentine's Day evenings! I would love to go out with my friends on my birthday, but every year they have better things to do. I've actually never spent my actual birthday with friends before. 
There's a birthday party happening upstairs  And it's all for me, who the shoot cares?   They don't notice if I never go and show my face   They just looking for a reason they can celebrate   I hate to waste the vanilla cake that they made for me   I'll tell the same stories, they'll pretend they never heard them   I'll just lay down here inside the studio   Doing blow and paraphrasing The Crucible 
Dam did not expect to see mac miller lyrics haha 👍🏽
Dam did not expect to see mac miller lyrics haha 👍🏽
Just found out it was his birthday yesterday too, what a coincidence. 
Mine's the day after Christmas.  It's the worst possible day for a birthday.
I had a stomach bug then this year...so, I hate your birthday too.
Why do you hate it exactly? I know you said you hate being reminded of it, but why?
I suppose I never clarified that. It reminds me that while everyone is celebrating my birth and existence, I'm actively wishing for the opposite. 
I suppose I never clarified that. It reminds me that while everyone is celebrating my birth and existence, I'm actively wishing for the opposite. 
I don't actually know how to respond to that. I didn't want to be an idiot and not respond. I love you brother/sister. Stay strong.
Yeah the one time I want to be shooting left alone..but noo make an effort it's your birthday!... -.-
I was sick on my last birthday. It was a relief not having to plan out shit to do and have people flake last minute. I just watched tv and played video games.
That's my motto. Why just blow your brains out when you can at least have some fun; and a shooted up goal is better than none at all.
If you could have fun, you'd probably do that instead of killing yourself.  I think people are really, really missing the whole mindset behind suicide.
If you could have fun, you'd probably do that instead of killing yourself.  I think people are really, really missing the whole mindset behind suicide.
In a way, possibly. But not all people who are suicidal are depressed; they are however all desperate. I spent most of my life suicidal, depressed, addicted to drugs, institutionalized and/or in jail. I've got a good grasp on it, my remark about a shooted up goal being better than no goals at all was dead on. Doing 'crazy shit' like the OP suggested probably saved my life. By 'throwing it all away and hitch hiking to China' he would in fact, be gaining so much more.
That was beautiful
What did it say?!
Me too, Into the Wild style. A social suicide, if you like.
When I was like 13, 14, 15, I used to fantasize about that exact thing -- going to Alaska to live in the wild. I made friends and told them about it and they called me stupid.   Are you really a superbly handsome guy? I have to know. 
When I was like 13, 14, 15, I used to fantasize about that exact thing -- going to Alaska to live in the wild. I made friends and told them about it and they called me stupid.   Are you really a superbly handsome guy? I have to know. 
As much as you're WICKED SICK, BRO
As much as you're WICKED SICK, BRO
Hahaha I was just, my sister occasionally sends me stuff she thinks is funny, and shes been sending me these old memes, like [this comic](http://funnyjunk.com/funny_pictures/3577186/My+milkshakes).   Your username reminded me of the 'dapper' guy in the comic for some reason, and I was laughing. I was imagining some super groomed up hipster beard and mustache combo on some guy and it was just silly. 
Im 20 and I want to do exactly that. I enjoy watching all these shows about people who live in the wilderness, specifically Alaska, because I envy it. I mean I guess being totally alone would kind of suck, but what I wouldn't give to be able to do something like that.  I guess it'd just be nice to not have to deal with the bullshit of school, family, career expectations, etc...just living a simpler life
Alaska kind of sucks.  You have no concept of what 'remote' and 'cold' is like, I assure you.  You also have no concept of the hell that is mosquitos in summer, in Alaska.  Reality TV isnt real, kids.
I think about this too! From going on adventures in Europe to becoming an Alaskan bush person. Just experiencing new things. Who knows, I might find something worth living for.  Let's start a 'Depression Adventure Club!'
Can... can we actually do this? This needs to be a thing.
Can... can we actually do this? This needs to be a thing.
If that whole 'college' thing doesn't pan out next semester, I just might start this.
Done this but went to Seattle instead of china and I'm alot happier now actually. I was able to come to terms with alot of things. I highly recommend if you feel your options are limited.  
As someone in the Seattle area I'd love to hear more about this.
Honestly i love to move but i have no job skills   i pretty much just game, work a min wage job, and work on my art and graphic design; which im no good at. to relocate you have to have some type of skill to get you work to sustain yourself. =p
I didn't,  not when I left.  I took what i could,  looked up the local resources for the area and took off. I'm not much better off than you, but after being in a new place for a while,  everything i wanted just seemed so obtainable.    Nothing can stop you but you.  Sorry if that's cliché but I've taken that saying to heart.  
time to buy a motorcycle in london and head to mongolia. 
Ahaha if only!
I just feel like there's no connection when I'm close to other people. It sucks. It really does.
I have literally zero friends, I totally can relate to you. 
I have literally zero friends, I totally can relate to you. 
The internet is a great place to meet friends, so, what's up with you? :)
The internet is a great place to meet friends, so, what's up with you? :)
Where exactly? Reddit? 
This. I can make friends. I can make 'close' friends but I never feel a true, strong connection. I never fully trust them. I like to think that it's perhaps not solely due to my depression, but the fact that I'm a bit 'different' lol 
I fully trusted one person to completely be myself around and I trusted her for 15 years. Then she cheated on me and left. It's really interesting coming to grips with never being able to be yourself with people.
I have the same feeling. But don't you wonder why it is?  Nowadays I just feel that people interacting with each other is fake. It's etiquette, it's polite, but it's empty. Their memory of the conversation probably disappears as soon as the air stops vibrating by their voices. 
think it's because i'm so inherently boring there are just no connections
Hey I feel the same way exactly but not so mich anymore. I was wondering if you can go into more detail as to why you think this pertaining to the conversations with people. it would be much appreciated. I just want other peoples insights on the same things I go through!
Whenever I laugh/smile or show any kind of emotion with someone, whether it be a family member or someone else, I feel like I'm showing my emotions from the outside. I do feel that in the inside, but it quickly fades away after a moment and I feel empty again.  It feels like I'm restricted to be happy and constantly have to mask myself. 
The lack of social interaction has diminished my ability to even communicate.   Whenever I talk to someone, I feel creeped out by myself, and the way how my words come out. I can even feel my hostile aura, imagine what the other person feels.   I barely talk to people outside of my house, so I have to almost relearn how to not seem hostile. 
Once you dig yourself that hole of not having social interaction it can be hard to get back out of it. I'm right there with ya. 
This is spot shooting on. OP, if you wrote this, excellent work, if you didn't, very excellent find. To a large extent it is what I'm dealing with, and this made me feel a little better about it all... again, good work.
I found it. I don't know what it was, but this spoke to me.
 I've always found that I'm capable of just about anything, even during the worst times.  I can work hard, I can be sociable with friends, all that stuff.  The problem is that being busy and thinking 'living sucks, this is all pointless' is really no different than doing nothing and thinking 'living sucks, this is all pointless'.
Exactly my struggle. I do a lot of volunteering that used to make me happy, but I've lost all will do it anymore in the past year. I've struggled with depression many years of my life, but never as much as I have in the past year.
This is too real, wow. Thanks for posting.
:)
I've saved this so I can read it again when I'm on a downer.
Same here. :)
This made me cry but a good cry because it means someone understands what its like. Thanks for posting this OP.
<3
Goddamn. So much better than I could ever put it. I don't want to kill myself, but almost everything else is spot on. This inspired me. I'm calling my doctor tomorrow and setting up an appointment to finally talk about my depression.
:D
>Right in the few feels that are still there.    Sometimes I just love being around this place. Because of small sentences like yours.   Different topic: This text is all over the internet and I've seen it several times. Do you have any idea of its origin? Just asking because I couldn't find the author.
Those sentences say so much in so few words.  Someone posted the original source in /u/maxanderson's thread here.
I feel like this wouldn't be bad on [r/bestof](http://reddit.com/r/bestof).
I feel as though the original post of this on here should be seen to /r/bestof.
I just found this and I'm in tears trying to type. Thank you, thank you. This is it, it's so true, and people don't get it unless they have had it or know someone close with it. 
:) No problem at all. It means a lot that other people can relate to this find.
Just remember, as you are lying on the comfortable couch under your favorite blanket, eating delicious comfort food and watching the perfect mindless show - today COULD be the day your life turns around.  It may not be life changing day, but at least thinking about it makes me smile and put on clean underpants :-)
Your comment made me smile. Sometimes that little baby step is the most progress that can be made. But it's better than the alternative.  Way. To. Go.
Parks and Recreation is my go to! 
Hahaha i actually just got into it yesterday and got to the second season today
Hahaha i actually just got into it yesterday and got to the second season today
So good. What a cheery show that doesn't resort to cheap jokes! 
Firefly. Always Firefly. <3 
As long as we skip Angel and don't say 'I am a leaf on the wind' more than two times... I'm happy. 
Thanks buddy, your words really encouraged me.  I made myself go to a party at my church today, and I ended up having a pretty good time.  :)
Go you!
People tell you to take vitamins for depression? How is that supposed to help?
People told me Vitamin D would help seasonal depression. It didn't. 
People told me Vitamin D would help seasonal depression. It didn't. 
Yeah, I heard this the other day. I had high hopes but the realistic part of my brain was telling me that summers suck too.
I'm currently in a mental hospital (been here for 3 months now fml), and when I get out I have to find a therapist. The thing is, that I have to go to group therapies, not 1 on 1, which I shooting hate. I can't open up in group therapies, I'm not interested in other people, and I will talk only for a while which is not worth the money. I would like to have regular therapies, but group ones suck.. for me at least.
I'd feel the same way if I was in your position. If I'm gonna open up, I need to be alone and it has to be for one pair of ears  Edit: I read it again and realized it wasn't so clear
I liked group therapies because I knew I wasn't the only one who needed help.  It made me feel less alienated, and took away a lot of my shame and guilt. 
Well I guess I have reddit for that. In group therapies I usually can't emphasize with others, because they have way different problems than I do. Usually it's alcohol, or family. I have issues with neither.
Oh damn, I'm sorry to hear that. Why are group therapy sessions mandatory? Surely it should be your own choice how you want to proceed? I hope it all works out for you!!!!
Well I'm in a mental hospital and they decided, that once I get out I should start going to group therapies, as they are apparently better for me. I don't feel like that's the case. Oh well.  Thanks, appreciate it.
I feel lighter after a session, but I usually feel really bad during. Like I'm reopening a wound. I like to think that it's like resetting bones. It's painful, but at least now I'll heal properly. Is it the same for you? I'm just wondering because it seems people have different experiences with therapy
My first few I felt awful and struggled to talk about anything without getting on the verge of tears but like you said it's resetting bones and now I'm able to express whatever may be troubling me with much more ease, tho there are still certain subjects I struggle with, it will get better with time. How long have you been in therapy for?
My first few I felt awful and struggled to talk about anything without getting on the verge of tears but like you said it's resetting bones and now I'm able to express whatever may be troubling me with much more ease, tho there are still certain subjects I struggle with, it will get better with time. How long have you been in therapy for?
Ahh, that explains it. It's only been a few weeks for me. Not even on meds yet.
God, clingy mom. I know that feel. I hope your friends didn't give you a hard time for it? I dreaded sharing that I was going to therapy, thinking 'I'm weird enough already,' until I learned a lot of my friends are or want to be in therapy. People I like and admire. It's weird how much people shared once I admitted to going and dealing with depression.  Sorry, not trying to preach. I hope things get better for you is all.
You’re not coming off as preachy.   They didn’t really, mostly I refused to elaborate when they asked, or just made up some excuse which I knew they didn’t buy,  but I pushed it anyway. I don’t think my social anxiety would have let me admit it anyway, I just really wished they pretended it wasn’t anything different.
You get the hospital bill yet?
I live in the UK so no hospital bills! The NHS is a pile of shit but at least I'm not in debt. 
I live in the UK so no hospital bills! The NHS is a pile of shit but at least I'm not in debt. 
Remember: 8th June, help keep it that way.
I can't let myself feel happy, I feel guilty for being happy. Now I don't feel anything and numb.
Ay I was there at one point a few years ago, if you want we can talk about it?
I have expressed this to my therapist(s) so many times.  'You had a good week?'  'Yeah, but.. Idk. It doesn't feel real.'  -explains how I always end up feeling bad again and my happiness is so temporary-  They are always just like.. Believe it! Enjoy it! Ride it out!   im like alright man,,,,,
How do these people not know how to talk to a depressed person by now?  'It gets better.'  'Oh, okay, cool, I guess Ill just be miserable and hate myself and my existence until it does. Here's your $80 fee. Thanks for nothing.'  Maybe its time to try another therapist?
You're a good man. I wish my parents would understand like you do. Hiding things and not talking about them is dangerous. Feeling that you can talk about everything is very important. I wish you the best 
I was his Mom. I would have done anything for him. Anything. I couldn't take away his depression, though.   Thank you for the compliment and the good wishes.   I am so sorry you feel you need to hide your feelings from your parents. Is there anyone in your life who would listen and/or help?
This is why I would like to go away where no one can find me. Then, when I die, no one will know.
Finaly someone said it all I want to do is leave my old live behind travel to the other end of the world and die 
Honestly, there's hardly any people who don't have depression that understand it. And many people believe that there's a way to overcome it. There is, it's just that a lot of people don't understand how hard it is.  That said, I get what you're saying. 
I even feel like those few people who have overcome depression don't understand it anymore, they say a few bullshit lines which are supposedly 'inspirational' but they just make me think they never had it that bad in the first place.
I even feel like those few people who have overcome depression don't understand it anymore, they say a few bullshit lines which are supposedly 'inspirational' but they just make me think they never had it that bad in the first place.
Oh how I hate inspirational bullshit! And then there is 'You're smart enough to get over it yourself. You're not trying enough!' people.   Apparently we are just a bunch of lazy stupid losers /s
Sincerely out of further insight, as someone who closely counsels and works with suicidal adolescents - what would help you to hear? Silence? Understanding? 
I'll tell you. Some damn empathy.
The point is that if you love someone you won't want to hurt them. 
But if they love me, why do they want me to continue suffering like this for as long as I would live naturally, which could be up to 80 years?  It's the same thing, like a catch 22, they'd have to understand that it's just too painful for me to stay alive for decades just for them to not have to suffer a little while.
Death is permanent, acute depression is not.
I've always thought of myself as a proactive problem solver.
Yeah, a lot in recent months. I just want hugs. Something Ive never had.
Sorry to hear, man. If I was there, I'd hug the hell outta you. 
Sorry to hear, man. If I was there, I'd hug the hell outta you. 
that sounds painful...
that sounds painful...
[Hug the hell out of you](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=FHKEANRD5Wk) (**WARNING, ANIME**)
(not so) fun fact : I cry myself to sleep every other night.
I wake up crying every morning
I wake up crying every morning
That's me, too. Night is almost peaceful. You're supposed to be alone at night.   But morning is terrifying. There's a whole day alone ahead of me. I always cry when I wake up. 
At least you get sleep 
I don't sleep because at night when I'm not bothered by anything and can think is the only time I feel somehow comfortable with myself  then sun rises 
I feel extremely lonely everyday, but I'm unable to cry.
Me too. I want to so bad, but it won't happen.
Me too. I want to so bad, but it won't happen.
When I really need to cry, I visit /r/baww. It might not work for you, but give the top posts of all time a shot if you really need it. 
>Any meaning that I've been able to derive out of social relationships don't hold much very for me now, because I've realized people don't actually give a shit.  I've noticed that with me too. Nobody gives a shit about me, really. I'm just a weed addicted deadbeat idiot anyway. Sorry if this is annoying   
It's not annoying at all, man. I know how you feel, depression tends to make us very negatively biased, but  you're so much more than you realize. Hope things get better, and my inbox is always open if you want to talk. 
It's not annoying at all, man. I know how you feel, depression tends to make us very negatively biased, but  you're so much more than you realize. Hope things get better, and my inbox is always open if you want to talk. 
I need something that will motivate me. Those who have a more positive outlook are lying to themselves too. There is positivity bias, where people actively pretend everything is okay and happy happy happy... I feel like the world is suffocating me. 
I always wished there was a sort of 'dating site/app' but not for dating, just pairing up people who share these same feelings so they never feel alone, and so people could make friends with other like minded people who hold more value in the connections between people. Someone get on this and make some big bucks. 'meet your mental illness!' lol :P 
I'd do that. Would you be willing to help?
I'd do that. Would you be willing to help?
I like this.
Normally it's when I'm out in public. At least once a week* I'll tear up in class. 
I do at work. I realize how useless it all truly is. 
I do at work. I realize how useless it all truly is. 
Yup and I'm a bust boy, it really sucks 
I think I am depressed and my parents say 'It's in your head'
'Of course it's in my head. That's why they call it a mental illness'
'Of course it's in my head. That's why they call it a mental illness'
They recently diagnosed it as more than a mental illness because it disrupts systems throughout your body.
I've cried more over the last few months than I can ever remember.  It's not constant, or even everyday, but when I so down and just feel like dying, I cry.
I can relate. The past year has been just awful. So much bad I sometimes wonder if the good will ever be back...
(HUG :) )
Thank you SO much :)
I both love and hate sleep.  I love it because it's like being dead for 8 hours. The world disappears and you get to rest.  I hate it, because once you do fall asleep, the next day comes rushing around all that much sooner. Nothing worse than waking up in the morning and realising that you're still alive, and that you have another 16 hours of reality to deal with.
Ugh, right? Damn Monday mornings.
Ugh, right? Damn Monday mornings.
***Any*** morning.  But, yes, Monday's are often particularly bad.  Sometimes there's about a 5 second period after waking up where everything seems okay. But then reality comes crashing back in, and I realise that I've got to endure another 16 hours of being alive, and all of the psychological benefits of having been asleep are washed away. 
***Any*** morning.  But, yes, Monday's are often particularly bad.  Sometimes there's about a 5 second period after waking up where everything seems okay. But then reality comes crashing back in, and I realise that I've got to endure another 16 hours of being alive, and all of the psychological benefits of having been asleep are washed away. 
And the fear of the next day makes you go to bed later next time and therefor you get less sleep which your body tries to get back at work or school or whatever, thus making the much harder to get through. Yep, lucky im outta that circle. 
Apart from sleep, is that app good for just regular meditation? I just started meditation about a week ago and you're the second person who's recommended it. 
Yup, it's not actually for sleep, you're supposed to sit in a chair and do it. It's just an accidental by-product. :)  
I'm the opposite, I hate having to try to sleep, because it means I'm alone with my thoughts for usually an extended period of time which leads to bad shit and suicidal thoughts 
Are you seeing a doctor?  I get a sleep aid which is also an antidepressant.  It's called rameron.  Knocks me straight to sleep.
Are you seeing a doctor?  I get a sleep aid which is also an antidepressant.  It's called rameron.  Knocks me straight to sleep.
I have no problem falling asleep, but sometimes I wake up in the early morning and freak the shoot out. I take 2 Benadryl (the OTC allergy med) and it's just enough to keep me asleep.
I feel this way all the time.  I also look forward to going to sleep so I can wake up and have coffee. :)
Haha me too.  Coffee in the morning is great.
Haha me too.  Coffee in the morning is great.
Sleep is just a cool time-warp to get you to that morning cup of coffee :)  Hey, if you LOVE coffee in the morning, you have something to make each day worth it.
Sleep is just a cool time-warp to get you to that morning cup of coffee :)  Hey, if you LOVE coffee in the morning, you have something to make each day worth it.
That's a positive way to see things.  Make your reason to live coffee.
Looking forward to being tired? Shit, I'd kill to feel awake most days haha. But yeah, sleep is way too big of a crutch for me, as is my bed.  Note - have been laying in bed now for 4 hours :(
This is exactly what I thought. I don't remember what it's like to not be tired. I'm always tired. And all I want to do is sleep.
Dang, what a refreshing point of view. Kudos to you OP! 
thank you... jst trying to hold on
Oh how I wish this was my line of thought today, but the fight is just so hard. 
Don't give up!
From a person who was severely depressed to the point of debility for 40 years and finally got happy at 50, I want to confirm that no one should give up. Things are always changing. Nothing abides forever. For me, it turns out that it was worth enduring all the darkness for a glimpse of the wonder of life as a happy human in a spectacular universe. 
The dude abides forever though 
It's dumb I agree, but honestly I don't see how anyone can comprehend what depression is like when they never experienced it.  No amount of research will let them truly understand how shitty it is.
I just stare out my window every day, hoping an airplane will come and land on me.
I have ended up feeling really meta about it. I get to die eventually anyway. Why even bother kill myself? After I die, out won't have mattered how much I suffered in life or whether I spared myself any pain by committing suicide.
If you could choose 1 second of pain then death vs 1 hour of pain then death. Why would you ever choose 1 hour? What benefit is it to you suffer more needlessly? Just because you won't remember the suffering doesn't mean you won't have experienced it.
Alright cool, but adjusting one's environment and outside factors isn't an adequate solution for most cases of severe depression. You also seem to be suggesting that cases of 'chemical imbalance' require lifelong medication, which isn't the case. 
I get that I'm a unique case. Everyone is here. I've just found what works for me and identified that it isn't a permanent problem. It won't be here forever.
depression is a permanent problem with temporary fixes
Well put.
What a shame that he forgot his own words :/
Those were not his words. It was what his character was saying in the movie 'The Greatest Dad'.
I like your answer.    People who say that have never had reoccurring depression.
i say it and i have.  you're wrong about that.
Danging EVERYTHING is temporary! Nobody kills himself over any single problem. We're depressed--we're not shooting stupid. It's just... life is a series of consequences. I think it's fair to say that people who are severely depressed don't see a way to untangle themselves from a larger web of mistakes and mishaps, and don't have the strength of will or emotional fortitude to keep working at the knots. But that 'blah blah permanent solution temporary' bullshit is condescending as shoot and people need to stop spouting that shit right goddamned now.
Pretty much my view on the subject.
I know that saying isn't for everybody, but it's helped me when I've been feeling particularly depressed - when it seems like nothing will ever get better, it helps to have a reminder that things have gotten better in the past and probably will get better again.  You never fully stop being depressed, but there are good days and bad days.
Glad it helped you out but it has become such a cliche surrounded with ignorance, it is just hurtful
Glad it helped you out but it has become such a cliche surrounded with ignorance, it is just hurtful
It probably helps that I'm saying it to myself rather than having someone who has never dealt with the issue saying it to me - I can see how that would suck.
*Life* is a temporary problem.
A life you never wanted is a permanent problem. It's not like any of us asked to be born.
A life you never wanted is a permanent problem. It's not like any of us asked to be born.
Well said. I've actually weighed the pros and cons and decided that it would be better for me and people around me if I was never born.
I can't say this to people who say it, because I feel like it is so harsh to say to those who will never understand the people like us who feel so depressed that we would rather be dead than alive.   People who say this have no way of understanding, sympathizing, or comprehending what severely depressed and suicidal people feel. I can't be angry at ignorance, just disappointed.
I really don't mind their lack of knowledge. What I just can't stand is their arrogance. They think that they know everything about your life and that you are wrong.
My response to this is always 'but it's still a solution'
Or as someone said, 'Is a temporary solution better?'
Why? At one point years ago I was extremly suicidal, then a moment of intervention appeared out of nowhere and I slowly recovered from the worst. You WILL recover.
The arrogance is triggering for me.. I don't know why, but it makes me feel like shit. 
That's a lie! My bed stabbed me in the ass with a spring and ripped a hole in my favourite boxers! No friend would do that.
It wants to be friends with benefits.
Totally. Shit genetics is the cause of every problem I have in life. Such terrible genetics deserve to be extinct. Letting it continue to spread through out the planet is a huge sin. Never getting married. Never will. 
Natural selection 
Natural selection 
I say this to myself so much, it really just is natural selection isn’t it?  People like me are literally supposed to be eliminated early on so the normal functioning people can live long happy lives, the jaded crowd simply can’t live like that
The whole thing that started my current bout of severe depression (~2 years into it) was witnessing how easy it was for my best friends and my girlfriend to replace me. 
For me it was when I turned 18 and my father realized he had no legal obligation to even acknowledge I exist. It really hurts to be forgotten. I know how you feel. :(
I can’t even get a job so I am worthless 
I'm in the same position friend. Just had 5 interviews in the last month and had my spirits crushed after each one.  I keep telling myself to keep going and that it's going to get better but I think I've reached my limit.
Same here. I just feel stuck.
Getting unstuck requires you to find what makes only you happy and pursuing your creative side in life. Make time to pursue any hobbies that you are passionate about and focus on you. Message me if you want me to elaborate on what helped me out.
I do this all the time, usually before sleeping.I feel so bad, it's like nobody is ever going to love me and all that I have are my stupid toughts, it hurts so much I just wanna kill myself.
:( I'm sorry. 
:( I'm sorry. 
No need to feel sorry, and I think that since it's not hurting anyone and even if for a brief moment it's making you happy there's nothing wrong about it. :)
Same. I'm only kept alive by fake internet points
That's the depressing world we live in now. Higher standards than my reasons for living though (facebook and memes).
That's the depressing world we live in now. Higher standards than my reasons for living though (facebook and memes).
facebook and memes, man. They've replaced kisses from girls and laughs/hugs from friends. Dang.
I do that all the time, ever since high school.  Recently I've been going as far as going through wedding preparation pictures and dresses, or even houses. I feel so pathetic.
I usually do that with Pinterest, making up my fantasy life
I usually do that with Pinterest, making up my fantasy life
Just last night I made a new Pinterest folder for inspiration for 'our house' lol
Just last night I made a new Pinterest folder for inspiration for 'our house' lol
lol I have way too many pins for house Inspiration, probably over 2000 
i daydream all the time... i'm 23 and i'm stuck in a mind of a 17 year old self, i haven't progressed at all, while my friends moved on to better things years ago, have steady jobs, been in and out relationships, always being social and shit...   i realized that as i get older it's harder to connect to people because they are SO. OUT. OF. MY. LEAGUE. it's painful to be 20 steps behind everyone in everything
I'm nearly forty...be scared you don't stay stuck till now, gets harder every year. 
I can so, so relate to this.  Someone who loves in my mind that truly loves me. Maybe my expectations are too high, or maybe I'm too messed up, but I'm usually disappointed by real life relations.
It's worse when I'm projecting my fantasies on someone who's real. I feel like I'm dehumanizing them. I'm just using them as the object of my affection. 
It's worse when I'm projecting my fantasies on someone who's real. I feel like I'm dehumanizing them. I'm just using them as the object of my affection. 
oh dang, i feel you, i just tell myself to shut up when i start thinking the weird stuff
oh dang, i feel you, i just tell myself to shut up when i start thinking the weird stuff
I get afraid that the person I'm fantasizing about will secretly catch me fantasizing and think I'm weird.
I'm hesitant to say this but I think it's an okay thing to do. Maybe it is embarrassing but it doesn't hurt anyone.  I've watched a lot of people grow up while I didn't and, well, a lot of them aren't that great of people either.
Thanks. You're probably right. 
Thanks. You're probably right. 
You're welcome.
What I don't understand is how do adults do so many things. They have a career(which itself can be so demanding and requires effort), have a SO, maybe have kids, socialize, have hobbies etc.   Like how do they manage all of that? I can barely manage doing the daily chores.
The trouble is depression is an exhausting illness,evrything that goes with it anxiety,agitation,insomnia,hypersomnia,anger,irritability.When we are in a depressive episode our stress hormones that are there to just act quickly then switch off like in hunter-gatherer times,they are going 24/7 its like a tightly wound coil,so it is utterly shattering.A lot of people do not understand and will never unless they go through it.
The trouble is depression is an exhausting illness,evrything that goes with it anxiety,agitation,insomnia,hypersomnia,anger,irritability.When we are in a depressive episode our stress hormones that are there to just act quickly then switch off like in hunter-gatherer times,they are going 24/7 its like a tightly wound coil,so it is utterly shattering.A lot of people do not understand and will never unless they go through it.
you've described it so clearly here. this is what my life feels like at the moment and i was having a really hard time understanding it.
you've described it so clearly here. this is what my life feels like at the moment and i was having a really hard time understanding it.
I am sorry to hear that,i just hope things get better for all of us on here.Take care
Hey, if it makes us happy... why not? I'm starting to think that happiness 'in the moment' is all that matters. If it's not real, who cares? We're happy.
I think the problem is with how we define happy. Feeling simply 'okay' or 'here' is just as good as 'happy.'    Continuing maladaptive habits causes more unhappiness and can hinder recovery, so I wouldn't say it's okay to do so. Fantasizing is a way of escaping the world (and our problems), but only temporarily. To recover, one needs to reconnect with the world outside their head. And that world is much less lonely, even in an empty room.
I think the problem is with how we define happy. Feeling simply 'okay' or 'here' is just as good as 'happy.'    Continuing maladaptive habits causes more unhappiness and can hinder recovery, so I wouldn't say it's okay to do so. Fantasizing is a way of escaping the world (and our problems), but only temporarily. To recover, one needs to reconnect with the world outside their head. And that world is much less lonely, even in an empty room.
I agree that it can hinder recovery. I feel like some people are so scarred that the maladaptive habits are needed until they (I'll personalize; until I) am okay enough to deal with and accept a harsh reality. I actually didn't even realize that maladaptive daydreaming was a thing until recently. I get it. I do it. I have since I was a child.
Everynight before sleeping,I know how pathetic that is, but I cant stop, it's all I can do.. shoot
It's ok. We're all friends here. 
> You survived.  Not an accomplishment. Any organism's natural instinct is to survive.
It's surprisingly hard to die. I'd say living is the worst - not just surviving and not just dying, but living an actual life with stakes and people that depend on you. That's the scariest and bravest of all. 
'I don't feel able to express myself', your writing contradicts that! You express yourself very eloquently.  I agree, if someone fell in love with you right now you wouldn't believe it because I don't think anyone could love you right now. Not, as I said, until you start loving yourself.  It's great that you have had experience of being yourself without judgement, that's when we feel good and excel!  You said you see many good qualities when you can be yourself, I'm wondering what these are? 
I don't know. I like how I can express myself - like you said. I like that I have a good sense of humor and can draw. 
Thank you...I really needed this.   I just made an appointment with a new therapist, its been a few years.   I recently was so self concious that people didny like me, i lied to someone about what someone said to me....cause I wanted to feel wanted. It made me feel crazy.  Ive been really depressed recently, lashing out, and now apparently embellishing my life with lies. Heres to breaking the cycle 
> now apparently embellishing my life with lies.   Gosh, this. I lie a lot. I mean, not nearly as much (or extravagantly) as I used to when I was younger, but enough. They're usually little lies, made so that others won't think I'm as pathetic as I really am, but they shame me a great deal and I hate that I feel the need to resort to them. I hate being dishonest, and I hate fearing that one day someone is going to catch on.
I needed this. Thanks. 
Np, its literally just chemical imbalances making you doubt yourself.  Keep strong fam and don't let them win!
Yep same here. I fantasize about getting cancer or having a meteorite crush my skull.
> .. I fantasize about getting cancer ..  This. So much this.
> .. I fantasize about getting cancer ..  This. So much this.
It would be blessing really. A chance to go out without hurting those you love, a chance to say good bye and a chance to tell the people who didn't know you loved them that you did. And soon the pain is gone.  Its tragic that people who actually enjoy living are struck down by cancer and people like us who would be willing to take it are not. 
It would be blessing really. A chance to go out without hurting those you love, a chance to say good bye and a chance to tell the people who didn't know you loved them that you did. And soon the pain is gone.  Its tragic that people who actually enjoy living are struck down by cancer and people like us who would be willing to take it are not. 
As someone living with cancer, I wouldn't wish for it. You *do* hurt the ones you love; not deliberately, of course, but their pain watching you suffer is (to me) worse than any physical discomfort you experience. It's not Ali McGraw in Love Story; it's a long, slow, drugged-up disappearance of your personality.
Yep same here. I fantasize about getting cancer or having a meteorite crush my skull.
Let's go to Russia together, then. :)
This. I've had the same thing and am having it right now too. Sometimes life is hard and it's easy to get caught in the loop where you don't think things will get better so you only see the dark side. But things do get better and will be easier and happier for you. Talking to people helps and people want to help others.   Hang in there, you are not alone. Feel free to drop me a mail if you need someone to talk to. 
Likewise, I'm here to listen as well. I appreciate the support!
> People in your life care about you  Mine don't. My family doesn't, considers me a bother and a nuisance.
Find new people. There are good people out there. 
http://i.imgur.com/GoegP.jpg  I saw this recently on here and saved it. It seems to explain my thought process, and hopefully yours.
I feel as if I am at a dead\ end and so I am finished.\ All spiritual facts I realize\ are true but I never escape\ the feeling of being closed in\ and the sordidness of self,\ the futility of all that I\ have seen and done and said.\ Maybe if I continued things\ would please me more but now\ I have no hope and I am tired.\  -Allen Ginsberg, A Ghost May Come Pt. 2, New York, Early 1952
Thanks everyone for commenting, it's nice to know that as much as this sucks there are people to talk to here. 
Hey, if you ever need someone to just talk to my inbox is always open, honest. I didn't meant to turn your post into a personal soapbox, my apologies. Hang in there.
Yep, me too.  Nothing in life makes me happy.  I have an excellent job, a family that loves me, etc. etc.   There's no reason why I should not love life but I don't.  I don't enjoy it.  I want to die.  I really am not scared of death at all.
Same boat. Great life, but I'm not happy. I just want to disappear.  
it boggles my mind that people believe they can do whatever they want as long as it is allowed by the laws of physics. Is it so hard to get that we are robots and our software has real limitations?
The thing is though, I feel like most people believe that they can do anything if they set their mind to it. Maybe they can. Then they meet someone who says they can't and they just chop it up to that person being lazy or something. They don't think that some people just don't have the same options as them. 
Thank you so much for this. I get so frustrated when trying to explain this to my friends. They try to be supportive, but it often makes me feel shittier than I already do. I'm gonna show them this and hope that they understand better. 
No problem friend, I'll be very glad if my take on an explanation helps at least one person understand a bit better. 
Thanks for this. This is a good thing for people with depressed friends to read.  Also, hugs go a long way. It's nice to feel that another person is literally supporting you, especially when your equipment is failing underwater and you aren't sure you're gonna make it.
HUGS. **YES.** Physical contact (for those who are receptive to it) means so much me as someone with depression that I can't even begin to express the joy I feel when someone randomly gives me a hug. It's so comforting.
thank you so much for saying this ;_;
<3 No worries. My inbox is always open.
Now if someone could describe to me what it feels like to be happy/not-depressed/normal. I cannot recall when last or if I felt like that and I am curious how it feels not to carry a mass of pain in yourself.
I can do it. Think of the worst headache you've ever had. Now realize right now your head probably doesn't hurt. But you didn't even realize it, you weren't thinking about headaches. It's like this. When you're depressed you can't think of anything else. It lies to you and weighs on you every second.   Please hang on and get through it, because when you're out if it you don't even think about it.
Reading these depression related posts for days now. Feels good. As someone going through this,all I can say people like you make Reddit Special ! Wish I could give you gold.But anyways,thanks !
I appreciate the sentiment anyway, thanks a ton! I'm glad you found my post useful. Hang in there.
Ask them over or out for coffee. Start saying yes, no matter how hard it is for you. Sometimes, you really have to **force yourself** to get out. Easier said than done, yep. Do it. 
I say shoot that. Forcing myself rarely worked and when it did, I felt like shit while I was out. /myexperience
Have you received any help for your depression?
Yep, only in recent times but I'm on my way ;)
The worst part is waking up and all your sad thoughts come back rushing over you. It's that paralyzing feeling that I hate. It just tells me that it's going to be another waste of a day.
Oh man, that feeling of peace for just 2 or 3 seconds after waking up... then it all floods back. It's even feels kind of meta for me right now: 'shit, that's right.. I have to be me again today'. Anyone else get that? 
Oh man, that feeling of peace for just 2 or 3 seconds after waking up... then it all floods back. It's even feels kind of meta for me right now: 'shit, that's right.. I have to be me again today'. Anyone else get that? 
All the time. But sometimes when I’m lucky, I wake up disoriented and forget that I’m “me” and feel oddly at peace for a few minutes. Happened to me only twice after weird dreams. It was kind of beautiful. 
I have a job and mortgage. I just leave my job at 4:30 and drink and go to bed early and wake up and go to work. 
happy cake day <3
I feel this way all the time. I also think about myself in third person a lot, like if I was someone else, I would probably be concerned about myself, but it’s either no one really notices or cares, or someone does and it’s really tiring to have to  explain yourself  to other  people.   I hope you can pick yourself up. 
I do the 3rd person thing too. I wonder to myself, sometimes aloud, how I let myself get so far gone. Weirdly I'll even laugh at myself for how badly I've shooted my life up. Gallows humor I guess. That moment of levity last about 15 seconds before the depression kicks back in. Good times. 
I feel this a lot.  However, if I skip anymore I will be penalized so that is enough to push me out of bed for now.
I basically go to college for the same reason. Aldo the people in my class gossip a lot and that makes me feel bad.  Pd: here in Spain in college you have to go Minimum x hours to class
Spoke to a counsellor last week for the first time and my answers always went on tangents and I didn't even end up answering the questions. I understand 
SAME. I just can't. It feels like sometimes I physically have something or someone inside of me making me stay negative so they can thrive off of me and that negativity I produce.
Yes, when it seems like there are so many dark thoughts and problems it can be difficult to organize them. And actually speaking about them can be vert emotionally intense. You could try writing down your feelings and issues when you are alone and then using that as a reference when you talk to someone about it. A journal may also help you to sort through your thoughts since you can write literally anything you want in there.
I wish I had motivation to do that. I used to write in a journal every day as a kid but now...I find it hard to remain consistent on anything because it seems so mundane, repetitive, and pointless.
I have some major trust issues, and find it really hard to be honest about what I'm feeling, so I just lock myself up alone in my room and talk to no one about it.
It's good you came here,People who feel the same will seek you out and you can talk.
People always expect the 'I'm fine.'  So I throw them off with the truth.  *'I'm doing terrible, how are you?'*
I'd love to do that, but it'd lead to more questions and explanations and judgement that I don't have the balls to face.
I'd love to do that, but it'd lead to more questions and explanations and judgement that I don't have the balls to face.
Especially when dealing with people who truly don't understand.
Especially when dealing with people who truly don't understand.
A good friend constantly uses 'depressed' and 'bummed out/stressed' interchangeably, and I'm afraid he won't take it seriously. 
Who gives a shoot
Me 
I did that. Lost friends. Many friends. I don't do that anymore.
then they weren't friends
then they weren't friends
They were. I just didn't tell them anything. I shooted up, not them.  Also, I kind of didn't care too much.
I've been called an emotionless robot. But that was by the one person who constantly hurt me the most. The one I should have been able to lean on the hardest. I had to wear the mask and hide my depression because I was hurt worse when I showed it.
I get this from my parents often. Why aren't you showing emotion?! Because when I do, you make it ten times worse by talking about how much I'M hurting YOU. 
I was just explaining how I feel to someone right now. This is even better then everything I could think of. Between ops post and this poem, It's exactly how I feel right now. How I felt today. Probably how I'll feel tomorrow.
I am glad you can relate! It makes me feel less alone, hopefully it helped you too! maybe ill post a few more of my poems and maybe i can help someone feel less alone in the world and that we may be sick but thats okay. 
I hate it, it's boring, cold,  minty,  I don't know. .. I'd just rather not.  But I also have an intense fear of dentists, I've had to be strapped down every visit, so I force myself to brush.  
I dislike mint, so I use kids toothpaste that comes in yummy flavors.
What I did is buy an electric tooth brush I had fun. That was my first step to good hygiene 
I have an electric toothbrush and a sonic one but both make the tip of my nose itch : (
It feels amazing doesn't it? You don't have to do this but I try to do it and it helps me a lot. Take a shower every day and get ready to go somewhere even if you don't have anywhere to be, then try to go outside. Preferably when the sun is shining and just enjoy the moment. In laymens terms, TREAT YOSELF.
Exactly this. If I stay in pajamas and don't shower I won't leave my room all day.   But, if I pretend I'm going somewhere and get dressed I find myself more motivated. 
Go you, keep it up! Next step - seriously - go to a good hairdresser and get a trendy haircut, somehow that makes a ton of a difference.
I'm set to get a haircut in a few days actually!
I'm set to get a haircut in a few days actually!
See you're ahead of me there. I really need to get a haircut but have been putting it off. You're on a roll!
See you're ahead of me there. I really need to get a haircut but have been putting it off. You're on a roll!
I've been putting my haircut off since October.
Definitely get this as well. I absolutely love when there are rain clouds out and the smell of the rain as it comes down. I really enjoy gloomy weather for your exact reason though
Its like I am the 'opposite' as soon as it's crappy out (which is never when you live where I live) Im up doing laundry and getting all sorts of things done. Maybe I should get some super dark sunglasses and wear them 24/7
Its like I am the 'opposite' as soon as it's crappy out (which is never when you live where I live) Im up doing laundry and getting all sorts of things done. Maybe I should get some super dark sunglasses and wear them 24/7
Or move to Alaska.. 9 months of darkness. Haha
I love rain and as someone else said, thunderstorms. The smell outside when it's raining or have rained a lot, everything feels so fresh. Not to mention that usually there's not a lot of people around, so you can just take a walk in the rain on the suburban streets with not a person in sight, it's a great experience. The sound of rain is wonderfully relaxing aswell. Can you tell how much I love it <.<?
That smell is called petrichor. 
I live in New York state so soon it will be cold and dead outside. Can't wait.
I am so jealous. At least it has stayed gray here today. For once!
It’s okay to cry, crying helps. There’s no reason to feel bad okay? I hope the rest of your day goes well :)
THANKS 💖
Same. It just makes you feel lighter for some reason
I feel so heavy, crying helps. Sometimes I cry for hours, almost everyday. Before going to bed. In the middle of the night, I just sit by the window and cry. Somedays, I'd go to bed early, just so I could cry for the rest of the night. During the day, I just shut my door and cry while looking at the ceiling.
I feel so heavy, crying helps. Sometimes I cry for hours, almost everyday. Before going to bed. In the middle of the night, I just sit by the window and cry. Somedays, I'd go to bed early, just so I could cry for the rest of the night. During the day, I just shut my door and cry while looking at the ceiling.
>In the middle of the night, I just sit by the window and cry.  I do this too. My room has a huge window, so I can sit by it and watch the rest of the world go on, all glimmering lights and tiny cars. It makes me cry a lot.
Crying is when the soul decides to jerk off. 
This made me laugh through my tears, thank you.
If you feel like it, do it, it it might help you feel a bit better. Have a great rest of your day alright? (:
Thank you so much :) 💖
Crying can be good. To me, the worst is when you're so numb that you can't cry.
Reached that point a long time ago. Sometimes I want nothing more than to just shrivel up into a ball and cry like a baby because I know it will make me feel better. I've tried and I've tried but I just can't anymore. Sigh...
I pulled my car to the side of the road Monday night so I could have a good cry.  I have the day off today, just woke up, and am already crying.  It's not daily for me, but definitely multiple times a week.  I usually feel better after.  
I give you a hug! Yeah, feels way better after crying. It’s good that you made the moment by pulling your car on the side for that to happen :) Now I see that is very important to cry. 
Good on you for pulling over. I was bawling my eyes out in the freeway and couldn't stop, it was nearly impossible to see, or think. It went well but I often think of how dangerous that was. When I parked at home I just sat there behind the wheel crying for a long time before I could go inside.
I started crying a few hours ago while driving on a busy road and had to blink rapidly for a while so it would go away. I'm fortunate they were very controllable tears and they passed quickly. 
I cry often. It's as if my chest gets so heavy and tight and then once I cry, I can breathe again. 
Yeah, exactly. It's like this sort of pressure that builds up inside and once it reaches its limit, you cry and suddenly it's not quite as bad anymore.  Mostly, anyway.
https://vocaroo.com/i/s1UOr97KcqFK
You have the most soothing voice , my good friend.
I just heard your message. I can’t believe all the support I’m receiving. Honestly, thank you so much.  I also think that is not well seen by society or this world we are living now, so it’s nice to know that there are people that believe crying it’s a good thing to do. I feel ashamed of it lately. Thanks for real!
Embracing our weaknesses are the only way to become strong.
It's more commom than we think. I think I've ran into people crying in the bathroom at all my jobs. Sometimes crying can really help and after, you may not feel better but at least you let out that strong emotion. I hope you are feeling better now. <3
I am 💖 thank you so much!
I cried today too.. I hope you're feeling better! 
I am! In big part thanks to all you unknowns that cheered me up a lot 💖 I hope you’re feeling better too, crying it’s a great thing. 
I went to my garage earlier today and had an ugly, screaming cry fest with rocking and  all and then I took an amazing nap. Sometimes we just need to cry to feel something. Hugs to you. 
I just had woke up from an extreme supreme meltdown in my bathroom, cried my eyes out, came to my room to watch OUAT and somehow fell asleep. I agree. Sleep after a tearfest is the best kind of sleep.
This is why I hate working customer service.   **customer** How are you?   **me** ~~Well, my whole life feels like it's falling apart, I'm doing everything in my power not to be crying in a ball on the floor right now, and I can't go home or I'll get fired from this dead-end job. So I'd say pretty shooting bad!~~ I'm doing well, how are you?
I feel like if reddit scriptwriting were a thing, you'd be a mod
Yea, you say 'Fine! How are you?' And deflect the questions and start asking the other person question after question. Some people say I'm attentive and a good listener; I actually hate talking about myself for fear of one day bursting out with 'I hate my life and I feel so empty and hollow nothing makes me happy'.   .... Sorry. 
This actually sounds like a really good way to handle it though.
If a coworker asks that, my polite response is, 'I'm here,' which is basically, 'I'm not bad enough to have called in but I feel awful 95% of the time, so...'  I also occasionally respond with, 'I've slept 4 hours in the last three days. I'm exhausted.'
This reminds of a post where someone said that if they say they're great, they're just good. If they say they're good, they're just alright. If they say they're alright, however, they're not doing too well  Edit: spelling
This reminds of a post where someone said that if they say they're great, they're just good. If they say they're good, they're just alright. If they say they're alright, however, they're not doing too well  Edit: spelling
'Things could be worse.' = 'I'm miserable, but at least I don't have an animal biting my arm off right now.'
That's the thing.   I usually know when something is up so I ask 'Hey, are you doing alright?' With as much sincerity as possible so they can give a real answer.  I want to help, I'm not gonna bullshit you with smalltalk, you know?
Yeah, I appreciate people like that.
I work at a busy corporate gas station. 2000 times a week i'm forced to answer this question. I'm dead inside. 
'I'm dead inside' would be a more memorable answer
I straight up told my therapist that I hate that question. I typically answer her with 'well, I'm alive?'
This is almost exactly my standard response. When asked, I reply 'alive' which to people who haven't encountered it seems to throw them for a loop. The most common response is 'well it's better than the alternative' to which I invariably reply that I could, in fact, be undead, then follow that up with a short list of the undead with an int and wis score out of the monster manual. By this time they tend to be thoroughly confused, and I can make my escape.
deleted  ^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^0.0356  [^^^What ^^^is ^^^this?](https://pastebin.com/FcrFs94k/11034)
It sucks when it feels like that's the only/best option sometimes. I'm sorry that you're in so much pain :(
Oh everyone has cancer these days.  Here's a better name for cancer: *life*.  SCREW these people. Depression =/= unfortunate life events. Just shoot off everyone who thinks they know better than the millions of people who struggle through each day. Mental illness is just that - an illness.  These misinformed douchebags should keep their harmful opinions to themselves.  
exactly
ya i've noticed that it has become a trend on social media to pretend you are depressed or suicidal. I'm not sure if it's to seem edgy or unique but it really makes it look like a joke to people who actually have problems
Do you mean the meme pages? I just like them because it's one of the few things I still find funny
Do you mean the meme pages? I just like them because it's one of the few things I still find funny
r/meirl  r/TooMeIrlForMeIrl
You can also attribute that attitude to social conservatism -- Errybody gets depressed! Be happy! Stop complaining! Pull yourself up by your boot straps etc.   I think it's more the fact the word 'depression' has lost its intended meaning and is no longer clinically relevant, it's now  glamorous to be 'depressed' when in reality that couldn't be farther from the truth.
Agreed. Usually, I correct people when they say that someone was a bit 'depressed' because of some specific event or subject, saying 'you mean sad, depression is actually something much more serious' (and I probably should add that it's a disease).
Millenials amirite?  /s  This arguement is usually by people who lack empathy. Depression is a horrible thing i would wish no one would suffer from.  I have a strict diet  Workout  Take vitamin d and zinc supplements a long with fish oil   I tkae wellbutrim and klonipin  I see a counsellor twice a month and a psychiatrist 4 times a year.  A person without depression wouldn't need all that to live a normal life.
EXACTLY. I've given up drugs, started going to the gym 4 times a week, tremendously cleaned up my diet, & I still struggle to find the motivation to even get out of bed most mornings. People act like I choose to be this way, but in reality I am really trying to be better.
This comment makes me want to stick my head in a blender. I've seen so many comments of this same nasty flavor and I get pissed off by every one of them.  'Teenage depression is a growing problem? MORE LIKE THIS GENERATION IS JUST A BUNCH OF PUSSIES!!' 
Oh the good old millenial hate.  I encountered this in college a decade ago in that shithole known as the comment section on Yahoo comments.  That's when I truly wish I could infect everyone with the reality I know.  Or just fling the planet into the sun, because nothing's really changed in these ten years.
Oh the good old millenial hate.  I encountered this in college a decade ago in that shithole known as the comment section on Yahoo comments.  That's when I truly wish I could infect everyone with the reality I know.  Or just fling the planet into the sun, because nothing's really changed in these ten years.
Hell, sometimes I even get the millennial hate in person. Just a few days ago my father was talking about how he doesn't get this generation and 'doesn't know what went wrong'. 
Hell, sometimes I even get the millennial hate in person. Just a few days ago my father was talking about how he doesn't get this generation and 'doesn't know what went wrong'. 
The irony is, THEY went wrong.  If not the part where they tanked the economy and lived in a different society than us... then the part where they raised us.  And their parents said the same thing, but they probably thought they wouldn't become their parents.
So, um, how it ended for you both?
Not well. It ended up being a pretty toxic (for both of us) 'on again, off again' co-dependent relationship for several years.  Once I landed in the hospital and actually got some help for my depression and anxiety. We both kind of realized that we were just plain bad for each other and called it off once and for all.  It worked out ok, though. She ended up introducing me to my wife.
'Depression is life, everyone has blue days, get over it.  Stop being a pussy.  There's nothing to worry about.  It'll get better.  It's not so bad, there are starving children in Africa.'  One is more openly condescending, but they kind of stem from the same font of denial.
I really dislike the comparison to something like starving people in Africa. My mother says that a lot And it's all relative
Just about everyone experiences depression but not everyone HAS depression. Depression and anxiety are really hard for people that have severe symptoms because everyone experiences depression and anxiety so they think that you're overreacting because they dealt with it just fine. Disorders with positive symptoms (schizophrenia, bipolar, etc) people cannot grasp because they never experience anything like that. 
I'm bipolar and I certainly experience depression. I might suffer it in a different way I might cycle between depression and mania but when I have depression I still feel it.
I've found that everybody has at least 1 period of depression in their life. This is ABSOLUTELY normal. What is abnormal (and I use that word as in, your brain is experiencing something it's not supposed to) is when your like that for long periods of time. 
For some this periods seems to be longer than their lifespan.
The criteria for something being a disorder (a real illness) is whether it interferes with your life and functioning.  Your life sucks, but you function? Great, you don't have depression. Your life sucks and you don't function? You have depression, you need to get some help, take some meds, figure out a way to function. Its a daily struggle, and struggle often comes with recoil, but you gotta attack somehow
But what is functioning? I put on my brave face for 8 hours of the life I have outside of my house each day but I have panic attacks when I get home. I lie awake at night thinking about how unimportant I am to the world, and how I will never make a difference. I think about how I can hardly talk to people. Is that functioning? 
But what is functioning? I put on my brave face for 8 hours of the life I have outside of my house each day but I have panic attacks when I get home. I lie awake at night thinking about how unimportant I am to the world, and how I will never make a difference. I think about how I can hardly talk to people. Is that functioning? 
No, its not. Get help.  It shouldn't be a chore to live your life. A healthy human, even a african rural mother of five children, has this inherent desire to live life, to fight for survival. Even people in Auschwitz didn't try to kill themselves, they tried to live. If you don't have this desire to live, then you gotta get help, try some meds or something. Everyone in the world is one Prozac or Zoloft, and I'm personally on Effexor. 
I feel like there is an element of truth to that. I don't want to pull numbers out of my ass or anything, but it seems like the slight majority of adults I interact with are terribly unhappy and may be coping with untreated clinical depression. Whether they realize that's what they have or not. 
Also, depression have been normalized the last years. People throw that word around like it has no meaning. A lot of that happens in memes about depression and suicide floating around reddit and facebook. Here are some examples of what I mean: [1](https://i.redd.it/2lk8z934jf4y.jpg), [2](https://i.redd.it/w9nq1c2cpoxx.png), [3](https://i.reddituploads.com/4682c7c1d2c34c4bb8776397cc24e756?fit=max&h=1536&w=1536&s=81b044ac7b991a2a4499265e44ac313c), [4](http://imgur.com/jEuCA7O). Well, you get the point. While some of them can be funny, they still throw it around like it's meaningless.  Really makes it harder for people that are actually suffering from it.
Also, depression have been normalized the last years. People throw that word around like it has no meaning. A lot of that happens in memes about depression and suicide floating around reddit and facebook. Here are some examples of what I mean: [1](https://i.redd.it/2lk8z934jf4y.jpg), [2](https://i.redd.it/w9nq1c2cpoxx.png), [3](https://i.reddituploads.com/4682c7c1d2c34c4bb8776397cc24e756?fit=max&h=1536&w=1536&s=81b044ac7b991a2a4499265e44ac313c), [4](http://imgur.com/jEuCA7O). Well, you get the point. While some of them can be funny, they still throw it around like it's meaningless.  Really makes it harder for people that are actually suffering from it.
>Really makes it harder for people that are actually suffering from it.  I have to disagree. In general, I don't think that people with a healthy outlook on life post those things. People who are suffering and trying to cope with humor do. 
Ehhhh... they correlate. To me, it seems that the one who truly realises life is the on who's depressed; life has nothing much else to offer. To me, it's the ones that are oblivious to life's true... intention? End goal? Meaning? Either way, the oblivious ones are the ones who aren't depressed. However, people don't agree with me, and that seems fine.
They say the number one cause for atheism is education. So I suppose perhaps we all can be affected by depression, but perhaps those ignorant enough to the meaning of life will also be unable to recognize the absence of life. Hence the obesity epidemic, such physical deterioration can certainly and almost always leads to mental deterioration alike.  I agree with you though. 
I mean, many doctor these are diagnosing people wrongly with depressions to get the sweet sweet medication and therapy money, but depression isn't life. A normal life would be one of emotional stability, and when you just randomly look outta the window and think about how much you hate yourself is everything but emotionally stable. 
Got a source on that? Because it sounds like crazy conspiracy theory talk to me.
OkCodependency
I laughed way too hard at this.
Replace 'dating' with 'friend making' and I think the idea would be solid. Lots of the people here are so kind despite suffering from depression. I'd kill to have such a friend IRL.
Ive posted the idea before!!! How do wr make it happen? We beed a depressed app developper haha.
Ive posted the idea before!!! How do wr make it happen? We beed a depressed app developper haha.
i am one... and wouldn't know how to do that  *depression intensifies*
e-Misery
**P**lenty **o**f **F**ailures?
**P**lenty **o**f **F**ailures?
that's really catchy and funny.
That's usually how most of my dates go anyway
If I ever went on one I'd imagine it going the same.
I would be worried some people would take advantage of depressed people. But other then that it kinda makes sense actualy. 
That was my first thought :( macabre 
Ehhh dating someone who is depressed while you are also depressed isn't  super great....   while it's  nice that they can understand what you're  going through,  sometimes you both end up having lows at the same time, and end up feeling shittier because you can't really support your partner,  and they can't really support you.
I think it depends person to person, I ended up marrying someone with MDD just like I have and it really helps they know what it's like.  
I think it depends person to person, I ended up marrying someone with MDD just like I have and it really helps they know what it's like.  
That's very true. My partner and I both live with depression,  and it can be nice to have someone there who actually *understands,*  without you having to say anything.
That's the reality I suppose... I was fantasising about understanding each other and creating a warm, comfortable space for each other to be depressed in, alone together. Being able to feel each others nothingness.
Well,  it's definitely possible to make it work... my current partner and I  both live with depression.  Sometimes it's  nice  because we both understand what it's like,  and I know he isn't going to tell me to 'just snap out of it'  or to 'try smiling more.' It just sucks when we both end up in a low at the same time,  because we just can't  support each other,  and it can put a strain on the relationship. 
If you read between the lines hard enough, they're all depressed dating sites...
My relative failure on dating sites makes me depressed
I'm imagining a website where depressed people go during a ' energy spike ' and are super charming for a day or two then the conversation takes a break for a few weeks until the next spike comes.   ' so, i'm sorry i disappeared but i went into hibernation. How do you deal with bedsore by the way? '
The site could have a pause button, where no message is sent but the user's status is set to 'Paused: This means no messages out but don't take it personally'. Although again it's easier said than done for practical reasons. 
The site could have a pause button, where no message is sent but the user's status is set to 'Paused: This means no messages out but don't take it personally'. Although again it's easier said than done for practical reasons. 
good thinking
I found a dating site for ppl with social anxiety. No one msgs each other and few ppl have a profile pic >.<
What's the name?
My girlfriend tries so so so hard to understand but I know she just can't, and people who have never had it severely enough to affect your daily live will never will. I am glad you're getting better also! That is awesome.  I have severe anxiety and I get super depressed sometimes. It just sucks so bad but I'm going to a psychiatrist on Monday to start and get help! I'm just very scared.
You can do it! I remember my first encounter with the dark arts of psychiatric medication. I was scared, ashamed for being a loony, and incredibly suspicious that the meds would change me into someone I wasn't.   Still, I'm glad I did it. It's not a magic fix, but finding a good medicine makes things a heck of a lot easier.
You can do it! I remember my first encounter with the dark arts of psychiatric medication. I was scared, ashamed for being a loony, and incredibly suspicious that the meds would change me into someone I wasn't.   Still, I'm glad I did it. It's not a magic fix, but finding a good medicine makes things a heck of a lot easier.
I'm on Lexapro and Xanax right now, but obviously they're not working if I'm having daily anxiety still, and it's been two years, lol.
Yup I feel the same. Tried dating non-depressed girls and they just don't get it. Every time I got bad she'd just accuse me of making it up (which obviously made it better). 
What? Distrust, shame and condemnation didn't cheer you up? Huh. That usually works for me. (Read: *cries* I know that feel.)
What? Distrust, shame and condemnation didn't cheer you up? Huh. That usually works for me. (Read: *cries* I know that feel.)
I know _right_? Dang me for trusting :\^)
It would be unnecessary for women because they can have easily someone on a regular dating site if they want too.  People would use it to get easy targets and empty their balls with a girl who has no self esteem. There would be a lot of abuse.  The majority of the relationships would benefit disastrous and unhealthy. 
'someone on a regular dating site'. Yeah, one who probably doesn't understand them. It's not just about finding someone who will put up with you being depressed. Also, women don't have it as great as you think. Sure, I could shoot the guys who are old enough to be my grandfather that message me, but do I want to?
I want basically a dating site for the mentally ill but like... for finding friends. Can we have that?
That would be a good idea tbh.
'Hmu if you like hiking, canoeing, camping, rick climbing, clubbing or just chilling with friends on a Friday night XD'  ...guess I'll just move on to the next one then lol
Hi, I'm Rick! 
Bad idea. You'll just end up deeper in the hole you're already in. Also, depression is used so casually these days most people on there would be talking about breakups and not getting into the college of their choice.
Yeah I know it's not a good idea, more of a fantasy really with a whole series of events laid out in my mind, ending with cuddles and building each other up. The reality would be tears and shitty feelings all round.
I like your big brother / sister idea, but I think it would be important that the Big Brother Big Sister / accountability partner would have to be someone who has had depression in the past so that they are more understanding. 
That makes sense. Depression has been a constant companion for so long, I think I forget that there are people for whom it is not a problem. 
Just go to r/me_irl   /s
You can probably take out the /s
I know people who identify their depression as kind of a fog that has displaced their 'old' self.  But I don't know who I am if not depressed. Someone telling me not to be negative feels like they're saying not to be me. And of course I don't want to be me, I don't want to be depressed. But I am.
>I know people who identify their depression as kind of a fog that has displaced their 'old' self.  This is exactly what I'm going through. It's comforting in a way to see someone else put it like that  
Honestly, I want to be hit by a car or have some kind of random accident that either causes me great pain or kills me as justification for my wrongs and to end my numbness. I too can't commit suicide, instead I fantasize of heroically sacrificing myself for others somehow whether saving someone or something along those lines. I'm basically waiting for the chance to end my life to save another.
This. This right here. If I go out before I die of old age, I at least want to know my suffering in my life can help somebody else be happy and satisfied with their life.
This. This right here. If I go out before I die of old age, I at least want to know my suffering in my life can help somebody else be happy and satisfied with their life.
'I want to **DIE**. But, in such a way that leaves the gentlest waves of pain possible.'
I think that the fact that someone you don't know saved you is evidence that your life is worth something. If a stranger would pull you back from the edge, imagine what someone in your life would do for you. Never forget how strong you are and how much you are loved.  I am sure you are doing the best that you can. 
The best you can is good enough.
Wow that's awesome somebody pulled you back. Maybe try to return a kind gesture to somebody else? Hopefully it doesn't have to be saving someone from suicide. Stay strong ✊ 
At the time I was so disoriented that I wasn't able to function properly. Looking back, I should've thanked the guy. Makes me hang on a little tighter. Thank you.
At the time I was so disoriented that I wasn't able to function properly. Looking back, I should've thanked the guy. Makes me hang on a little tighter. Thank you.
Grip with all of your might....  The sun WILL rise. It always does. 
I wish you the best. 
Thank you
No, it's ok to post something positive. It gives me hope that good things have happened to others like me and that something good could come around to me also. I like how the new school is treating you okay, don't listen to that girl, teenagers suck, and she's a terrible person for threatening you, you didn't deserve that. I hope you have more good things that happen to you. You deserve to be happy.
Thank you, I hope some good things will happen to you too. 
Random hugs are the best. Especially from people you'd never expect it from. Some of my best memories are getting hugs from someone. 
Hugs sure are awesome and supportive; I wish I could hug random people over reddit.
Hugs sure are awesome and supportive; I wish I could hug random people over reddit.
I could use a hug...
(っ◕‿◕)っ
(｡◕‿◕｡)
Wow. That's pretty cool. Good on her for doing this. It takes very little effort and can have a big effect.
Hugging should be some sort of official treatment.
It's one of the best feelings. Especially when it's unexpected
Ikr! It made me so happy; The last time I *asked* for a hug was 2 years ago and I was rejected, that's why this unexpected hug made me especially happy.
Ikr! It made me so happy; The last time I *asked* for a hug was 2 years ago and I was rejected, that's why this unexpected hug made me especially happy.
Lol I got hugged by two different men unexpectedly. One was the owner of the company I work for and the other was a dad of one of my daughters friends. Both times it was in the context of what I've been going through. Haven't been hugged yet by a woman besides my wife.  :/.  ;)
That person is great and so are you :)
Thank you, that was so sweet. :D  You're great too!
Good luck man, just do your best with kids and I'm telling you, you need a break from that woman. Maybe she then understand.
I know very well I need a break. Problem is that I can't really afford to go and rent anywhere, and sleeping in a tent isn't exactly an option in November hehe. 
I'm sorry this is how the people around you reacted, I wish there was a way we could share the feeling with people so they could see, for a moment, what it was like. then they wouldn't judge. 
Even a moment of living and feeling like this would be torture to a 'normal' person. And imagine we live like this all the time :-/ 
people aren idiots.
Most people are dildos. They are not real enough to be calledn idiots.
Seems to me the relationships in your life being so hollow & toxic and your having depression might be related.
well my depression started long before I was in any relationships (except for with my parents and sister of course),  so maybe the relationship I am in is turned sour because of the depression, and the sour relationship is in turn affecting the depression. It's like a spiral of death.
when having depression it can seem to take over relationships of all kinds. it really sucks. I just got told that I ruined a relationship that I had because I guess I made everyone around me feel horrible even with out me even noticing. that seems to sound about right. depression is just a pain in the ass. 
what really bugs me about having a depression, is how other 'normal' people seem to have this idea that it is just a minor thing, that it is just to 'shake it off'... I know that me being depressed have an effect on the ones around me. I am painfully aware of that. That is why I also chose to reveal that part so that people would understand that I'm not doing it on purpose, to make other people feel miserable.
this saddens me.. It saddens me because hypothetically, if you were to committ suicide, they would realize just how damn serious it was. They would cry and mourn about how depression took their son away. but like, when you reach out they shun you away.... I;m sorry OP.. I know it doesnt mean much but we are here for you. Maybe if your wife does leave you can start fresh and try to make a new and more improved life. Good luck to you <3 
If I killed myself, the reality of what a depression can do, will hit them in the face like a rocket powered brick. But by then it would be too late. At this stage, I am not really too concerned with my wife leaving. Or kicking me out, as the reality would be. It would just open a new chapter in my life, where I could start over and live the way I want. 
If they care that little, are they really your family? Or just your relatives... We all need a shoulder to cry on some times, we all need a hug some times, or some encouraging words, we are only humans. Until you find someone that can give you that little bit extra care, stay safe, and survive. 
Really doesn't help for you to put down my family. You've basically done less than they have - told me to find someone else. Easy for you to say.  They gave me what they could, not that I should defend them to you. I need more. I can't do it alone, but there is no one for me.  I am not safe and ultimately will not survive. At least I have that option.
Ha. I can't believe any professional would say that. I know it's been said before, but that's just like saying 'other people have it better than you and therefore you shouldn't be happy.'   I totally agree with you that that is a terrible way to help anyone struggling with depression.
I've heard it so much through out the last few years
I've heard it so much through out the last few years
Which is sad. Like...my problems that I have right now are my problems. They're important too! Regardless of how they vary from other's problems...
I've heard it so much through out the last few years
Likewise. I'm starting to think only people who have struggled with mental illness should be allowed to work with people who have mental illness.
Likewise. I'm starting to think only people who have struggled with mental illness should be allowed to work with people who have mental illness.
Yes, that is potentially a good idea. However, I struggle with fatigue, and I had a therapist that seemed just as tired as me and seemed nearly as unhappy. He could really be an ass and seemed to get confused sometimes, he was just the worst.  Got new therapist now that's fantastic, so yay for that! 
I'd like to point out that there is a thing called 'malpractice.' And while many sufferers of any number of mental illnesses might not be in the state of mind to consider raising a complaint, no matter what country you're in, there is always an avenue with which you can raise a complaint.  What you've described is malpractice. Don't settle for alerting us to it. 
Malpractice might be much. That usually involves suing the doctor for damages and it would potentially ruin their career. There are steps in between, though, like you mentioned, filing a formal complaint. You can probably even file a complaint to whatever the Board/Committee is that psychologists are in. Malpractice would just cost a lot in court fees etc.
As I like to say, 'suffering isn't a pissing match.'   I find comparisons helpful to some states of mind (e.g., if I'm calling myself horrible or something overblown like that, I try to stop myself and say 'no, Hitler was horrible. Serial killers are horrible.  I'm not horrible.').  It can be good for stopping hyperbole.    But to use comparisons to invalidate your completely valid feelings is just bullshit.  No therapist should be doing that. 
Great saying. I think you captured the balance needed to handle this. Yes, perspective can be good to deal with some of the irrationalities of depression. But having a guilt reaction can be very debilitating. It's a delicate balance, but I'm going to try to be more aware. Use it for perspective without guilt. Thanks for the insight :-) 
I think about that a lot. Telling myself that I'm pathetic because people have worse problems.   I have to remind myself that just because other people have it worse, doesn't mean you don't have it bad. Your struggle, your pain, it's still **real**. You can still have it bad when others have it worse. 
>I think about that a lot. Telling myself that I'm pathetic because people have worse problems.   I do that too. That's why I hate it when people tell me I should be happy because others have it worse. My usual response when someone says that to me is, 'The fact that other people are worse off in no way makes me feel better.' That usually shuts them up.  
>I think about that a lot. Telling myself that I'm pathetic because people have worse problems.   I do that too. That's why I hate it when people tell me I should be happy because others have it worse. My usual response when someone says that to me is, 'The fact that other people are worse off in no way makes me feel better.' That usually shuts them up.  
That 'there's people out there that have it worse' tends to make me more upset because the feeling of absolute helplessness magnifies exponentially. I hate being told that.  I know there's worse,  but that doesn't diminish my very real problems.   Nobody has a monopoly on pain.
Doesn't sound like a very good therapist.
He's the one my doctor sent me to.
He's the one my doctor sent me to.
You don't have to like your therapist. If you don't, get a new one. You should be with someone you trust.
Okay, to play devil's advocate here: encouraging someone to look at the big picture could help someone with MILD depression. If it's a way to encourage positive thinking and gratitude, I can sort of understand the logic. Anything more than that is just shitty.
Just to follow the point, though, one need not have a myopic view of the world or be ungrateful to be depressed.  My girlfriend tends to assume that I must be either ungrateful or overly negative about life to feel how I do and it's absolutely infuriating.  
I don't like that saying... if it is one.  I believe people handle situations differently, therefore, making the statement arbitrary.
It's inherently illogical.  Other people have bad lives -> You should like your life.  There's nothing that logically connects those two statements.
By that logic I must be extremely grateful that I have clean water and enough food to avoid dying of hunger (not to mention internet connection) and should not feel depressed AT ALL since there are people who don't have access to basic necessities.  I can't believed a licensed therapist would use that kind of logic. I have a crappy psychiatrist too and sometimes I feel like I'll make a better counselor than him. :(
I think the best way to look at it is that being grateful and being depressed are not mutually exclusive. You can feel both things at the same time - so the implication from someone suggesting this is that if you feel depressed then you must be ungrateful - which I would imagine is only going to make a depressed person feel even worse!
The fact that other people have it much worse just makes me wonder why THEY want to live.
It's their choice some people are stronger than others, how bad a situation is is subjective to the person. Maybe to them it's not as bad and they don't feel as bad in that situation as someone else would.
It's their choice some people are stronger than others, how bad a situation is is subjective to the person. Maybe to them it's not as bad and they don't feel as bad in that situation as someone else would.
Yeah, but what's the upside?    I don't even want to live my cushy life, so what's the motivation to slog through a bunch of REAL problems, even if they don't seem as bad to you as they might to someone else?  
It's amazing how one group of people can find the picture so funny, while another find it all too relatable and soul-crushing. I know which group I'd rather be a part of. 
I find it funny and sad. I have days like this, but not as often as before.
Literally just happened to me. I was, like you said, euphoric for a whole day, thinking, 'damn, I'm finally feeling better!' Then I woke up the next day crying for no reason.  ¯\_(ツ)_/¯
Same here. Yesterday I was like 'hey I'm gonna go out and make some friends and find a girl and be happy' and nope. Now I just want to go home and hide in my room again
For me it can be days, maybe even weeks and then I'm down in the dumps again. I also feel way better at night, like my mood shifts and I feel at ease
Are you seeing a therapist? Elevated mood for at least one week followed by depressed mood is a symptom of bipolar disorder. 
Are you seeing a therapist? Elevated mood for at least one week followed by depressed mood is a symptom of bipolar disorder. 
Today is my first appointment with a therapist. I don't think I have bipolar though because by elevated mood I mean just stable, sometimes even happy, but then something happens and I become depressed again, but we'll see! Thanks for your concern
Today is my first appointment with a therapist. I don't think I have bipolar though because by elevated mood I mean just stable, sometimes even happy, but then something happens and I become depressed again, but we'll see! Thanks for your concern
I'm glad to hear you're seeing a therapist!   Know that it can take a few sessions before you feel like you're getting somewhere, so don't expect a one-and-done type thing. Also, if you don't have good chemistry with the therapist, make appointments with new ones until you find one that you are comfortable with. 
I also seem to feel better at night. Not sure why.
I was once told that it's because nothing is expected of you at night, unlike mornings when you have to go to school/work
I'm the exact opposite.
Well, I do admit that going to bed does bring on the bad memories and thoughts. I usually have to do stuff and not sleep like I should. Does everything hit you at once at night?
Yeah earlier this year I'd be 'on' for around a week and a half, then back 'off' for another couple weeks. Made me wonder if I was actually depressed or just 'being a pussy'. Then I went to therapy and found out that's a common thing. 
So... this is common for normal people who don't have depression/anxiety issues?
So... this is common for normal people who don't have depression/anxiety issues?
I meant common for people with depression/anxiety
I only get euphoric bursts for about six hours.
Same here, after awhile I start thinking why am I feeling so good? Negative thoughts start coming and back down you go.
I'm so happy for you! Sometimes it's the little things in life that keeps you together when the big things in life are tearing you apart. I like to play 'smile tag' when I'm feeling particularly isolated. :) 
:)
:)
:)
:)
:)
I'm sorry, but could someone explain this joke to me? I don't get it.
Its VOL NTEE which is supposed to be 'volunteer'. U R the only thing thats missing mean 'you are'. Its a funny way to say you should volunteer for clinical research.
Hells yes.  Great!  Please do remember that not all antidepressants work for people - It may take time to find out which works for you.  My roommate, who has borderline personality disorder, went through about fifteen different medications before she figured out which ones worked.  I have major depressive disorder and it took me three.  It'll also take time for them to work(for the most part), but a HUGE step has been taken! Congrats.
Thank you for the advice, and to everyone else in this thread!  It's going to be a long, hard struggle but I feel like I can take it!  
Thank you for the advice, and to everyone else in this thread!  It's going to be a long, hard struggle but I feel like I can take it!  
My roommate explained medication as 'Putting those that need it on a level playing field to those that don't'.  I think it holds true here, too. You will struggle. You will push. You will hurt, and you'll maybe gain some friends along the way.  When you are 'level', that first breath after you realize it... It's exhilarating. It is so worth the struggle.
Right with you!  One of the tricks I use to trick my depressive demon is grabbing a drink with someone who's suffering and needs someone to listen. It helps them, which helps me. Selfish not selfish. 
Learning curve: you make friends, and they're happy, or as happy as your help can bring them to be. Dissonance forms, where they move forward and you don't. Is the next step to end the friendship and start anew?
The one place where I don't get roasted for being such a debbie downer.   I love you guys, don't ever leave me.
same place as you. Never :)  We're here to pick eachother up when we're down right? We're good together. Gonna help each other out. Promise. And I don't even know who you are. 
I used to do this constantly, it was like sparing myself the pain of being disappointed, of messing up or being let down. After years of this behavior I just realized that it hurt me so much more not to try to do these things even though I'd rather hide away from the world, so I started taking baby steps to doing stuff and it got easier with time. It can still be challenging but I just push myself into it. 
I kind of had a similar epiphany. There are two types of losers. The one who tries stuff and fails, (the admirable loser), and the who is so scared to fail that they don't even try. And the latter is just a wasted existence.
Reminds me of this comic, which hits really close to home:  http://imgur.com/a/QIHnc  (The artist's Tumblr is listed at the bottom...  She has some very relatable content.)
Wow, this describes exactly how I've been feeling for the last four straight months. It took years to get to this room, but here I sit, no longer wanting to even try to get out.  
> Can't remember the last time I went outside to just be outside.  Time to do that. Like now. Just go outside. Walk around, look at trees or grass or shit. For fifteen minutes.
If it was that easy i would've done it already. I don't mean to dismiss your idea, but for me exercise is a sore subject. Last time i went for a walk in my neighborhood, it made me feel worse. 
These comments are more harmful than helpful in all honesty. It's like telling people in a hole that they should climb out like they didn't think of that. I'm glad your life is better but telling people to just live again is not the way to help people out, saying nothing would have been better.
I never said climb out. My last sentence purposefully points out that choosing to climb is a victory in itself, because there is nothing to find except the will to live. I'm sorry you feel that I painted am unreachable utopia, the whole point was that you need to engage with life to reap any rewards and that means fighting the instinct to retreat. That's all
-hug-  For every building that burns is a potential for a larger one to take its place.  Let's build a nice life, friend.
Thank you, kind stranger. Today is a new beginning for me.
Hey everybody, check this guy out!   You, sir, are awesome. You've done something that some of us can't. You've taken the first step to taking back control of yourself. Yes, the depression will be there. Life will always be tough. But hey, you can't be a hero without a little adversity, right?   Keep fighting the good fight. We're proud of you
Thanks man. I will fight. For everything else, there's my good friend Reddit.
Thanks man. I will fight. For everything else, there's my good friend Reddit.
You're not alone. We'll fight alongside you
'Hey, don't go. I need you'-future self
Beautiful.  
What courage you show! You deserve more  - bad things happen to good people - appreciate you reaching out and admire your honesty and tenacity - respect.  I recall hearing when you have no energy and are feeling down, borrow some - from a song, a dance, throwing a ball - anything - I am watching Finding Nemo for a laugh - try it - it is hilarious and I can borrow from it for a while.
I'm really down and out today. But I know someday I won't be. Thanks man.
I feel my own mental health slightly deteriorating day by day, I wish nothing but the best for you mate. 
Thanks for your kind words man. I hope you get better! :)
Supporting you as much as possible through this keyboard now! So proud of you for taking the initiative to improve your situation! :) Good Job OP!!!!
Thank you. Thanks a lot. Hope days ahead are better.
This inspired me to sign up and write a comment (I promise there will be more).  Your analogy reminded me of a phrase that came to me, 'I can't relate to myself.'  Who the shoot ever thought it would possible not to relate to yourself?  But there it is.  Your post gives me hope at least that I am not alone in this.  Thank you.
Welcome! I'm glad you're here. 
Absolutely perfect way to put it. It's like intellectually you know *exactly* what steps to take in what order to, if not 'fix everything', at least get back on a solid track you can move on from... But there's this second part of you that sucks away any joy, kills any initiative or motivation and keeps that wellspring of emotional resilience bone-dry 24/7. And that's *before* it starts self-sabotaging... It's a hard cycle to break.
Thanks. I was going to go on about how distractions like phone/alcohol/videogames/tv etc would be like sitting in the car before going home from work. Only so you can try to avoid it for as long as possible. It's a precious break from the madness, but you know that eventually you have to get out of the car and face whats waiting for you in the house.   But I kind of felt like I was already starting to ramble on lol  Thanks again, take care
May I use this? Credit to you of course.  I don't know who you are but I think I love you. :'(
Thanks, As far as I'm concerned I gave it to the community to do with as they please. If it somehow helps someone somewhere that's even better. 
Reddit is my current anti depressant. 
Zoloft is better. Except when the bottle is empty and your left alone with your thoughts.
Zoloft is better. Except when the bottle is empty and your left alone with your thoughts.
And your brain zaps and nausea as a consequence of not taking your zoloft 
And your brain zaps and nausea as a consequence of not taking your zoloft 
I dont get the naseau but I know its been longer than i thought without my pills when I start pooping solid.
Reddit is very nice and helpful place obviously. But don't rely only on that to make you feel better. Because reddit is still an escape to real life. So you might use reddit to run away from problems as well. My point is don't overuse reddit to hide your problems. I hope you understand what I am trying to say.
This has become a huge problem for me...
What if you're the type of person like me (and probably the OP) who literally doesn't have one single day of happiness in a year? Or if there is one day, it's JUST that one, and then you're back to 'normal?'   I've heard this advice before, where people say 'oh your brain tricks you into thinking it's constant but really it comes in waves.' But for me at least, it is simply not true.
I'm envious of someone who has it comes in waves.  If mine is a wave, it's the kind in an angry storm.  I can't write myself a note and pretend there's hope.  Intellectually I know it's false, hope left me a long time ago.
Everything is impermanent. Realizing that, through learning a bit about mindfulness and Buddhism, helped me a lot in my depression.
Same here. Really helped me get closer to accepting my depression. 
If something lasts for several years and you don't see any slight improvement then you can say that it's permanent. 
Improvements don't occur all at once. They occur one step at a time. 
Everyone around me call my fake or pretending when I breakdown or about to breakdown and start crying..  I am not faking it... i am really dying inside, why no one help me? Why do they think I am only faking my feelings when I can't even control my own feelings?   I hate this world  I can't even be happy... help 
Had this happen two days ago. I'm at dinner and my best friend tells me I'm not crazy I'm just weak, and getting weaker every time I see him. It almost made me feel like paychotic or at least drove me to that thought. Being weak is one thing but being told you feel this way because you are weak was just brutal.   I don't have help. But this spoke to me. Maybe we can talk? Pm if interested, maybe we can work on this together. 
God refutes permanency by change. Change is the only true thing God embraces.
no offence but it is too cheesy and unrealistic and doesn't help to some people  it's not the right advice in any situation 
>P.S.: Those who do have jobs, how are you still alive? What's wrong with you? How is not everyone doing this BS suicidal?  Various things in my childhood have left me emotionally dead for years, so I just sort of shoot around in life waiting for death. Im right there with you on 9-5, this isnt how humanity should live.
Small business. I have one partner and no one else. The owner has one person above us and he doesn't speak to us because we do our jobs. She is pleasant and easy to get along with so it's basically her and I running one portion of his company. Much nicer than the 18 political bimbos I worked with in my pod at the big corp I was at.
And they say that unemployed people have no lives.
Being unemployed can make you (at least me) feel even worse than working some dead-end job. You (generalizing, again) feel like a useless dead weight.
let's say you wake up at 7:30, commute takes an hour, work 9-5, get home at 6.  You have ~5 hours of free time left. That's enough time to go to the gym, play your favorite video game, go to a bar to get a drink and even watch a movie.  That doesn't sound like a bad deal to me at all. 
But there is 24 hours in a day. ~5 hours is not enough. 
The trick is to find a job that lets you live life while working too.
My last job was an office job. 8 to 430 Monday thru Friday. Easy as shit work. The coworkers caused drama so I alientated myself from everyone. I got 12 hours of paid off time each month. Had good health insurance too. I gave it up and depression slowly worked it's way back into my life. I had a good job, but the thought of going back, 15 lbs heavier than I was and more depressed than I've ever been in my life terrifies me.
There is nothing wrong with you, you are just a bit more perceptive than the average human.  Working 9 to 5 is nothing but slow suicide.  
Can i just chime in and say that I enjoy my office job? It's not some guaranteed terror...  My boss has reasonable expectations and open communication, my coworkers aren't perfect but they're certainly easy enough to work with, I have enough support to actually achieve work goals, and I feel like I contribute to a useful project that will benefit humanity. 
Can i just chime in and say that I enjoy my office job? It's not some guaranteed terror...  My boss has reasonable expectations and open communication, my coworkers aren't perfect but they're certainly easy enough to work with, I have enough support to actually achieve work goals, and I feel like I contribute to a useful project that will benefit humanity. 
I am in your shoes. I don't work in an office but I love my 9-5, it actually helped me beat my depression. I've worked 2-10, 5-3am and so many other crazy shifts, 9-5 is just the best for me. I understand maybe not liking offices/cubicles but what shift other than 9-5 would anyone rather work?
I am in your shoes. I don't work in an office but I love my 9-5, it actually helped me beat my depression. I've worked 2-10, 5-3am and so many other crazy shifts, 9-5 is just the best for me. I understand maybe not liking offices/cubicles but what shift other than 9-5 would anyone rather work?
Wow, you're getting downvoted for being happy on /r/depression... ain't that some shit?  Edit: I see it has changed. Good!
Not sure why you replied to me instead of the OP, and why you are here if your life is so great.
Maybe because I am depressed. Shocking, I know. 
You are swallowing the red-pill. The conflict comes in denouncing the material world - there is a life beyond it but it is not what we have been conditioned to embrace or accept. It won't be easy but you'll find your place. Just be true to yourself and keep your options open. You are not wrong in seeing the 9-5 world as slavery. It is dehumanizing and is a result of the human experience being hijacked by those who want to make sure their power and wealth is always preserved.
Fantastic response!!    May I ask though...... how do you know there I life beyond death? Did you have a near-death experience?  Sorry to pry, I'm just genuinely interested.
Fantastic response!!    May I ask though...... how do you know there I life beyond death? Did you have a near-death experience?  Sorry to pry, I'm just genuinely interested.
'Life beyond the material world' =/= 'Life after death'  /r/CaughtInTheNet is saying you can find your way in life without succumbing to working 40+ hours for someone else to live 10 hours for yourself if you are committed to finding your own way. That might mean living a nomadic life in a van as a freegan, amassing a ton of wealth on Wall Street so you can retire on your thirtieth birthday, finding a job that doesn't feel like work, or anything else that works for you.
'Life beyond the material world' =/= 'Life after death'  /r/CaughtInTheNet is saying you can find your way in life without succumbing to working 40+ hours for someone else to live 10 hours for yourself if you are committed to finding your own way. That might mean living a nomadic life in a van as a freegan, amassing a ton of wealth on Wall Street so you can retire on your thirtieth birthday, finding a job that doesn't feel like work, or anything else that works for you.
OHHH!!!  I went back and reread what was originally written and I totally misread it. Thank you for bringing that to my attention :)
You are swallowing the red-pill. The conflict comes in denouncing the material world - there is a life beyond it but it is not what we have been conditioned to embrace or accept. It won't be easy but you'll find your place. Just be true to yourself and keep your options open. You are not wrong in seeing the 9-5 world as slavery. It is dehumanizing and is a result of the human experience being hijacked by those who want to make sure their power and wealth is always preserved.
There's commie Red Pill and ew women Red Pill. This is commie Red Pill and best Red Pill.
As a fellow dishwasher for the last 3 years, I empathize with you.  It is perhaps one of the most thankless jobs to ever exist. It doesn't matter WHAT happens in the restaurant/kitchen.....it's ALWAYS the dishwasher's fault 
I've never known a dishwasher who wasn't treated like a dog by their staff. I was a dishwasher for 5 shifts before I walked off the job. 
I've never known a dishwasher who wasn't treated like a dog by their staff. I was a dishwasher for 5 shifts before I walked off the job. 
And yet without dishwashers, there are no clean plates, which means that the restaurant NEEDS a dishwasher to function. It is thankless, but a vital part of the functioning of ANY restaurant.
Once the depression is under control you can determine what type of job or career you want to have. Not everyone works 9 to 5. Many people work from home, are on flexible schedules, create their own schedule, do seasonal work. I don't think you can really come to a decision about work until your emotions are under control. 
OP, watch this Doug Stanhope piece before you dose yourself up to the eyeballs on pills to cope. https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=FNU5FnxOxLY
I felt the same way so i dropped out of school and traveled the world.  Highly recommend it. Office jobs are not for everyone and thats cool. Figure what you like doing and do that. 
Do you mind saying how you could afford traveling the world? People always say that they dropped out and travelled the world and I'm always curious as to how. 
Try using couchtuner as your streaming website!
Also I have an open directory for the show [here](http://beta.treyzania.com:8888/media/Television/Rick%20and%20Morty/).  This just points to my /r/Plex repository, so you can steal all of my media.  Edit: My ISP yelled at me for using too much bandwidth.  Working on alternatives.
That is quite sweet and positive! I like where you find inspiration! 
Thank you! I've been struggling with that feeling where I just wish I could disappear, but I can't. It's not time for me to go. There are still people who need me. 
This was really beautiful. I always tell people to live for anything or anyone until they are able to just live for themselves. I'm in the same boat as you, I want to die, but I know I can't. I suffer everyday, but maybe, one day I won't and it'll all be worth it. Keep on keepin on.  Also when the hell is the third season coming out??? I'm dying 😩
Right?! I need my R&M fix now!!! Lol but yeah I completely understand where you're coming from. Some days really hurt. It is a struggle. But we're stronger than that. I'm impressed with your ability to handle that suffering, and I hope you find happiness very soon. God bless. 
Caaaan do!   Great insight btw
'Is he keepin' his shoulders straight?' 'Oooh, he's tryin!'  Cracks me up every time lol
Oh this is great and made me smile.  Thank you!
You're welcome!! I'm glad I could make ya smile! 
I watched one episode. I think I will give another try. I want one of those dolls already. 
I didn't like the pilot at first but I've come around to watch every episode multiple times. It's not for everyone, but you should give it another shot!
When you finish Rick and Morty, try Bob's Burgers! It's also a pretty hilarious animated show and has so many more episodes than R&M :) It's holding me over until ~~FREERICK~~ season 3 comes out!
I love Bob's Burgers!! I keep rewatching it on Netflix cause it's so funny :) plus I feel like I relate to Tina on a spiritual level...*anxiety moan* lol
MAN!!!!:DD Rick and Morty was the only show that kept me from spiraling sometimes, it's the shooting best show ever. It reflects so many of stances in life and is so honest and awesome and just the best shooting tv-series ever!!  ...but when the meeseks couldn't disappear...that turned bad :/
I know! I got the doll to remind myself that I can't go crazy...like hold up a restaurant with a gun until someone takes two strokes off their golf game...lol
I think you're wrong about it not being deep or meaningful. I wish someone would crawl down here with me. Everyday I just wish for a hug. 
Hugs are amazing. Very few things make me feel better than being up against another person and hearing their heart and feeling their touch. 
Hugs are amazing. Very few things make me feel better than being up against another person and hearing their heart and feeling their touch. 
And that made me want a real hug. :(
And that made me want a real hug. :(
INTERNET HUG
It's ridiculous how much of a difference a simple gesture can make 
I agree. My roommates fiancé will sometimes see me sitting there and come over and hug me. She is an amazing person, as is he. 
I agree. My roommates fiancé will sometimes see me sitting there and come over and hug me. She is an amazing person, as is he. 
Aw that's sweet. 
I like it.  Sometimes all you want is for someone to notice that you're not ok and need a friend.
then you realize you are at college and none of these people know you well enough yet, if they will
made my manly ass cry *whelp*
Second.
How did you cope with it? To me it feels like being in a relationship is a burden I couldn't see the difference between being unhappy with her or being unhappy in general.
Deal with it? I lost the woman of my dreams. I don't call that dealing with it.
I just broke up with her. Could not put her through it anymore.
I did the same. We can't stay away from each other though..tough times.
You have shed a lot of light on my situation. I'm on the other side of things, the one who was broken up with. I'll assume you're right and leave her to figure things out for herself. I feel helpless not being able to do anything to help, but that's the problem with depression I guess. Thanks for inadvertently helping me out happyvocal.
): I'm sorry.  Here is an [obligatory picture](http://fc03.deviantart.net/fs71/i/2012/147/4/f/sleepy_kitten_by_drsmith-dd79xp.jpg) of a cute kitten to help you feel better.
IMO the worst thing that can happen to your comment is just having a zero. Like, it's not even significant enough for multiple opinions, you just made 1 guy think you're stupid.
Hmm my most of my messages remain on 1. People read what i say and they just don't care and ignore me, just like in real life
I just find it really petty on his part. Like, whatever were you trying to achieve by this? 
some people just enjoy trampling on others
sometimes getting *lots* of downvotes  feels satisfying tbh.   I'll take a -10 over a -2 any day. 
I usually delete things if people downvote them, but one time I had an unpopular musical opinion that got voted down to like -20. That one stays.
I usually delete things if people downvote them, but one time I had an unpopular musical opinion that got voted down to like -20. That one stays.
It's okay, I like Chinese Democracy.
It's okay, I like Chinese Democracy.
It really isn't as bad as people make it out to be. I think maybe because it took over a decade people were expecting some next level epic rock opera. The disappointment of it not being that soured them I think.
i kinda want to get a bunch of people to downvote you now
I'm in. But I upvoted since it's up
I don't. I think of my karma as money. It's earned to be spent.  What I earn from one opinion, I spend on another.
That's a great way to think about it. 
whenever i get downvotes on my stupid fanarts on here i wanna delete them :( but i worked shooting hard so it hurts to delete them :( WHO DOWNVOTES ART IN A FANDOM SUB!!!
Downvotes are usually a 'I want to see less of that', while upvotes are 'I want to see more of that'.  In a nutshell, each vote is about the person casting the vote, not about the person whom it affects.
Usually when people ask a question on Reddit, they basically want an echo chamber on what they think is right and any actual opinion or answer that doesn t fit that gets downvoted. I can confirm, it's happened to me alot. I'm not one to agree with 4Chan and ESPECIALLY Pol but most of Reddit DOES come across as sensitive little  sensitive little girls in my opinion. Hell, this might even get downvoted. 
I am a sensative little girl, but you better say what's on your mind than piss me off with sweet talk.
Usually when people ask a question on Reddit, they basically want an echo chamber on what they think is right and any actual opinion or answer that doesn t fit that gets downvoted. I can confirm, it's happened to me alot. I'm not one to agree with 4Chan and ESPECIALLY Pol but most of Reddit DOES come across as sensitive little  sensitive little girls in my opinion. Hell, this might even get downvoted. 
It's true. It's nicknamed 'circle jerk' for a reason. 
I down voted you, in case you felt a little tingly down there
:)  I down vote myself too.
:)  I down vote myself too.
Hnnnnng
A while back I joked about saying that every time I joke, it's a plead for help. Recently, that statement is becoming more and more true. I just don't want people to pity me so whenever I joke it makes it seem like I'm good.
Wubba lubba dub dub
Turn it into a strength. Write down the jokes you come up with, and go to an open mic night. You may find that many (most) stand up comedians feel similarly.
Wasn't this very thing a big part of Robin Williams life?
I was at the gym the other night and a random fit girl smiled at me. I think I was a bit too stunned so I'm not even sure if I smiled back. But that stuck with me. That is how lonely my life is.  It is pretty damn cool when people you have no prior connection with show you true kindness like that.
Well, I find that it is kinda rare to have someone give you the kindness that keeps some people going. That is awesome. I hope something good comes out of it!
It's hard to believe, but sometimes you can save a persons life just by being open to them. 
I know, I am going to try to treat anyone like she did me, no matter what.
You deserve all of the nice things brohan.  I'm glad you had a good day x]
Thanks man, I really appreciate you saying that!
:)   'if you smile, or talk to someone who needs it, I promise you, it will make their lives.'  I really need to start doing this.    
I am glad I inspired someone, I really know that little things like that help people in need.
That is actually very sweet. I actually think you just opened my eyes to what women actually see from their standpoint, so thank you a ton! I hope you have a great rest of the week!
:) thanks you too!
Keep talking to her!!!!!!!!! Be happy to see her every time you do!!!!!!
I will try!
I will try!
But don't get too clingy! And don't think she's taking a romantic interest in you just like that. Some people are just naturally outgoing and...touchy-feely. It just means they like physical touch.
Try to hang onto that feeling and let it propel you through each day.
Way ahead of you man, I realized that you folks really can find the good in people, thanks!
Someday you'll find someone similar who wants to spend her whole life with you. You'll get and give hugs from her daily! Screw depression! 
You know what, that is some of the nicest advice that I have had in my whole life. Thank you. I wish the same for you, too!
I girl I kinda know hugged me out of the blue the other day.  I was just shell shocked and stood there confused. 
Hahahah, sorry man.
That is actually pretty awesome. I wished we had a Chipotle where I lived, but I dunno why we don't. I hope in a good turn of events, that something will happen out of this! I care how you feel dude.
I live in a college town so we have some good food around. It was delicious.   I'm finding out that this friend doesn't hate me for being depressed like some of the others seem to when I talk about how I feel.  Let's keep up the good things!
I live in a college town so we have some good food around. It was delicious.   I'm finding out that this friend doesn't hate me for being depressed like some of the others seem to when I talk about how I feel.  Let's keep up the good things!
That is really what can separate your 'friends' from your real friends. I wish the best of luck to you!
op, Id love to hear more about your future events with this girl.  She just might, somehow out a twisted turn of events end up being the one for you.
I plan on trying to befriend her, I will try to keep posting if anyone cares to follow!
well, what's your favorite anime?
I recently finished Tengen Toppa Gurren Lagann, and I really liked it, great overall writing, thanks for asking!
Not to be too positive or anything, I think she wants the D...
An easy way to set your self up for disappointment is to mistake attention as attraction
Ive been searching for the thing that its worth living for but i just cabt find anything .
Have you thought about doing some volunteering? Doing things to help other people can be an amazingly fulfilling way to fill your days, connect with others and distract from those negative emotions.  Obviously it can be a scary first step, but I can't recommend the experience enough. Try googling volunteering opportunities in your local area. . .
Have you thought about doing some volunteering? Doing things to help other people can be an amazingly fulfilling way to fill your days, connect with others and distract from those negative emotions.  Obviously it can be a scary first step, but I can't recommend the experience enough. Try googling volunteering opportunities in your local area. . .
I have but most volunteer works is with people, I hate people, social anxiety etc..
Ive been searching for the thing that its worth living for but i just cabt find anything .
Keep looking but not so hard you will miss it. Have you tried just sitting and meditating? I started with 2 minutes just sitting eyes closed, clear the mind and count breaths, in through the nose (1) out through the mouth (2) so on  3,4  5,6 etc. Your mind is going to keep barging in but just clear and keep going.  Just relax and when you least expect it...you will find something. 
That's awesome you went on a walk. I could never get myself to do that in low times, except I haven't come that close to ending things. 
I only walk outside if its dark though, else i cant put myself to it either. I enjoy walks at night (i normally take a 10 min walk or so). It feels good to not walk into people
I only walk outside if its dark though, else i cant put myself to it either. I enjoy walks at night (i normally take a 10 min walk or so). It feels good to not walk into people
Same, I like taking occasional walks in the cold of the night.  It's peaceful, I also like star-gazing for a bit when the sky is clear.  I wish it could always be 2AM.
I think you're brave, honestly. It's harder to live than to die. I was also too afraid to kill myself when I was very depressed as a teenager. Now, ~10 years later I'm so glad I didn't. Life can get better even though sometimes it doesn't feel like it. 
Thanks, but I've been feeling this way for around 8+ years. I'm currently 23 y/o and nothing has changed in my life. I know I'm supposed to change up things in my life but I struggle too much. I also have no ambition for a future or so.
I'm not even writing to them about the mental illness, it will literally be 'how was your day?'      Seen, no reply.
I know exactly how you feel. The exact same thing happens to be all the time.   Feel free to pm me if you feel the need :)
not saying its the case but as someone with ADHD and depression I sometimes find it hard to reply in the moment and then promptly forget about the message later. Its not that I dont care and I often beat myself up over it even though its just a problem of being unable to coerce my working memory to... well work.
Yeah, me too. I have to tell my friends over and over again that I'm not an idiot, just a bit of a spaz ><
this could be said about any mental illness. im sure if you broke your leg your friends would come rushing over to  you. but because they cant see your disease its difficult for them to symphathise
Unfortunately, this is, in part, why some people self-harm or attempt suicide. For some it's an outlet for the pain or a way to end to the pain, for others it's a way to make the pain physical and visible to the outside world in hopes that someone will understand the severity. I don't like the phrase that it's a 'call for attention'. I understand it as a call for others to see that the pain is real... it's a call for empathy and understanding.
What are you using to message them? Facebook messages can be easily missed. I recently received two alerts that were a month old.
Yeah Facebook, none of us ever text message.
Yeah Facebook, none of us ever text message.
Try another method of communication. Facebook's messaging system is flawed.
Yep. I told my parents. My mom laughed and said it was my fault for not being more pro active.   This world is a cesspool and I'm happy it's going down the Shitter really fast. Means I won't have to live to be 90 because some event caused by global warming will wipe us out soon. 
I tell my parents all the shooting time my brother is giving me anxiety and they always say 'well if you hate us so much kill yourself!' or my dad will turn around and threaten suicide himself. NICE FUKN STABLE HOUSEHOLD!!!         I hate how people think families are who you can always turn to in a crisis - sometimes they ARE the shooting crisis!    
I know it's tough, I've lost all of my friends due to depression.  Do you have any family to turn to?  I know for me that doesn't fill the same gap, but it definitely helps.
My family are the cause of my depression. Ironically my number 1 'support system' is constantly telling me to 'well just hurry up and kill yourself if you hate us all that much!'
Why should they care?  You send messages to these people all day without a thought to the fact that other people have lives as well.
I'm saying they don't care about me in general, not about depression. I've never messaged them saying 'I'm depressed!'        I've messaged them going 'how was uni?'   No reply.      'Guys want to go for breakfast next week?'   No reply.
It is a big step. I writing this from bed, about two hours after waking up because I just cant/dont want to get out. So today your already better than me. Good job!
14:20 - still can't get out of bed, I wish people understood how much of a challenge it is
I managed to get out of bed, but still didn't go to class. Waste of a morning.
You made it up before afternoon though!
You made it up before afternoon though!
True. Got an early start to the day, even if I didn't really do much.
wait but then how do you usually go pee pee and poo poo?
Honestly there have been times where I just hold it as long as I can.  If I end up sleeping all day I don't eat or drink so it don't end up needing to use the restroom
Every time. 'Oh, you mean all I have to do is look on the bright side of things and get outside more often? Why have I NEVER thought of that? Thanks Dr. Phil!'
Every shooting time! It doesn't shooting help! I need real help, not their repetitive gibberish I hear every time they try to help. If I had a dime every time someone tried, I would be a gazzillionaire. This exactly.
Every shooting time! It doesn't shooting help! I need real help, not their repetitive gibberish I hear every time they try to help. If I had a dime every time someone tried, I would be a gazzillionaire. This exactly.
If you were a gazzillionaire, you could buy tons of antidepressants!
I could scream and rip my hair out every time someone tells me the only way to get motivated is to start doing things step by step and taking it slow etc. Yeah thanks, I'm so shooting dumb that I couldn't have come up with that myself you idiot.
*How do you ride a bike?  You just sit on the bike, balance, and pedal.*  The problem is that we *know* it's the answer. We just can't do anything about it, we're trying to get someone to hold our bike as we learn to balance again.
Haha 'get out and exercise, its good for ur depression' they say.  But then id just be exhausted AND depressed lol
and disappointed in your performance. Depressed crossfitter here... It's always a bad day.
All the time. I'm working on not always being the one to send the last text.  It makes me feel like I have some level of control over the conversation, even if I don't.
I'm always the last text. It's weird.
I'd add another:  * Don't keep trying to convince us to do something with/for you if we've already explained that we're not feeling up to it. It's great to let us know that you find us valuable enough to want around or make requests of, but pushing it only leads to guilt and resentment.   My mother does this at least once a day, and I swear it's the biggest obstacle keeping me from fully recovering from my latest episode.  
One that gets me is asking what's wrong... That immediately drives me nuts and ruins everything.
Thank you for this. I felt like I was being one of the friends OP was describing. I try to do everything that you just listed, so that's somewhat encouraging to me.  Nothing worse than trying to be helpful and finding out much later on that you were just being a twit.
You're welcome! I know sometimes it can be hard figure out what the person needs. You can always just ask though, because your friend might like something specific that I didn't mention.
I feel bad for them because they'll never understand my pain. Yet, I'm not jealous that they can feel happy, because I don't know what that is. The reason why is because I'm at my lowest point possible; I can't be torn down anymore. Anything that happens to me doesn't affect me. I've grown to be comfortable with my lack of feelings.
I agree with you, I'm at that same point and I feel the same way (Maybe we have different causes for depression). 
Me too. I lost all my distractions. And that was scary because I needed to focus on something to hold my wandering sick mind. No more books, tv, sports. It was terrifying. But now, after 8 monts of weekly therapy I'm starting to read again and waching some movie and that's give me hope...
Hey, I'm really glad you're starting to get better <3 I'm starting therapy this week and I'm somewhat both excited and scared at the same time because I don't know what to expect. I really hope we'll be ok one day. You're on the right road already.
Hey, I'm really glad you're starting to get better <3 I'm starting therapy this week and I'm somewhat both excited and scared at the same time because I don't know what to expect. I really hope we'll be ok one day. You're on the right road already.
Thanks! I think reddit helped more than therapy lol
Thanks! I think reddit helped more than therapy lol
Lmao. Well, being able to relate to someone is definitely a helpful tool for depression. 
May I ask what type of therapy you're having? 
Some kind of cognitive behavioral therapy. But I'm not sure it's working on me, maybe I'm recovering for some other reasons...
Some kind of cognitive behavioral therapy. But I'm not sure it's working on me, maybe I'm recovering for some other reasons...
Thanks. I tried CBT, and it worked but not long term. I'm really struggling at the moment, and I'm grasping at any straws I can to try to get out from under it.
I get this. It's terrifying at times. These things that I used to love doing, that were an inherent part of my 'essence'... What if I don't like them? What if I actually never liked them? What does that mean about my perception of myself? It's shooting scary just thinking about it. Which is why I haven't picked up a camera in years.
Oh god yes!!! The terror, just thinking of all the passion that you had for those things in the past and how happy those things made you, they were part of you, and now you don't even know who the hell you are. It's absolutely terrifying to think of those things and feel nothing.
Oh god yes!!! The terror, just thinking of all the passion that you had for those things in the past and how happy those things made you, they were part of you, and now you don't even know who the hell you are. It's absolutely terrifying to think of those things and feel nothing.
Recently I was getting close to trying again... I was so close. Then I buckled. Oh well.
I’m the same way. I can’t even be on my phone for a long time because I get no enjoyment out of it. It’s so boring 
Yup. I used to love technology, especially video games, but nowadays games are so damn boring
It's really normal to be afraid of that. I've struggled with this but after over a year of treatment, I was able to pick up a book and read. Reading used to be my favourite hobby. So it will come back, it will just take time. 
I'm so happy for you!! <3 I used to enjoy drawing, painting, video games and especially music. Now none of these are enjoyable anymore, and not being able to enjoy music drives me absolutely insane because music was the biggest part of me, and losing music feels like losing myself as a whole.
Hopefully my post will bring some hope to you guys.  I'm an artist that lost all interests in drawing year ago because of depression and anxiety. Last week, something lit up in me and I am currently riding an art wave like I havent had in over 10 years.   It's not forever and hopefully you guys will get your turn sooner than later. <3
Congrats! It's always good to hear someone made it to the other side.
I used to, and then I spent the last weekend working on a design project that I had started years ago and hadn't touched since.  Give me some hope.
I'm really glad you found some distraction. I hope it gets better for you
I used to collect comics, ice hockey sticks and equipment and game used ice hockey stuff. Now it just reminds me of my ex girlfriend. I'm thinking of taking everything out into the yard and burning it. Maybe I'll jump in, too.
I'm so sorry...please stay. I know this sounds cliche, and I'm personally still struggling with it but...things will get better. I'm sure you'll find someone else but first you need to heal. We all need to heal, we're broken. And healing takes time. 
I haven't touched my guitar in months...  :(
Right there with you. Between my arthritis and depression, I just haven't been practicing. 
This is probably stupid to ask, but do you wanna be friends? I'm in a similar situation to you, and don't have much of a support network.
Oh heck yeah. I crave friendship like a recovering diabetic craves sugar.
Hey friend. I know this feeling well. I'm not good with words but I hope things work out 
Ha, that's me every time I want to comfort someone, I don't have a clue what to say, just something simple, but many times I just don't comment at all so not to accidentally hurt the other person. Oh my emotional intelligence where are you... 
I also get those feelings of inferiority when I look at other people's art. That being said, I had a look at some of your work and I was surprised how good it is. Clean lines, good work on the expressions, good colour choice. I'm not saying it to be nice, you are very good.   Just remember, you don't practise art to be better than someone else, you practise to better than you were yesterday, as corny as that sounds. 
Awgeez thank you so much. My clean lines are credit to the handy stabilizer option in paint tool sai. This year I've really tried to better myself but when it comes to coloring- like shading and highlighting, I get too nervous to experiment and learn. I feel like I'd be so much more confident in my stuff if I'd just learn how to shade already.
Do you still draw? If so, is there anywhere that you share your drawings on?   I always feel useless and overwhelmed whenever I compare myself to others. Sometimes at times like those I like to think about a nice wholesome quote, 'You can't always be the best, but you can do your best'.
Sometimes I post my art here on reddit, but mostly it goes on my DeviantART or my Tumblr blog. I do my best but it gets hard sometimes. I get discouraged and feel like I'll never be able to get halfway where she is now. We both started on the same level, too.  I put my best into my art, but it hardly makes a dent in the art communities on DA and Tumblr. My family thinks I'm amazing though.
Sometimes I post my art here on reddit, but mostly it goes on my DeviantART or my Tumblr blog. I do my best but it gets hard sometimes. I get discouraged and feel like I'll never be able to get halfway where she is now. We both started on the same level, too.  I put my best into my art, but it hardly makes a dent in the art communities on DA and Tumblr. My family thinks I'm amazing though.
FWIW, from one stranger to another,  I do think your drawings are great. I'm digging the art style. 
Don't mean to be creepy but I stalked your submitted and I adore your art style! You're really talented
Awh geez- man, thanks so much. That means a lot to me- especially right now when I'm on a low wave of confidence. 
I used to love to draw, lost passion for it once I started with digital art but ended up losing interest in that too. Depression makes it hard to stay motivated or see things through to the end so I know exactly where you're coming from. Hopefully you create that drive to get your life together, all the best. 
Oh geez, I miss the simple days. Before digital art and the sudden pressure to compete or get noticed, I'd spend all day every day drawing comics and mary-sue shit for myself. My art was terrible and my anatomy was atrocious but I loved drawing anyway. 
Watch her make an art piece (comic? short animation?) that clearly reflects both of you as friends back then...  Watch as it rises in popularity.  Meanwhile she still doesnt call you. 
I half hope for that everytime I check her blog but then I think I'd feel even more like shit afterwards. 
No offense, but she's selfish. How could she just abandon you like that? pretty much sums up her personality
I ask myself that a lot. The only reasons I can come up with are A) my depression dragged her down and she couldn't/didn't want to deal with it anymore or B) because she was younger than me, I was simply a phase during weird teenage times and she grew out of me.  She was a really sweet and innocent person. I used to tell her that. I'd act protective of her and thought of her as my little sister.
I hate this question to. Because I have to tell people that the depression and anxiety keep me from working. Which makes me feel worse.  Sometimes I'll make something up.
'I work from home' works fine.
I think if you only really want a conversation starter, a better question would be: 'so what do you like to do in your free time?' Not only is it a positive approach, but it will also let you know if you can relate to something that the person really enjoys doing. 
Bad questions for some, like me who spends their free time sleeping and gaming. 
This question along with the equally dreaded 'So are you still doing X?' from people you haven't seen in a while. So much internal screaming.
RIGHT????       It seems to be a go-to question in order to break the ice in case you accidentally make eye contact yet both don't really want to talk to each other 
What's even worse than that is 'what's up? or sup?'   What am I supposed to do with that? How am I supposed to even respond to that? 
Just consider it a way of saying 'hello'. That's what always works for me. I usually respond with a 'same old' or a 'not much', followed by a 'what's up with you?'.
Just consider it a way of saying 'hello'. That's what always works for me. I usually respond with a 'same old' or a 'not much', followed by a 'what's up with you?'.
I can't stand small talk, it's so empty and boring and you have to go through it at the start of every conversation and it drives me insane! 'What's up?' 'Nm u?' 'Nm, how you been?' 'Fine u?' 'Yeah, good' 'Wuu2?' 'Nothing' 'Doing much this weekend?' 'Not really, u?' 'Nah' I hate hate hate it! 
First laugh I’ve had in a few days. Thanks. 
You're welcome good sir or maam
I’d also be happy to donate it. 
Aw man. If I could give my life to some kid with cancer. No hesitation.
Aw man. If I could give my life to some kid with cancer. No hesitation.
I’d be happy to give it to anyone, even if he’s 100, as long he wants to continue to living. 
Tried it. The manufacturer won't return calls. 
Holy shit that was smart
Me too, i wished I could give my life to someone who really wants to have a life and achieve their dreams, for me it's useless, It's just a waste of time for me to live 
Same. It's so cruel to see people who just want to live, die; while people who wants to die, live.   Recently my friend got diagnosed with cancer. If I could give my life for him, I would. He might be able to make better use with it.
I would gladly give my life to someone that wants to stay alive but has a terminal illness. Like a trade off. 
Same. You can take mine if you want to.
Maybe if enough of us broken lives offered we would make a full meaningful one...
Might take the whole sub. Lol. 
Ah r/depression the only sub positive comments are downvoted to shit 😂
Well probably because this comment is pretty bullshit. 
i always fantasize about impressing people that i wish i could impress
Like your dad? :')
Like your dad? :')
no.  actually i often fantasize about fighting him
no.  actually i often fantasize about fighting him
Damn, your fantasies are pretty fun! I usually just fantasize about different ways of killing myself
I do this all the time. I spend all day fantasizing about achieving something great instead of actually working on anything and end up being a disappointment to everyone around me.
I feel the same way. Only I fantasize about something, try and figure out how to start working to attain it, but then never figure a viable way. I realize I either missed my chance, or did/didn't do something in my younger years that screwed it or made the opportunity a much harder or time consuming process. I feel your pain. 
I fantasize about traveling and exploring the world, having friends, Having a career where I can be creative but that's all just in my head 
I'm the same, my biggest dream irl now is that the afterlife is something like a lucid dream so I can actually the life of my dreams.
This has been my entire life so far. I graduated from college twice with honours, yet nothing came out of it. I wanted to do things, but now I don't.
2 college graduations both with honors? That's a hell of an achievement, even just in and of itself. 
The only people who do impossible things are the people who believe they can. I find it hard to believe I can do certain things, and I end up not doing them.
Man but the thing is as much as I wanna believe stuff like that, I can't help but feel like it's so naïve to *actually* believe it. Like, there's gotta be a line between realism and quotes like that. I just don't know where it is. 
Man but the thing is as much as I wanna believe stuff like that, I can't help but feel like it's so naïve to *actually* believe it. Like, there's gotta be a line between realism and quotes like that. I just don't know where it is. 
You set that line bro ;)  Be real, think about it. If there's a slight chance it can be achieved, then what's the harm in having a go? THAT is what makes successful people :)
i fantasize all the time of creating an incredible song or a beautiful movie or an amazing video game, but theyre just fantasies. in reality, i will create nothing. i am not destined for production of anything meaningful.
I was doing this last night actually. I like to record little shitty songs just to keep my mind occupied on a project. It's better than having a bleak outlook that I'm going to be stuck in an office the rest of my life...oh wait.
Your dream is getting a powerful pc that can run modern games on it? It's gotta be the easiest dream I've heard of. It's not even that expensive, you could earn enough money by working part time for 2-3 months
That was slightly patronising, but you're right. It is definitely achieveable :) 
I know exactly what you're talking about it, I have that too right before I sleep, I keep thinking about what it would be like to graduate with really good grades, or if I ever got to perform on stage etc. 
I always wake up and fool myself into thinking it's possible, only to go to bed later with thoughts of futility and wasted life. 
I always wake up and fool myself into thinking it's possible, only to go to bed later with thoughts of futility and wasted life. 
It's a very painful process, because for those brief moments you truly believe that it'll be okay, and then the next day hits you hard. 
Sounds like it was a big push for you. Congratulations
Thank you!
Nice job, being called a butterfly is seriously a great compliment. I hope you can ride this momentum and keep doing things which you may have been uncomfortable with before. I hope I can possibly run into that kind of opportunity soon.
I hope that you can too!   Sometimes when I am feeling better I sign up for events I think sound fun, pay for them, and pretend in my mind that I have to go no matter what. It always gives me things to potentially look forward to in the future. I normally try to sabotage things at the last moment, but I always end up having a pretty good time regardless.     
I hope that you can too!   Sometimes when I am feeling better I sign up for events I think sound fun, pay for them, and pretend in my mind that I have to go no matter what. It always gives me things to potentially look forward to in the future. I normally try to sabotage things at the last moment, but I always end up having a pretty good time regardless.     
'I normally try to sabotage things at the last minute'...story of my life hehe. But no honestly, it's amazing that you did that! It sounds like a wonderful experience and I'm so glad you were able to do it and are planning on/already are doing more! It's heartwarming 
That's not easy at all, I hope that you can keep pushing through
Thank you, and I hope so too. I know the initial high will wear off, but I hope that this will be able to help me cope with things in the future.
Wow, what do bananas do to his digestion?  
Nothing bad as far as we can tell! We give him one slice on top of his kibble at both meals of the day, and he's been going regularly and consistently since we got him. 
reminds me of that little guy [:-)](http://www.wendy.de/bilder/neu-cool/kino/oben/OBEN_Dug_Pixar_L_QF.jpg/image_preview)
'I have just met you, and I love you.'
'I have just met you, and I love you.'
SQUIRREL!!!! 
ye same. my bro has said this to me before several times. i hurts trying to explain you can't just get over it. or snap out of it. 
It's the equivalent of telling someone with a brain tumor to just 'stop letting the tumor grow.' Depression isn't an emotion, it doesn't just pass with time. It's a medical condition and should be treated as such.
Yet another person who doesn't understand depression and clearly doesn't want to learn about it. :(
I've said it before and I'll say it again: simply put - these people don't know shit, even if they do have good intentions. The principle of it, wishing one could just snap out of it, is a valid one, but alas, it doesn't work that way and that only troubles and annoys people who are not grounded in the reality of depression.
Try educating the people closest to you about depression, and about how you can't just 'feel better'. Hanging out with people is important in helping yourself feel better- Isolation only makes it worse.
I have tried. It gets me nowhere. Then I just end up feeling stupid for trying. I'm all set. I am dealing with it on my own and doing okay.
I'm sorry, but I feel the same way sometimes. Even about my own depression. And hopefully you feel the same way about yourself if you're dealing with depression. Sometimes I just want to smack myself.
That doesn't make it acceptable for people to think this way. I just feel that it's a shame that more people aren't understanding of how difficult depression can be. I wish it were this simple, but alas, it isn't. 
yes ive done that before. sometimes i just wish i could change everything, i actually wish i could trade lives with someone, just for a week..to see what its like... to live a *good happy life*
I could probably count the times on my hands and toes that I've looked myself in the eye and felt proud to be who I am.  
Never hate. It's more of disappointed.
Disappointed because you failed to meet your own expectations, or because you failed to meet the expectations for yourself that others said you should have?
Disappointed because you failed to meet your own expectations, or because you failed to meet the expectations for yourself that others said you should have?
Pretty much both
All the time. I often give myself the middle finger when I look at myself in the mirror (immature, I know, but whatever), and I try not to look at my reflection when I can help it. I spend most of my time these days trying to distract myself from the fact that I exist.
I hate shaving. I hate that I'm bald and I hate shaving my hair. I HAVE to stare at myself for like 10 minutes and accept the reality that I'm ugly.   I know low self esteem but it's what I feel. So I too also avoid the mirror like the plague
It's not a fight. It's a journey. A journey you can take if you truly want it. You view it as a fight, because you view it as hard, because you judge yourself. But judging yourself is inherently wrong because you are biased against yourself. Only the people around you can tell you how good you are at being around them.
There's no one around me, so I guess that says it all.
i relate to this so much... it hurts to know that i cant get back those days. i miss being creative and i miss having a hobby.
It makes life worthless. If I can’t be good at anything why even bother? That’s how I feel. But at this point I hate myself so much I don’t even allow myself to have the cognitive thoughts I know I deserve to have. Dang depression 
Yes.  Nothing matters to me anymore.  I just feel empty and dead inside. 
Same here. Listen to the song “Chemical Burns” by Sadistik and Eyedea. I think you would be able to relate 
Yes, I see what you mean. I used to draw and paint. I was getting quite good at it, painting portrets. Then with time I just lost all confidence and inspiration. Now I can´t even seem to care to pick up a pencil. 
Think less about your failings and the point of it all, and think about the feelings you used to get when you did paint. To look upon something and be proud that you did it. Do not compare the present to the past, because the present is what you make it. You are still you.
My entire life. Always thought 'It doesn't matter. I don't matter.'  I still don't understand how people even find a passion, how they get into things. 'What do you want out of life?' I don't know. I have always simply existed.
In the exact way that some mental conditions like depression f*ck your drive and your creativity and make you feel like a worthless piece of sh*t there are others which turn you into a hyperdriven motherf*cker that produces immense amounts of output. Say hello to hypomania :).  https://www.nytimes.com/2005/03/22/health/psychology/hypomanic-absolutely-but-oh-so-productive.html   
Is it worth finding some information on depression from reputable sources and print it out for them? Are they the sort of people who will listen to reason?
I’m not sure how they would react because I’m their “happy-go-lucky” daughter, but it’s definitely worth a shot if there’s a chance it’ll help them understand. Thanks for the suggestion
I feel like shit. Im drunk right now. I cant talk about my feelings when im sober. Im breaking down. Im losing friends because im depressed. I dont know why i wrote this. I guess i just need help.
Losing friends it shitty :-( I wish I had advice, but all I can say is that I think we both have a community in this subreddit.
'I don't understand this = this does not exist'  Its ridiculous how many people operate on this logic  Dang those people, people like this don't deserve to have an opinion
You could explain it like this... or his sister's a teenager and teenagers are shooting stupid.
You could explain it like this... or his sister's a teenager and teenagers are shooting stupid.
actually being at a certain age doesn't make you stupid, who knew
actually being at a certain age doesn't make you stupid, who knew
nah man, teenagers are shooting stupid  source: was teenager, had teenager friends, knew teenager people
Dang your sister
Don't actually do this though
Don't actually do this though
lol
Your sister is a shitty person.    Write her off.  She doesn't get to be in your life any longer until she learns how to behave like the kind of person who deserves to be in your life, aka an adult.  Often our depression is caused or worsened by who we choose to surround ourselves with or who we cannot escape because we are related to them.  Break free.  Best thing I ever did.
Don't do this out of anger or spite, do it out of love for yourself.
I think  idiot is better suited for this worthless human. 
Nowhere near the warmth and depth tho
Nowhere near the warmth and depth tho
Oh my god 😂
It took me 50 years and unbearable heartbreak to finally cut my brother and sister from my life. The relief was a rush of unburdening and strength I didn't know I had.  If a person is hurting you, you have to talk to them seriously, and then decide whether his/her presence is worthy of your time and attention.  Your sister was inappropriate and cruel. I don't the circumstances but if that is normal behavior for her...  Cut. Her. Off.  Be. Free!
I think I may have to do the same with my parents before long.
I think I may have to do the same with my parents before long.
It's not easy but removing toxic people is a healthy step!
Is your sister a psychologist? A psychiatrist? A good friend, even?  You don't have to value everything that's said to you by every single person around you. Seek help for yourself, please!
she's none of the above not even a friend i can trust .
she's none of the above not even a friend i can trust .
Then why do you waste time thinking about some words she mumbled?  There are plenty of people (and maybe even pet animals) out there willing to help you XD
I'm so sorry she's not supportive 😔 If you need to though, please vent on here. This is a safe space and I guarantee that you'll find support and understanding here 😉
i know this subreddit has done a lot to me things that i can never dream of paying back .
I'm sure she doesn't actually feel that way, and is just frustrated with the situation... depression is hard on family and friends because they can't understand why you cant just 'be happy.'    Those who've never had real depression just can't understand what it's like... I hope you are able to get through this. 
You're probably right about that. OP, I wouldn't try to let her bother you too much, but we all know that that's easier said than done. 
i cant say i flt the exact same way but i've been depressed since i was 7 due to sexual pyscical and emotional abuse, i feel like my childhood had beeen robbed
This post has opened my eyes in ways I did not expect,  I can see that people have been through a lot more than I have and they are making it regardless.  I find it very encouraging to know that people like yourself have beaten greater challenges than I
Saw it a while back. Thanks for posting.  Simply - accurate.
It actually brought me to tears the first time I read it,  last time I cried before this was when Ash died in front of Pikachu
It actually brought me to tears the first time I read it,  last time I cried before this was when Ash died in front of Pikachu
> Ash died in front of Pikachu  I have not seen Pokemon in a very, very long time...Are you serious? Did this actually happen? Holy shoot!
> Ash died in front of Pikachu  I have not seen Pokemon in a very, very long time...Are you serious? Did this actually happen? Holy shoot!
[When Mew fought Mewto they shooting killed him bro,  I was shocked](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=fgLw0zk0A4w)
Yah it made me cry as well,  because I could have written it it feels so accurate.  In a way depression forces me to cling to joy,  make me better.  It is not a net gain trust me I realize that
Depression is overwhelming, and the hopelessness leads to desperation. I'm desperate for anything to cling to, anything that might ease my suffering for a moment, even if it is fleeting. Sometimes I cling to people, sometimes substances, sometimes more tolerable feelings like anger.
Swimming or walking upstream implies you care.  Sometimes I just have no feelings at all.  It's like styrofoam or stale air.  
That is the scariest part, not having the instinct to swim anymore.
I like this, but it also eludes to relying on others to help your own state of mind.. At the end of the day everyone is responsible for themselves. You are the only one that can help you.
I can tell you, from personal experience: you just can't rely on yourself, if you want to get out of depression. You are your worst enemy.  I've been fighting on my own for years, refusing help, refusing to admit I had a problem. It drives you insane on the long run and it can cost you your life. You NEED help when dealing with depression.
I don't know, he just makes me enjoy the world more
His cheek bones make everything just that much better.
what show/ movie is that? 
I believe it's Batman Begins. Could be The Dark Knight but I don't think so.
Yeah I'm ashamed of things I've done.
I don't have pics but I hate who I've been and the things I've done in my past. At this point I just ignore they ever happened 
I wish I was ashamed of what I used to be, but I am ashamed of my current life.
I feel the same way. I seemed so much happier back then.. healthier, smilling.. now I'm deflated, tired, and close to giving up. How did it get this far? 
Yes exept little kid me
Yeah i envy her. She still had hope for the future
Yeah i envy her. She still had hope for the future
I know right? A great future ahead of him(or her) who could have imagened this is how it would turn out.
The past makes you who you are now. Think about the good things that happened, not the bad.
> The past makes you who you are now  One more reason to hate it.
I'm not ashamed of the things I did in my past. I'm ashamed of the things I DIDN'T do in the past. I just... let shot happen. That's a mistake I'll never make again.
Same here. Problem is for me it's too little to late.
That was so beautiful.  I desperately want to find someone who can understand how I feel and this story portraying two people who understand each finding each other in such unfortunate circumstances was just so emotionally intense to me.  Thank you for this.
Hey.  I'm right here.  We're right here.
Hey.  I'm right here.  We're right here.
Yeah but I mean someone in real life who I can connect with. The internet doesn't really provide that same kind of connection.
Is this true? 
It may not be since the user seems to have a history of posting stories and one was explicitly lagged realistic fiction, but I mean one can dream. The magic is never in the truth 
Is this true? 
I hope so, but it seems like something that should be on r/thathappened
I hope so, but it seems like something that should be on r/thathappened
I think it's pretty clearly fiction, it's kinda written like a poem.
This literally made me cry because of how much I can relate
Same minus the slitting my wrists
This story got me crying out here
Same here
Stop making me tear up!! I'm at work!!!
oh my god xD same. last working day this year
I dunno. When every second of your life is filled with an overwhelming sense of dread and hopelessness, and you cannot even dream of doing all the things most people around you can do, I would say that depression is beating the shit out if you pretty bad.  No matter how much you try to put a positive spin on things, life with depression is still miserable. It feels like you're losing at everything. And maybe that's the truth.
Of course it is. Its a debilitating, deadly disease. Thats why just surviving it on a daily basis is a win. 
I'd consider suicide to be a massive win for me.  I'm losing because I'm too weak to find a way to accomplish that.  Worst thing is seeing the only way out and not being able to do it...
'Worst thing is seeing the only way out and not being able to do it...'  YESS. That's how I feel. 
Wow it's exceptionally bleak up in here today.
What were you expecting from this subreddit?
I hate being like this, it gives the impression of, 'you cant be depressed, youre always joking etc.'  \*sigh\*
I can relate. I sometimes deny the existence of my depression just because I'm laughing, joking around and what not around my friends.
I can relate. I sometimes deny the existence of my depression just because I'm laughing, joking around and what not around my friends.
I still do it. Whenever I am feeling down and someone asks if I am OK, I lie that I didn't sleep well. Was in counselling and therapy for a year and have yet to tell anyone. Everyone thinks I am the happy go lucky, always happy guy and hence they will always confide their problems to me.
'Youve got a good job, friends, live at home...how can you be depressed?'.
It's so hard not to say 'Brain chemical imbalance,you jackass.'  Isn't it?
It's so hard not to say 'Brain chemical imbalance,you jackass.'  Isn't it?
Oh yes! :D 
I have a really nice, genuine smile and I currently work the front desk at a gym. So I smile and greet everyone and I get lots of compliments about my smile and how happy I always am. Last week, I was in a state of anxiety/depression NONSTOP. When people complimented me, I just wanted to scream, 'it's a front! I'm broken!' but instead I just said, 'I'm not always happy, but I try my best.' Sometimes I feel like a fake.
Me, too I work in guest relations and hence smile and have been complimented by people. My friends like to think of me as their rock to rely on, I am so broken inside that I just don't have the guts to tell anyone how I am really feeling
Yeah, basically. And in the mix I'll throw in a couple dozen self degrading jokes here and there.  'Ho ho boy do I ever want to kill myself!'  'Haha wow I'm a shooting idiot!'  'I am dying inside. :)'
Same dude... And no one would even dream of thinking you're serious because you're the happy person.
Same dude... And no one would even dream of thinking you're serious because you're the happy person.
I have a few friends that do this and anytime I've asked them about it they say they're fine. I know they aren't. 
yep.  And then I go home and cry and take a few days away from the world.  I actually do feel pretty happy while I am out there being funny and social, but it also drains all my energy.
I find that it's a break from the depression, as soon as you're home again it comes back, it's a strange thing.
I find that it's a break from the depression, as soon as you're home again it comes back, it's a strange thing.
yep, immediately
That's perfectly normal for someone going through depression, i think most people are like this to hide their true feelings. I was the same when i was suffering. But keep your head up man hope you beat it soon
Hey, thanks dude
Reminded me of this. Heard joke once: Man goes to doctor. Says he's depressed. Says life seems harsh and cruel. Says he feels all alone in a threatening world where what lies ahead is vague and uncertain. Doctor says, 'Treatment is simple. Great clown Pagliacci is in town tonight. Go and see him. That should pick you up.' Man bursts into tears. Says, 'But doctor...I am Pagliacci'.
Love that one
You're not the only one. Done this my whole life. I think it might be because I can pretend to be somebody I'm not, somebody normal.  Somehow I've managed to turn social interaction into an escape of sorts. But don't let me fool you, I also suffer from severe social anxiety, so it's actually painful and nerve wracking most of the time, but it's the only time I can distance myself from my problems.
Up until this post I've felt so shit about saying I have social anxiety while still making people laugh and such... Felt like my feelings weren't valid. I'm sorry you have to experience this. 
Sure, being funny(or obnoxious or inflammatory) can be very enjoyable and distracting. And nobody actually gets to see how you feel. Or as I found out in jail recently even just sitting there and shooting howling like a wolf or talking to yourself in a clown voice or spending 5 hours in a row loudly making up used car commercials helps with depression.
Can I ask what you were in jail for?
Everybody is mostly good - I truly believe that. Imagine for a moment that you have the ability to brighten up someone's day just by saying hi.  Say hi to someone and watch them light up the way you did.
I've never really looked at it that way, that maybe other people would value something so small as much as I do. I'll do that next time, thanks
I've never really looked at it that way, that maybe other people would value something so small as much as I do. I'll do that next time, thanks
You share more in common with those around you than you know. They long for connection like you do. People are just sometimes shy but the good news is that you don't have to be. Start with hi and go from there.
To this day, I remember back in middle school English class when a very pretty blonde asked me 'what's up?'. I tried so hard to be cool and nonchalant even though it excited me and caught me off guard... 'The sky' I muttered with probably an eye roll. She turned her attention so fast and never talked to me again. I still cringe at that moment.  Turns out girls aren't 100% crazy... there is a bit of a difference between confidence and being an idiot.
That's my favorite dad joke. She's not worth your time, friend.
It doesn't even have to be something a person says.   In high school, I was walking and sort of had that 'which way should I go' moment with my crush. Our bodies were in very close proximity to each other, and since she is shorter than me, I looked down to say sorry. Then right there, I saw her give me the cutest shooting smile as she looked up to me. Literally brightened my day and made me all jittery and happy for the next few days.
That's really sweet, I used to get that feeling every time I saw my crush. I hardly ever saw her, but seeing or even getting a text from her made me so happy
That's really sweet, I used to get that feeling every time I saw my crush. I hardly ever saw her, but seeing or even getting a text from her made me so happy
Ah, you already made it further than I ever did by texting with her :(
Ah, you already made it further than I ever did by texting with her :(
Well, I used to. She's not actually around anymore. You'll find someone that makes you feel that way again sometime, I promise
Girls used to say hi to me too sometimes  .    ^^^then ^^^burst ^^^into ^^^laughter ^^^and ^^^make ^^^quiet ^^^sarcastic ^^^remarks ^^^among ^^^themselves
Or when girls talk to you, and it's only because you look stereotypical nerd and they just want help in assignments :(  
I'm really glad for you. I understand that feeling well and when someone acknowledges you it's just something really nice and special. Enjoy the feeling and I hope it happens to you more! 
Thank you (: I hope you have a wonderful day
I've gotten to the point where people only like me for my brain. It sucks :(
I don't know you personally, but I know there's more to love than your brain. You'll find someone who values you for everything you are, don't give up <3
I don't know you personally, but I know there's more to love than your brain. You'll find someone who values you for everything you are, don't give up <3
I hope you're right OP, thank you
Yeah.  I'm either waiting for things to go wrong or waiting for the current disaster to pass before the next one arrives.  And I don't know why I'm waiting.
You described anxiety perfectly. 
Was literally just talking about this with my therapist yesterday. i feel like I'm constantly waiting for each thing to be over but I'm not even waiting FOR anything
This. So much. It's like I know *something* should be done about the way I think and the things I should be trying to achieve. But what really *are* those things? And why can't I see how they're worth trying for at the moment? It's like trying to run in a dream and you can't really move, even though you know you need to get somewhere fast.
[Waiting Around To Die](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=SDymc0CJ6pQ)
Townes understands, man.
Came here to post this...nice to see that there are other Townes people in this sub! (: 
It is extremely nice to see that. Townes is incredibly important to me. 
Yeah, I'm mainly waiting for a steady life by the time I'm 21. Problem is that I'm 23.. Ship has sailed, but I can visualize a steady life within my grasp but I'm not sure how to pass up the conflicts inbetween. Transferring to a university, finding a job, paying off the student loans that I'm eventually gonna take out, and getting my eyes/health fixed. Well I guess I'll just cross that bridge when I get to it huh?
You'll never get to that bridge if you don't travel.  Source: Almost 40.  Still no bridge.
You'll never get to that bridge if you don't travel.  Source: Almost 40.  Still no bridge.
Great point! It took me four years to actually begin traveling and realize that I'm much closer now than I was when I was sitting around mulling over it 
Great point! It took me four years to actually begin traveling and realize that I'm much closer now than I was when I was sitting around mulling over it 
The journey of a thousand steps eh?  I've made progress and trust me, if you can look back and go 'i'm better now than i was then.' It makes not quite being where you want to be better.
That really gives me hope bro! I always felt it was too late for me. Seemed like even if I finished I wouldn't get a job because a 22 year old graduate seems more desirable than a 27-28 year old graduate, but you've done it! Thanks for the hope man
Any time bud 
That and just wanting things to be over with. Get up Monday morning? Dang I wish it was the end of the day. End of the day? Dang, wish it was morning already. Tuesday morning? Dang can't wait until the weekend. Friday night? Dang nothing to but wait round til monday. rinse and repeat. 
You described me so aptly that I almost cried. Heh.
And then people will say that you have to be the one to motivate yourself, but the problem is that this doesn't come natural like it does for others and so it becomes a matter of deciding whether it's worth trying or not.
That's the hardest part for me. 'Why even bother doing this? Will it even fix anything?'
>has a fiancee  :(
That's not nice. 
I don't get invited to anything nor really have friends anymore. On one hand it's nice that there's no pressure for parties on the other it can get boring. Why can't I find some gamer friends instead I want to have a lan party or something like that :/
I'd like some gamer friends too you know :) I don't go to parties because I don't drink and I love video games :)
I'd like some gamer friends too you know :) I don't go to parties because I don't drink and I love video games :)
Yeah lan parties sound like a lot of fun, like playing mario kart on a big screen or some shooter lan sounds like a great time :)
God I hate that. I get asked what's wrong everytime I go to a party. It's just.. what my face looks like.
I literally started to say that to people. I'll just be like this is how my face look, it's not going to change no matter how many times you ask. That tends to shut strangers up at least. 
What's it like being at a party? I've never been to one. This is a serious comment btw. I really want to know what its like. 
It depends on the party.  It could be anything from a few friends chilling on the couch with some drinks and light music in the background, to a full-on rave.  The former is more pleasant, because if you're not so much in the mood to socialize, you can find spots to get away and chill on your own, or just chat one-on-one with someone.  Houses with a few rooms are nice for that.
I went to a party with my bf and his friends. I could not drink (because of my antidepressants), but I was chill and having a good time, sitting at the corner, drinking lemonade, browsing through the cookbook and enjoying looking at friends having great time. And all would be perfect, if not EVERY one of them came to me every 15 minutes and asked WHATS WRONG.  I was really annoyed after a while and left. 
That's how my night was. Between the previous night and last night, I had drank a lot and I felt buzzed last night so I stopped drinking.  My friend asked me every 5 min if I needed a drink and what was wrong, so much that everyone heard and was like 'just get her a beer so she can chill'. I was sitting on a couch happily with a dog. I don't know how much more chill I could have been
That's how my night was. Between the previous night and last night, I had drank a lot and I felt buzzed last night so I stopped drinking.  My friend asked me every 5 min if I needed a drink and what was wrong, so much that everyone heard and was like 'just get her a beer so she can chill'. I was sitting on a couch happily with a dog. I don't know how much more chill I could have been
Yes holy shit finding the family pet and passing out next to it was the best part of the party for me
I hate going to parties because I don't drink and everyone asks what's wrong with me 
lol I'm the opposite. I don't particularly like parties because anxiety but I will sure as shoot drink your alcohol
People feel threatened by it, I hate it. People are so selfish. My personal choices literally cause them emotional harm because they aren't internally self sustaining and rely on outer things to determine their self worth.  I feel so alone.
What's even more gross is that it's more acceptable to drink than it is to smoke and they are both just as damaging to your body.
See that's the thing. I was talking. I was playing beer pong. I was like laughing along with stories and stuff. It's not like I was being antisocial or anything but my friend just kept bothering me about how I was doing.  I had been fine, but after people after you a few dozen times, it starts to get annoying and ruin your mood. 
>but after people after you a few dozen times, it starts to get annoying and ruin your mood.  That's the worst part, that it turns into a self-fulfilling thing after constant questioning. Then it turns into 'SEE, there is something wrong' even though (I) specifically said nothing was wrong and to stop asking.
You should practice smiling. It's like an optimism exercise. Smiling in social events can be helpful even if you do a fake one.
I was doing that the whole night :(
At least you guys get invited to parties. Last time i went to a party was my cousins birthday a few years ago. I ended up throwing up in front of everyone from drinking so much cause i was sitting alone and no one would talk to me
Do you live in Australia? If so I can see what I can do? 
Is there a name for this theory? I'd like to read more about it.
I expanded on this theory awhile ago, you can find it here:  [**Part 1**](https://www.reddit.com/r/IAmA/comments/2wzg62/iama_man_that_was_dead_twice_about_2_minutes_at_a/cow49mi)   [**Part 2**](https://www.reddit.com/r/IAmA/comments/2wzg62/iama_man_that_was_dead_twice_about_2_minutes_at_a/cow4a2w)
I know exactly what you mean man a lot of times I have daydreams about dying in a car accident or taking a bullet from a campus gunman.  the uncertainty of after death is huge for me like if theres a hell. and yea I couldn't leave my parents with that so relatable 
This is exactly what I go through too.  Like those are the two major scenarios that I think about 
Anyone else fantasize about being the hero in this case? Pushing a kid out of the way of a speeding drunk driver or maybe tackling that gunman and bleeding out after the cops get him? Then everyone would remember you as a hero; the only thing you have left is your legacy and now no one is going to know about or remember the sad, broken person you really were.
I often wish for a cause worth dying for
Why can't you live the same way? Don't sacrifice yourself for a child, but volunteer with one. 
Damn good question and point. Maybe because we feel as if I have other obligations and we can't make time and with this, our inner desires for it to end are achieved through a blaze of glory. But, like everything else, it's probably just me trying to make excuses for myself. 
I can empathise with that, the guilt of being the intentional cause of my little brother's grief if I killed myself has stopped me multiple times.    I used to want cancer or some other terminal illness.  Someone I knew got cancer and it wasn't fair because they wanted to live.
That's what I really want. Something terminal. I feel like, ironically, it would make me live life to the fullest during that short time. Like, I would actually really look forward to dying and it might make me happy for some time.   It always seems to be people who love life who get sick, unfortunately. 
No. I'd rather just get cancer. 
[deleted]    ^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^0.1594   > [What is this?](https://pastebin.com/64GuVi2F/78665)
[deleted]    ^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^0.1594   > [What is this?](https://pastebin.com/64GuVi2F/78665)
Good for them. That's not what will happen to me. 
Damnit. Should have read this before I called in sick at work. 
Take advantage of your day off! Go do something that you enjoy. :) 
Take advantage of your day off! Go do something that you enjoy. :) 
Well I was planning to spend the entire day meditating and watching Star Trek :)
Well I was planning to spend the entire day meditating and watching Star Trek :)
I seriously wish I could give gold off mobile.  *brofist*
HOLY SHIT, IT'S MY CAKEDAY, TOO?!  Today is officially awesome.
You are officially awesome.
You are officially awesome.
Seconded. Keep those endorphins up and depression will cut down its visitation schedule. Dang you depression, you sack of squirrel diarrhea
I was gonna say HAPPY CAKEDAY! but You go! I woke up yesterday and got shit done, actually turned out the lights and fell asleep around 11pm yesterday (instead of my usual 3am). woke up today, made muffins for my kids for breakfast.  *Higs Fives* Dang Depression!
Thanks! I went to bed early last night, too. It makes a huge difference, huh?  And shoot yeah, muffins! :)
Thanks! I went to bed early last night, too. It makes a huge difference, huh?  And shoot yeah, muffins! :)
the nights I cant fall asleep it takes me days to not feel like crud again. the nights I go to bed when my kids do and fall asleep, I get so much done the next day!  I am no where near running a 5k, but I CAN get a couple of loads of laundry done lol.
This is just awesome. Happy cake day!!! Today's not my cake day but it is my bday. It's going to be a great day.   Dang you depression! Go home, you're drunk :p
Happy birthday! :)
But it's the truth - there's only so long you can try run and hide from the truth. I don't care about myself, nobody else does... so what's the point?
depression lies. It tells you you're worthless, it tells you life is *only* pain.  None of it is true. You are essentially good enough, just the way you are... and in between all of the moments of pain in life are little bits of joy.  The best way I have found to combat my own depression is to collect 'joy sand' and keep track of it. It might be hard to see piece by piece, but it's amazing when you add it together. 
Wish I could feel this way.
You can – I've gone through extremely dark periods where I thought I could never feel this good. And without a doubt, I'll have more of those bad times, so I'm enjoying this little bit of motivation and happiness and much as possible. :)   I hope things get better for you!
All I can say is that with this post you put a smile on my face. There is, indeed, hope. Thank you.
Glad to hear it! :)   And the strange part is that with all the shit depression's put me through, this good day means so much more than it would to a person who has never experienced depression. I've learned that I really have to enjoy days like today. 
Start by making a technology review blog. Work your way up from there!
OP: if you need any help with setting up a technology review blog and marketing it, I'd be glad to help.  It could be a good way to get started and make an impact/improve things.  Blogs I've started have been quite popular.
Congratulations!  /u/reddog323 suggested that getting a domain and hosting is really cheap these days and that you can use that as your starting place for your company.  I manage a web hosting business and have a deal for you.  If you're willing to make a step towards your dreams, I'll register one domain for you and give you free hosting for a year.  PM me if you're interested.
Wow, this means a lot. I will definitely hit you up sometime in the near future.  Thanks for everything man!
just sleeping is okay, but being permanently asleep AND seeing dreams would be the best thing ever.  I have my own imaginary world in my dreams where something new always happens and, surprisingly, 99% of my dreams have been very positive and normal even though I'm depressed.
I sometimes revisit the same places when i sleep, that is my far the best times of my entire month when that happens however brief.
I sometimes revisit the same places when i sleep, that is my far the best times of my entire month when that happens however brief.
in my dreams I'm on a planet that is very similar to Earth (nature, architecture and all) but distinctly different and there is no humans because they all mysteriously died out and all that's left is an automatic robot force that keeps repairing the infrastructure as it decays. There are even gigantic cargo ships cruising the oceans transporting resources to keep the whole thing going, very surreal.  Really fascinating world to visit and travel, too bad I can't stay in it forever.
I love that feeling of not being able to keep my eyes open. It is pure bliss just feeling that extreme wash of tiredness wash over you.   That's how I'm working on driving myself. Keeping myself working until I can get that awesome feeling as I'm going to bed. 
The problem is that depression often comes with anxiety and while you feel exhausted, your mind doesn't switch off and you can't sleep. There are some days I just wish I could sleep the whole day, because I'm apathetic and exhausted, but even so I can't sleep.
The problem is that depression often comes with anxiety and while you feel exhausted, your mind doesn't switch off and you can't sleep. There are some days I just wish I could sleep the whole day, because I'm apathetic and exhausted, but even so I can't sleep.
Yeah, I have anxiety and ADHD, so I don't sleep well. But once I got older and hit puberty like the third time (Late confusing bloomer) I started wanting to sleep no matter how anxious I was. 
I'm 33 and feel the same way. Do get blood work and such done but don't be surprised either if they don't find anything. Depression itself can cause that (as I've learned after trying to find something physically wrong with me). Makes sense to me because it's very draining to fight yourself every waking moment. 
Yeah I'm getting my annual blood work soon and usually nothing is wrong (except one really fat year I had high cholesterol).   People also recommended getting a sleep study done, perhaps I will ask my doctor about that too.   It's at the point where I almost hope it's a physical problem because that seems like it would be easier to solve than if it's just due to depression.
I'd rather be dead tbh
Often i wish someone would push me infront of a train by accident because i wont do it myself.... I think i know how you feel. That might sounds psycho and shooted up but the sentence kill me is way to often in my thoughts 
What makes you say that?
Well, honestly I don't want to deal with living with depression anymore.
How come?
because I can't cope anymore
I like sleeping too, mostly because I imagine that is what being dead feels like.
Yep, i call it passive suicide
Playing a video game works well to make you stop thinking about stuff, but it's only temporary. 
And Netflix. 
I hear you. Seeing a doctor or getting a sleep apnea test is a good idea, but it did nothing for me. Granted the fact that I spend most of my time sitting in front of a computer probably doesn't help.
I work in an office so I have no choice but to sit in front of a computer 8+ hours a day. Funny how doing next to nothing physically can be so draining.
I can relate to this. Myn idiot stoped working years ago. I'm always in pain somewhere, no energy and I just want to close my eyes for the last time. I've had enough. I'm only 26
Those last few lines....I'm 33 and man that's me too. I'm female but I can say I've lost my sex drive entirely. Old injuries ache regularly and I'm so ready to close my eyes for that last time. People would argue with me but I feel like I've had a good run. 
Awful isn't it! I highly doubt I'll reach your age. 
I think I'll see 34 (Im not that far from it) but I'm starting to have doubts about 35. 34 is a nice long life right? Heh. 
I have the same problem as you. You could be having iron deficiency. 
For someone dealing with depression, sleeping or that aching need to sleep comes with the territory. 
I think you're missing the point. 
It was a failed attempt at humor.
Exactly! Effort is the achievement, not results. I recently thought of it like, if one person starts farther away than the other, but they both cross the finish line at the same time, one of them ran faster.
Thanks for understanding man. Not many people get it, but you do. I'm happy to see you do, and that tackling depression is understood by more than one person. Just thanks. 
Congrats! I remember how happy I was when I got mine last year.
Congrats to you also! Such a huge accomplishment and goal attained! 
I get you, I mean do people think that going around doctors and counselling every 2 weeks is my favourite hobby or something?
Or taking pills everyday... My God. Hell yeah. I totally understand. 
Or taking pills everyday... My God. Hell yeah. I totally understand. 
Same... Crap I think I missed my dosage yesterday... Oh well. Like yeah do you guys think I take meds for fun or something?
I always get the lazy comments. Do they actually think we want to just lay in bed most of the day doing nothing and struggling to even eat or shower? Some people actually think that this is what we choose to do. How unobservant and clueless people can be...
Same, I'd love to be productive again...
'Everyone feels down and has bad days'   I've been having a bad day 3 years now.
I had someone say this a few days ago. They don't seem to be able to grasp that I feel depressed littleraly all of the time.
yeah I hate that as well! the get a grip part... if someone could tell me how... 
Same
I know, right? I'd love to spend my $50 co-pay on literally anything else. People get annoyed at things they don't understand. My whole family is filled with type-A personalities. All very successful, and I get so much crap from them that it's all in my head.   It sucks, bad. I totally hear where you're coming from. 
I get what you mean, my family is extremely dissapointed with me but I've learnt that I need to stop trying to live up to their standards. Right now I'm proud of myself for still being alive and sort of managing to look after myself.
I get what you mean, my family is extremely dissapointed with me but I've learnt that I need to stop trying to live up to their standards. Right now I'm proud of myself for still being alive and sort of managing to look after myself.
Good for you, that's an awesome outlook. I compare my life to others way too often. 
Good for you, that's an awesome outlook. I compare my life to others way too often. 
Same, I littleraly just stopped caring though.
'it's all in your head'  No shit, and my constant cough is all in my lungs. Your point?
>'it's all in your head'    With all of the interesting depression research lately looking at the roles of gut microbiome and systemic inflammation, I'd bet it won't be long until that statement is disproven. 
>'it's all in your head'    With all of the interesting depression research lately looking at the roles of gut microbiome and systemic inflammation, I'd bet it won't be long until that statement is disproven. 
Great point.  I'm a neuroscientist, and I get *so tired* of the use of the term 'mental illness' or 'psychological disorder.' Uh, everything is biology, people.  What are we, Cartesian Dualists and our magical pineal glands interact with the ether?!?  It's a BRAIN DISEASE (plus, as you point out, likely a systemic disease).   It's a disease and deserves to be treated like one.  I sometimes wish it presented with a rash or something so people would make the connection.  
Yes, whenever anyone even starts saying 'Have you tried...?' there's a 99.99% chance that I already have.
>'Have you tried...?' there's a 99.99% chance that I already have.    Ooh ooh I've got one I've got one! Have you tried Botox to paralyze your ability to frown? Lollllll (for real though I have legit tried that). 
I don't think some people understand the difference between sadness and depression. 
In their defense, the difference isn't explained very well by most depressed people, and those commercials for antidepressants.
In their defense, the difference isn't explained very well by most depressed people, and those commercials for antidepressants.
Oh sorry, I meant people who have never really been   severely depressed/depressed before. 
Yes. And it also feels as if I'm not 'allowed' to feel this way, as if people think I can snap out of it whenever I want and just feel *better* . 
If we could feel better whenever we wanted we would all just choose happiness though, right?
Yup. Like my grandparents seem to think my generation is lazy as it is, and I seem to solidify that ideal by being 'lazy' myself. 
My mum says the same thing 'Back in my day this was just called laziness, now it's' Depression''.
My mum says the same thing 'Back in my day this was just called laziness, now it's' Depression''.
I mean, she might be right. I've heard that back in the day (my dad was born in the 50s) people weren't so open and tolerant about mental illness. 'He's not ill, just lazy!'
I mean, she might be right. I've heard that back in the day (my dad was born in the 50s) people weren't so open and tolerant about mental illness. 'He's not ill, just lazy!'
True I get that, I guess pure 'laziness' doesn't include suicidal thoughts and low mood in the package
I'm sorry, it looks like it's been a long ride for you (if that phrase makes any sense, sorry I'm tired). Your post gave me quite a bit of encouragement to keep going. Best of luck btw :) I hope things turn out well for you. Keep sharing your experience and don't be ashamed of it!
My guy! 
What if depressed people literally turned blue? Now there's a symptom!
But then how would we hide the crushing weight of our existence and continue to drag ourselves through each day pretending everything is okay? 
I'm about to turn 28 and have thrown away even more time than you.   I can offer no advice or help because I'm an even bigger shootup. You're not alone.  Cheers!
Dang I'm 42, single and live with my parents doing a job I hate that makes little money. Try to beat that!
I know the feeling. I can have the greatest day but after everything's done it always ends with me lying in bed alone with only my thoughts for company. The cycle continues.
Fernando Pessoa wrote well about this in his  'The Book Of Disquiet' , 26[24] 'At the end of this day there remains what remained yesterday and what will remain tomorrow: the insatiable , unquantifiable longing to be both the same and other.'  This feeling never seems to go away, always punishing inside, because I do not yet know how to turn loneliness into solitude.
Damn it this sub is messing with my head. It's like coming in here to read my own thoughts.
Me too,the title really got me
Damn it this sub is messing with my head. It's like coming in here to read my own thoughts.
Same thing here man. If you ever need to talk PM me.
My therapist says I need to change my thoughts. Oh ok. 
Oh what a great idea! Why haven't I thought of this before?
I'm the complete opposite. I will say about 5 words during my whole school day. But then have extensive conversations with myself. I talk to myself all the time. It's probably unhealthy. Ah well everyone around me doesn't understand me so wth else shall I do? I have no close friends, which I can really open up to. I have no friends, no close friends, no distant friends. None. Zero. Zilch. So fck it. I'll open up to myself.
I do this all the time too. And I find myself often pretending that someone that I actually know is in the room with me (like a close friend or a crush I'm too afraid to talk to). I creep myself out with it sometimes and I'm glad no one has caught me doing it.
I do this all the time too. And I find myself often pretending that someone that I actually know is in the room with me (like a close friend or a crush I'm too afraid to talk to). I creep myself out with it sometimes and I'm glad no one has caught me doing it.
In fact; that is exactly what I do. I'll pretend I'm sitting next to someone I know (Like I know their name and they're probably in my class for something) And I'll literally have a full out conversation with myself. I will speak what they would say and I would reply back. I would literally. Very literally. Talk to the air. But I doesn't feel like that. 
Out loud or in your head?
When I know; no one can hear me. Out loud. 
After reading most of the comments I feel like we should all just hang out lol.
I've been here 10 minutes. Cried over a post because of how much it relates to my depression, sent a msg to a stranger, commented my heart out AND now I wish I could just meet all of you...Depression sucks, but knowing there's others who are like you makes the world a little less lonely.
I don't really have any friends so I wouldn't know how I act towards them 
Hey bud I'll be your friend
When I'm with my friends I 'think' I feel happy, then I go home and I feel alone and sad, and I'm alone with thoughts like 'My friends don't really like me', etc etc.
I feel the same way. It really eats me up inside. I'm worried it's going to get worse and ruin the friendships I've managed to create.
Yes, i thought this too when I read it. I say that exact phrase to myself multiple times a day
That and 'why am I like this@ run through my mind daily
I'm the opposite lol. When I'm around people I clam up and get extremely shy. I also struggle making eye contact. With friends its a little less severe but its still hard. When I'm alone however I laugh, talk shit/talk on xbox, and open up way more. Theres probably something wrong with me.
Introversion
I don't have any friends so I wouldn't know. Probably, part of the reason why I'm depressed to begin with.
I'll be your friend :)
I totally feel this. I often find myself forcing my face into expressions of amazement, enthusiasm, or shock when people tell their stories... only to feel bored and tired by it all. I wish people just said the things they said on Reddit in real life... the place would be a lot more shooting interesting.
Sometimes I genuinely laugh or show emotions with friends and fam during conversations..But there's this constant weight or cloud that dulls things over..Sometimes it's just me knowing that I can only be less depressed (not necessarily happy) for that small instance, before I get yanked back into my own dark abyss.
This scares me so much. The only thing that gets me through each day is believing that everything will get better and I'll sort through all my issues and be content with my life. 
It isn't like that for everyone. I live with depression every day and my life is pretty good. I work super hard to keep myself from getting into depressive ruts but it doesn't always work. I live my life trying to make my worst suicidal days feel like a tiny fraction of my life.   So, for me, at least, it did get better. But it didn't get easy. 
It isn't like that for everyone. I live with depression every day and my life is pretty good. I work super hard to keep myself from getting into depressive ruts but it doesn't always work. I live my life trying to make my worst suicidal days feel like a tiny fraction of my life.   So, for me, at least, it did get better. But it didn't get easy. 
That is getting used to depression. Being depression free is the goal. Man, I miss my happy self
That is getting used to depression. Being depression free is the goal. Man, I miss my happy self
No, that's managing depression. It's an illness like my high blood pressure and asthma, just way harder to control. My life is generally pretty happy. 
> How the hell are you still alive after 20 years?  I shot myself when I was trying to commit suicide. It didn't kill me but was a nightmare to go through. I've been afraid of the same thing happening, so I've just been too scared to try again. However, I've researched much better ways to do it. Turns out that a lot of people shoot themselves and live. 
Yeah, the gun jerks. People don't account for that.
> How the hell are you still alive after 20 years? You must be one tough SOB  Me too. Make it 40 years of shit. I'm very tough, when not curled in a ball, crying for hours. Haha... my joke for the day. But I'm serious.
I've been there. It's sad that you have to make it into a joke for people, and even then they would never understand the pain. Take your experience and apply it to other going through the same thing. You may feel better having a positive impact on someone else's life. You may find some purpose in it, you may not. Time goes on regardless. I wish there was an answer.
Yeah. I don't get it either.   Someone recently told me that I basically chose to be depressed. That its my fault I'm miserable and my fault I didn't see a doctor to magically fix it.  I'm just so tired of all sorts of shit. I'm 30 yrs old and I just dont want to be around anymore...
I don't understand how anyone could think someone would choose to be depressed.  I'm 27 in a few weeks and I know how you feel. 
I don't understand how anyone could think someone would choose to be depressed.  I'm 27 in a few weeks and I know how you feel. 
Straight up ignorance is all i can figure. why would anyone enjoy being miserable? its absolutely insane logic...Its not even logic. Its just idiotic non-sense.
yes, i feel like i have more suicidal ideations nowadays
I feel numb most of the time, and time after time I care less about the people I'm leaving behind.   I wish you luck.
I feel numb most of the time, and time after time I care less about the people I'm leaving behind.   I wish you luck.
Thanks. U too.
See, this is precisely why I don't like positivity. It's baseless. Sure, things are going great for whoever's offering it. But that's irrelevant. 
It's like those guys who make it in the NBA and say 'all you have to do is work hard and never give up!' who don't realize that 99.99% of the people who do exactly that still don't become pro basketball players. 
It's like those guys who make it in the NBA and say 'all you have to do is work hard and never give up!' who don't realize that 99.99% of the people who do exactly that still don't become pro basketball players. 
Even if you make it in the game, there are precious few slots at the top.
> get your affairs in order and do it  That's what I'm doing. Cleaning up my shit so I don't leave a huge mess for other people to deal with. 
Same here.
The two times I tried to commit suicide I used pills but someone got me to the hospital in time both times. Every day of my life I think about how much I wish I would have succeeded, if only for the fact that I would have at least succeeded at *something*, finally. The last time I tried to die was 15 years ago. Nothing has changed, nothing had gotten better. Things just either change laterally or get worse.
So what keeps you from trying again? Hoping things will improve, or not hurting people around you, or you just figure someone will 'rescue' you if you try again?
So what keeps you from trying again? Hoping things will improve, or not hurting people around you, or you just figure someone will 'rescue' you if you try again?
Number 2, I have two kids and a wife.
What steps have you taken to make things better?
Everything I could think of and do. I quit trying a few years ago though after none of it worked. Much of it just made things worse. 
Everything I could think of and do. I quit trying a few years ago though after none of it worked. Much of it just made things worse. 
The problem with the 'everything' answear is that it is incorrect. We didn't do everything, there is always a new perspective to approach the problem! We might not see it, but others might help us.
The problem with the 'everything' answear is that it is incorrect. We didn't do everything, there is always a new perspective to approach the problem! We might not see it, but others might help us.
'Everything,' is a big word. That said, at what point can we just say that, on balance, being depressed sucks great green donkeyn idiots and the act of being there for someone (actually reaching into their lives and spending time with them) is frowned upon and a complete pain in the ass? I don't mean dwell on it. I mean just shooting acknowledge it?!
Oh thank god. I always figured things wouldn't change and honestly this is kinda reassuring.
My favorite is how so many people said that I'm alive because 'god has a plan for you' or 'your purpose on Earth is still unfulfilled'.   Unless god's purpose for me was to slowly decay while getting nothing done, and slowly losing my ability to love anyone or anything - then it must be bullshit. But hey, they did get me to suffer through another 20 years of misery, so yay!
My favorite is how so many people said that I'm alive because 'god has a plan for you' or 'your purpose on Earth is still unfulfilled'.   Unless god's purpose for me was to slowly decay while getting nothing done, and slowly losing my ability to love anyone or anything - then it must be bullshit. But hey, they did get me to suffer through another 20 years of misery, so yay!
Right and what's worse is how condescending it comes across. As if they have the answers and know I'll improve. And that I just need one good day to pull myself up. They don't know how that I won't remain like this for the rest of my of life, because its all I know.
Right and what's worse is how condescending it comes across. As if they have the answers and know I'll improve. And that I just need one good day to pull myself up. They don't know how that I won't remain like this for the rest of my of life, because its all I know.
'You just need to put a little more effort in'. Why do people explain absolutely *everything* away as laziness?!!
This is strangely comforting to know that other people had difficulty after an attempt.  I'm having a lot of trouble coming back from my attempt.  Misery loves company, I guess?
I tend to isolate, actually. I do kind of secretly revel in the *thought* of other people being miserable, but I don't actually want that for most anyone.   Sorry you are having trouble. How did you try to kill yourself?
Yeah, I wish I could die in a way so my sister got insurance money and didn't have to think it was suicide. Maybe I'll save up to have a hitman take me out :oP  Sorry you made it, I guess. How bad did the car accident shoot you up?
Thanks, I guess!  The accident is mostly healed now - the only lasting damage is hearing loss, memory problems, and a bit of a palsy. It's not bad, I don't notice it most of the time. On the plus side, since my head needed shaving to repair the skull fracture, I've now got the short haircut I always wanted but was too wussy to go for, and so I've finally started triggering lesbians' gaydars.
If I need to choose between definite depression followed by a chance of happiness and nothing, I'd choose nothing. What is the point, going through sadness to get to some potential happiness that could perhaps cancel out the sadness? I just don't have the guts to end it...
Most of what stops me is how horrible it was the first time (actually 2 times) I tried. I'm scared I'll just survive again and be brain damaged or crippled or even more disfigured.
I'm much younger than you.  However, I tell people the last sentence a LOT, and it honestly makes life so much harder knowing that if you are suffering in any way you become invisible.  You articulated what I think all the time so much more concisely than I could.
Lol, maybe I should write a book about being depressed. Though that's been done a thousand times by people the world actually cares about. 
That's what I've been worrying about lately, I don't ever feel better for more than a few days. I always come back to the agony. At what point is this actually worth it.
I honestly don't know. I think it only becomes worth it for some. Either luck steps in, or they are able to figure out something they care about enough to fix themselves, I guess. The rest of us quietly disappear and history never even takes note. 
I think my depression will never go away. Things get better and then they get bad again, and I might be able to function, might be having a stress-free day but I know I still have depression because I don't see the point of me doing anything and I wish I don't exist everyday.
Yep. People say that anything can happen, and you can work your way out of whatever is wrong right now. But at this point in life, I know myself. I know within a pretty tight range what is going to happen. I know how I operate. At a certain point, you're stuck with who you are. Strapping on a fake smile isn't going to change that or make things better. I fought for half a lifetime and it did no good. I'm done fighting. 
It doesn't get better. Harsh truth is you gotta make it better. You have to change the way you look at the world. You gotta aim straight at the problems and deal with them head on. As you've seen first hand - time doesn't cure you. Only you can cure yourself.
Clearly not something I'm capable of. I've done every sort of therapy I could find. I've given up on meds because they don't work, usually make things worse because of side effects. I've tried cbt and all that stuff - changing the way I look at things. But I just am not able to fool myself. The truth is inescapable. 
Clearly not something I'm capable of. I've done every sort of therapy I could find. I've given up on meds because they don't work, usually make things worse because of side effects. I've tried cbt and all that stuff - changing the way I look at things. But I just am not able to fool myself. The truth is inescapable. 
 I hate all that 'YOU GOTTA MAKE IT BETTER.'  That does not work for everyone. Sometimes people have bad luck and life sucks.  Sometimes there is no cure.   I wish people would just acknowledge it instead of pretending life can be roses and unicorns for everyone. 
Same here. 16 years. Spent my student loans on meds and counseling. What a waste
Yeah, a good bit of my student loans went toward therapy and meds. They didn't help, but I do have all this nifty debt still hanging around to remember it by!
cognitive 'distortions' my ass
I think depressed people actually have the more rational view of the world, but you need some sort of positive cognitive distortion to somehow become content.
All the time. I'm doing it right now, actually.
same haha i was too
Every damn night. And then I lay in bed for an hour after I've woken up because I don't want to face what the day ahead has for me. 
i do the same exact thing, i just really don’t want to get up and begin the day, i hate it
This. I do the exact same thing. I'm still awake at like 4am or something because I don't want to deal with tomorrow. Also staying in bed for as long as I can in the mornings because I know as soon as I get up I have to pretend to be happy all over again 
it really does suck. putting on a “happy” face every day of our lives is so exhausting and tiring :( we don’t want to go to sleep at night, but we also don’t want to get out of bed in the morning. it’s horrible.
it really does suck. putting on a “happy” face every day of our lives is so exhausting and tiring :( we don’t want to go to sleep at night, but we also don’t want to get out of bed in the morning. it’s horrible.
An endless torturous cycle 
so you guys don't need to work or go to college?pretty envious of that
It's not that we don't have to do those things, we just put up with being less energized while we do it.
I love the rain! More importantly, I love storms. Rain is rain though. I just hate it happens more overnight than throughout the day. As in the weekend when I'm not working. All the same, it just brings me joy and happiness. It may not be much, but I depend on those moments. The smell, the sound, the whole experience just soothes me.
It also helps me sleep 
IT is weird how they say, staying in the sun helps lower depression, and the rainy weather makes people depressed, cause mine is the opposite, the sun makes me deprsssef and the rain makes me happy 
Same here. I seriously hate the sun, it's shooting annoying and it makes my eyes hurt. Gray cloudy weather soothes me. Even better if it rains and even better of there's a storm. 
I'm so sorry for your loss.  I wish I could say something more comforting, but words don't seem adequate. 
Thank you it's the thought that counts
 I feel you. I've been by myself since I was 16 and I never felt lonely up until a couple of years ago. I'd like to think Im independent but I know I would be lying to myself.
Same. It sucks because half of me is okay with it since I've been independent for so long, but also feeling the pressure of norms and how I might be perceived a loser. I don't know what is right or wrong.
But you are independent, otherwise you wouldn't be able to live by yourself. Have you considered pets? I know I would feel way too lonely without my cats.
Cause it was forced on me, I didn't choose it. I've had a dog before but my place is too small for one.
Cause it was forced on me, I didn't choose it. I've had a dog before but my place is too small for one.
Ah, that's a shame. I wish animal cafes were more common, so I could spend my lunch break there. Maybe look for one in your city!
Ps4 and netfix everyday.. Tried making friend online and i failed, tried dating apps an i failed, my family suck, an I'm slowly sinking back in to the shut-in lifestyle
You can only fail at making friends when you stop trying.
I wake up, realise I have nothing to do once I go up. I start the computer, sit there and stare at the screen for the whole day, maybe play some music. Go to sleep at 8pm cause I have nothing to do.
I was gonna write about this to another subreddit; I don't want to do anything. I have almost 300 movies on my watchlist, I don't watch them, maybe once a week. e-books are waiting for me, I don't read them. just hanging around subreddits, switching between apps... I don't feel sad about this either, I just feel empty and that's all... 
I was gonna write about this to another subreddit; I don't want to do anything. I have almost 300 movies on my watchlist, I don't watch them, maybe once a week. e-books are waiting for me, I don't read them. just hanging around subreddits, switching between apps... I don't feel sad about this either, I just feel empty and that's all... 
I'm struggling with this lately. I have things I can do that I think I'll get enjoyment out of, but I just don't do them because I don't really get any feeling out of them. Everything feels like a grey homogeneous soup.  On the plus side, I can sit there and do nothing, or work if someone has work they want me to do; it doesn't really matter to me because it doesn't feel much different. It's all the same. So I guess I can still be productive.
Its problematic really. Once someone have friends they are satisfied, until their need for a SO comes along. Then it becomes another issue again. Goddamn if I could just stop desire.
Damn this is so right. It's the endless desires, the endless downward spiral of want and need, the dissatisfaction that's killing me inside.
People do sometimes stop by my desk to chat but I don't really enjoy it. It's all fake conversations....how are you, any weekend plans, talking about their kids, etc. I don't really like it. I never stop by anyone else's desk just to chat....only when I have a question about work stuff. 
Not fake conversations, small talk, social connection. It's like gossip, it ties people together by expressing interest and avoids meaningful topics in order to avoid disagreement.   Same reason Brits will tend to talk first about the weather with someone they don't know, conversation can happen and it's the weather, not really much room for argument.
I wish I was in your position. I have a roommate who never leaves the room and I have no chance at privacy which makes my depression worse.
No I live at home just my family dont talk to me
Your ex bf is an idiot if he thinks reading about the holocaust will make you appreciate life. If anything, it would bum you out more.
I'm guessing the point is 'people have had it worse than you, quit choosing to mope around because it could be worse, honey'.   I doubt if he thought it would cheer her up, he was downplaying the validity of her depression.   Edit: spelling
I'm guessing the point is 'people have had it worse than you, quit choosing to mope around because it could be worse, honey'.   I doubt if he thought it would cheer her up, he was downplaying the validity of her depression.   Edit: spelling
I hate that response.   If that's true than it also means there is always someone who has it better than you too.   That's just as depressing a thought. 
I hate that response.   If that's true than it also means there is always someone who has it better than you too.   That's just as depressing a thought. 
That implies that there's one person in the world who has the closest thing there is to a perfect life.   I don't know who that is, but I hate them now. 
> people have had it worse than you, quit choosing to mope around because it could be worse, honey  Literally the least useful piece of advice you could give someone who's struggling with depression. Maybe tied with 'get over it'.
Tied with those two is 'just smile and it will come to you!'   -.-
'I know you have been struggling with alcoholism so I brought this heroin addict over to show you some people have it worse.'
this is perfect
No, he's not an idiot. He doesn't understand how depression works. For people that are not depressed, they aren't aware that there is no real rational thought behind it. He thought he was shifting perspectives, when in reality, there isn't any perspective to shift.  If you expect people to be understanding of what we go through, you have to see it from the other side as well.
>For people that are not depressed, they aren't aware that there is no real rational thought behind it.  I'm not depressed but I'm capable of empathy.  How could reading about one of the worst atrocities mankind committed possibly brighten anyone's day?  There are ways to try and make someone smile, sad books isn't one of them.
No, he's not an idiot. He doesn't understand how depression works. For people that are not depressed, they aren't aware that there is no real rational thought behind it. He thought he was shifting perspectives, when in reality, there isn't any perspective to shift.  If you expect people to be understanding of what we go through, you have to see it from the other side as well.
I disagree, I think he's an idiot. I can understand making that basic mistake about it, but he then continues to misunderstand despite OP trying to explain it and says that he's sick of her and her negativity.
For the record, I agree. Ignorance doesn't make him an idiot. It's important to look at this kind of attitude as something that can be corrected.
I agree.  But if he doesn't want to be corrected that makes him an idiot.
I wish you were wrong about mental health professionals. It takes time, effort, and a lot of digging to find one that may work for you. Private therapists seem alright, in my experience. Ones for those who lack money or insurance are terrible. I remember going to a therapist in a community counselling setting and it was a half hour a month. Just  barely enough to keep tabs on how I'm doing. 
urgh, that's a joke.
urgh, that's a joke.
Well, I wasn't planning my death at the time, so they didn't care. The worst part was the two months to get crappy care. And the hoops. At the time, I was like, look, I'm depressed, why do I have to expend all kinds of energy I don't have to get inferior care?  Glad I have insurance now. It sucks, but is better than not having it.
> Private therapists seem alright, in my experience.   Sadly I've been to many and while there are plenty that aren't bad, there are dozens that are plain old shits. There's a *lot* of 'well why don't you take responsibility' thinking even among professionals. It's disheartening because as I'm fond of telling them-- if knowing was the same as the capacity for doing I wouldn't be here. 
I can easily believe that. I'm having problems finding a psychiatrist that is decent. First one would spend more time on the phone during an office visit than with me. The other pushed me out of her office as I was having a panic attack. Now, I'm back to having to look for one, bleh.
I've been having a really rough time lately, and I really needed this.  Thank you for posting it.
Glad to help make your day a bit better.
Thank you for posting this! These really are things that the world needs to know. It's such a difficult illness to deal with, especially when other people don't understand. 
I do find myself wondering why? Why don't people get taught about depression in school (at least not at my high school when I went). Or why don't people care, try to help or understand.  I don't mean to undermine other world issues but depression isn't one that is publicly spoken about much, while a large percentage (1/4?) suffer from mental illness and it really should. And it would make a world of difference if people were educated about depression.
What DO you want your friends to do? 
To care.
How do you show that you care? 
Reach out. 'Let's get coffee on monday' is better than 'let's get together next week' and even more than 'i'm here if you need me'  Be normal. I know I'm depressed. I know I'm ok. I still want to hear about all the random crap normal friends talk to other normal friends about. The last thing I want is my friends to avoid being 'normal' around me because of their perception that there's something wrong with me and I just want to be left alone.
Definitely. I'm happy about how well this post has done and the conversations that have come out of it, even got reddit gold (not sure entirely what that means) but I feel like I should be happier because I honestly feel like this is amazing what has happened here.
Every time I have something good going for me all I can think is 'alright, how long before it gets taken away.'
How do you show that you care? 
By asking how I am, what they can do, when to hang out, don't ignore me. Pretty simple friend stuff.
This made my day a lot worse. 
I'm sorry. Just spiraled my frustration with people who don't understand.
I'm sorry. Just spiraled my frustration with people who don't understand.
I know, I share your sentiment. Nothing to be sorry about. 
Girl here, you are indeed good looking. So there's that at least!
Thanks! What are you doing Friday night? ;)
Thanks! What are you doing Friday night? ;)
Not hanging out in Canada, unfortunately!  Although the one time I visited Toronto, it was pretty fun.  And I think you guys have way more of your shit together than we do in the US.
I think you're strikingly attractive. Some times getting into courting yourself and being your own best friend is really okay feeling.  If you would like a friend,  I'm down for shooting some breeze. We could talk about anything.
Hello Potato&Bug! Thank you for the compliment: the secret is the hair straightener ;) Nice to have a coffee with you (referring to your own pic). I will try to make a similar picture for you but with tea cups.
Oh my god, you met Ross.
I've been watching Friends on netflix with one of my BFFs and I read this and totally though you meant Ross Geller. 
This may be totally out of the blue, but have you ever been to the Renaissance Faire in SoCal?  I could have sworn I saw you there a few weekends ago...
lol, nope, sorry. Never been to any Ren Fairs, actually. Always wanted too, though. Was my doppelganger at least wearing a sweet outfit?
lol, nope, sorry. Never been to any Ren Fairs, actually. Always wanted too, though. Was my doppelganger at least wearing a sweet outfit?
He was wearing a pirate outfit actually, it didn't totally fit with the whole 1500s England theme but it was still pretty awesome.  If you ever get a chance, you should definitely check out a ren faire!  So much fun.
It's so wonderful and hopeful to hear that you are working hard and that things are slowly, but surely getting better for you. Your eyelashes are real pretty, btw.
Thank you!  I grew them myself
What brought you from England to Oklahoma?
That would be my ex wife.. Seemed like a good idea at the time ;-) but now it's home 
Thanks Courtney. You're a fantastic looking woman! I hope that you can find some light in the darkness. What kind of treatment did you seek out? I've been through a number of therapists and 2 different antidepressants. It takes some time to get a good balance, but I think it's starting to help at least.   If you ever want someone to talk to, shoot me a PM! 
Thanks, and I think I'll take you up on that sometime!  I'm in cognitive-behavioral therapy right now and taking the highest dosage of Wellbutrin available.  Other therapy has not been that great, but the CBT is really helping.  And the Wellbutrin is an old friend that I quit taking earlier because I thought I was 'all better.'  Because that's logical.
JessaJez/22/PA, U.S.  Been battling depression and anxiety since I was 14. Wish I had something uplifting to contribute. Here's a photo of me and my best friend, the only thing keeping me relatively sane http://imgur.com/UcZr9JR
Love the dog!  Sometimes mine are the only things that put a smile on my face as well.  The unconditional love is so therapeutic.
Love the dog!  Sometimes mine are the only things that put a smile on my face as well.  The unconditional love is so therapeutic.
Absolutely. Sometimes you need affection but can't stand to be around other people and dogs are the best therapy. I'm so grateful to have such a true companion 
two things: badass shirt and you're awesome.   that is all. 
Ha, thank you! 
Nice! My husband is the guitar/bass business! Will be building his own soon. :)
That's awesome, I'm really glad to hear it!
I'm Chloe, 22, from the United States. I struggle with social anxiety, depression, binge eating, and maybe borderline personality disorder. I'm tremendously insecure, to the point of justifying this additional sentence.   I don't think I'm comfortable sharing my face, but here's a photo of a child's art (from some local elementary school) that makes me giggle: [http://i.imgur.com/whdoRzb.jpg?1](http://i.imgur.com/whdoRzb.jpg?1)  EDIT: fine, this is me. We're having coffee together, isn't that nice? [http://i.imgur.com/2z8qAxt.jpg?1](http://i.imgur.com/2z8qAxt.jpg?1)
I know you were hesitant to post a picture of yourself, but I like the one you chose. It makes it feel personal, plus coffee!!
I know you were hesitant to post a picture of yourself, but I like the one you chose. It makes it feel personal, plus coffee!!
^^ Thank you! It was from a series I took for my mom, because I couldn't be with her for mother's day and actually share a cup of coffee.
I love the picture too. I'm glad you shared! I'm incredibly insecure myself. So I know how you feel. But in all honesty I would love to be sitting across from you having a coffee right now (instead of being at work anyways lol).
Picking words for this post was somewhat agonizing. I'd love to do that, too. A coffee date with someone who silently understands/acknowledges mental struggles is automatically a hell of a lot more comfortable than many others.
Tom, 21, England  Recently had to withdraw from my final year at university due to depression and anxiety  http://imgur.com/3hx4cmV
Hey Tom, I'm just letting you know that someone across the pond is thinking of you. And I hope that you are in a better place one day, so that you can finish uni! Or that you find happiness in whatever you do!   Dropping out isn't the end of the world, it can be a better one! 
My name is Sarah.  I'm 21. I live in Virginia. I struggle with life. There's a lot of background on that I'd rather not touch on. Here's a photo from one year ago. [It's the last photo of myself that I was okay with.](http://i.imgur.com/FVfDtuX.jpg) 
Sarah, I wish you luck with the struggles in your life and I hope you have someone out there helping you with them. All the best!
I'm Jackson. Born and raised in the state of Georgia, age 15.  I had a moderately abusive father, which did not help my normal woes of dealing with transitioning to a teenager. Recently more things have started contributing to my depression. I suffer from MDD, Anxiety disorder, and possible bipolar.  And, here's my ugly mug. https://imgur.com/AsPXjyj
Mug is not so ugly! Sorry your father wasn't the one we all would like to have....I bet he was verbally abusive too, just as bad.   Are you getting help for this?
Mug is not so ugly! Sorry your father wasn't the one we all would like to have....I bet he was verbally abusive too, just as bad.   Are you getting help for this?
He's dead now, so there's that. The scars are still there, though.
He's dead now, so there's that. The scars are still there, though.
They always will be there but you can get therapy to help you learn to deal so it doesn't drive you in wrong directions...you deserve better so now you can give it to yourself. Hugs.
Hey! I'm Felix, I'm 21, living in San Francisco but from new Zealand.  I'm trans, I have an eating disorder due in part to my gender dysphoria and in part to being a terrible fat idiot, I have severe anxiety, and I want to die a lot. I use self harm as a coping mechanism, and smoked way too much. I just finished my first semester at a real university.  Here's some pics from the last times I felt okay looking. http://imgur.com/a/6PYBa
Hey Felix.   I can't even imagine how hard it must be for you. I'm glad you're going to school though. Just having something to work towards can sometimes be a huge help.   Your pics are fantastic. And you are far, *far* from being terribly fat. You look pretty damn good if I do say so myself.   Hope things start looking up for you soon. If you ever wanna chat, shoot me a PM. 
You have very soulful eyes.  Very pretty.
Thank you, that means alot
SoulOfaLostUndead, 21yo male from Brisbane, Australia.  It's coming up to final exams for me and I've not attended a single thing for two of my three subjects so I've got a difficult few weeks ahead. I do this to myself every semester. I'm passionate about what I do, but I severely lack motivation.  Symptoms are many, but the worst is my insomnia and social anxiety.  Wouldn't mind a chat so feel free to send me a message.  No mugshot for me thanks. 
I, too, lack the motivation for what I want to do. I'm at a dead-end job that has nothing to do with what I want for my career but I'm scared of taking the next step in my academic career and apply to grad school.
25/FL   Struggling with depression, really. I think I might have BPD. Self harm, passive suicidal ideation and constant suicidal thoughts, and Rumination. I could go on and on, but I'm lazy and just want to play games.  Edit: BPD confirmed. 
Hey one of my best friends, from the Netherlands, has BPD, I can refer you to her if you wish! It's always good to talk to someone you can relate to.  PM me if you're interested and I'll talk to her
you look like a fun person, happiness comes and goes for a lot of people, hope you find a lasting happiness....keep having fun....
I try, some days there is no fun other days is full of it. 
Amanda/22/Wisconsin  When I was younger, I struggled a lot with bullying, which led to my body image/self esteem issues, which led to me not feeling like I was worth other people's time, which led to me pushing people away, which lead to my loneliness issues. I also go through phases of self harm (currently not harming but i get the urge to occasionally). It's kind of a vicious circle now.  This is an album I uploaded a week ago of pictures from the past couple weeks: http://imgur.com/a/zpPgt
~~Well you should not feel insecure, that's for certain~~  Edit: Let me clarify as I feel I may have misrepresented my intent:  You are strong and attractive. I know it's hard to see that sometimes, and I hope that one day you truly see how special you are. 
~~Well you should not feel insecure, that's for certain~~  Edit: Let me clarify as I feel I may have misrepresented my intent:  You are strong and attractive. I know it's hard to see that sometimes, and I hope that one day you truly see how special you are. 
While I understand what you were hinting at (which was a compliment), however its belittling her insecurities. While I too, find her attractive, it doesn't mean she cant/does't feel that way.
While I understand what you were hinting at (which was a compliment), however its belittling her insecurities. While I too, find her attractive, it doesn't mean she cant/does't feel that way.
Oh I totally didn't mean that. I'm a 28 year old depressed alcoholic who is very insecure. I definitely understand, I hope I did not offend. I fixed my original post. 
I know how you feel dude, and I'm sorry it's ended up this way. But it sounds like you're on the up. Good luck with the rehab and be brave!
Thank you, it means a lot to hear that!
If I were Al Capone I would rob you for those gems you call eyes
Oh gosh, that made me smile like an idiot. Thanks for that. 
Oh gosh, that made me smile like an idiot. Thanks for that. 
:>
Hi. I'm Dario, 23.  I'm just finishing up my final uni term in England after 2 years of medical leave (due to social anxiety and depression), and I'll be moving back to Madrid in a couple days (I'm Spanish).  Here's a [couple](http://i.imgur.com/OLHPPS7.jpg) of [old](http://i.imgur.com/kXQuR2e.jpg) pictures of me.  If anyone would like to talk on skype, to vent or just because they need a friendly voice, please do hit me up! I enjoy making friends there and helping out in any small ways I can.
You've got the beard and the hair and the name, do you watch game of thrones?
You've got the beard and the hair and the name, do you watch game of thrones?
Walking Dead actually. I'll marathon GoT eventually. I've remained spoiler-free this whole time!
Is there a link to the old one? I'd love to look at that one too. Thanks!
Sure! http://www.reddit.com/r/bipolar/comments/2vy6yr/it_was_asked_in_rdepression_so_ill_ask_it/
[Hi there](http://i.imgur.com/sgjG8Q6.jpg).      Sonja, 30, Canberra Australia.      I originally joined the sub as a supportive voice. My husband is a depressive, and we've been together for over 12 years now. So I kinda had some idea of what was helpful.      Then I got depression and anxiety. A mild case brought on by becoming a stay-home mother after 8 years in the workforce.
check out the book [Morning Has Broken by Phil and Emme Aronson](http://www.amazon.com/Morning-Has-Broken-Couples-Depression/dp/0451218078). It's a great book presenting the husband's depression but through the eyes of both of them (each chapter switches off). And stick around this sub because we constantly have people asking how to best care for someone with depression and you clearly have first hand knowledge. 
Hi, I'm Francis, 25 and living in Montreal, Canada. Picture: http://imgur.com/FJvYOYw  I suffer from anxiety, depression and struggle to find an actual purpose in my life. I feel completely overwhelmed and lost. I've been without work or any occupation for over a year now, spending most of my days in my room (gaming and internet browsing mostly) and can barely find the will to 'do things'. Throughout my life, my attempts to find my place and connect with society have failed and I don't know what to do anymore.
I can totally relate, dude. Thanks for sharing.
^I ^shooting ^hate ^the ^sun    
but praise the sun?  i shooting hate the sun too, rain ftw
but praise the sun?  i shooting hate the sun too, rain ftw
I love it when it's raining :)
I love it when it's raining :)
yeah, I wish I lived in a place where it always rains
I also hate how exposed I am. I can't wear a jacket as my armor. Also seeing other people wearing basically nothing and being so confident and free. Just reminds me that my existence is not meant to be.
Same I hate that exposed feeling
You dont need friends to go to the beach or eat ice cream
What's the point of going on your own? A therapist said this to me once, go places even if you're alone. Honestly, I tried, I felt worse. Seeing groups of friends, families, partners, it's depressing as hell. Come back home alone, I have no one to share photo's with, or tell about my experiences. No point.
What's the point of going on your own? A therapist said this to me once, go places even if you're alone. Honestly, I tried, I felt worse. Seeing groups of friends, families, partners, it's depressing as hell. Come back home alone, I have no one to share photo's with, or tell about my experiences. No point.
Thats exactly how I feel about doing things alone...ugh
/r/raisedbynarcissists 
that sub comes up way too often here, it's pretty depressing.
Same same.  When I was 16ish I told my mom that I didn't want to live anymore, she then proceeded to choke me. Obviously she didn't finish the job.  When I was 28, I tried killing myself by ODing on painkillers, but only ended up being unconscious ciois for 72+ hours. When I told my mother, she cried.  Weird things humans are.
That's a crazy woman. 
That's a crazy woman. 
Yup, kinda why I steer clear of her now.
Do you have that texting number? That might be useful
http://www.crisistextline.org/textline/  Text 'start' to 741741   It was helpful for me, if you need anything else feel free to PM me, take care.
I go to college next year. I want to live in dorm or somewhere apart from mom but I don't think i can afford them. About the family members, mom told my sister about me and she somewhat really mad at me. I don't understand. She was the most reliable family member. Anyway, thanks for your comment.
Have you confronted your sister personally? Your mum could have twisted your words, if you haven't tried you should approach your sister and explain everything to her.  Also, that's alright. I enjoy helping people, especially when they're in need of someone to speak to.
You did the right thing. ~~Hang in there.~~  Edit: I didn't think my words through. I'm so sorry. My point stands that you did the right thing. 
hang in there is not a good choice of words
Thanks for pointing it out. I totally spaced out; my bad entirely. Sorry, OP. 
It's ok. I chuckled actually
I've gone skydiving once. It made me decide I wouldn't kill myself with gravity haha
Saw a comment on I think AskReddit where it was asked what would you do with 50,000 dollars or something. The dude said he'd give most the money to his friends, take some skydiving lessons, and never pull the parachute string. 
i feel the same way. friends are idiots. only pretend to care if i reach out first.
Exactly, and it's the worst. I reach out because I care, but if I don't, I don't exist to them anymore
Exactly, and it's the worst. I reach out because I care, but if I don't, I don't exist to them anymore
You worth much more then they do. Idiots can smell this like sharks can smell drops of blood over long distances. That is why you almost never see a group of life winners together, but you can spot a group of losers almost every day. Know your worth and do not sell yourself short. Watch the opening of KAT WILLIAMS: PIMPIN PIMPIN- take his advice!!!!!
Those aren't friends.
Well, that’s all we have
Hey, how are you?
Honestly, I could be a lot better
same here! I genuinely feel that conventionally attractive people are treated better, it's awful
I look at those twitter famous people who can post a selfie and get all that validation from people they don't even know and I get so jealous :(
I look at those twitter famous people who can post a selfie and get all that validation from people they don't even know and I get so jealous :(
Can you imagine some of them make a living earning 6 figures or more just by being good looking (Twitter famous, IG famous, Twitch streamer, youtuber), you can have 0 talent and have no education at all and STILL make bank.   While the rest of us uggos work our asses off and it still isn't guaranteed we'd even have homes to live in. 
Can you imagine some of them make a living earning 6 figures or more just by being good looking (Twitter famous, IG famous, Twitch streamer, youtuber), you can have 0 talent and have no education at all and STILL make bank.   While the rest of us uggos work our asses off and it still isn't guaranteed we'd even have homes to live in. 
And this is why god isnt real
There's plenty of evidence to suggest that attractive people are treated better by others.   Source: I studied this in college
treated better, considered more intelligent, more trustworthy .... the list is long
It's just not fair because it all comes down to things we can't control :(
Yeah it's all just dumb luck which is bullshit. Nobody did anything to deserve their appearance whether it's good or bad. Sick of being ugly.
Yeah it's all just dumb luck which is bullshit. Nobody did anything to deserve their appearance whether it's good or bad. Sick of being ugly.
I agree, but I am more sick of people thinking working out makes you more attractive. It can't get rid of my ugly face.
I agree, but I am more sick of people thinking working out makes you more attractive. It can't get rid of my ugly face.
Seriously they might as well say, 'Just stop being ugly.'
> It's just not fair because it all comes down to things we can't control  The failure is in obsessing about things that we can't control and not making changes on things we can control.  I can't really change how I look very much (without going under the knife), but I can change how I act.  *something something actions louder something something*
seems so obvious, but I think it's worth meditating on  I definitely obsess over stuff I can't change, and it's absolutely destroying me  I don't know how to stop  but I guess working on things I could change would be good enough, since you can't focus on two things at the same time; also you need to expect and accept relapses - sometimes you're gonna waste time on stuff that can't be changed, and that's ok as long as you catch it eventually and move on then
Me too. I follow models on youtube and IG and think 'wow their lives must be amazing' it's like they're playing life on easy mode.
Don't follow them. That's awful for depression. 
  I've been told I'm attractive before and even been approached by a fair number of girls...but it doesn't make things easier. I have zero self confidence and always manage to screw up potential relationships even when they're practically handed to me.   Currently, I'm spending my summer alone and hardly speaking to anyone at all. Being attractive only helps if you have the confidence and self esteem to go with it. Otherwise, it's almost like a slap in the face. 
You've basically described me. People tell me I'm attractive and I often think they're only saying it because I'm so ugly they're giving me a pity-compliment.  What's good in being attractive when underneath all that is turmoil/crap as a foundation? 
You've basically described me. People tell me I'm attractive and I often think they're only saying it because I'm so ugly they're giving me a pity-compliment.  What's good in being attractive when underneath all that is turmoil/crap as a foundation? 
People want to shoot you and give you superior treatment even if they don't like your personality. That's the good in it. Would you really rather be ugly and still have the inner turmoil? 
People want to shoot you and give you superior treatment even if they don't like your personality. That's the good in it. Would you really rather be ugly and still have the inner turmoil? 
If only I knew that true happiness comes from people wanting to shoot me even when they don't like me as a person. I am such an ingrate
Uhm, how doesn't it make it easier to get a girlfriend when they approach you? How doesn't it make it easier to get a girlfriend when you actually get matches on Tinder instead of 0?  I get that it's still hard, especially if you have no confidence or social skills, but you can't deny that it's at least easier when you are attractive...  Imagine having no confidence, social skills AND being unattractive. 
Well, yeah, I guess it's a little easier. But that's only if I put myself in situations where those things happen.  Girls can't approach me if I sit at home because I don't have friends or hobbies. Tinder matches don't mean anything if I message them but can't escalate the conversation.
I'm pretty confident that a lot of the crap in my life that has brought me into a depression that's impossible to get out of, is all rooted in my ugliness. I've always tried to over compensate with personality, humor, being social, being fun and kind and a good person, all of the other qualities that make someone 'attractive', and it's gotten me NOWHERE. So much of the world and life is based on looks, and people that don't have that problem fail to accept that. 
And that failure to accept that truth makes it worse for ugly people: our culture places the blame on the ugly person as if it their choice to be ugly.  This manifests in intangible things like 'you just need a better personality!' Or 'you just need confidence'.
Being attractive helps though. I mean look you had girls pursuing you. That makes things way easier. I'm 23 never gonna have a girlfriend. No girl will ever be interested. Never gonna have sex.  What good is working on people skills if nobody will even talk to you? Doing all those things doesn't stop you being ugly.
You got a crystal ball over there bud? Those are some hella fortune telling statements.
I find because of the way I look I've never had a real relationship with anyone. I envy people who aren't conventionally attractive because it seems like the people around them that they attract are more genuine.
Lol ugly people like me don't attract anyone that's the point
Lol ugly people like me don't attract anyone that's the point
I just met a very unattractive woman but after talking with her she seemed very attractive to me. I dont go by looks. I want a kind, genuine person.
/r/amiugly   Get in there. Make a post. Chances are you aren't as ugly as you think. And usually you can get some constructive feedback about some easy things you can change (style, grooming, hair, etc.)  Seriously, if you're actually ugly, save up and go under the knife. I've considered it in the past, but I realized a long time ago, I like the way I look.
oh god no I know I'm objectively unattractive I don't want other people to confirm it
Then you are ugly with the potential to be more attractive than you think you are. As long as you stick with the mindset that you're undateable, you aren't helping your position. Try working out, it does wonders for both appearance and confidence.
I've tried that and [I'd look like this ](http://scontent.cdninstagram.com/t51.2885-15/e35/p480x480/14031553_1682538202072012_1853127982_n.jpg?ig_cache_key=MTMyMzQ4NTQyMzc1ODE0NDA0Nw%3D%3D.2) . 
At first I was thinking 'wow, what a great idea! I should try this when I get home' but then I remembered I live in California.
Haha, I was going to say the exact same thing. 
Haha, I was going to say the exact same thing. 
In CA you have to bathe with Almonds instead.
I don't understand the reference. Is it because water is scarce where you are?
California is going through one of the worst droughts in years. Water isn't *scarce* exactly, but our water tables are getting lower and lower.
This is nice, thanks for sharing!! 
No problem! I hope people find it as satisfying as I do
No problem! I hope people find it as satisfying as I do
I used to do just sit in the shower for a while without all the story and temp change. That was just relaxing in itself.
I used to do just sit in the shower for a while without all the story and temp change. That was just relaxing in itself.
My bf and I call this having a 'shath' lol
Eh, I just cry in the shower. Seems like the most natural thing to do.
Once during an inpatient stay at a hospital, I experienced labile affect and came inevitably to this situation, just sitting down in the shower bawling my eyes out. At one point I opened my eyes and looked over to see the shampoo bottle that said 'NO TEARS'. I started laughing and kept crying.
Once during an inpatient stay at a hospital, I experienced labile affect and came inevitably to this situation, just sitting down in the shower bawling my eyes out. At one point I opened my eyes and looked over to see the shampoo bottle that said 'NO TEARS'. I started laughing and kept crying.
That's a lovely story, as lonely as it feels. Thanks for sharing it.  Addendum: 'lovely' and 'lonely' are quite close together on the keyboard.
Ahh, I've found this at just the right time.   Took a turn about half an hour ago and it feels like my mind is a black hole. Just a total absence of everything. Darkness and inescapable.   I'm going to do this now, it sounds like a great idea that may really help. Thanks for sharing OP.
May I ask if it worked/helped?
Howd it go?
It really helped. Showers trigger my dpdr (a dissociative disorder) but having something to focus on made it bearable for the first time in a very long time.   The past few days have been really hard... But the shower was a reprieve. Thank you. 
You know some Buddhists stand under painfully cold waterfalls for about 10 seconds while reciting their Buddha stuff so that they come back out into the warmth feeling rejuvenated and vitalised.  Strange world ey.
It's not all that different, really!
Oh, wow, that's beautiful and sad. Sometimes it's important to let ourselves feel the pain instead of struggling against it. Thanks. i'll try this.
Uhuh. It's a fine line, but so much good can come from being *in the moment* and letting ourselves really feel our own pain and sadness etc. - **Not** wallow in it, just acknowledge it and be at peace with ourselves and allow ourselves to feel uncomfortable.   It helps us cope with future setbacks and negative thinking. A very, very important tool, though it does suck that it means feeling awful... But definitely worth it, if you ask me. 
That's ok. It's what families are for, and they way we lived for most of our time on earth. Don't let capitalism convince you that being poor makes you a failure. 
There's a difference between being poor and being dysfunctional to the point where you can't support a basic lifestyle. Not just in terms of a job, but relationships, stuff like that. People like us don't really have a purpose besides being dead weight.
Sounds like a NEET's dream
No sleeping in a car and your only food comes from a state food card with 187 bucks a month and having to live at librarys and a mall untill your car (bed) is parked isnt fun or a deam. Its depressing and horrible. 
ME TOOOOOO. I can’t tell you how much I relate. I’m still working on this myself so I can’t give you amazing advice and everything to do with this topic seems cliche. “Don’t dwell on the past” bs. But it’s true. Time is going to pass either way so choose to be happy and choose to do something about it. Make a list of TINY steps you can do everyday to improve and build up strength. That’s what I’m doing. 
Yeah, I think its just because I have nothing going on right now. I'm without a purpose until september when I start college so all I have to do is sit in my room and overthink.
Yeah, I think its just because I have nothing going on right now. I'm without a purpose until september when I start college so all I have to do is sit in my room and overthink.
Not having anything going on is always dangerous for me, you ought to try and find a part time job or something at least so you can keep a schedule that you need to remain responsible for.. Having 6-7 months of 'I'm gonna be in school soon,' is really potentially unhealthy if you're a sadbrain.
You would benefit from CBT if this is the case. I can help to change the way you think so you aren't constantly torturing yourself with the past.  All I can say now is...it's not that bad. Really. There's no scorecard of shoot ups. Every single person makes mistakes. Thinking about the past so much serves no purpose but pain. You can't go back in time and change anything. You can't heal a real wound if you're constantly picking at the scab. 
I was doing CBT therapy for about 6 months and it didn't really help me. The lack of confidence and self-scrutinizing has been pretty deep ingrained in me ever since I was a kid.
I saw +(a huge amount) of upvotes next to your username and flipped when I recognized my g59 friend. we got this man, we're still here
Haha yeah I post here alot, always love when I bump into /r/g59 folk outside of the sub.
Thanks for sharing these, do you have any good sources for research on cognitive distortions? I deal with all of the ones you mentioned on a near-daily basis, so I'd love to hear more about the exercises you mentioned. 
Also helpful: Feeling Good, the new mood therapy by David D. Burns, M.D.  This book is considered “Bibliotherapy” aka Self Help. Just reading it helped me realize that I was digging my own grave and that I could climb out with some help from experienced professionals.  It was first published in the 80s I think but has been updated many times by the author to remain current with the DSM.
Or make a post in r/familiesyouchoose.
I am not forcing my opinion, but this is not right. Not at all.
I missed a concert last Friday because I didn't wanted to go alone, like always. I have many friends but I have very little in common with them. I like concerts, music, art, movies, sometimes just a walk in the park is enough but all my friend want to do is drink.   I never developed a taste for alcohol. Just feel left out.
I thought I was the only one.
I thought I was the only one.
With a username like that it's pretty obvious why you dont drink :) cant blame you though im the exact same
You know what? i would love to go to a concert without having an insane panic attack.
What happened the last time you did it?
What happened the last time you did it?
I've had a pretty bad panic attack, i just ran from the place, good thing i kept everything inside my pocket. Aftewards i called my dad to pick me up and went home feeling like crap.
I've done that before and it's great! I always end up dancing with random strangers and having a good time. 
>  dancing with random strangers   That gave me a little panic attack
Like being hungry and nauseated at the same time.  Want food. Food hurts. But really want food. But food really hurts. :(  edit: And thanks for sharing the cartoon. I thought it was spot on :)
Oh man, I feel that all the time! After the first bite, I can normally start eating, but feel full quickly. It's a big hurdle for me wanting to gain weight.   How do you deal with it?
Oh man, I feel that all the time! After the first bite, I can normally start eating, but feel full quickly. It's a big hurdle for me wanting to gain weight.   How do you deal with it?
With the actual nausea/eating it's just a matter of waiting until the desire to eat overwhelms the reluctance to. Primal drives are powerful.  With depression/socializing it's different. I just hole myself up until the depression subsides. I need food to survive. There's no thinking my way around that kind of biological necessity. I don't need social contact to survive. I'm going by the literal definition of 'survive': 'continue to live or exist'.  Psychologically I'm a mess.
I know this feeling all too well & it's usually part of the reason why I don't open up to many people. For me it's a little less of  'leave me alone' and a little more of 'I'm bothering you by needing your support even though you're willing to give me support' which is an obnoxious hurdle to get over.  Anyways, great drawing & you're not alone, it's totally normal for people to feel that way sometimes. I hope you're doing okay :)
Yeah, I think that feeling of bothering them is a big factor of it. There's definitely a lot to it. I just get scared of being vulnerable but I also know that's the only way to get better sometimes.
My parents ask me what's wrong multiple times a week and every time I say nothing...
why open up to someone who doesn't care anyway? If they gave half a shit they'd notice you're bull pretty . Everyone is too lazy or self concerned to gaf about anyone else.
What's the matter? 
*deletes thread and account and throws computer out the window*
oh yeah. Same feeling with going to sleep. Sleeping is possibly the best part of the day except it leads to another morning/day, so I can't enjoy it.
the best feeling is getting the day off of work, staying up late and then just sleeping 16+ hours straight and waking up for the evening
the best feeling is getting the day off of work, staying up late and then just sleeping 16+ hours straight and waking up for the evening
I do this every day off.
That's called *Death*... 
Then so be it
This is exactly how I feel rn. Prefering the night and sleep over the day but hating the mornings that come after.
I love being up all night.  Then as soon as morning comes (daylight) I feel horribly depressed. And have to put my blackout mask on and go to bed.  I’m trying to sleep better and earlier but I miss my late nights when it’s quiet and peaceful.  But the sun and daylight would just be so depressing.  
Oh, man! How many times! I've had periods when I didn't really care if I was dead or alive. I fantasized about suicide but I couldn't do it. For my dad. He's done a lot for my life and he doesn't deserve this. So I had to live but I hoped something could kill me. LIke some heart attacks or something. I'm still alive. 
I feel the same way, I could never commit suicide but I’ve thought about it. I just wish something random would happen and take me out of this misery.
Yep.  'Passively suicidal' is a thing.  I've been there many times.  When I'm in the thick of it, it feels like it will never get better, but it always has.  I have always gotten better.  
As Robbie Williams who is bipolar writes in one of his famous songs ´I don´t want to die, but I am not keen on living either´  I think it is a very relatable state of mind for anyone who has struggled with depression. 
Yeah, I relate to this. As another poster said, I’m too cowardly to commit suicide, so I just get stuck there sometimes. Doesn’t last forever, but it seems like every time it’s harder to come back all the way.
I feel the same, like parts of me slowly dying. If I'm in this, I got to go hard... it don't make sense not to live fully man. I feel like I've been going 'half pregnant' on life and I'm not happy with myself...
What if the thing that makes you too cowardly to kill yourself might actually be a positive part of you or a piece of hope that you’ve become dissociated from. I personally think it’s more brave to push on than finally submit. 
I can tell it’s not a positive part because it’s mostly fear: fear of commitment, fear of finality, fear of pain, fear of the unknown, fear of inflicting suffering on my family, etc.  I don’t think it’s more brave to carry on, at least in my case. It’s cowardice. I don’t think life is inherently good or worth living. In truth, I think it’s an abomination.
Yeh, I went through a phase when I was really depressed where I stopped caring completely and did things like close my eyes as I walked across roads, closed my eyes while driving, took way too many pills etc. looking back that shit was incredibly dumb especially the stuff on the roads as my actions could of had terrible consequences for other innocent people.   I am still depressed now but I do kinda still want to live so there's that.
Good on you for doing better.
Good on you for doing better.
Hopefully you get there too!
I never cared since I was 13.
How old are you now? I've had this since I was 11, and I'm 14 soon.
Yes. My son passed away at age 19, 22 months ago from cancer. I frequently feel this way. Shortly after he passed, I would swim just a bit further out in the ocean, or walk where I damn well knew alligators were. My 14 yo daughter keeps me grounded and frankly the only reason I go on. My heart is with you. 
And my heart is with you. I'm so sorry about your son. 19 is too damn young. 
And my heart is with you. I'm so sorry about your son. 19 is too damn young. 
Thank you. 
Thank you. 
I realize it doesn't help, but I felt it should still be said. I bet he was an incredible son :) 
I hate it when we feel like we have to live just for our loved ones. It's not about THEM, it's about YOU. YOU deserve a reason to stay here on this earth. YOU deserve to be fulfilled. 
So true. We owe our existence to no one. In most cases our entire being and birth was simply the next step in a pair of nobodies shitty relationship. Our cold, screaming ape bodies shoved into the world just so they could feel better about themselves, so they could look down at something and feel like a matriarch/patriarch.
If pain is connected to brain, how much can shotgun to head hurt?
Survival instinct can kick in and you might try to move the barrel at the last second. There is always a risk that things go wrong and it isn't painless anymore.
Survival instinct can kick in and you might try to move the barrel at the last second. There is always a risk that things go wrong and it isn't painless anymore.
if I had access to a gun here I'd probably have pulled the trigger already. Always seemed like the easiest way to go out to me...
As bad as it is to say I honestly don't care what other people would think if I kicked the bucket, if there was a pill that got the job done quickly and painlessly I wouldn't even think twice. Just seems in every scenario I can imagine the risk of bodily harm in a failed attempt far outweighs potential reward
id take that tic tac magic pill in a second! 
I can't describe how painful it is to have such an amazing dream where I'm loved back and then I wake up and nothing's changed.
I thought this thread was too relatable as it was, but then I read this comment and my tear ducts imploded.
'The best dreams are the worst dreams, because that's all they are, dreams.'
What is this from?
What is this from?
My head, something I tell myself which I probably shouldn't, I also don't know why I put it in quotes 
My head, something I tell myself which I probably shouldn't, I also don't know why I put it in quotes 
Your head is brilliant.  The truth that embrace my heart.  Thank you
Absolutely agreed there. The worst is when you're desperately trying to remember the details of the dream, and you already know all the important bits have already slipped through your fingers. So then you're stuck with some half-remembered thing that doesn't seem all that great as it was, and you're right back to normal life again.
:(
That's why I love sleeping, I don't have to think about how much I hate my life when I'm asleep. 
I like that feeling too. Closing my eyes and pretending my life is not my life as it is or just ignoring everything. Doesn't help getting out of bed, that's for sure...
That's great! So glad you are doing well! Just remember not to stop taking them because you feel like you don't need them without talking with your doctor first. I was doing really well, then stupidly stopped taking them on my own and ended up right back where I started.
This happened to me!!!! I felt great off of them for 3 months and now I have an apt tomorrow to get back on my meds. 
I like live podcasts and live streaming for that reason. 
Same here.
Same here.
Yeah I use youtube videos. Mostly ones with lots of talking (rather than music videos, etc.) Takes the edge off of the crushing isolation. 
Not to escape loneliness, but to prevent rumination.
Holy shit. I really cannot study alone for this exact reason. I mean, it helps with loneliness too, but in a sense not being alone and in an area with people and/or sound keeps the voice in my head distracted so that actual me can focus on studying. My dorm has “21 hour quiet hours” this week because finals and it’s been so difficult to study because the silence allows rumination to happen. I hate it.
I don't think this is limited to people with depression - I know tons of people who leave the TV on for background noise. 
My entire family does. I worry a lot about what all the news, ads and pop culture memes are doing to them. (On the other hand I grew up on 4chan, so what the shoot do I know.)
Yep... Damn, didn't think I did that because of loneliness. :-(
You're probably just doing it to entertain yourself since your bored. Most people have the TV on even if they're playing a game on their phone. Don't worry, I do it too. It's human instinct to want to hear other people around us regardless. We're social creatures despite depression.
The people depressed find it cringy because we always think what others are thinking about us how shitty we look to them imo. but we shouldn't feel that bro everyone has their own struggles, we are in this together man stay strong 
Yeah this is why I tend to stay happy about living life.
Yeah this is why I tend to stay happy about living life.
Who tf downvoted that? ^
The worst part is that I have nothing to confide or explain the depression. It just sounds pitiful and attention seeking. Its just being  pathetic for no reason. Failing at life in ways that others didn't even know one could fail at or even see as a struggle. That makes it even more cringy.
Yep, and when people ask you how they can ‘help’ you never know whether your answer is going to satisfy them or they will say it’s your fault, and you “just are not trying”
I have the same feeling - the moment I cross the threshold of my doctor's room I cannot find enough guts to speak about my feelings and emotions, and try to belittle my problems as though they were nonexistent. However, once I leave this place, gloomy thoughts began to occupy my head and again I feel bad af.
1 hour of 'Im fine' 7 more days of 'lol this is cry for help i want to die, can you see my lack of will to live through this meme?' 
I tried opening up to someone yesterday. I talked to her for a little while, like 3 texts, until she stopped responding entirely. I'm just used to that at this point.
If I could recall he number of times I would start talking to someone then immediately backpedaling and apologize repeatedly, it would be waaaaaay to much
Social media and depression don't really coexist well. It's such a constant peep show into everyone's glamorized lives that you start the spiral of comparing yourself to them and feeling like shit because of it. Figure out who's close to you really and just rely on texting and actual phone calls, it's amazing the mood increase and lessening of stress from getting rid of social media. 
That's the thing, though. People are so aware that it's a constant peep show that they put on their best show. Some people are convinced that showing themselves having fun makes them more fun or cool or however they want to portray themselves. It's not about comparing because if you're comparing yourself to something fake, you'll always find yourself lacking. 
http://www.espn.com/espn/feature/story/_/id/12833146/instagram-account-university-pennsylvania-runner-showed-only-part-story  Here's a great article 
really touching article , thanks for sharing 
> but hey at least I don't have to worry about the hangovers :p  you can always drink alone like I do! No, don't do it it's not that good for your psyche 
Weeeell.. can't say I don't do on ocassion hahah
Some of those people are partying and having sex just for appearances and desperately wish they were home cuddling with their soft toys. They're crying inside.  edit to add: Sex is not evil. Partying is not evil. It's not necessary to diss the other side to feel better. 
Yup. Was at a large party with some of my closest friends two weeks ago. 90% of the time I was wondering why do I do this to myself when I could be at home? The party scene is highly overrated after a few times out. 
Yup. Was at a large party with some of my closest friends two weeks ago. 90% of the time I was wondering why do I do this to myself when I could be at home? The party scene is highly overrated after a few times out. 
Yeah it really is not something that you have to do just because you've come of age or whatever. Hard to realise when in the thick of it I guess.
Really?
Really. If you talk to them, they're mostly the same. Most people are kind of stuck going along with wherever the social currents wash them instead of doing what they prefer.  
Really. If you talk to them, they're mostly the same. Most people are kind of stuck going along with wherever the social currents wash them instead of doing what they prefer.  
But if you're all alone :/
Being left out like that by friends suck. I know the feeling way too well.
Are they really people you would call friends if they were leaving you out from fun stuff though? 
Are they really people you would call friends if they were leaving you out from fun stuff though? 
Well I don't really have anyone else. They don't leave me out all the time thought luckily, but too often.
Have you ever had sex OP? Its not that mindblowing tbh.
No I'm a virgin and I hate myself for that
No I'm a virgin and I hate myself for that
I used to hate myself for it too. Then I had sex and realized how stupid I was. 
<3 teh internet so much
Honestly I'd probably have killed myself a long time ago without it.  Or maybe I would have been more active and met real friends and wouldn't be as depressed in the first place. Who knows ¯\\\_(ツ)_/¯
Teddy bears usually don't involve hangovers and regret the next morning.   Don't worry, I spend my nights the same way as you so you're not alone. 
I wish I had a teddy bear
I wish I had a teddy bear
I really want to send you one now. Everyone needs a teddy bear.
Hey theres some of us at parties who really wish we were home cuddling a teddy bear. Sometimes being around so many people and being still so alone makes one feel that much more disgusting.
seconded
seconded
Substance abuse is a cold mistress
Substance abuse is a cold mistress
and at the end of the day it just makes me feel like shit. i should invest in something to cuddle...and try harder to stop wrecking my insides
Well surely they aren't ALL having sex at this party unless I've misunderstood what kind of party this is
Coincidentally I just watched that one episode of Westworld and I'm pretty sure they were having that type of party 
It'll be fine dude. Believe me. Sex is seriously nothing.  You see you've got to let it go. What's your gender anyway fam? Looks like you're a girl.
I'm a guy but yeah a lot of people say that it sounds 'girly' whenever I talk about feelings and stuff
You can always drink and do drugs alone, you also have your hands to have some fun. Don't compare yourself to them. Imagine that only you exist and try to make the most out of that. 
Or or orrrrrr you can just not drink or do drugs..
Sounds like a pretty boring time to me but hey, I'm a smalltime addict
Given the fact this is a subreddit for people with mental health issues I think it's irresponsible to be telling them to use mind altering substances..I mean okay social drinking sure, social pot use also fine..but using by yourself is just going to feed into your depressed moodset and likely do you nothing but harm in the long run 
You're not missing out on much. Those friends are passing incurable sexual infections (genital herpes & warts) to each other, and there is NO protection (condoms don't work against herpes).
Sorry, but that sounds like a cheap excuse. On top of that 90% of the population have herpes. You should look that up.
Almost, but not quite.  I'd rather keep my issues away from my friends and family because i don't want them to waste their time. 
This. I feel like a shooting burden because of my bitterness of even talking about issues. I've seen how much of a bother I've become I just stay shut.
This. I feel like a shooting burden because of my bitterness of even talking about issues. I've seen how much of a bother I've become I just stay shut.
It's not about being a burden. I'd glady be someones burden if it meant i'd get better. But when they can't help i don't see the point of saying anything, to me it's just seems i would be giving people more shit to worry about.
I'm too embarrassed to tell my friends anything. Talking about any sort of feeling embarrasses me. I don't tell them how I feel unless the ask me point blank, and even then I'd probably leave some of the worse details out. 
This is how I feel, and I hate it. I wish I could tell people things, I want someone to listen to me and not judge me. I need someone to hug me and tell me they care about me :(  But I'm like you, I don't tell anyone anything and I rarely open up about my feelings. ***If*** someone asked me point blank, I may reveal something, but not anywhere near the worst of it - and only if I trusted them...
Very few people actually want to hear it despite what they'll say. 
I'm slowly understanding that
No people want to hear it, very few people will want to hear it because they care.
I know many people that want to hear it just so they can say to themselves 'glad I'm not that guy'.
Whenever people ask 'how are you' every response I've ever given feels like a lie to myself. Objectively it's kinda true but I'm never doing 'well' it just feels like what should be said. 
I know this feel, every single day of my life I just crave somebody to truly express myself, It kinda sucks knowing that I'm going to have to spend the rest of my life lying to everybody else. I think if I expressed myself properly they'd think I was crazy :) 
I know this feel, every single day of my life I just crave somebody to truly express myself, It kinda sucks knowing that I'm going to have to spend the rest of my life lying to everybody else. I think if I expressed myself properly they'd think I was crazy :) 
Scrubs did this scenario perfectly  You have to let your crazy out slowly. 
I have never seen a more poetic statement of my struggle with depression.  Thank you for this.
You should thank Dickens with his sharp observation skills and wonderful writing.
That really cuts deep. It harkens to the many sleepless nights and the dread of wasting away another day.   There's a certain tragic beauty in this sadness, though, that I have come to admire and crave.  Thank you for sharing. 
It's the 'sensible of the blight on him...' part that really gets to me. If we were thick-skinned and oblivious to what we're missing, maybe depression would be more bearable. At the same time, I feel like some people would never have the chance to face their own demons head-on. It's a horrid process, but we might be gaining a perspective on ourselves, and on life, that perhaps others don't have.
This made me look at my struggle in a beautiful way instead of a dark cloud hanging over me. Thank you. 
There's a strange comfort to feeling a connection with something from 1859, and knowing people had similar internal struggles centuries ago...
Good quote, but I wouldn't equate a man suffering from depression to a man of good emotions.  
He had them before he was depressed, they were wasted the same way his good abilities were wasted.
People just don't get it and or never listen to you. It really does suck :(
For real so many people just think I'm being a lazy shit........they just dont get it.......
I wish people would understand the power of a little empathy and understanding goes a long way.  But virtually nobody ever just listens. There is almost always a lecture or a reason why you shouldn't feel the way you feel.  All it does is make people bury their feelings and go deeper into isolation. 
I think the problem is that people think just because you're venting that you want a solution. Sometimes there *is no solution*. Most people don't get that.
When I told my mom i have depression she backed me to a corner and slapped me and punched me and pulled my hair and made me promise in between all the sobbing that I'll be positive.     I really don't know how i climbed out of that day
What the hell is wrong with people, especially parents... it's a disgrace and you should never have experienced that. You are stronger than you realise. I think with depressive or traumatic episodes we tend to suppress a lot and I certainly know my memory isn't what it used to be. I think that's maladaptive coping mechanisms that help us survive. I hope you're safe and away from that violence and abuse. 
What the hell is wrong with people, especially parents... it's a disgrace and you should never have experienced that. You are stronger than you realise. I think with depressive or traumatic episodes we tend to suppress a lot and I certainly know my memory isn't what it used to be. I think that's maladaptive coping mechanisms that help us survive. I hope you're safe and away from that violence and abuse. 
I believe that many parents take it as a personal insult. That it's their fault and they are shitty parents. Well sometimes it's true. 
I believe that many parents take it as a personal insult. That it's their fault and they are shitty parents. Well sometimes it's true. 
Well if they're going around assaulting their own children they technically are shitty parents.
I know how that feels when I try to talk to my mum or dad about my depression they say things like 'life is tough you just have to get on with it', it's stupid they don't realise how complex it is.
First of all, ignore the other wanker who has commented. Secondly, there are some great resources you can use when your support network doesn't help you. Time to Talk by the NHS is highly recommended, as well as asking your doctor for a counseller/therapist. You don't need to see a psychiatrist (therapist that can give you medicine) but talking through your issues can help give you a bit of perspective. Best of luck. 
My mom said something similar and criticized me seeing a counselor, saying that I am still as bad as before I saw one. People can just be so mean.
Your mum is terrible person if she told her son that, my mum/dad helped me a lot with depression few years ago
Are you currently in therapy? Maybe bring her to a session with you (if your therapist OKs it). If you aren't comfortable with that, try to educate her in another way that might help open her eyes to this illness. 
I was in a similar situation to OP, eventually I had to realise this wasn't something I could communicate with my mum about. I learnt to be okay with it because I realised the reason my mum can't accept it because she can't cope with her kids bring unhappy. I learnt to talk with other people in my support network and that helped. 
Ah, you mean death but not painful.
Mhmm. Death without all the steps, and without the guilt that comes with it. Sounds pleasant, right?
Mhmm. Death without all the steps, and without the guilt that comes with it. Sounds pleasant, right?
It really does sound appealing to me.
Yeah I want to die but all methods of death are scary and painful especially as I can't access firearms.
That's the most relatable thing I've ever read
That's the most relatable thing I've ever read
I'm sorry man I hope things get better for you.
I'm sorry man I hope things get better for you.
Don't get your hopes up, I'm known for disappointing other people
I've got ready access to a loaded 12 gauge.....      I'm too much of a pussy to do it
Mail it to me, I'll use it for you.
Mail it to me, I'll use it for you.
lmao
That'd be a 'soothing' way to disappear. Though, the best part of sleeping is the first 10 seconds after waking up where no depressing thoughts have set in yet.
You know that state where your not quite asleep, but not fully conscious? You are somewhat aware and very comfortable?  If I had the choice to just stay in that state forever I probably would. 
Yeah. I just want to get hit by a car or just killed so I don't have to live anymore. 
My fear is having something like this happen to me but not dying and then becoming paralyzed or something. I'm left not able to control even my own body. 
someday you will.  until then, suck it up, shake it off, and find your purpose.
God, I hope you get herpes.
God, I hope you get herpes.
Someday he will.
Existentially speaking, I don’t want to exist, but I also don’t want to *not* exist…
nah, I just don't want to exist.  I'm ok with not existing.  If this is what my existence has to look like, I'd just as soon skip it.
That's not what death is unless you believe your consciousness somehow transcends your brain and physical body. its not an endless void, its the same thing as sleeping. You wouldnt be able to tell me what you thought, felt, experienced while asleep (Deep sleep, not REM dreaming bullshit). Same thing with death.
well, yeah, and isn't that simply nothingness?
how do you feel when you're not sober?
i have hope for my future and i want to be alive
This puts a lot I feel into words. I have a date tomorrow. I want to go on it because I haven't been on a date in, holy shit, a year. I don't want to go on it because of how unprepared I am for it and the more I prepare for it, the more uptight I will be, the more likely it is to go bad. But I'm tired of being lonely, but I want to be alone.
> I'm tired of being lonely, but I want to be alone.  this is me.  I like the idea of being around other people a lot more than the reality.
Well... did you?
No, but I think about strangling him to this day, that son of a stupid girl should never have become a therapist if that's the kind of advice he planned on giving.
I hardly ever open up to people about my depression. I did with my cousin once and his response was, 'Just get over it, dude.' I swear that's what he said. I really don't have much of a relationship with him anymore because of that.
People who havent experienced it themselves are just shooting clueless. Dont hold it against him. 
ya...
Happy Cake Day!
Yes, my heart races when I get a notification, thinking that it might be from her.  It's a big let down when it's not.
My wife and I are close to divorcing.  A few weeks ago she sent me a text, 'Hey, can you talk?'. My heart was pounding, I broke down crying.  I had to leave work for the afternoon.  Thought she wanted a serious talk.  Turns out she had a trivial question about a gift she wanted to buy someone.  I felt like a shooting idiot.
My wife and I are close to divorcing.  A few weeks ago she sent me a text, 'Hey, can you talk?'. My heart was pounding, I broke down crying.  I had to leave work for the afternoon.  Thought she wanted a serious talk.  Turns out she had a trivial question about a gift she wanted to buy someone.  I felt like a shooting idiot.
You sound like someone who has a really big heart that's also been put through the wringer. That's not something that should make you feel like an idiot. I don't mean that to be invalidating. 
I never get messaged unless someone needs something from me 
this right here....
this right here....
Yeah pretty much, sometimes it will go on for months and then bam 'Hey, how are ya?.....(some small talk later), can you help me with this or how do I do this or do this for me' 
Yeah pretty much, sometimes it will go on for months and then bam 'Hey, how are ya?.....(some small talk later), can you help me with this or how do I do this or do this for me' 
Same like...   'ok so after all these months/years, you messaged me just to find out something you can look for just by checking shooting google?'   
Me as shoot. I used to put different sounds for when i get a message from someone i care but then it was the notion of how little that sound happened across the day or the week. Eventually i had to keep all notifications the same since it proved to be less depressing that way
oh god, you just reminded me of a specific LED color...
'I feel like I am being made to choose between a million kinds of orange when all I want is an apple' ~ I really enjoy your writing style and POV. Please write more. 
Oh -- I'm so glad you liked that -- but to clarify I didn't write that - I was copying a passage from a zine I read years ago that I just came back across in my email - I didn't write the Zine though!!  All credit goes to author but I don't know who that is - I'm sorry if I was unclear!
Tldr? :x
Read it. You won't regret it.
Read it. You won't regret it.
I usually don't read long texts here on Reddit, but  as soon as I started this one, it gave me a feeling that it was going to be worth, it just describes my life with such precision.
Sometimes it helps to have a good cry.When i'm really depressed and I feel like shit sometimes I cant cry for some reason and it feels like it's all being stored up inside of me.
This. Exactly. Last two weeks.  FMLast two weeks!
This is how I felt today <3
It's how I'm feeling right now. 
The same advice that is given when stuff like this gets posted in fitness subs: report them to the gym staff. Gyms often have zero tolerance for people taking pictures of/laughing at other gym goers. You might feel like this is an overreaction, shoot it, it's not. You're going to the gym to better yourself and these shoots are trying to ruin that.
I hate to be the 'this' person, but shooting THIS.   Report them. Get them kicked out. Gyms have no tolerance for this kind of harassment. You have every right to work out without being bothered.
I hate to be the 'this' person, but shooting THIS.   Report them. Get them kicked out. Gyms have no tolerance for this kind of harassment. You have every right to work out without being bothered.
this
this
And this!
If that happened to me, I'd get a rise out of it.  Just think of it like this: those idiots are still stuck in a high school mentality. That's pretty pathetic.  If you just ignored them, you adulted at their childishness. That's a win.
Lmao even in high school no one acted this childish, middle school? Maybe.
Outside there is an ocean of people who couldn't find it yet to open that door you did. Its occupants may be complete clowns, but I can say with great confidence there is a strength to you being there. And that's not something you get from lifting any weight, that's something you brought with you today. This is easily forgotten, and likely no real antidote to their poison, but I give that strength credit.
Coming from someone who struggles to get to the gym bc of social anxiety, this^ x1000000.  You're dope, keep it up.
Should you beat yourself up because dogs bark and wooden tables are made of wood? No. Just as you shouldn't when people are idiots because they're idiots.
hey, that's pretty good
Keep going to the gym.     Keep working on yourself.     Push yourself.    Punish yourself.    Get shooting HARD.    When the time is right, single the bullies out, catch them alone one by one, and beat the living shit out of them.
“Maybe you don’t have to push yourself forward.  Maybe you just have to stop holding yourself back.”  Doe Zantamata, author
Cook them and eat them, seriously tell them your a cannibal and if you see them looking at you one more time, you put them in a mother shooting microwave.
10/10 advice.
Hey, I’m sorry to hear about your situation. I’ve been through a ton of depressing situations myself. I’m 25 now, and apart from the cancer, I’ve been through similar experiences in life. If you’d like me to share, please message me. I really feel like I can give you some insight and hopefully, some hope. If I can get through what I’ve been through and end up with an ambitious spirit, I’m fully positive that you can as well. 
If you joined 'i must think more about myself and let others be' mentality id ratter not hear it.  Im not one to get somewhere at the expense of other. I feel that if i flip that switch i wouldnt know where to stop.  If you found another way then sure.
I read all of it just wanted to let you know that, hope it gets better for you
Thanks. For you too.
I'm sorry you dealt with so much people treating you like shit. You seem like a good person who deserves to be happy, don't give up on yourself. 
I have no problem facing the demons who torture me everiday. Its the angel who shows me theres a better place and then leaves me with the demons that i have a problem with.
I mean, IMO that is 100% true. Hell our existance is so short in the grand scheme of things, everything we do is just bullshit...but I find that kind of freeing. Big picture, it doesn't matter...so don't let it weigh you down too much.  The trick, I think -- and I fail at it mostly -- is to find the bullshit that can make you happy and run with it. 
Personally, I don't find that freeing at all, I find it the opposite - suffocating.
Think about it this way: if it’s meaningless either way, then why not have fun with it? At least you get your money’s worth from paying the price of existing by living a fulfilling life.
If I were able to live a fulfilling, fun life, then I don't think I would be so depressed in the first place.
You can view it in an optimistic or pessimistic way. Personally I view it similarly to urs. I'm going to seek the most pleasure I can possibly get while I'm still alive. I'm gonna drink, smoke ,shoot, do crazy shit. Dang goals and responsibilities, all of that's gonna disappear when u die, might as well smoke some weed while I'm at it
That's exactly what I think. I won't get stuff done in life. Basically the only 'real' happy time I have is when I party on chemicals... Dang this garbage human existence, I just take it how it approaches.
So, consider this: when gamers get old and retire, they will ABANDON their real lives for fictional VR MMOs. I can see it happening with  The Elder Scrolls VIII: Dang Reality 
I probably would play the shit our of that and won't wait till retirement.
Yup, life dosent matter. Thats why you only do things thta matter to you.
Unless you want to have food,  then you have to do work most of the time.   Also if life doesn't matter then nothing should matter to you unless you delude yourself into forgetting the fact that life doesn't matter
Meaningless =/= Bad
True,  but life is mostly bad.  Happy accident. Also being meaningless is not a point in life's favor. 
What separates us from the rest: knowing that 
I wrote it once in another thread: Who could blame them, 'normale' people are basically on drugs all the time. Produced by their own bodys, all right, but drugs nonetheless. Many of us don't get that luxury. Hell, I even have a hard time to get something out of 'artificial' drugs like alcohol, weed, speed, Hawaiian Baby Woodrose and such. Although I would love to get my hands on Shrooms or LSD at one point. Especially Shrooms, since they seem to have uses for treatment of depression.
Well a lot of them were from a different time, the game has changed a lot. The whole 'just go in and ask to speak with the manager!' for one easy example. Very outdated (might still work in some cases like food service or retail jobs, but for the most part...).
Nope, because if the sign says 'apply online' and you show up in store oftentimes they will eliminate you from the pool because you 'can't follow instructions'.  And I don't know any retailers that don't hire online anymore.
Our parents and grandparents shooted us over. They're such pussies they continually try to use us as punching bags to make themselves feel better about their shitty lives and failures.  Dang them, it's like they're stuck in high school.
I used to respect my elders because I thought they're the 'adults' and they know everything. When I became an adult I realised that there's no magic. Just because you're an adult doesn't mean you're always right or know about everything. I have started to see a little more clearly the flaws in them and I hate myself for wasting so many years and trusting them with their bullshit talks.
Yeah. I know the feeling. Except that I'm 190 6' and I have no excuse to have no energy. I try going to the gym. No luck. I try getting out of bed. No luck. I woke up at 1 AM after sleeping since like 4PM. Sleep schedule is shooted and my medicine isn't working. And yes I've tried 2 other medicines before this. So I know the feels, OP. 
I tried everything, medication, forcing myself to do it regardless of how tired I am, eating the right foods etc and it made no difference. I even managed to get my sleep routine back to normal (I go to sleep at 11:00pm and wake up at 7:00am) and, unbelievably, I have even LESS energy now. I am absolutely exhausted by 3:00pm even if I did nothing all day and have to just wait around to go to sleep. I am really losing my patience with this. 
I tried everything, medication, forcing myself to do it regardless of how tired I am, eating the right foods etc and it made no difference. I even managed to get my sleep routine back to normal (I go to sleep at 11:00pm and wake up at 7:00am) and, unbelievably, I have even LESS energy now. I am absolutely exhausted by 3:00pm even if I did nothing all day and have to just wait around to go to sleep. I am really losing my patience with this. 
Yeah. Depression is a pretty terrible thing. Most people don't seem to understand that no matter what you do it's always weighing down on you. 
Yeah. Depression is a pretty terrible thing. Most people don't seem to understand that no matter what you do it's always weighing down on you. 
Yeah exactly, I mean even today I'm sipping a smoothie and on my way to the gym but I feel the EXACT same as if I had stayed in bed and cried this morning instead. These healthy habits are not affecting my mood in the slightest. 
Try adderall. Im not kidding try it and see how your day goes.
frrr i get so productive when i take vyvanse!! but i always feel like shit afterwards :/
Translation: 'We want enthusiastic, charismatic, overly-bubbly people you'd want to punch in the face to wear a mask of perfect and utterly fake glee to become our workslaves.'
Pretty much.  Job ads like this disgust me.
Where's the job description that says the truth?  'We are looking for some a-hole who needs money bad enough to show up, do their job, and not shoot up a lot.'
+1
it's because that just a rule of HR or a standard so that the employer gets something out of you, otherwise there wouldn't be much to do, they have to think of stuff to do and one of those was to make sure you write a CV that is enthusiastic which kind of makes sense, as they are investing time with you the person....  So just fake it and be genuine as well, best method...
Can confirm, I'm a massive quiet introvert who had landed jobs and faked it for the $$$. Sometimes it's very tolling but each new day at work made faking it that bit easier. Good luck all you job seekers! 
smile with your eyes
when i was new to sales and had a hard time with this, i came up with an activity that helped alot. i would smile at myself in the mirror, then try to stop smiling with my mouth while leaving my eye expression static. it sometimes helped to cover my mouth in order to focus on my eyes. now (after much practice) i can pull a smile out of nowhere and not even mean it. i mean, i feel like a sociopath, but the customers just think i look friendly.
I get where you're coming from, but I also don't think it makes sense for a company to say something like we're looking for unmotivated lazy losers to join our team, I don't think there is a middle ground.
'We're looking for 'meh' people who want to do the bare minimum they are asked.'
'We're looking for 'meh' people who want to do the bare minimum they are asked.'
where do i sign up
Every time I walk down a sidewalk and I see a car coming I hope that it hops the curb and takes my ass out. So, you aren't alone in that. Unfortunately I do not have any words of wisdom to offer.
Everyday.
I have this and it is worse when I am driving, I see every light post or telephone pole and think a head on crash would be awesome.
Driving does it for me too! Especially when I'm on a highway, I think 'I could just run my car into that tree/cement embankment, etc., and it would all be over.'
I couldn't kill myself because it would hurt my family too much, but the idea of dying after being diagnosed with a fatal illness or in a sudden accident feels attractive. I could finally be free from pain and at the same time I wouldn't have to feel guilty about it since it's beyond my control.
That's exactly it. Dying early and very soon in a way that leaves my hands clean of it is my dream
I did.. Until someone attempted to rob me at gunpoint. At that point, I realized I wasn't ready yet. 
This is an interesting perspective. How much did your attitude change?
I realized how bad it was a while ago when I heard a news story of someone getting pulled by the riptide and smashing against a bunch of rocks.  I involuntarily thought, 'How nice it would be to die suddenly.'
That must have hit you like a pile of rocks, I can't imagine. It was definitely a slow development for me
Everyday. Every time a car stops before hitting me I curse them. I curse at myself when I look both ways when I cross the street. 
I have never agreed with anything as hard as I agree with this l
Yes, this is a very common thing. Especially because my depression leaves me with little motivation to do anything. Even making plans to kill myself and be able to get away with it without anyone finding out or stopping me seems like so much effort sometimes.  Sorry you're feeling this way, OP, but I sympathize with everything you wrote and wish you the best, whatever that may be for you. 
It does appear to be a common thing, I didn't expect so many replies on this thread especially not ones echoing what I feel so accurately  I like that you said you wish me the best, whatever that might be. Because it is death, but in my experience people online only try to make me look up and I really appreciate getting something else for a change
I'm constantly day dreaming of dying in a car crash
Me too. I used to daydream about success and happiness and now all I want is my own death where it arrives soon and I have no hand in it
Everyday I feel this way. I smoke cigarettes constantly, and I'm hoping that one day I get cancer and die. I don't have the guts to commit suicide, and killing yourself by smoking isn't illegal as far as I know.
I wanted to start doing that but I hate smoking, and I'm way too broke. 1 pack costs like 8£ and I can't spare that much if I'm buying enough to destroy my lungs  Also the odds are pretty bad, haha you're probably not even getting cancer and if you do you're living with it for a while
I wanted to start doing that but I hate smoking, and I'm way too broke. 1 pack costs like 8£ and I can't spare that much if I'm buying enough to destroy my lungs  Also the odds are pretty bad, haha you're probably not even getting cancer and if you do you're living with it for a while
Please keep in mind cancer can be an extremely painful and long way to die.
I relate. I've been a chain smoker for, God, eight years? Unfortunately, singing was one of my only outlets. I had a goddamn fantastic voice earlier in my life. Although I know it happened gradually, one day I just realized that my voice (and my young skin) was shot because of it. That's a big regret, considering what little impact smoking will have on my longevity, in the scheme of things. No longer seems worth it.
I've been chain smoking since I was 15, and I'm 36 now. I quit for one year when I was 17 so I could be in marching band.
Even if you haven't been diagnosed with something, that doesn't make it less real
I know what you're saying, but i don't want to sit here and be diagnosing myself because i could be wrong. maybe i'm just sad and not clinically depressed, so i just felt like i had no right to post here
I wanna be killed by a hot guy then
I would kill you but unfortunately I'm ugly
Sometimes yeah. Like some absolute nut job will break into my bedroom and just do it while I'm asleep.
God, isnt that the dream
I have to go back to college tomorrow but it feels like the opening scene in saving private Ryan. Im so nervous and its not even my first year, im a junior.  p.s No friends whatsoever 
Yeah that scene is a pretty good description of what it feels like. Wish it felt a bit more like High School Musical instead
I wish, but in Germany there's a law you must or else you pay a large sum of money on an daily basis. At some point, leaving the family as punishment.
Really? I thought Germany was pretty progressive when it comes to that stuff. Shouldn't have to be like that.
Really? I thought Germany was pretty progressive when it comes to that stuff. Shouldn't have to be like that.
Yeah. They argue with stuff like ,,so the poor people aren't made slave of' or 'this kind of education is what everyone should know', even though it is exactly not that kinda stuff, except evolution (very basic) in class/grade 5 to 6.  It really sucks, as an lone person which also is very into justice, you'll end up getting bullied or border-bullied, because they're really hypocrites. (I don't care - I don't want to have any personal friendship with them anyways.) 
Did you feel like the break helped you?
Somewhat. It took away the stress of having to go to school every day, but I still felt depressed, and awfully lonely. I think what's helped me most as of late has been medication.
So true. A single hug can go a long way.
So damn true mate
I agree, even though I can hardly remember how it feels now.  Almost every single night when I'm trying to fall asleep, most of the time unsuccessfully, I 'daydream' how it would feel to receive a gentle touch on the arm or a hug... then I get even sadder when I realize how long ago since I felt that feeling...
I hug a pillow sometimes as I fall asleep, I don't know man, that might help you
I hug a pillow sometimes as I fall asleep, I don't know man, that might help you
I've tried it, but it's just not the same holding my arms around a pillow as it is to hold my arms, or being held by, another person.
I've tried it, but it's just not the same holding my arms around a pillow as it is to hold my arms, or being held by, another person.
It'll happen bro. You won't be alone forever.
I work as a Pre-K teacher, so kids run up at random points in the day and give hugs and say 'I love you'.  Sometimes I feel like they are doing more for me than I am for them.  Those interactions help get me through the day.  In the morning, when I'm usually feeling most anxious, I just have to remind myself that once I get to work I will feel needed and loved.  
I used to work as a ski instructor, and I always loved teaching the really little guys for things like this.  Something I miss most about the job.
Sounds nice, I can't remember the last time I had a physical contact that wasn't a handshake. So long that any physical contact wigs me out now. I will say this, I thought that I had gotten over it, but just yesterday I broke down sobbing. Sorry, that all came out in a bit of a rush, it's hard to admit this in actual, concrete words. More so to other people, anonymous though you may be.
I'm in kind of the same position as you, but maybe not as bad. Someone gave me a hug when i wasnt expecting it, and immediately i could feel tears welling in my eyes... I kinda just stood in quiet shock for a while afterwards.   And don't be afraid to admit anything! Someone out there cares! :) 
Made me think of JD:  https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=jS164Gn1FS8
Oh god. :x  You make me feel bad :<
Biggest reason why I miss my ex :(
dont worry man, there are plenty more girls/boys out there for you!
For the longest time in my life I always wished (I know this is going to sound really, really bad) I got cancer. That way I'll be able to leave the world without guilt.. I know it's an extremely selfish thought but if it meant I could just disappear one day then so be it.
I've done this
Yep. I make list divided in easily doable very small tasks. Then I do nothing from the list. Then I feel shitty. 
I'm sorry :( Sometimes even just putting 'get up' on the list then crossing it off if I do (even if I write it down after the fact) can make me feel the teeniest bit better. Some days I can't even do that but it's a process. 
I often think about how unlikely it is for me to be existing here and now. The universe is trillions of years old, but the year is 2017 and I'm breathing and experiencing this life. So many things could have happened to prevent my birth. 
Ive contemplated the same shit many a time. There is no solace, only pain.
I think about jumping off my balcony or jumping in front of the subway, but I can never do it. I know it will hurt the few people I care about and I can never do that to them.  But the feeling of not existing does not go away. 
The only thing keeping me alive is not wanting to hurt the people who care about me. I recently lost my grandma who was one of the main reasons I never took my life. I know it would devastate my mom to lose me so soon after losing her mom, but I really wish she could understand that it's the only thing that would end my suffering. 
Every. Damn. Day. I know that my suicide would hurt too many people and my mom has told me point-blank that the end of me is the end of her. But I still can't get the thought out of my head. When not existing is a better alternative to living with depression you know this illness is rough.
Damn. I'm still dealing with a family member's overdose from last March and my mother  told me the exact thing. She wouldn't be able to do it if anything happened to me. I'm not selfish enough to off myself but days like these make not existing seem sublime
I got layed off from radioshack 1 an a half years ago.. The store closed. I'm in Eastern ky. There are no other jobs here but fast food and walmart. I figure once I hit the 2 yr mark I'll end this dumb shootin game. I can't force people to hire me. 
That sucks. Anything further afield or you could do from your home? My partner has just managed to find something after a year of searching. He did some online courses and some volunteering to brush up his CV in end, which seemed to help, but it was still a nightmare. The economy has slipped through the toilet and reached full sewer depth. :(
I constantly wonder if im depressed or im just some pathetic pussy hurt by small, irrational, shooting stupid reasons. Then I find myself okay, then I feel silly for feeling so pathetic. Then the guilt. Then I feel bad for feeling bad. Then I find myself stuck again
Yes, yes and yes. I thought it was just me.
Yes. Even the therapists I've talked to are insinuating that I'm not depressed. No idea what they want as 'proof'. Starting to think suicide is the only option. Its apparently what depressed people do.
Sorry about your experience with therapists, they sound awful. I think therapists should offer help if someone comes to them with a problem, regardless of whether you have a clinical diagnosis. Try to keep looking - finding a good therapist who 'clicks' with you and understands your situation can unfortunately take a painfully long time of trial-and-error.
What if you don't have any friends?
I can't really answer that. But if it's worth anything, I would be that persons friend. Everyone could use at least one friend.
I can't really answer that. But if it's worth anything, I would be that persons friend. Everyone could use at least one friend.
My problem isn't that I can't meet people, my problem is that I can't make myself maintain contact with people.
Nah, I don't want or need friends.
How come?
Wow hope you cut your mom out of your life as much as possible or fixed your relationship.
We didn't speak for a year when I moved out of the house at 19. When I came back home, I was in a new place and my dad was ill so we reconnected out of necessity during this tough time. I wouldn't say I forgave her for all the things she's done/said to me-- I just realized that if I hold on to things for so long, they start to consume me and if anything, I will be the better person and move on from it. 
Your parents sound christian and Republican and horrible. Are they dead already? 
yep, all those things are true. dad's been dead for 10 years now, mom's dead to me. i haven't talked to her in i think 2 years, haven't seen her since a year before that, and my son has no relationship with her. i know that one of her sisters' husbands knows where i live and has my address, so i assume she's still alive or else he would have contacted me.
You're not pathetic. It takes a lot of guts to tell anyone that you're struggling with this. That's the opposite of pathetic. 
Thank you. I beat myself up about this all the time. I don't think anyone hates me as much as I hate myself.
Speaking as someone who's moved around a number of times, including away from a bad family member and a bad non-family member on separate occasions, **I strongly recommend that you force your way out; you won't regret it.**
I already looked into my options, but since I'm not legally an adult they still own me. Fortunately I'll be turning 18 in a few months (and I'll be moving out the week of) but every passing day feels like years. Time is going by so slow and sometimes I don't know how much longer I can take this. It's good you were able to get out. I hope I can soon.
I already looked into my options, but since I'm not legally an adult they still own me. Fortunately I'll be turning 18 in a few months (and I'll be moving out the week of) but every passing day feels like years. Time is going by so slow and sometimes I don't know how much longer I can take this. It's good you were able to get out. I hope I can soon.
You got this! 18 will be there before you know it and then a whole new chapter of your life will open. Persevere and you will prosper!
Feel free to PM me just for support. I am in your shoes, my damily refuses to accept that depression runs in the family. Though 6 out of 8 of us has attempted suicide. My mom was one of them.
Holy cow, it sounds like your family is in denial about what's really going on. I hope you get the help you need.
This is why I won't speak to anyone about my problems, there's a HUGE stigma still attached to mental health, and it's like people who have never had it just don't get what we're going through, I'm sorry to hear your mom reacted in that way, if you haven't already you should visit your gp and speak to them about treatment options, diagnosis etc, know there's people out there that do understand and will listen.
Thank you, I tried to do that but she denies me mental and medical help constantly. As soon as I'm legally an adult, my first goal is to get into therapy. I'm sorry you're stuck in the same hole as me. People are so unpredictable.
Yeah, parents are usually not that understanding. Mine wasn't either.  I think it's because they grew up in a generation where mental health awareness was still not really a thing.
Right. I tried to get mental help and she told me 'psychiatrists weren't a thing when I was a kid. We had no antidepressants.' Basically, she was trying to tell me that I can just deal with it on my own. Sorry about your parents as well. It really sucks when not even they can understand.
I want to beat your mother in the face so hard she'll be feeling it for the next year. I have no empathy for her if she's saying shit like that to you, she could use a good bit of the tough love anyways. What a miserable  idiot.  Live better than her so you can rub it in her face about how much of a useless cow she was to you.
wow, that was quite evolved of you.  her mother is ignorant.  that is suffering enough.
This is why people shouldn't come out. 
No, you should seek help. Coming out is strength, because it shows a desire to get better. 
Yes it’s since last July now when it really started. I really need a change but I’m lost and feel like I’ve lost everyone besides Mom and sister who I live with.
Me too since last July. Got no help and no will to get better. Am stuck, can't do anything.
Hell yeah bro! :D
I love how upbeat you are about it, haha
I love how upbeat you are about it, haha
Rotting for is a form of art.
Browsing the web is like a drug, keeps you numb but digs you deeper into the whole, I've been doing it all day
Honestly it is a good way to keep me numb.  Without my phone, I contemplate life and get depressed.  I have an assignment that was due yesterday that I need to get done.  Professor emailed me, saying I got to turn it in by tomorrow noon or I'm in real danger of not passing the class.  Good bye
Honestly it is a good way to keep me numb.  Without my phone, I contemplate life and get depressed.  I have an assignment that was due yesterday that I need to get done.  Professor emailed me, saying I got to turn it in by tomorrow noon or I'm in real danger of not passing the class.  Good bye
bye...
This is why work can be fulfilling; even a menial job makes things a little less meaningless. You make friends with the co workers, get a little money, get out of the house for a bit. Or if not work volunteering in the community. Doing a little something for someone. It's hard to find motivation to get out and do something, but it really does help in the long run.
I don't like leaving my house, people are mean, and boring, and I'm suspicious of most of them
Guilty of this too. Constant sleeping to escape the pain. You're doing great. Keep going. 
the less you do, the more guilty and useless you feel, which compels you to continue not doing anything, the cycle feeds itself
Yes I have a little phone anxiety or phone hesitation. Picking up the phone is way harder for me than making a call though. I even did a phone sales job and weirdly the anxiety NEVER went away even though I made thousands of calls. 
I'm the opposite where it's basically impossible to make a phone call but I'm able to answer one
I'm exactly the same. I can keep a conversation in real life going, but on the phone? It's horrible.  I have to think over really hard what I'm going to say before I make any calls, but, sadly, I mess up close to 4 out of 5 times. 
It would be easier if the people on the other end could do that as well, but they usually can't, making you the one holding a conversation with yourself with some random interjection from the person st the other end. 
I have a terrible phobia of talking on the phone. My phobia is so bad that it is one of the things that cripples my life.
This is me. A therapist told me that if it was important I'd make the calls. Umm..nope. I can't call employers or anybody who can give me any help like voc rehab or doctors or dss and these are the people who rarely use any electronic communication which pisses me off
Here, let me fix it for ya:     does anyone else hate talking and actively avoid it?     My answer: yes.
At my job i don't chat but im forced to sit there and listen in.  OH MY GOD people are so inane.  I honestly believe that about 90% of human dialog is completely extraneous.  
Then you get more depressed :/ unfortunate cycle life can be
Yup. Started getting depressed so I stopped initiating contact with the people I thought were my friends. I then discovered they never initiate any sort of contact with me.   Never get a text, or invitation to hang out. Any time that stuff happened, I initiated it.  Of course, that realisation has only sent me deeper into depression. How fun.
Yup. Started getting depressed so I stopped initiating contact with the people I thought were my friends. I then discovered they never initiate any sort of contact with me.   Never get a text, or invitation to hang out. Any time that stuff happened, I initiated it.  Of course, that realisation has only sent me deeper into depression. How fun.
Exactly what I'm going through right now. I have not talked to anybody in 3 months. 
Dang us right
Nope. You're amazing. 
I'd be your friend. And anyone else who commented on this agreeing with you too. PM me if you wanna talk. 
Hey morning bud... Hope you have a nice day today 
Oh, yes. I'm suffering from the whole alphabet soup of depressive disorders and PTSD. The only friend I had was around for 20 years, then completely betrayed my trust and bailed on me when I needed her most last summer. It broke my heart so much that I moved across the country a few months ago, and it's terribly lonely here. There's zero chance as it is to make friends as an adult, let alone in a new place... It's crushing me.
My best friend stopped talking to me without explanation 2 years ago. I still can't understand it. 
Unless they too are also suffering.  Depression makes us self centered because we're too miserable to care about other people. 
Yep. I rarely talk with my friends any more because I don't feel like I have anything positive to talk about. Doesn't mean I don't care about them, just means I don't want to drag them down with me.
Yep. I rarely talk with my friends any more because I don't feel like I have anything positive to talk about. Doesn't mean I don't care about them, just means I don't want to drag them down with me.
I recently started talking to my friend again, we're neighbors so it was weird not to talk to her for months  (year?) Now we bond about how uneventful and sad our lives are. Which is nice to not lie and just be open with someone.  We know we don't like being around people often so, small doses.
A lot of times people just don't know what to say.
Most friends should at least be empathetic in some way.
Most friends should at least be empathetic in some way.
I agree!
My recent bought of depression caused me to become extremely isolated. I never wanted to text, or call anyone back which then made my friends upset with me, to the point where they never tried anymore. And then I was even more sad because no one bothered to call anymore ...it's a vicious cycle.
This. Exact same thing is happening to me right now.
Friends learn of a new you with depression.  See behind the mask.  The sight is generally not pretty.  It's not their fault if they can't handle it.
It's their fault for how they choose to handle it.
Not so much 'bad enough'  just they have their own lives to deal with and severe problems.   Rather not add emotional negativity to their already rough lives. 
Some of us, though, gain strength from helping others.  I know that my worst depression comes when I feel alone.
What do I think? I think this was a pretty damn good reply!  Thank you so much for taking the time out of your day to leave some kind words; I really do appreciate it! And I'll most definitely start doing positive self talk! :)
You're very welcome! :)  Feel free to message me in the future to tell me how it goes, if you feel like it. (:
>I'm a somewhat rare person, I completely lack inner dialogue. So I find it hard to relate to this, haha.  wat
¿?
¿?
wtf do you mean no inner dialouge, what goes on in your head boyyo
You are the very first person I’ve ever found, that is like me, haha. <3
BRB gonna go get the engagement ring
with doctor i refer to the job not to any gender. Just like a bartender or a medic.
You said 'He will believe your words', that's what they're getting at.
Sorry you went through that. I'm 50ish, but I've been there/done that on the teenage suicidality thing, and it shooting blows. Believe it or not, but answering 'yes' in that situation is the best bet, even with a parent present, as the other outcome could involve personal extinction. If doing so would worsten your parental relationship, that's a separate problem you can address after you get better.
> I'm 50ish  *checks username*  Jesus, sir. That's dark.
Call the office, ask to speak to a nurse, and explain that you didn't feel like you could share that in front of your parent but you need that to be considered.  Doctors aren't judging you and even though i know it's something that's super hard to admit to, hopefully your parents would be supportive of you too!
Do what this guy said! The doctor should ask the parents to leave the room before asking those questions, its doctor-patient confidentiality thats protected by HIPPA.
Coming from someone that has lied to several doctors and to my parents: I can empathize. Suicide hotlines, talking to someone online, posting here, etc. is a good start! Keep us updated please.   Also, once I did tell my parents, I was 18. I felt the weight lift off my shoulders. If you can trust them, take the leap. It’s horrifying but your parents care and love you. If you feel unsafe telling them, tell someone - anyone. 
im 20 i told my parents that i was depressed and suicidal.......  well they laughed and brushed it off... i tried killing myself that night my ex saved
Out of curiosity, what did they diagnose you with and did they prescribe meds?
They diagnosed me with minor depression and anxiety, and didn't prescribe meds because I 'wasn't suicidal'
They diagnosed me with minor depression and anxiety, and didn't prescribe meds because I 'wasn't suicidal'
Ok. You were completely not taken care of properly. You need to see a psychiatrist and a psychotherapist. I understand you were scared to say anything. If your parents are not going to be supportive, I would go to the ER. Suicidal thought are very serious. You need help by professionals to get on the right meds and learn some mental health skills line cognitive behavioral therapist. 
He's legally obligated to tell my parents if I'm at risk to myself or others. Plus, it took 4 months to get that appointment. I doubt I can just walk in there again.
But its worse that he gives you wrong meds/treatment based on wrong diagnosis and it messes you up. Will it be okay if he tells your parents? How is your relationship with them? When is the next appointment then?
Happy birthday fam keep up the grind
Thank you!!
congratulations and happy birthday! I can completely relate, I recently made it to my 19th birthday so the goal now is just to make it to 19.5 and then 20 and then 20.5 and so on
Thank you!! Happy belated birthday and good luck!!
For me it was turning 28, two months ago. Somehow, making it past 27 makes me feel accomplished, considering the connection that age has with suicide.
Happy belated birthday!! I actually had no idea 27 has a suicide connection. I hope I'll see you for my 28!
Happy belated birthday!! I actually had no idea 27 has a suicide connection. I hope I'll see you for my 28!
I was referring to [this](https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/27_Club). And thank you :)
I’ve had dreams for years that I’d kill myself on my 28th birthday. Being 27 is somehow very scary for me for some strange reason, but I still have 5 years to get there.
A lot of my depression started when I turned 22, but making it to 28 really wasn't that hard. It was just another day.
Happy Birthday! I wish you have a good life ahead of you!
Thank you!!
Happy birthday I feel so happy for u :D
Thank you!! It makes me happy to know I made you happy!!
Happy happy birthday!!! I never thought I'd make to almost 19, but here the shoot I am lol!
Thank you!! Happy early birthday!!
You know what?? That is probably the best description of depression I've seen. People just think were sad, like when your pets dies as a child ... shoot no!!! It's a daily war, I feel I've come from a shooting battle every day, wounded, completely exhausted, and people just go 'don't worry about that', 'It will get better'... Its been hard to be functional all these years, I 'm glad to hear that other people suffer the same but keep on fighting. Great text 
My mom just got done telling me I just need more sunlight. Like thats my whole problem. I'm just like 'okay whatever mom' and roll my eyes.
My mom just got done telling me I just need more sunlight. Like thats my whole problem. I'm just like 'okay whatever mom' and roll my eyes.
'Go for a nice walk'. I did and last time I just sat on the curb and broke down cause I physically couldn't move anymore. 
'Go for a nice walk'. I did and last time I just sat on the curb and broke down cause I physically couldn't move anymore. 
I can't even get myself to the curb. And if I did, I'd be wishing for a car to roll me over.
Oh man, that's a real challenge right there. Depression + Architecture never bode well together. I recently got my architect's license but haven't been employed for almost a year now. Been depressed for months and It's killing me. And now at interviews I tend to shoot up a lot because I've mostly forgotten my basics. 
Exactly! Try being in a room full of shooting egos, trying to defend your shitty design because you forgot architecture basics. It’s shameful sometimes. I’ve been employed at this company for a year and I’ve got nothing to show for it.
Same. Nearly out of the 200's.
I laughed. 
I didn't realize I thought this way until I heard the line 'You can get addicted to a certain kind of sadness' by Goyte. It suddenly clicked that depression is kind of comforting in a sense. 
http://imgur.com/M2d7Ojk
I have this same feeling too, and I don't know where it comes from. Medication made it go away, and healthy living and good habits certainly make it easier to stop as well
Good to hear the meds worked for you. Did it get rid of that feeling or having the thoughts in the first place?
Good to hear the meds worked for you. Did it get rid of that feeling or having the thoughts in the first place?
Yes, for the most part. It does the lion's share of work when it comes to getting rid of them
Yes, for the most part. It does the lion's share of work when it comes to getting rid of them
I've been thinking about starting medication.. I've had depression for so long. I'm kind of scared of what will happen
Asserting your self-worth is uncomfortable because it creates responsibility for your problems.  Saying 'I'm a PoS' feels good because it resolves the dissonance of what we think we should be and who we actually are.  It's tricky because we need to accept our real limitations but at the same time we often don't know how much we can grow or deal with things.
>Saying 'I'm a PoS' feels good because it resolves the dissonance of what we think we should be and who we actually are.  That...actually makes a lot of sense.  
Ever heard of a documentary called 'What the Bleep Do We Know?' It's about pretty much this topic. How we can become addicted to our own brain chemistry even if it's negative. It covers quantum mechanics and how it connects to our emotional states. I highly recommend it. It's helped me start to see the patterns that I want to avoid or do more that I hadn't considered before. 
Haven't seen this and plan to watch it so thank you. My biggest issue when it comes to this is... if my brain is naturally ruminating on these negative thought patterns then there must be a reason for it. And so I begin to believe the lie.
Thank you so much for your response and the trouble you went through to type it. :) I'm still at my parents which is good and I do have education. It sounds petty but I have a boyfriend that knows what's up and we're planning to move away together in 3.5 years. I just have to keep my head down and finish school and save up so hopefully I can move. Thank you again. :) 
How old is your boyfriend?
How old is your boyfriend?
why? 15
I'm sorry you have (apparently) such uncaring, unsupportive parents/family. I can't imagine how hard that makes things. Have you sought any professional help? Are they literally kicking you out? Where are you going to stay?  My only advice, which is very unhelpful, is: hang in there. You don't have much agency at 14. But in 2-3 years you can leave your toxic family behind and start to work through your shit. Please don't bail on life before it's even begun.
I'm seeing a psychiatrist soon and I already see a counsellor. I don't know how long I'm going to be gone for but I'm staying at a place for awhile and then I'll probably be old enough to leave soon enough.   I'll hang in there. thank you, you have a lot better advice than you could ever imagine. so thank you. <3 
I'm seeing a psychiatrist soon and I already see a counsellor. I don't know how long I'm going to be gone for but I'm staying at a place for awhile and then I'll probably be old enough to leave soon enough.   I'll hang in there. thank you, you have a lot better advice than you could ever imagine. so thank you. <3 
He's completely right.    Additionally, when you talk to either your psychiatrist or counselor, *please* tell them what's going on. If they have a solution you're not really comfortable with, tell them and ask them to explain it. I've made the mistake of telling professionals nothing and it's just not going to help! They're there to talk about anything :)
He's completely right.    Additionally, when you talk to either your psychiatrist or counselor, *please* tell them what's going on. If they have a solution you're not really comfortable with, tell them and ask them to explain it. I've made the mistake of telling professionals nothing and it's just not going to help! They're there to talk about anything :)
Exactly this! Do not hold back anything. They are there to help you and they will, but please don't hold back. If you feel uncomfortable or are having a hard time talking about something, tell them that and they will help you. They know sometimes someone is too ashamed to talk about things, or they fear talking about it, but these ppl are professionals and will handle your situation with care, keeping you as comfortable as possible. Please seek help, and don't give up!
Dang your family,  family isn't who your born into, it's who you make it, pour water bottles into their cars gas tanks!!
I agree with the first part. The second part isn't going to help anything.
You should message the admins. They have tools to deal with these situations.
We have, but until this person is completely shut down, we feel our community should be forewarned.
I don't know.  Could you please send the tx of the PM and the account i came from to ou modmail?  Thx.
Is there an update on camp fire friends? I just got a message from them but I won't hit the link until I know it isn't spam or something dangerous.
Is there an update on camp fire friends? I just got a message from them but I won't hit the link until I know it isn't spam or something dangerous.
We think it's spam also, strongly recommend against visiting the site.
So, does he got ads on his site (using ad and script blockers)?   Or what is the entire purpose of this (even for ad revenue this seems to be a shitty tactic too).
No ads, just PM-ing people pretending to be 'just a person' when they're actually trying to drive traffic to a site they own.
No ads, just PM-ing people pretending to be 'just a person' when they're actually trying to drive traffic to a site they own.
There's an ad running at the top of the sub for me right now for this cathartic thing. 
There's an ad running at the top of the sub for me right now for this cathartic thing. 
We know.  We can't do anything about that, but at least she's paying for publicity instead of sneakily trying to get it for free.  Still, since the ads will appear right above this sticky, I doubt she's getting her money's worth. 
Nice! I know that exact feeling- when you just get it **done**. Feels goooood
I know! it feels great to go to bed relaxed and not stressed out. 
I know! it feels great to go to bed relaxed and not stressed out. 
Yeah, it's awesome. I've been trying to do this more often. It feels great to be studious and conscientious about school. I know its can be hard in terms of discipline, but just watch; you'll feel better (more confident) and your grades will skyrocket.
I have this problem. I just want to sleep right when I get home which ruins my sleep schedule and I'm a zombie during class. Also it's ruining my grades a bit, and I'm pissed @ myself.
You can have my Karma sir because this is just like my situation.
This brought a smile to my face. Thanks! Keep up the good work!
thank you! after all this encouragement and seeing how good I felt I'll definitely try! :)
Once upon a time a very insecure girl got the courage to wear mid-thigh length shorts. She was 60kg, 155cm (130lbs, 5'1) and always felt she was too fat for shorts. That same day, two girls in mini-shorts came up to her and told her that someone like her needs longer pants - nobody wants to see her fat legs wobbling around.   Took 3 years to feel confident enough to wear those shorts in public ... and 60 seconds for someone to tear me down.
Just wanted to say that those figures (130/5'1) are ideal for some :)  
Just wanted to say that those figures (130/5'1) are ideal for some :)  
Indeed. When I had it I hated it, but I would love to have that figure now haha (I'm still the same height but I'm carrying an extra 40lbs).
'I see you have some self esteem you'd like to save and grow. We'll just take that, invest it in your life long happiness annnnnndd it's gone.' 
'We'll also throw in those random thoughts that makes you doubt yourself, absolutely free off charge!'
'We'll also throw in those random thoughts that makes you doubt yourself, absolutely free off charge!'
'And if you call the number on the screen RIGHT NOW, we will give you thoughts that you should rip your skin apart! A $40 value, for free!'
UGH I know this feeling too well. Self esteem's always fleeting with me, so I tend to enjoy it whilst it lasts. Easy come, easy go. 
If only there was a way to trap that fleeting self-esteem in a bottle or in a net...I would love my own collection of self-esteem tailored specifically to me to take out and play with whenever I please.
Here is the text from this meme pic for anybody who needs it:    >Title: Finally got some self-esteem...    >Meme: and its gone    >* YOU FINALLY HAVE SOME  SELF-ESTEEM  >* AAAAND IT'S GONE    > ^[[Translate](http://translate.google.com/#auto||YOU+FINALLY+HAVE+SOME++SELF-ESTEEM+-+AAAAND+IT%27S+GONE)]    This is helpful for people who can't reach Quickmeme because of work/school firewalls or site downtime, and many other reasons ([FAQ](http://www.reddit.com/r/qkme_transcriber/comments/o426k/faq_for_the_qkme_transcriber_bot/)). More info is available [here](http://www.reddit.com/r/qkme_transcriber/).
I finally got one of these. :D
I do this too and actually question whether I'm depressed or not. It feels bad when I turn in mediocre work or no work at all to teachers and I feel like I'm disappointing everybody with my laziness.
As a college English teacher, I bend over backwards to help the students who disappear for a few weeks and come back all apologetic. I'm told to fail them, but I know a good portion probably have some form of depression. 
As a college English teacher, I bend over backwards to help the students who disappear for a few weeks and come back all apologetic. I'm told to fail them, but I know a good portion probably have some form of depression. 
God I wanna tell my professors but I'm afraid they won't understand or be that sympathetic. In fact that's the reason I haven't told anybody I know about this, they just never seem to understand. Dang me right?
This is me everytime I start a paper. Lately I go to my colleges computer lab or library where there are less distractions and actually try to get stuff done
I'm currently 3 weeks into revision period for my exams and with 6 weeks left it's getting pretty depressing
try dating with a girl. It might boost your confidence 
Some people can't get dates, or don't want to, and in any case confidence isn't the issue here.
10 things sounds like a lot. how about 3 a day?
The idea is to just get something done, be it 1, 3, 7,10?  The number isn't that important, 3 is fine.  Generally once you get moving and accomplish something then each proceeding task becomes easier.
I think I'm lazy AND depressed. The depression just makes my natural lazy tendencies worse. 
I think im just lazy. I become depressed when i have to do anything, so i just ignore things and go back to bed.  Im lazy by nature, and depressed because such a state is incompatible with our world.
I think im just lazy. I become depressed when i have to do anything, so i just ignore things and go back to bed.  Im lazy by nature, and depressed because such a state is incompatible with our world.
That's a good way to put it. Sometimes I can't relax because if I'm not doing something, I feel bad. Sometimes it's good and healthy to be 'lazy!'
I think my depressive thoughts are relatively mild so especially whenever I sort of break the negative spiral and get distracted by my work and am productive then it really feels as if I was fooling myself all along. And then the next day it's back and I can't concentrate.
same, i actually feel BAD for feeling good. it's really odd, it's like the depression was fake and i was just being an attention whore the whole time 
Laziness is definitely real. Im 100% content laying in bed all day, watching netflix and reading books till i die. Thats what i want out of life. I dont want to work, or even shower more than once a week. Its the way both me and my sister have always been.  Everything else is a chore, and ee become depressed having to do it. 
I'm like you but I don't have the energy to read books and I feel watching Netflix is a chore. Everything is just bland and too much. 
I'm the same dude. Except I imagine these scenarios where someone calls me lazy and I just blow up to them. 'Don't ever call me lazy! You don't know what I go through!'.  I would never actually do that but I would question them about what defines lazy because I'm constantly busy struggling with my depression as well as studying and working 7 days a week. 
I just admit im lazy. That always catches people. They expect your ego to be insulted. Its a form of motivation. When you show no response, ehen you agree you are lazy, and treat laziness as the affliction it is, people lose that power over yoi.
hey guys wats up i am new to reddit
Yeah let's downvote people in a depression subreddit.  Not like it will hurt them emotionally or anything.  Because that totally doesn't happen.  For shoots sake.
Yep. All the time. I start feeling hopeful, then I feel guilty for feeling hopeful; because I'm worthless. cycle continues
Damn. I know this all too well. Why am I enjoying myself, I shouldn't be, I'm happy now but will I be tomorrow? No. Pointless.
For me sometimes guilt stems from thinking about why I have depression. My life is objectively not so terrible, and I just think, 'What reasons do I have for being depressed?', which just kind of makes me feel worse, even though I *know* that it's a chemical imbalance in my brain, sometimes I just can't *accept* that, if that makes sense.
This exactly. The one time I ever told someone I was depressed, they told me that I don't have real problems.  It makes me feel guilty for hurting when I should be happy for what is there.
Yes. It usually happens during a particularly enjoyable social interaction, like at a gathering with my closest friends. Sometimes it also happens when I hear really good news. It makes the 'normal' days suck so much harder. It can't be like that for other people, can it?
>Yes. It usually happens during a particularly enjoyable social interaction, like at a gathering with my closest friends  And then as soon as it's over and you are alone you just crash and feel worse than you did before. That was my experience anyway.
Me too, but I only have one real close friend. The only time I truly feel happy, is when we are hanging out in person and can both be stupid together. The rest of the time, I feel like shit but hide it from everyone ^_^
I've never posted here before but I'm in the same situation, I've lost all my other friends one way or another over the last six months (betraying me, moving away, cutting communication out of the blue) I have one friend left that's been my best friend for 12 years, and he's talking about moving away next year. If you ever want to talk hit me up.
Yep, I was like I'm going to learn photo manipulation and was really motivated did it for a day next day I lost all motivation and just felt like it was ppintle
I know how that feels so much! Every time i get into and motivated to do something it always ends after a while. :\
that's honestly pretty shooted up. your fafsa is YOUR money not anyone else's. even if that money was supposed to go to your grandmother, it's still your money and the fact she didn't ask you is pretty shady. as far as im concerned your mom owes you $1500. good on you on cutting her access. i do sincerely hope the best for you
Sounds like something OP should contact their school/state about. Federal aid isn't to be used anywhere besides college.
Maybe post in /r/legaladvice?
Also sounds like you need to vent in /r/raisedbynarcissists as well, especially if she's done this before
Also sounds like you need to vent in /r/raisedbynarcissists as well, especially if she's done this before
She didn’t rush to search for money? Tell her you know it is her and ask why 
I don't have to time or money to do anything about it. All I can do is confront her about it but I can't deal with confrontation and I can barely hold a conversation.  I don't want to have a bad relationship with her but I really need my money back. It's so close to the holidays I feel bad for asking.
A lot of the people from r/legaladvice can give you some cheap or even free options. And even if you can’t afford it, it’s still good to see every option before you confront her by yourself. I’d say give it a shot 
You could take next semester off to work and save. Also make sure NO ONE can get into your bank account. Open an account somewhere that has a good mobile app that you can check frequently (like chase) also I would never lend your mom money again. I'm sorry this happened to you. My mom stole money from me too 
Also you should tell her that you deserve your money back and it isn't right. That's all you have to say
Also you should tell her that you deserve your money back and it isn't right. That's all you have to say
It is, in fact, illegal to use FAFSA money for non-school expenses. This is almost never prosecuted, but if OP goes to his financial aid office and says 'my mom broke into my checking account and stole my financial aid money' it'll ring some bells at the federal level.  Might be a bigger hassle than it's worth. But OP could definitely remind mom that she's committed fraud, not just helped herself to a piggy bank.
It is, in fact, illegal to use FAFSA money for non-school expenses. This is almost never prosecuted, but if OP goes to his financial aid office and says 'my mom broke into my checking account and stole my financial aid money' it'll ring some bells at the federal level.  Might be a bigger hassle than it's worth. But OP could definitely remind mom that she's committed fraud, not just helped herself to a piggy bank.
Op could let his mom know this. Unquestionably she is a narcisist. I would try to not live with her if you do not already
If everything else fails, create a gofundme (or) similar campaign and reply the link here. I'm willing to donate 100 USD!
I really appreciate it but I don't feel right doing so. I don't want to take people's hard earned money when I have nothing to give back. Thanks but it just doesn't feel right.
I really appreciate it but I don't feel right doing so. I don't want to take people's hard earned money when I have nothing to give back. Thanks but it just doesn't feel right.
Dear, You have a heart of gold! You don't necessarily need to give it back to me. You can give it to someone in need when you've surplus. Anyway it's your call to take and if things feel hopeless just keep in mind that it's okay to take help from someone who's willing to help.
Dear, You have a heart of gold! You don't necessarily need to give it back to me. You can give it to someone in need when you've surplus. Anyway it's your call to take and if things feel hopeless just keep in mind that it's okay to take help from someone who's willing to help.
>it's okay to take help from someone who's willing to help.  This is super difficult for me personally. I do not think I am worth it at all and end up feeling worse. I can't even get myself to take FAFSA money hahahahahah wtf is wrong with me. 
My school does have payment plans but I can't even afford the down payment. I can't get a loan because I have no one available to help me and I have no credit. Thank you for your offer but I don't want anyone to send me any money. You've worked hard for it and I don't feel right taking it. The offer is appreciated though. 
>  I don't feel right taking it  No-one can do everything alone. Everyone needs a bit of help sometime. If this is your time, so be it. Accept it, and next time you see someone in need, and you have spare resources, be it time or money, you can give back, and help the next person who needs it.
Congraaaats! I know how it is. 3 years ago I finished school, this past week I finally received a job offer.
Thank you, congrats to you too. (:
What kind of job is it? Are you looking forward to it? Do you know anyone working there, or are you a new face to everyone? Does it pay well? What has your family said? Tell us more!
It's a simple minimal wage job at a grocery store, I'll be working as a clerk. Nothing impressive. I'm extremely nervous but I'm trying to be hopeful. I have a buddy who works there, and my family hasn't said anything about the subject. 
It's a simple minimal wage job at a grocery store, I'll be working as a clerk. Nothing impressive. I'm extremely nervous but I'm trying to be hopeful. I have a buddy who works there, and my family hasn't said anything about the subject. 
Good for you!
Nice i just started a new job too! Congrats! 
good luck with your new job too man
good luck with your new job too man
Thanks! Hope you're doing good
I don't feel this way. Cuz I don't even have friends. 
I have no friends to go out with now too, or to talk to
I have no friends to go out with now too, or to talk to
yeah I used to feel like this, I always felt better if I called or texted with another friend but now that I'm homeschooled I have no friends, so the problem is gone. 
It feels fun and all, but after you left it sort of empty.
Feel the same thing,especially when i talk about my depression with those who don't understand 
Feel the same thing,especially when i talk about my depression with those who don't understand 
Yeah people think depression feels like heavy sadness or crying overnight but for me it feels like being bored, but you don't need entertainment anymore.   You watch horrible stuffs but you couldn't care less anymore.
Yeah people think depression feels like heavy sadness or crying overnight but for me it feels like being bored, but you don't need entertainment anymore.   You watch horrible stuffs but you couldn't care less anymore.
That can actually be an emotional dissociation, in there to shield you from the overwhelming feels.
College currently has me more depressed and stressed out this semester than ever before... I just want it to stop. I want to start living my life and not sitting in a chair being lectured for hours, studying for hours, testing and then completely forgetting the information afterwards. Even though I really do like learning, I'm just... sick of it.
Just stop going to classes and give yourself a panic disorder from missing so many assignments, like me
Just stop going to classes and give yourself a panic disorder from missing so many assignments, like me
Dang. I haven't gone to two of my classes for the past month. Now I have to choose between dropping them and losing my scholarship now, or failing them and losing it next semester and shooting my gpa. I hate myself so much.
School has me shooted up, and I don't want to go to college, but I feel like my family will be disappointed in me if I say I don't wanna go.
If you aren't ready, DO NOT GO. I did and I wasted a shit load of money by failing all my classes. Don't do it if you aren't 100% sure. Just work instead. I wish I would've. 
If you aren't ready, DO NOT GO. I did and I wasted a shit load of money by failing all my classes. Don't do it if you aren't 100% sure. Just work instead. I wish I would've. 
I agree!! In high school, I couldn't decide my major so I just chose something and now I'm in a major that I'm not sure if I hate cuz I'm depressed or if I hate cuz I hate it. Really wish I took the time to figure out what I liked. 
I agree!! In high school, I couldn't decide my major so I just chose something and now I'm in a major that I'm not sure if I hate cuz I'm depressed or if I hate cuz I hate it. Really wish I took the time to figure out what I liked. 
I'm in one I absolutely love, I just don't have the motivation to get out of bed and go. When I do, I still don't have to motivation to do the work. I hate how if you don't go to college you're seen as a failure. I want a degree more than anything, but I've accepted that I'm not ready yet. I'm still working on not beating myself up over it though. It's shooting tough out there.
This! College is not for everyone. If you like working with your hands try a trade school or apply at a union. Go straight into the work force if you want. Don't waste tens of thousands of dollars because it seems like the 'socially acceptable' thing to do.
EXACTLY. My parents are pressuring me to go to College this year (just barely graduated HS...) and I don't even have anything I'm particularly interested in, so I'm going to find work 
It beats the hell out of working. Take it from a 49 yo. 
I can say for a fact id rather do something i dont want to do and be paid for it over doing something i dont want to do
I can say for a fact id rather do something i dont want to do and be paid for it over doing something i dont want to do
I think he might mean it sucks more to be working *because you're an adult and you have to survive* than going to school cuz just trying to make it is a constant job in and of itself. It's a new level of stress.
I think he might mean it sucks more to be working *because you're an adult and you have to survive* than going to school cuz just trying to make it is a constant job in and of itself. It's a new level of stress.
What about doing both lol. Full time college and 30 hours a week is leaving me dead inside.
I won't answer that but these are the best years of your life. The best of all my years are gone by already. 
If these are the best years of my life, I shouldnt even bother making it home before killing myself. Seriously, do people think this is supposed to not make me want to blow my shooting brains out?
It's worth noting that there aren't many antidepressant success stories, and there are a lot of their failures, on this subreddit because when they work, people tend to feel better and leave the sub, whereas when they don't, people are stuck here, talking about how this latest attempt at help hasn't done anything useful. This subreddit tends to be biased against them as a result of that, but they do generally work, and it's good to hear they helped you. 
This makes a lot of sense. It's like survivor's bias, but in reverse. I've had great success with antidepressants and therapy, but I stay on this sub because the users here helped me when I needed it. I want to be able to provide support and encouragement to others that are stuck in the spot I was. I think it would really benefit this sub if we had more success stories sticking around.
Wait what are you serious you can get it trough regular doctors? Damm I might have to try that
My OB practically threw them at me when she found out I had just gotten a divorce. I don't know if she even knew my history of mental health issues. 
I owe my life to my anti depressants, whilst they don't strictly make me happy, they numb the pain and the bad feelings.   But overall it's ten times better than not being on them. As my mum says 'they don't make you happy, they give you the tools so that you yourself can make you happy'  
Numb is not good or healthy though, that's the problem..the pain and bad feelings are there for a reason..I see quite a few people that are leeping 16 hours a day on ssris and it doesn't bother them..they are numb and apathetic and fine with it...that's not a good thing imo
Numb is not good or healthy though, that's the problem..the pain and bad feelings are there for a reason..I see quite a few people that are leeping 16 hours a day on ssris and it doesn't bother them..they are numb and apathetic and fine with it...that's not a good thing imo
Yeah numb is better than severely suicidal any day.  You have to experience it for yourself to get it.
My therapist hasn't prescribed them to me yet... but I really want to try them out. Badly. I'm on my worst stage in months and it has me really, really tired...
Regular therapists can't prescribe drugs -- if you want drugs, go to a psychiatrist or your regular doctor! 
Glad to hear, and thanks for this post. I've been thinking about asking for antidepressants, because, just like in your case, therapy alone wasn't cutting it. But I'm somewhat scared that it won't help at all. Reading this positive experience is encouraging in a way, without being overly optimistic. 
I just straight up couldn't do therapy. My negativity was just too pervasive and I was unable to do anything but feel angry at the therapist. Eventually I will add cognitive behavioral therapy to my treatment regimen, but until I feel like I can handle that, the drugs are really letting me feel human. 
What side effects do you have ? 
Not OP but on my antidepressants, all the major side effects went away in like two weeks. The only things that stuck around were super vivid dreams and sometimes my appetite kind of doesn't work and I need to remember to eat even though I don't feel hungry. 
Not OP but on my antidepressants, all the major side effects went away in like two weeks. The only things that stuck around were super vivid dreams and sometimes my appetite kind of doesn't work and I need to remember to eat even though I don't feel hungry. 
I am having super vivid dreams too!! I had no idea that could be a side effect. I keep having dreams that reference other dreams. It's wild. 
Does vitamin D deficiency contribute to depression? Recently found out I have it, curiousif it has anything to do with my moods
It can affect mood, yes. I think it's biggest symptom in most people is fatigue/low energy. 
I think it does. On my phone so I don't have any sources but my mum is a nurse and she always talks about how important it is. Even if it doesn't directly contribute to it, the cycle of being out during the day and sleeping at night is good for your brain
Interesting. My mom is a doctor, and she never mentioned it when they found I have a deficiency, that it could be a cause of my depression. Thanks for the info. 
thank you for posting this!! i started taking prozac about five days ago...I know it takes some time to kick in, but I am hopeful and reading this helped :) I put off trying them for a long time and recently decided that I didn't have anything to lose. nowhere to go but up, hopefully. i appreciate your positivity and wish you lots of luck and happiness on your journey 
Stay strong, in the beginning it might get worse for a few days. But it's just the meds no matter how much you believe it's not 
Im happy for you :) Im taking prozac and it just made me feel more numb and tired, but its better than trying to hurt yourself daily. I'm glad you're on the road to recovery
Tell your doctor,  they'll try something else.   Took me 3 different antidepressants before i found a combo that worked for me.   Hated effexor and Prozac but found success with welbutrin and lexapro
I started venlafaxine (effexor) on Thursday and I haven't felt anything significant yet, but I'm looking forward to seeing if this helps or not. 
That's way too soon to feel anything from it, I hope it works, changing antidepressants sucks.
That. Is. So. Danged. Up. What a psycho. I'd report his ass, atleast file a complaint to his oversight board. Please, do it.  No one should ever experience this. He should be seriously & swiftly reprimanded. I'm sorry you experienced this. What a joke. But it's not. People *lives* are at stake. *He* needs some major mental help himself.
I am going to report him, I don't want anyone else to go through this with him. Just gotta pull myself together first, you know? Thank you for the support.
I am going to report him, I don't want anyone else to go through this with him. Just gotta pull myself together first, you know? Thank you for the support.
That's awesome that you would go out of your way to effectively 'save' other people from having the same thing done to you. Yeah, you can't know if the guy was having a bad day or not, but that's a really really shooted up thing for a psychiatrist to say. It's things like that that make me scared to go see one. 
That's awesome that you would go out of your way to effectively 'save' other people from having the same thing done to you. Yeah, you can't know if the guy was having a bad day or not, but that's a really really shooted up thing for a psychiatrist to say. It's things like that that make me scared to go see one. 
Mental health practitioners are taught to keep that stuff inside, no matter how bad a day they're having. It's completely unacceptable for them to go on a rant like that. If the practitioner is having such a bad day that they can't control their emotions, they're supposed to call in sick until they can. For a supposedly experienced, licensed professional to let hateful views or a bad mood come out against a patient...he deserves to be severely censured.
One more thing, u should post this on r/talktherapy. There are alot of mental health pros on that sub who will give you the exact action you should take.
Good idea!
If you were referred to this psychiatrist by another professional, I would tell them about your experience, they probably don't want to be sending people to someone like this.
I second this- how did you find this guy? I'd not only report him, but make sure that any other avenue that leads people to him can be commented on. See if there are forums to leave reviews as such.  so sorry you had to go through this, I know it can be extremely stressful changing therapists and opening yourself up to someone new. 
I guarantee that he only went into psychiatry because he didn't get into his preferred field of medicine. I hate the match system. Causes a lot of bad psychiatrists so funny truly believe in mental illness and only do it because they have no other option.  I really hope I get the opportunity to revolutionize the field.
Even worse, some people are attracted to psychiatry, not because they want to help people, but because they enjoy having power over others. I have a few people like this in my degree program right now and it scares the hell out of me.
Even worse, some people are attracted to psychiatry, not because they want to help people, but because they enjoy having power over others. I have a few people like this in my degree program right now and it scares the hell out of me.
What the actual shoot. Now I'm scared too
This is hard to believe. Not saying it's not true, just hard to believe. 
Either he wants to lose his job or be murdered. The dude is dealing with depressed patients.. suicidal patients.. I wouldn't mind taking a dumbo like that with me in death
if you're in NZ I'll hug you!
im in auckland hug me :D
come here and let me hug you!
*internet huggss*
It's bullshit that we live in a world where something we can't control easily is demonized so heavily, to the point where the issue purely lies with the singular and people on the sideline act as if they've been burdened by our existence. Hey, shootwits, we didn't ask to exist, did we?   People just wanna feel good about themselves, no matter who they step on to feel that way. They wanna be right, not good. Why should we deal with that when we can just disappear? 
>They wanna be right, not good.  basically summed up all of humanity in that one sentence
>They wanna be right, not good.  basically summed up all of humanity in that one sentence
Maybe we should give up being human then. As dramatic as that sounds. Dying is the one escape. 
No one cared before I tried to kill myself. Then I get love bombed for about a week after my failed attempt and it's right back to no one giving a shit anymore. 
Same. Attempted, got people 'supporting' me for a few days, then 'why can't you get a job?' 'you're always sad and it's annoying' like shoot thanks for the reminder 
I've been thinking about this a lot lately.  People say that it's not true, but it still keeps getting proven.  It's actually one of the reasons I don't want a funeral.  I don't want any of the fake pity crap from people who didn't even know me. I don't want people who couldn't care enough to be there when I was alive, leaving things at my funeral casket and standing around looking depressed. 
I've joked in the past about someone hollowing me out and using me as a ventriloquist's dummy when I die. I'd actually be of use for once.   I agree with you though. People wanna say 'we all care' but I know personally how little people truly care. There are people at funerals, I know for sure, that never knew the deceased and are there out of obligation. What do they care? 
One thing that has long haunted me is the realization that, having been suicidal for a long time, the only time people seem to care about me is when I'm ready to kill myself. And even then, it's a dice roll. After they 'rescue' me and things go back to a normal routine, it's like I suddenly don't matter again. I'm so tired of it.
Exactly! You're irrelevant to people unless you've got the noose in hand. All they send is false platitudes, stuff that 'works for them', neglecting to actually assist in any meaningful way. And then they wonder why you wanna try again at a later date. Nobody wants to try if it puts them out of their way enough to actually help. 
Yeah, people just don't have the will to go and look for depressive symptoms (mine often manifest as urges to isolate myself). But shoot it. If people aren't going to give a shoot about me, that means I'm free to do what I want. I'm basically the invisible man. I can do whatever funny or dumb shit I feel like doing.
That's a good way to look at it. I wish that were more the case with me. I can be depressed and isolating and nobody would care. But being odd? Wearing something slightly different? It's ridiculous, because people neglect when I'm depressed but when I'm actually being fun and odd, I get looks and smartass comments. 
This actually hits close to home. I just had someone from my high school that was attending the very same college as me kill him self on campus...soo many people at his vigil. He was just always an amazing person to be around. Thanks for posting this. 
If you saw him as a good person, knew him as more than a suicide case, then you are also a good person. 
If you saw him as a good person, knew him as more than a suicide case, then you are also a good person. 
I don’t know why, but your comment brought me to tears. That has been one of the nicest things someone has told me in a very long time. My life has been really difficult lately.  Thank you so much.
I don’t know why, but your comment brought me to tears. That has been one of the nicest things someone has told me in a very long time. My life has been really difficult lately.  Thank you so much.
My replies here have been really dark at times admittedly. But part of me doesn't want people to feel as if they aren't cared about. We're like a dysfunctional family here, and nobody deserves the bullshit they've experienced. Pm me if you need someone to talk to. 
Danging spot on. I have been saying shit like this for years. People lie to themselves about why they do things.
Not only do they lie to themselves, they feign sympathy when in reality they didn't know the person and thus couldn't give a shit if they tried. 
Not only do they lie to themselves, they feign sympathy when in reality they didn't know the person and thus couldn't give a shit if they tried. 
It's about pride, they want to be seen doing the right thing. Ego makes you lie. It is a survival mechanism. When people realize the ego isn't who they are, they will feel like a failure.
People pay respect to the dead because it is the moral thing to do, even if they ever cared or not about the poor person. It's quite a sad thought,but it's just human nature.
We respect the dead when it's too late, and we disrespect the living when we have the chance. Human nature can suck a fat one. 
I think that's a good aspect of sadness. I've becomed very humble too during last year.
It's something you will never lose 
You give depression too much credit, I bet you'd be just as nice to strangers without it. if you look deep down inside you might find you're just British.
Or Canadian. 
Or Canadian. 
Am Canadian. I have to say 'thank you' and 'sorry' all the time, else I'll feel super rude.   One time I was walking downstairs and this dude was walking upstairs. He tripped like 5 meters away from me, then apologized to me.  
British people aren't nice.
I can vouch.
The sad part is how these people don't even realise the weight that that simple 'thank you' carries.
When every day's a shit sandwich, it sure can be nice to find a chocolate chip in there. 
Because we know the value of being appreciated. Who knows... maybe you made the day to one of the people you said 'thank' you to.  Thanks for this post btw.
I said 'thank you so much' to the taco guy at the food truck the other week after I placed my order and he got this strange look in his eyes told me that he really appreciated it because people had been so shitty to him for the past couple days.   And then him saying that made me feel good about myself because I know how much it means to me sometimes when people are polite. 
I'm a complete cynical shoot who distrusts everyone and is a bit of a misanthrope. But I still try to be polite and not make a fuss or stand out. I'll be quiet, say hello, please, thank you. Then when I get home I can become the cynical shoot I am.
On the outside, I act like a normal person, albeit a bit melancholic and distanced. On the inside, or when I'm alone, I'm a misanthropic, pessimistic, antinatalistic depressive.
YEAH..  at the DMV I said thank you to the lady for taking my pciture for the ID card  CRINGE  Why do I do so many simple things wrong???????? WOE IS ME
No cringe dude, you're doin good 
You stared death in the face and said 'not today.'  Today was a good day.
I love this. 'Not today' is the only reasonable answer I can give for all the things depression wants me to do. Say not today.
You said shoot you to death today. Soon, you'll be able to do the same with all the sadness and worries holding you back. All it takes is to reach out and get help, and just when you think you can't do it, that nothing matters anyway... remember that you said shoot you to death today. And so you're going to shoot all the worries of the world and save yourself. You can do it. 💙
I suppose I did. Thank you. 
what did you do today when you decided to go home?
Went to bed. Still not asleep (6 hours later) but I'm still in bed. 
Went to bed. Still not asleep (6 hours later) but I'm still in bed. 
since you're up what're you interested in so I might be able to spam you with videos I like lol
since you're up what're you interested in so I might be able to spam you with videos I like lol
I'm mostly into politics and folk punk music (complete opposites but who cares) 
I relate so hard this... Just a few days ago I was seriously gonna kill myself. Please stop thinking you're failure, you are a good  person, especilly for trying to prevent another from suicide.
I felt very suicidal a few days ago, i feel like the only thing keeping me from doing it is not having the means to guarantee id die, rather than just inflict pain on myself.
https://sli.mg/iqAYWt
I like your handwriting 
I like your handwriting 
Was thinking this too.
I totally thought I was on /r/vagabond for a second. The jumping off a bridge part really threw me off.
I was thinking about that subreddit when I read it back to myself as well
so...every morning. i wish i lived by myself so i could be left alone.
NO.  At least for me, living along made the predicament that much worse.
Every single morning. Then I proceed to wake and bake till I feel better.
Seems like that is all in life that can make a life like this feel any better.  Failed in life? Don't worry, Mary still loves you.
Maybe you should set your alarm clock to play S club7's - Bring it all back, in the mornings.
Because the point of this exercise is to make me feel like *not* killing myself.
Drink a glass of water when you wake up, then take the time to look out your window and notice the life around you. Be it people, animals or nature. 
I wake up at an hour no one is awake at i drive on major highways alone. I go to work to do a job that's needed but am never thanked. Then i get called names by my coworkers. 
I wake up at an hour no one is awake at i drive on major highways alone. I go to work to do a job that's needed but am never thanked. Then i get called names by my coworkers. 
Consider looking for a new job. Easier said than done, but it might help. 
What do you do?  Sounds like my dad's years as a truck driver.
i pressure wash things. 
This is true, it doesn't. But i have no apparent reason to feel like it, that's what's bothering me.  
I don't know what to tell you other than you're not alone. I and many others feel exactly the same way. This vague sense of guilt that I should be happy and that I have no right to be unhappy is maddening.
Good luck!
It’s been half an hour and she hasn’t responded :/
It’s been half an hour and she hasn’t responded :/
Any update? I hope it went well.
Any update? I hope it went well.
Still no reply. It’s been an hour. I’m ok with her saying no I understand it’s short notice and it’s a little far and she doesn’t know the band but I thought it would be fun and I feel like I deserve at least a “sorry I can’t go” :(   Maybe she’s sleeping on it or something. Oh well. If she’s not into it she’s not into it. 
Take my energy!
And some of mine! 
This is why you don’t ask them out over text. Never over text, if face to face she will give you an answer whether it’s a yes or no.over text she will ask her friends and do all this other bs before she even gives you an answer. In the end, wish you all the best bro.
Eh. I didn’t want her to say yes because I put her on the spot. I want her to want to go because she likes me and thinks it would be fun. I would rather get rejected than have this date go badly. 
So how did it go?
No reply yet .-. Hopefully I get something. A no would be better than waiting like this. 
No reply yet .-. Hopefully I get something. A no would be better than waiting like this. 
The times that I got no reply, it was usually a no when I was in my early 20s. My wife is the same way when I text her something that requires an answer, she doesn’t shooting reply. So when I call her, I ask, “Well did you get my message?” And she says, “I don’t wanna go do that tonight”  And of course I will say, “Then shooting say no then!”
 I updated the post with what she said! I’ll let you guys know if we end up going and how it goes. 
Top 10 anime plot twist! Seriously was not expecting this!! 
How'd it go my dude?
It’s morning and still nothing at all :/ 
It’s morning and still nothing at all :/ 
Im sorry dude. Hmm. I know how that feels the only difference is that the girl i was texting with before enjoys leading me on. I blocked her everywhere and now she's asking through a mutual friend why i havent unblocked her yet. I dont plan to though. Sometimes dude, we just have to wait for that other girl you know? Really sorry
Update?
Still nothing! :(
She answered??
Still nothing :-(
You made an effort. More than most, so here, take my energy! 
Even if I don’t get a girlfriend, my spirit ball is getting pretty big. 
I don't understand how you can be proud. I guess if she says yes, you'd be proud. But we are one of the depressed, if she says no, it may just hurt you more. My first rejection hurt me so much that I plan to stay alone and suffer for the rest of my life. I want you to know the consequences. Love is dangerous and it's not worth it sometimes.
Love is what shooted me up and sent me down this depression spiral too, yet to me, it will always be worth it and I will accept that my heart can and will eventually be be broken every time I fall for someone. 
They say that cats don't care about their humans.  They are wrong.
I too wouldn't be here without my cat.  so yah, I'm calling BS on that.
Ahh. A pet can be your friend, even if the whole world is against you. I am desperate for such a friend 😢😢
I highly recommend adopting a cat. Dogs are great but they need a more active owner and honestly cats ate better stress balls. If you go on a depression trip it will affect a dog, but a cat will be like 'get up stupid girl I need food and lovins' and it'll be nice. Plus, a cat saves you, you save a cat.
I highly recommend adopting a cat. Dogs are great but they need a more active owner and honestly cats ate better stress balls. If you go on a depression trip it will affect a dog, but a cat will be like 'get up stupid girl I need food and lovins' and it'll be nice. Plus, a cat saves you, you save a cat.
Sadly, my family thinks that adopting an animal as a pet is like capturing him and taking away its freedom. There's this cute little cat which sometimes roams around in my neighbourhood, and when no one's at home, I sometimes bring it in and play with it. It really feels good
/r/raisedbynarcissists
ive complained about her on a few subreddits maybe 2 years back and they all referred me to this subreddit. im still not sure if she qualifies as a narcissistic parent but ill have a look again.  thank you for taking the time to comment
ive complained about her on a few subreddits maybe 2 years back and they all referred me to this subreddit. im still not sure if she qualifies as a narcissistic parent but ill have a look again.  thank you for taking the time to comment
I'm an active member of that sub on another account, and your mother definitely fits in with the parents there.
That sounds an awful lot like child abuse...I don't know if you're willing to go that far, but at this point I'd say you have grounds to get authorities involved.
I agree, but it might be more trouble than it's worth right now. I'd also like to reiterate what bobbinichols and velvetnachos said above: confide in your sister and avoid your mom. If your parents treat you this way, it's likely your sister is experiencing or has experienced this too. From what you've described, you are certainly experiencing depression. I hope another person acknowledging it helps you to start believing it yourself and removes some of the doubt.
I agree, but it might be more trouble than it's worth right now. I'd also like to reiterate what bobbinichols and velvetnachos said above: confide in your sister and avoid your mom. If your parents treat you this way, it's likely your sister is experiencing or has experienced this too. From what you've described, you are certainly experiencing depression. I hope another person acknowledging it helps you to start believing it yourself and removes some of the doubt.
thank you both so much for your comments. I sometimes believe its abuse but then feel like im going too far with it. my sister has experienced this in some way, but she was never beaten the way i was, it was mostly verbal, which is still pretty shooted up
thank you both so much for your comments. I sometimes believe its abuse but then feel like im going too far with it. my sister has experienced this in some way, but she was never beaten the way i was, it was mostly verbal, which is still pretty shooted up
It's abuse.
thank you so much for your kind words, i appreciate every single one .  unfortunately, confiding in anyone outside of my family about this is impossible :( im really glad you took the time to comment and say some really lovely things <3
Of course! I'm really sorry to hear that you don't feel like you can't tell anyone about this (other than posting about it, which I'm glad you're at least able to do). I hope that whatever obstacle(s) that are causing that change in some way, especially for therapy: I think that therapy has the best chance of helping if you're able to talk about anything and everything you're going through. But even if you can't, I'm still glad you're posting here, and appreciate your reply <3
Please tell someone.
thank you, ill try
You got beaten. Call the police and report it. It doesn't matter if it's your mom. Also tell them that she will react badly, and has been saying she doesn't want to take care of your health. Your mother is an adult and SHOULD understand. She might not act like she would, but the fact that she is acting like she is now, she does understand she is in the wrong. That's probably why she so adamantly wants to show she isn't. 
And if you think that you should not report it - everyone knows beating someone, hitting someone is a crime. It is not like your mother does not know. 
Call the cops on your mom like actually do it
i wish ughhhh i just cant do it
i wish ughhhh i just cant do it
Have someone else do it for you? Not even joking 
i wish i could but its not that easy :( thanks for your concern and your comment
I know it is not easy. Would you mind explaining what factors are keeping you from calling? 
im really sorry,  are you ok?
I'm ok now. I'm 24 years old and haven't lived with my mom since I was 18. I'm getting over the constant repression of emotions and guilt slowly and only with the help of a wonderful significant other. I'm just always worried because my little sister is only 15 and still lives with her.
Are you a girl or a boy? How old are you? 
im a girl, and 16
Do you have any close family or friends nearby that would let you stay with them? This seems like a situation you should get out of. If not permanently then even a temporary escape from this could probably be helpful. I agree with others who say you should involve authorities, but I understand if you're not ready to take that step. You at least need support from other adults, preferably some who care about you like family. I wish you the best of luck.
unfortunately no, they all live in a differemt country.  a close friend of mine has offered to look into college scholarships for me and said he would have no problem moving me in , so i guess thats more of a longterm plan.   thank you for your comment and your kind wishes :)
Lol spend everyday alone, whats so special about new years.. just another day.
Dang, ain't that the truth.
I really hate nye. It's so depressing, looking back at another year of being miserable, then ending it alone in my room. 
Same depressing
My birthday is in January so I'll literally be thinking how the shoot did I live a whole year
Same, mine is on the 23rd of January and that is the only thing I can ever think about when I get closer to the day; that, and thinking about all of the shit I've never done as a soon-to-be 21 year old that everyone else seems to have already done numerous times before.
I'll be alone in my room jacking off or playing video games / watching anime / YouTube and telling myself it will be different next year while trying to not feel too empty and depressed.  Spoiler: Year from now it will be the same. But really it's just another day. I just want to get into 2017 alive...
I do have friends but I feel so bored and lonely when I'm with them so I think I'm staying at home. I had planned to go out but my depression is getting worse and I'm even thinking of committing...
I do have friends but I feel so bored and lonely when I'm with them so I think I'm staying at home. I had planned to go out but my depression is getting worse and I'm even thinking of committing...
Yeah, it sucks where when you even have friends you still feel lonely around people. I've had that before.
Yeah, it sucks where when you even have friends you still feel lonely around people. I've had that before.
Yeah it's proven that people who have a better understanding of themselves and the world around them will tend to feel alone even when around large groups of 'friends'. I think it's because we can see through them when they are not being genuine in what they are saying or the way they are acting. Like they are only putting that face on for the people around them. Idk I'm just rambling at this point :/
Why 
It's a combination of me disliking clubs/parties, feeling like I'm not welcome and nobody likes me, as well as my refusal to be able to enjoy myself I guess.
It's a combination of me disliking clubs/parties, feeling like I'm not welcome and nobody likes me, as well as my refusal to be able to enjoy myself I guess.
If you were invited to things then no, people do like you. Depression makes it seem like the opposite. 
New Year's Eve is overrated. This will be my 8th New Years in a row I've done nothing I'm fine with just staying in have a drink or two and watch movies or play video games.
>New Year's Eve is overrated.    Amen. Freezing cold, icy sidewalks, overpriced cover and booze, unavailable cabs, crazy high Uber prices, parka stolen from coat check...just so you can get smashed and start the new year with a roaring hangover? Dang that.     Staying home is way more fun.
I'll be alone. Crying myself to sleep. 
I feel you
Girlfriend doesn't wanna include me with her friends, idk probably sit on my PC and cry away my life 
Really? You need a better girlfriend mate, it sounds like she's treating you like shit. 
Have an invitation to a party, but doubt I'll go - not sure I can handle all those people and all that noise, I imagine there'll just be a lot of drinking anyway, which doesn't really appeal to me 
I would still go. I also often feared such parties, but they still turned out fun
Hmmmm you got me wondering now. Also there are a lot of school friends who'll be there who I would normally have met up with in holidays and stuff but who I haven't seen in like a year and I don't wanna have to deal with answering people asking how I've been (am also taking the year out of university)
If you don't feel comfortable with straight answers, you can still lie. But really man, I would still go. Being active is key to defeating depressions
I can't remember the last time I spent NYE with someone. It was probably when I was a teen.    I'm probably going to spend it alone like always. It doesn't bother me much anymore though.
Yeah. Last year was the only time in my life that I went to a new year's party. I am getting used to it. My mantra is if I can't make myself feel good, others can't too. It's working out for me now
Almost every day at work. Also at the grocery store. Seeing real men with their wives and families is particularly difficult for me. I'm sorry you're feeling sad too.
Hey, you are a real man. Don't forget that because your brain is being weird. 
Hey, you are a real man. Don't forget that because your brain is being weird. 
The 'every day at work' part is a dead giveaway. You have the problems and yet you're at work every day. That's a real man.
Just last week i was walking back to my car from class and it just shooting hit me like a truck. I had to fake yawn to make it look like yawn tears. 
I've faked sneezed/coughed for the same reason.
Hey. I'm just back at work after ~2-3 months off. The months before that weren't good either.  I'm not better. But getting up everyday and getting to work is helping. I really do understand that it can be impossible sometimes.  Just do what you can do. A shower and coffee is good. Make the bed? Sometimes. Go outside? Well.. I didn't for weeks. But you'll get there.
Thank you for sharing this. It helps to be able to relate :)
Well done dude! What's next? 
I've got a job interview tomorrow. So hoping to turn up and have that go well!
I've got a job interview tomorrow. So hoping to turn up and have that go well!
Do it man! You got this!
Good job! What kind of coffee? 
Ground Harris 4 :)
checking in to confirm interview went well. and...? 
I'm in Australia, so I'm off to it today in about 4 hours. Deep breaths.
A bit embarrasing to make a new thread for it so i hope OP doesnt mind. I'm going to have an interview coming up the day after tomorrow or Monday for a tech support position in a small company and I feel really scared. Any tips?  By the way OP, I wish you good luck in all your future endeavors and I hope you won't end up self-consuming yourself like I am.
My best tip is to interview them. Switch it around. You're looking for a job and what to make sure it's the right fit for you, so ask them as many questions as they ask you.
A girl in one of my classes made eye contact with me and smiled, and I swooned and imagined our long life together.   A combination of depression, loneliness, and boredom, with just a little splash of imagination.   It's intrusive and I don't like it. 
i know that feel
Yes, this happens to me and I get incredibly disheartened when they don't like me even half as much as I like them.
And it's even worse because I don't *really* 'like like' them, I'm just amazed they're paying me any kind of attention. So then I feel twice as stupid.
Yep. I have embarrassed myself more times than I can count because of this. 
Same. I actually thought the other person liked me so i told them how i feel then theyre like 'i have a gf' oh..
Same. I actually thought the other person liked me so i told them how i feel then theyre like 'i have a gf' oh..
At least they didn't laugh at you.
I know what you mean. Anyone that gets close to me I do not want to lose them and when they stop talking,for even the simplist of reason I get worried and then end driving them away.  
I blame death cab and postal service for making albums based on my life. 
I blame death cab and postal service for making albums based on my life. 
Havent heard of either of them. Must look them up.  So if ya dont mind me asking whats wrong?
Havent heard of either of them. Must look them up.  So if ya dont mind me asking whats wrong?
every song is extremely relatable, no matter who you are. makes it hard to listen to after a while because all of their songs remind you of someone or something that you dont really want to think about..
I have the same problem. Especially around any girl that is even a little attractive in my opinion. It's best to just try and repeat in your head 'They were just being nice.' 
It's good to know I'm not the only one who does this.
Yes.  I'm very straight but I develop strong affection for anyone(of any gender, appearance, or age) that is nice to me.  It's rather embarrassing, and sad, when I greet them a few months later and they don't even say hi.
It sounds like you are just a generally nice person. I'm sure you matter more to a lot of people than you realize, people who treat you warmly can be a rare thing as I'm sure you know.
I used to get attached to people really fast and pretty strongly, which drove myself to quite a bunch of deceptions. I don't talk much to people, even less now. Not sure if that's better.  It's not... 'love', though. Or at least it's not systematic. I don't know, I'm pretty confused, honestly.
It sounds like you are just a nice, warm person. Its unfortunate that so many people are willing to take advantage of people who are too nice. Just keep doing what you are doing, and I'm sure you will eventually meet a group of people who would never take advantage of you.
Yeah. In hs there was one girl who actually talked to me and was nice, eventually I really liked her and we were 'best friends'. Didn't end well and I'm still dealing with not being able to move on from what happened. Its been years and I'm still destroyed inside from what she did.
Yeah, similar here. Different situation, same result. I let someone in, she didn't respect how hard that was for me to do, and left a lot of damage on her way out.
Sometimes I'll meet someone who's really nice and you can tell they have such a warm demeanor and then my mind spins and I imagine being 'important' in their life. Age, gender, etc... aren't specific. Even though I'm in my mid-twenties, I guess I still want to be held and feel valuable/worth something, probably because of the mix of severe and long-lasting depression and childhood neglect.
I think being wanted is a basic human instinct. I'm sure you are important in someone's life, even if you never hear it much.
Not exactly love, but I have very few friends and I can get a bit.. smothering if I really enjoying haging out with them. It's caused a fair few friends to just cut contact off almost completely.  If I dont hear from someone for a while, I just automatically assume they don't want to hear from me anymore. Usually it just turns out that we were never as close as I thought/hoped and so I'll only hear from them a couple of times a year.
Ohhh yep. I have very few friends, and the ones I do have all have tons of other friends aside from me. Which means that while I can end up feeling very attached to them, they always have someone else to hang out with. Meanwhile I just sit here on my own waiting for my turn...
I've actually grown into the opposite problem. After so much rejection and so many years of failed expectations I purposely try to blow it off the moment I think someone might like me. I've been led astray too many times to trust any gut feeling a woman has interest in me. I prefer to pretend it's not actually the case so I'm not let down.
You're not the only one. I do that too. I know people say it's no way to live, but neither is letting anyone have such power over me. It's an intolerable vulnerability. One I know better than to think anyone will be careful with.
I wish I had cancer. Like a brain tumor... then I could just go and die and no one would blame me or anything
I wish I had cancer so my patchy hair loss made sense but it's doesn't. Alopecia areata is a stupid girl and the only reason I have depression and it's so selfish to admit it
I'm at a Christmas party and I've never felt so alone... everyone here is happy and smiling and I'm just... here. I feel physically sick from this social shit. 
When you have depression you have to constantly give Oscar-worthy acting performances as a person that you aren't.  So many people have told me that I am so enthusiastic and happy and bubbly.  If they only knew.  If you're at a holiday party and forcing yourself to be smiling and happy, just remember there is an incredibly strong likelihood that someone else in the room is in the same boat with you.    ;-)
When you have depression you have to constantly give Oscar-worthy acting performances as a person that you aren't.  So many people have told me that I am so enthusiastic and happy and bubbly.  If they only knew.  If you're at a holiday party and forcing yourself to be smiling and happy, just remember there is an incredibly strong likelihood that someone else in the room is in the same boat with you.    ;-)
I wish there was a socially acceptable way to mention to a crowd of people 'does anyone else currently feel like they're drowning? I'm down to talk...' without making it too awkward. :(
Isn't depression a physiological sickness?
Yeah, and at a medical level it's pretty acknowledged that depression is a real, important medical illness. However, on a social level it's basically just seen as being sad and emo.
Yeah, and at a medical level it's pretty acknowledged that depression is a real, important medical illness. However, on a social level it's basically just seen as being sad and emo.
Hmmm.  Depression awareness... I would love to do a depression awareness gaming stream.  Damn my low budget and cool-but-not-cool-enough computer!  Maybe I should start plugging awareness in my YouTube vids.
You don't have to. It is not your fault that people are jerks. Depression is real
i agree, but it's hard not to struggle with that kinda problem in today's society
Yeah, a lot of people unfortunately think it's just a matter of 'pulling yourself together'. If it was that easy, depression wouldn't be a classified form of illness to begin with. No one shooting chooses this.
I think it is. Not that it's going to cure your depression but it's going to make sure your life isn't going to be destroyed by it and you can ride it out until things get better.   I just focus on keeping my shit together not spending too much time in bed, making sure I eat well etc. etc.   It's not a fix but it helps avoid the drain.
I think it is. Not that it's going to cure your depression but it's going to make sure your life isn't going to be destroyed by it and you can ride it out until things get better.   I just focus on keeping my shit together not spending too much time in bed, making sure I eat well etc. etc.   It's not a fix but it helps avoid the drain.
True, it can definitely help pulling yourself together as in forcing yourself to do stuff (unless you're so depressed that getting out of bed literally seems impossible), but a lot of people seem to think you can just 'think happy thoughts' and you'll automatically *be* happy. 
jesus christ it pisses me off so much when people say this to me
It's beyond offensive. Some people's mouths lack any connection to their brains.
I had a freak out at work yesterday and this morning my mom tried to give me a pep talk but it made my anxiety worse. I wish people would understand it’s not a choice. 
My mom is one of the people who make my depression worse whenever she asks me how I've been doing lately then she turns it into a lecture how I'm not trying hard enough. 
Someone I know said that last night.   ''You're sad by default'? Just be happy.'  I wanted to smack him. 
A favorite line said by one of my friends is 'telling someone with depression to cheer up is like telling someone with a broken leg to walk it off'
Yes. I have friends who have had horrible lives and their parents are in jail or dead ect. and here I am in college with a loving family and I am depressed. It makes it so much worse. I hate myself.
This. 
Absolutely. While my life has its issues I still have it way easier than a lot of people out there. I'm not starving or cold, I have a roof over my head and a mother who loves and cares for me, I have one talent at least, and yet I still feel the desire to end everything every other day for literally no reason whatsoever. Makes me feel ridiculously ungrateful about what I have but still resentful for what I don't. So tired of my brain's chemical imbalances haha.
This right here, i'm depressed over stupid shit, relationships, my existence, my desire to leave everything and move somewhere new. It's all shit that's not that big a deal, and yet i'm currently sitting here with my face in my hands at an empty subway. I hate it.
This right here, i'm depressed over stupid shit, relationships, my existence, my desire to leave everything and move somewhere new. It's all shit that's not that big a deal, and yet i'm currently sitting here with my face in my hands at an empty subway. I hate it.
Empty subway... that's so surreal man.
Empty subway... that's so surreal man.
I meant Subway the restaurant, not an actual subway lol jeez my mood would have been much worse
yeah. I have a lot of stuff going right for me. it just makes me guiltier that I get depressed when people who have it worse are doing just fine. 
Yup. Just makes me feel like I'm not really depressed but just lazy. 
An AI therapist? Sounds ... interesting.
Sounds like ELIZA.
Sounds like ELIZA.
Eliza Cassan?
Eliza Cassan?
Adam... Run.
Or Dr. Sbaitso. Anyone else remember that?
My grandpa had it on his computer and I loved chatting with it 
I just wanted to say thank you.....I am really, really, REALLY skeptical about AI therapy....in fact I wouldn't even trust it. 
Unless I see some research with some huge backing from the APA and the like, I too, will be skeptical. 
Unless I see some research with some huge backing from the APA and the like, I too, will be skeptical. 
I tried the service but on Facebook messenger and it connects you to real people, you could either chose to help or get help
This is new to me. What is your fear about Koko? 
I really don't have anything to add to to what's in this post and the earlier one it links to.  
I really don't have anything to add to to what's in this post and the earlier one it links to.  
I really would like to understand. It seems harmless. So what if it's a bot? It was programmed by people with good intentions, at least.   I'd really like your take on why it's not recommended? I'm new to this sub and it be great if a mod could explain this to me.   Thanks.
I really would like to understand. It seems harmless. So what if it's a bot? It was programmed by people with good intentions, at least.   I'd really like your take on why it's not recommended? I'm new to this sub and it be great if a mod could explain this to me.   Thanks.
Good intentions can easily produce a result that does far more harm than good. Besides, the Koko team has not acted in good faith here; that's why they got told by the admins so bluntly to GTFO.
Honestly I'd rather talk to a robot than a human. All they give is empty platitudes. At least I know what I'll get with a robot. Every time I talk to a person about my thoughts i start hoping they can help then they give me the same crap. Be interesting to see a robots point of view. 
fun fact, I learned the word platitude reading Crime and Punishment
I have seen a Koko announcement for a long time in this subreddit. I just wonder if at some point these announcements begin to work against themselves – a lot of people don't even know what Koko is but now their curiosity is sparked.
Just stumbled in here because I've been feeling down lately.  This post is ten days old? Guess I'm late to the party. Never heard of koko and I am on Reddit 24/7. This stickied announcement is the first I've learned of it. So yeah now I want to go check out more. It's some sort of rogue AI? That sounds interesting. 
Is this something the admins can help with? This sub always has lots of support from the rest of reddit
Did you read the post?  The admins are heavily involved.  
I'm out of the loop. Someone explain to me please 
This post links back to the original post which has the full context. 
Wot
What do we need to add to make things clearer?  
What do we need to add to make things clearer?  
Man you people are harsh
Man you people are harsh
Didn't mean it that way, sincerely wanted to know how we could improve the post.  
Didnt see the picture before , just didnt really make sense
I edited the post to add a bit of background.  Better?  
God, that's so dangerous. It makes me angry to think that someone would let themselves get so caught up in their 'cool new app' that they'd put people's health and safety and even lives at risk just to try it out.
wow i dont see any danger there 
I can't even get anything done anymore unless I have that adrenaline rush of doing it last minute.
i do this too i can only start work/revise the day before or day of the deadline because otherwise i do not care and push the work to the next day. then i do whatever i can and dont even care if it is good or not 
i do this too i can only start work/revise the day before or day of the deadline because otherwise i do not care and push the work to the next day. then i do whatever i can and dont even care if it is good or not 
Same
I'm supposed to send in my application for the university I go to on april 20th, and need to do a short film for it. It is literally the only thing I look forward to in my life and I still haven't managed to start :/
U still got lots of time, you can do it bud. 
i cant imagine anyone wanting to spend any amount of time with whatever the shoot i am
I feel ya. I'm terrified my shooted up upbringing and mental illness will keep me from having the life I want. I don't know how long it takes to unlearn 18-22 years of abuse but it seems too long for anyone with a human amount of patience to stick around for me while I heal 
If you've experienced mental illness you definitely have one thing going for you - you're probably tough as nails. You're strong in ways 'normal' people can only dream of. 
i break down working hours normal for anyone else and am terrified of  ta)lking to people
Romance is unknown. I don't know where to start. What do I do on a date? Should I introduce myself? But what if I talk about myself too much?   I really want to have lots of opportunities to mess up, but at my age, it's expected that I know what to do during a date. 
Reeelaaaaateeeee soo much. 24 yo no experience. On a general, social basis, I am quite good but when it comee to persuing a woman I am so clueless and with no idea how to execute. This makes me extra cautious and in the end unable to even try.  And I completely relate with OP as well. I havr had the same feeling for most of my life. But with a little twist - I am partially afraid to lose my loneliness that I have grown to know and like.
I accuse myself of it all the time. 
Oh man! This was exactly what I was going to say! We really are our own worst enemies, huh.
Oh man! This was exactly what I was going to say! We really are our own worst enemies, huh.
nice, same here
nice, same here
Lately I've tried to imagine someone else in my situation, and imagine how I would treat them, and then I imagine treating myself that same way (in the third person), because it seems not only kinder, but more useful and therapeutic rather than useless and harmful.  
To be honest I am genuinely not sure if I am depressed or just a lazy, low energy piece of shit. 
I know this likely isn't the same in all cases, but I realized it wasn't so much that I didn't want to do anything and I just SUPER craved comfort which I could only find in my bed.  I'm still depressed and fight with it all the time, but I was at least able to mostly shake the idea that I'm just a lazy shoot.
I was told that my problem is that I'm bored. From a kind of twisted point of view, I am bored. There is nothing in the world I could be truly enthusiastic about, or at least enthusiastic enough to bear all the shit I'd have to if I chose normal life. I am permanently, unalterbly bored.
I'm kind of like that but in a nothing-is-worth-doing-because-whats-the-point sort of way.
I used to be like that until I got into Cycling which turned into a hobby. There is nothing better than finding new places to explore such as being in the mountains or the beaches. Other than that everything else is boring, except for eating new food and sex.  
Even sex feels boring to me now, although I think sex is very overrated anyway.
All the time. That and, 'you want to feel like shit'. No. That's not how it works, but thanks for making me feel even shittier. I guess that's what normal people do. 
So much this. My mother just told me that I 'want to be depressed because it's easier.' Um. No. No it's not.
So much this. My mother just told me that I 'want to be depressed because it's easier.' Um. No. No it's not.
I usually point out that someone who would willingly choose this lifestyle is someone with serious issues. I don't see why people think that's a reasonable explanation. 
I usually point out that someone who would willingly choose this lifestyle is someone with serious issues. I don't see why people think that's a reasonable explanation. 
Because people tend to judge character of others in terms of something stable, while our own we judge as based on environmental reasons etc. The observer phenomenon in the psychology field of sorts. 
It's particularly annoying when you have other depressed people telling you that you are just being lazy. It's like a double slap in the face. 
How is one depressed person supposed to help another who is depressed? 
How is one depressed person supposed to help another who is depressed? 
No idea, but they should at least be more understanding of the other's problems imo. 
Wow. I think my sister has a Wheel of Depression. She even goes for the bonus points.  And get this: in the same session of her latest spinning of the wheel a few times to 'be honest' about me, she compared herself to a unicorn to gloat about how awesome she is to really drive home the contrast with how shitty I am.  
Ask her if she'd like to buy a vowel to solve the puzzle:   F( )CK  ( )FF 
Yup, I got fired from my job and havent gotten the confidence to get a new one. Been pretty depressed for over a month and all my friends do is call me 'lazy' for not working, they dont understand lol
  I've been dealing with that for years.... 
  I've been dealing with that for years.... 
Same. Unemployment sucks... and no-one really knows what the 'job market' is like unless they are unemployed and actively searching as well. 
All the time... Married to someone who seems to love to remind me about how lazy, useless, stupid, self-centred, whiny, irrational, unrealistic, stubborn, dead-beat, angry, annoying, the list goes on and on, I am... Of course this has a negative effect on my already not-so-good state of mind, and brings me even deeper down into the sea of mud we call depression. 
:(  It probably goes without saying, but you shouldn't be married to someone that treats you like that. It's one thing to not be able to properly understand depression, but it's another thing to just be an idiot to someone
Despite the fact I need medical help and have asked my parents to take me to the doctor, they accuse me of being lazy. In fact, they ask me WHY I'm so lazy and I tell them I'm depressed and they say to get over it ...
 'I would, if only I could! Maybe I could if you wouldn't dismiss such a serious issue. If you had asthma or diabetes I wouldn't tell *you* to get over it!'
Yep. 'slacker,' 'useless,' 'lazybum,' 'terrorist,' you name it. 'sup.
> 'terrorist,'  The shoot? &#3232;_&#3232;
you mean you have friends? and they invite you out and text you and everything??
Yeah I'm so jealous.
no kidding. The last thing I got invited to was my cousins birthday party.
My mom has made it so none of my family is talking to me. FML.
I deleted my facebook account a while ago #yolo
I created one a 3 years ago or so, deleted it a week or two after. Then I created one again a year ago, deleted one month later. Not only did it suck to have to listen to everyone else have a good time, it was/is where all the high-school crap is.
I created one a 3 years ago or so, deleted it a week or two after. Then I created one again a year ago, deleted one month later. Not only did it suck to have to listen to everyone else have a good time, it was/is where all the high-school crap is.
I deleted mine for three months, only three people realized....
I may be nine hours late but, hello. :)
Well hello back, I'm a sex toy version of Darth Vader 
I usually try to avoid Facebook in situations like this.
Same. This comic hits quite close to home because I generally don't find myself having fun when I go out. And when I don't, everyone else has fun without me. So either way, I feel alienated from the people I know.  And I honestly don't know how I got like this... 
Same. This comic hits quite close to home because I generally don't find myself having fun when I go out. And when I don't, everyone else has fun without me. So either way, I feel alienated from the people I know.  And I honestly don't know how I got like this... 
A lot of people just say they're having fun but probably aren't on the inside, it's ok to feel that way in my opinion.
Despite the sad theme, I like your cute style of drawing. Maybe look into making a webcomic~
I second this idea, it also might help you to have people love your work and reading and enjoying your art. Personally I really liked it, I think you should make a subreddit about your art! I'd subscribe!
I hate parties. There's never enough discussion going on, it's all loud music and sweaty people. Can we start a trend of big rooms where you talk to people in place of parties?
Well, parties like that seem to be rare. A small party between all mutual friends would work.
There is nothing I would like more. (Hugs Computer)
-hugs computer back- have a good day, my friend.
Nights are bad for me as well. I think part of it is loneliness. During the day, there are people around me who can distract me if I start spiraling, but at night I'm just left on my own to deal with my thoughts.
Yep. Danging brutal is what it is. During the day you have the generally hectic nature of life to keep you distracted.  At night however it's just you. In a dark little room with nothing to do except reflect. You don't want to have the thoughts you're having but you can't help it.
Yep. Danging brutal is what it is. During the day you have the generally hectic nature of life to keep you distracted.  At night however it's just you. In a dark little room with nothing to do except reflect. You don't want to have the thoughts you're having but you can't help it.
that hit deep
I'll just browse /r/depression and listen to the same old songs over and over again until i fall asleep at 4.a.m
i do the exact same shit. i can be texting 10 peoplr on snapchat abd feel decent, a d then realize that i cant even explain my depression to them or i wont be the always happy dude who just shoots around, so i jsut listen to the same shit and browse this sub
Same here. I lay in bed and burn my retinas every night browsing this sub. 
Maybe try a blue light filter for that.
Maybe try a blue light filter for that.
for clarity, blue light is what you're getting RID of
No, you're the only one on this sub for depressed people getting sad at night.
Novelty account lmao
Holy shit, what kind of job requires those sort of hours?
Companies who feel they can push their workers to Double Shifts because they don't want to hire any more, or can't :(
oh my lord, that's a feat. keep going with my support!
Ive always loathe myself and always belittled myself but today for the first time, I finally gave myself a pat on the back. Today/now, I dont hate myself and im trying to take it all in. I know i'll go back to hating myself tmrw but im just going to enjoy it for now. Thank you for the support
what you should do is make yourself a nice meal to celebrate. like chicken or something, it won't mean much but its always nice to celebrate even nothing. 
Lol im broke been going to the trash bins for food hence im so proud of working 19 hours under extreme circumstances in trying to turn my life around. To be able to have some warm food would be a dream. But thank you
She also suggested I read the book 'Proof of Heaven.'  That's when I peaced out.  edit: actually, she gave me her own copy of the book to borrow and read.
Report her to the medical board. 
Report her to the medical board. 
How?  I live in Pennsylvania.  I've been looking online for the past hour or so but I can't figure out what agency is the right agency to go with.
It's not only unethical - it's also highly unprofessional. 
So glad to know I'm not going crazy...er
So glad to know I'm not going crazy...er
Not that crazy, at least. :)
Some people find peace in religion, some don't. As a Christian and currently digging myself out of depression, I find it ridiculous what your Psychiatrist said. I agree that you need to probably find somebody else to help you out. I'm no Psychiatrist, but I am always here for you and anyone that needs to talk or just have a friendly conversation. 
Thank you.
lol proof of heaven...  I dunno, maybe it does exist since I have pretty definitive proof of hell
I researched the author and almost all of the people he includes in the book say the events he experienced were not at all what actually happened.  I think he was a 1%er who had either lost a lot of money in a ponzi scheme or started his own ponzi scheme, but either way the general consensus was that the book was his way of trying to separate the gullible from their money, so he could get back the money he lost.
You live in America, right?
What gave it away?  Was it the Jesus?
What gave it away?  Was it the Jesus?
I don't know about America but here in Europe that doctor would risk their license.  Depression is not a matter of attitude or worldview. Your psychiatrist should know that.  
My psychologist told me to see a divine singular being (not necessarily the Christian God) as a source of love and light, and it helped. It didn't feel intrusive or anything negative. In fact, it made me more calm and less like the world was over.  Yours sounds unethical. If it makes you feel uncomfortable, stop and report. Religious people are on average happier, but that doesn't mean you should get treated like a statistic.
I had explained to her several times when the subject of God came up that, God just didn't have a place in my life.  I didn't feel a sense of loss because of it, in fact I felt a sense of release, knowing my actions were my own and not of a master puppeteer.  But I was not the psychiatrist, so I thought maybe I was wrong to feel that way. 
I upvoted you like others who ran away...  I cannot be your friend. I am not even a friend to myself. The one I have I'm never really sure will still be around in an hour.   But I can talk to ya for a bit. Why did you lose all your friends? 
Thank you so much for upvoting me :) I replied to you in the PM, but I really appreciate your PM and comments :)
Why aren't you sure if your friend will still be around? 
Goku.
I'm up for a chat. Pm me whenever you like. I'm always lurking..
thank you so much :) I'll send you a PM shortly :) Really appreciate it
Do you have steam or play video games? Feel free to pm me I have a teamspeak 
I dont have currently, but thank you for replying me :)
I don't really have friends either...not sure if I would be a good friend...as i tend to be rather pessimistic, down, etc.  But, if you want, I could be your friend.
I am just happy knowing that you want to be my friend , i will PM you soon :)
just pm me anytime bro :) 
thank you so much :)
It's amazing how sarcastic you are.
I wasn't being sarcastic, but I have trouble not being sarcastic sometimes.
Feel free to also PM me :)
thank you so much roopoops :) I will definitely do :)
Wow, so many new friends in just 4 hours. You're probably bombarded with PMs, so I'll just wish you well and hope one of the conversations made you feel better.
thank you so much :) i would like to PM you too, is that okay? I like your nickname and it seems so much like me right now
I can be your friend! You mssg me anytime you want & I'll mssg back.
thank you so much :) I really appreciate it and will PM You soon :)
I'm here for ya if need someone to talk to.... I do know how you are feeling. I lost all my 'so called' friends when I became disabled. Their reason... I couldn't keep up with them anymore and I wasn't worth their time. Nice, huh?  PM me and we could chat sometime
I'm so sorry you lost your friends, and yeah it sucks, being disabled does not make you different than who you are, they are being really insensitive and rude :( Lets be friends :) I will PM You soon :) I like you already :)
hi! :)
hello bearsafety :) can we be friends? :)
Looks like you have a lot of new friends! If you need any more, feel free to message me!
I need more :) I will PM you soon :)
I don't know if I know how to be a friend but I will sure try. Just PM me whenever. 
thank you so much :) i will PM you :)
sure friend
thakn you so much :)
Iv been on this site for an hour and I can't figure out how to add friends or pm lmao little help?
Click on my username, and press the green 'add friend' button on the right.
I'm not sure if you have, but maybe seek a therapist that specializes in caregivers. I'm a part time caregiver for my mom and my grandpa. I used argue with my mom all the time and the only way it tappered down was being able to say everything to someone not attached to the situation. I'm sorry you and your wife are going through this. It's shitty. I want to say stay strong, but it's okay if sometimes you can't be.
I think this is a good idea. I'll have to look in my area to see if I can find one. Thank you. 
Has she tried cannabis (or cannabis products)? It won't fix her problems, but I have heard that it can alleviate some of the pain associated with those medical problems. Might also help with mood/stress for both of you.
This needs to be higher. There’s also a study that show it can even put the disease into remission.  http://www.medicaldaily.com/medical-marijuana-achieves-complete-remission-crohns-disease-drug-improves-247783
I don’t have it or claim to know anything about crohns disease but I do know its an autoimmune condition. Has she heard of or tried the autoimmune protocol diet? Its pretty restrictive and difficult but it can help to ease the immune response and help her heal. It may be worth looking in to. The people on the  r/autoimmuneprotocol sub will have a lot more information than I do, but it really may be worth a shot. I hope it can give her some relief.
I was also gonna comment on diet, not sure what your doctors have recommended, but some get better by cutting everything that contains gluten, milk and sugar. May be worth a shot if you havent already. 
The only medicine that has worked for my UC ( both UC and crohns are in the same family of diseases) is remicade. Ask your doctor about it if you haven’t already. 
remicade has not worked for me, but treating my illness with CBD +  herbs (isatis cooling + flavonex + RF plus) has literally saved my life. Please look into it if your S.O. is open-minded.
We have to make tough decisions sometimes. That being said, you can either stay with her and cope for the both of you or break up with her and move on with your life.
That's not an option with someone you actually love. Hopefully one day you get to experience that. 
I've experienced it already, and we ended up breaking up. Love is dead. Be practical and rational, dude. I know it may hurt, but it is what it is. This is reality. It's about time you wake up, and face the truth.
You sound hurt, good luck with fixing that bud. 
If you have the means, take yourself out to eat. If you're going to spend the night with yourself, be kind to yourself.
yeah i'll probably grab some fast food and just listen to music. Thanks for the reply 
yeah i'll probably grab some fast food and just listen to music. Thanks for the reply 
Portable gaming rocks. Just be yourself and enjoy the new year your way.
Portable gaming rocks. Just be yourself and enjoy the new year your way.
unfortunately don't have a portable system yet, thinking about getting the switch tho. I'll just have to listen to music. Thanks 
That sounded better than any other plans I could think of. Music and food are all you need tbh. 
It really wasn't bad lol, still wish i could be with ppl 
I will be spending my New Years locked away alone in my apartment I'm sure a lot of people in this sub reddit are going to be alone.  
good luck bud, happy new years 
This is what I’m doing. Much better than almost dying of alcohol poisoning like I did last year.
I would like to go out but I have no friends and no girlfriend, no one
when the time hit 12 i was playing xbox 
I drank than was at the gym when the clock hit 12
Honestly, this is so much more awesome than what the majority of people are doing.  I look at it this way - if I were reading a book or watching a film, would I want the protagonist to be going drinking in a crowded square with a bunch of morons, or sitting alone in some empty parking lot.   I actually love that you're doing this. 
thanks a lot for the response. 
thanks a lot for the response. 
Yeah, honestly better than what I'm doing. Lol. At least you'll be enjoying yourself some peace and quiet. Hell, if you're in a snowy area, do a couple donuts for me haha. 
Yeah, honestly better than what I'm doing. Lol. At least you'll be enjoying yourself some peace and quiet. Hell, if you're in a snowy area, do a couple donuts for me haha. 
haha, happy new years 
I think there should be a place where lonely people can gather together during festive days, it won't be as good as being around your friends/family but at least you won't be alone and maybe meet some new friends 
that sounds shootin awesome 
They're called bars
Yeah, but I don't think this special bars should be just for lonely people 
Dude I'm staying in and I'm ok with it. Who cares if someone makes fun of you. Have confidence. NYE is overrated.
Just like Christmas, Thanksgiving, and the rest of them are. Cool if you do make plans, but most of us just wish the plans were over an hour after they start anyways lol.
Totally understand it, I've gone on random drives to nowhere before just to make it seem like I got shit goin on in my life. But this year I'm just saying shoot it. I'm alone right now and driving in circles isn't going to change that, it'll just waste gas. So I'm alone on New Years and yeah it sucks but it won't be this way forever, I won't shooting let it. I will end up happy whether I like it or not dammit!
good luck friend, happy new years 
I'm spending New Years with MY MOM AND HER FRIENDS, I feel like a shooting loser, you're not alone.
glad im not alone in this, thanks for the reply. 
dude you dont need to hide away. be proud and shoot em if they dont like it. go to their gathering and just be your self, be unfilitered, speak your mind and laugh at them when they get uncomfortable with your honesty, have a ball at their expense, eat their food. Turn the tables see how they like it. No one deserves to be alone. Don't slink away and hide like a beaten dog.
He might get kicked out tho but that would be hella fun 
I do this. My parents used to ask me 'When are you going out? Don't you have friends? Why don't you ask them to do stuff? You're always alone.' So I just pretend I'm invited, but I just take a really long walk, bus to a library, or somewhere kind of far from home and just waste time. Saves me the trouble of explaining my depression. 
haha yep i do exactly the same. So much easier 
I would stay home and play video games. Too many drunk drivers tonight to be on the road unnecessarily. Besides, your sister and her friends don't matter anyway.   I'll be home alone watching DVD reruns. I would love to play Xbox but I don't have wifi to update the box so DVDs and early bed with earplugs it is.   HNY
thanks, happy new year. 
good luck, thanks for the reply 
Yep, Chinese joints are always open haha. 
Wanted to get drunk, even by myself, but I’m stuck with the mennonite side of my family. I’m an atheist.
hope u found something fun to do tn, happy new years 
I'm in the same place. My family is the only reason I don't off myself.   There's a pointlessness to life. I feel like a child that has been at the zoo too long and is ready to go now. Sure there are interesting things to do and see, but I feel like I've seen them all. Everything else is just more of the same. Ugh.
yep
Hey man, trust me nobody wants to see you go out like that. I've only recently left hospital after taking 60+ antidepressants and it broke my heart when I saw how people reacted to it. Your friends and family want to see you get better, not go away. Stay strong. 
What did people say to you? Don't answer if it's too private I'm just always wondering how people would treat me if I had a failed attempt. I know people want me to get better, but I feel like I can't and that dying is the only solution to not burdening them with me
What did people say to you? Don't answer if it's too private I'm just always wondering how people would treat me if I had a failed attempt. I know people want me to get better, but I feel like I can't and that dying is the only solution to not burdening them with me
I don't even have a close relationship with my dad but when I tried and put myself in the ICU I remember my dad sitting by my bed openly weeping...something my dad doesn't really do. It hurts the people around you, it really does. 
I don't even have a close relationship with my dad but when I tried and put myself in the ICU I remember my dad sitting by my bed openly weeping...something my dad doesn't really do. It hurts the people around you, it really does. 
It's really an eye opener. If you want to see how people would react, reach out to them and tell them you're having suicidal thoughts. Their reaction will speak volumes.
Thanks. I've been up all night cutting and my usual support person I haven't been able to get in contact with. I do enjoy drawing, but I find it extremely difficult to get started again. I quit a few months ago when I decided I wasn't good enough at if
Please don't hurt yourself! I'm here if you want to talk to someone. I'm the exact same – I find it really hard to pick up as well but once I start it's a little hard to stop. I'm a terrible drawer, but it's relaxing. Don't give up hope!
Please don't hurt yourself! I'm here if you want to talk to someone. I'm the exact same – I find it really hard to pick up as well but once I start it's a little hard to stop. I'm a terrible drawer, but it's relaxing. Don't give up hope!
Is it okay if i pm you?
I thought I was the only one...
I think people who feel this way tend to not talk about it because it makes them feel like they're putting a burden on their family and friends. At least, that's how I feel.
Totally get how you feel. Some times they are my only reason too. *Hugs* thank you for sharing this. It helps me feel a bit more sane.
It's strangely comforting to know it's not just me that feels this way
I just have this continuous fear that feeds into my depressions. If I stay, I will damage my kids. If I kill myself, I will damage my kids. 
This is the hardest part of being a depressed parent. When mine was really little I plotted to take her with me so she wouldn't have to feel it.  That was the first time I checked myself into a hospital. 
So many people have this feeling. I wonder how justified it is to keep existing for others' sake...
It enters dangerous territory when you begin to trivialise human suffering. I've had real dark moments where I've not placed any significance on the grieving/suffering of my family after my passing. That's helped me rationalise suicide a little more and pushed me closer to the edge.  Only thing keeping me alive is hope for a better future. Having said that, if you're not actually in terrible circumstances, it helps tremendously to build gratitude for your comforts and learn to be happy with what you have and where you are.
Your job isn't to hit the ball.  Your only job is to swing over and over and over.  That's it.  Just swing.  Hitting and missing is irrelevant if you can just find a way to pick up that bat, stand at the plate and swing. 
Good advice here. You will feel worse if you dont at least try. 
You can also be fired for any reason or no reason at all. Maybe they don't like your haircut and the fact that you have a mole on your cheek. 
That does depend on the country, countries with decent employment laws (ie not America) mean you cannot be fired for no reason or you can report them and claim a hefty sum. 
My trick is to assume that I'm going to fail and be rejected.  That way I'm never disappointed.  Instead, I can be surprised when things work out.  If you expect to be disappointed, then you can't be disappointed.
I already do this, but the idea still twists my stomach in knots and gives me anxiety.
Understandably so.  I find that a healthy dose of venlafaxine and Buproprion helps.
I'm on venlafaxine and find it (somewhat) helps my depression but not my anxiety, what does Buproprion help with?  
To the top with you. Take this updoot.
yo get the updoots
Wow :o I honestly feel like I could have typed this myself! All your thoughts and problems, I'm in the same boat! Wanting to be someone different. Being trapped in a body you wish was different. PM me if you like, I'll always listen.
I came here to say this. I ralate so much to the post.
Too bad we couldn't switch bodies...I wish I was born male!   Have you gone to asktransgender?  They may be able to help you!
Yeah, I wish I were born male, too. 
Yeah, I wish I were born male, too. 
i second this, having ur period every month sucks. Also i'd love to not be judged for not wearing makeup. 
i second this, having ur period every month sucks. Also i'd love to not be judged for not wearing makeup. 
And don't forget the ill-treatment of women in general.  There's not a single aspect of my life that is better because I am a woman, and many (most?) that are far worse because of my gender.  Being female is just one of the myriad reasons I hate myself, and it plays a significant role in my chronic depression.
Not the best posts to imply 'you have it better...'
I wasn't implying that at all. You're literally putting words in my mouth. 
Assuming all women have it easier is simply incorrect.
This is what people are reading out of it, but this is not what this is about for me. The post is too scarce and got its own momentum. 
Yes, because being female is obviously a blessing. All females are treated like saints.  Seriously, though, I wish I were born attractive and with more charisma. I don’t want to switch sex, though, and I’m sure if you were to become a female, you’d quickly realize that your life wouldn’t be any better. Hell, your life might’ve been worse; society, unfortunately, treats women worse than men depending on their attractiveness.
I know good looking women who don't have perfect lives with everyone loving and caring for them.   We can all have terrible chapters in our lives.
Have you looked into nofap for your sleep addiction? I don't think we need to quit fapping but sleeping  everyday does shoot us up mentally.   Also I think what you're missing is warm bloodedness. Women are more warm blooded and men tend to alternate between hot blooded and cold blooded. You can learn to be more warm blooded
No. Honestly shoot r/NoFap. Unless sleep/porn addiction is destroying your sex life, it's not worth giving up sleep as a coping mechanism. I tried it, and I would NOT recommend it to someone with depression.
Does it really shoot us up? 
No, masterbation is normal and natural. As long as its not getting in the way of daily life your fine. 
Yup. It feels too good. Brain stops dishing out happiness naturally because sleep addict takes it manually. There's only so much life in us and frequent sleep takes so much of it that there's not enough left to feel good about yourself  
Whats your source on this? I did some searching and I found nothing that supports this
Why do you say it shoots us up mentally?
It feels too good. Brain stops dishing out happiness naturally because sleep addict takes it manually. There's only so much life in us and frequent sleep takes so much of it that there's not enough left to feel good about yourself 
and much lower suicide rates too !
women attempt suicide at greater rates. men succeed more often when they do attempt.
women attempt suicide at greater rates. men succeed more often when they do attempt.
Fascinating. Women attempt at 4 times the rate, are only hospitalized at 1.5 times the rate, but men die at 3 times the rate from suicide than women. Did not know this (other than the final statistic).
>  If your ideal is not to be a woman but to be LIKE a woman, be more kind. Be polite. Be respectful.  Men = not kind, not polite, and respectful.   Also it's spelled transgender.   
Quite the hasty generalization. Coming off stereotypical may have not been the best choice...
According to traditional gender roles, no. 
According to traditional gender roles men have to love their families without question and provide for them without question.      My brother is in a traditional gender role family. His wife is home caring for the kids, he is doing his hardest to provide for all of them. No, traditional gender roles don't say that a man has to be a disrespectful idiot.  
Really?    I shooting hate being a chick. I feel like I got the shit end of the stick on that deal. 
Why is that so?   I don't mean that I disagree, I just want your opinion. 
Yes really. This is a females world right now. I encourage you to embrace your privilege🙃. I sure as hell would if I could . 
Yeah still not seeing this privilege everyone is talking about.    Female comedians still aren't funny.   That not skinny not fat body type is completely under represented.   Sleeping with more than like 3 his still makes you a  bad company .  Sorry, I just desperately hate it. 
Very happy for you! Just don't think a girl will fix all your problems cause that'll make it worse.
I actually had this same thing happen to me this weekend (asked a girl out and she said yes). First thing that has made me happy in a while and I will cling to that with all I have. 
I actually had this same thing happen to me this weekend (asked a girl out and she said yes). First thing that has made me happy in a while and I will cling to that with all I have. 
Take some caffeine and have a glass of wine. Make it the best time of your life. 
Your crush is only out of your league if you believe they are! Believe in yourself! <3
I believed a crush was in my league one time and when I asked them out they explicitly told me I wasn't. So...
Congrats dude! I have a crush on this girl and I'm thinking about asking her out at some point as well.
Ask!   Life is to short!
Looking good
Slow down!
You have a job, you can take up a social hobby and meet people, make friends. I *know* you can. It'll help.
>you can take up a social hobby and meet people, make friends.  i've been trying this for over a year with zero results
It definitely will if you let it. It will be slow but it will help. 
Thanks a lot.
Congratulations! I just started mine as well after a severe fight with depression and anxiety. Onto day two tomorrow couldn't be more exited. Sending positive vibes your way.
Thank you! Hope everything goes well with your job too. 
This is my first post ever, I am very proud of you! Congratulations! Keep going!
Thanks a lot, friend!
what is up with the negative comments? getting a job is one of the best things ever. I am myself searching for one. 
For the people that benefit from structure that a job creates, absolutely.
For the people that benefit from structure that a job creates, absolutely.
or, you know, the freedom that income brings
or, you know, the freedom that income brings
Or people who want to contribute more to society. I feel like a leech when I'm depressed and going into work every day and producing something of value helps prove to me that I'm not. 
Congratulations! Same here, except I got hired at Coffee Bean! 😊
Thank you!! Congrats! :)
Awesome man! That's a huge accomplishment, you should be proud of yourself and reward yourself with something nice :)
Thank you!! 
Congrats. I'm actually in a familiar spot of not having a job. So I feel out of touch with reality. I hope you feel better. 
This. Me too. Thanks.
You know who likes pizza? EVERYONE  You go, girl.
Lol! Thanks!
congrats man! jobs are great for confidence, for me its an excuse to get out of the house which tends to help me
Thanks a lot! 
Congrats! 😊 hope you have a pleasant experience there
Thank you!
Congrats :)
Thanks! :)
Congrats! 😊 hope you have a pleasant experience there
Thank you!
You aren't a tired lazy bum! Depression is just a pain, and I know you can get through this. Your in my thoughts, friend. Thanks. 
Haha yea true, thanks for the kind words. I would say it's more my ADHD than depression, but both pretty much makes everything a struggle anyways.
That's awesome, buddy. Congrats.
Thanks a lot!!
Nice! Good job. If I could give you some advice it would be this: try to build a good rapport with your coworkers. Treat them as friends and be happy to see them. Also, be dependable and competent. No one likes a coworker that slacks. It will make the job so much more enjoyable and will give your social skills and work ethic a boost.
Thank you! I will definitely use your tips!
Congrats, my friend! Service jobs have definitely helped me as far as confidence/people skills go. I'm not out of the woods yet, but a job like Domino's will be great for sociability and discipline. It definitely was in my case. Do good work and have fun!  Also, I love y'all's pizza.
Thanks a lot!! :)
So proud of you! Way to go:)
Thank you!! :D
Congrats mate! I think it should make a big improvement over time, even if it's not appreciable at first :)
Thanks a lot mate! 
Congrats! 😊 hope you have a pleasant experience there
Thank you! :)
Thanks a lot.
:)
One of the nice things, at least in my opinion, about these kinds of jobs is that you are forced to talk to people.  When I'm alone at work or elsewhere, I have too much time to think and end up getting at least a little depressed.  Helps take my mind off of myself and makes me even slightly happier.
Yeah I have a lot of trouble talking to people, so hopefully this helps me fix that. 
Yeah I have a lot of trouble talking to people, so hopefully this helps me fix that. 
I'm kind of the same way, but only really for starting conversations and the such.  Oddly enough, I'm pretty good at having formal conversations though.  I'm sure it'll be nicer at your job though, since my past job as a cashier consisted of 'cookie cutter' conversations with little to no depth. 
Domino's is shooting delicious. How'd it go? 
It's going pretty well so far. Thanks for asking. I made like 7 deliveries so far, made about 40 bucks in tips.. so not bad lol. I did screw up a couple of times tho..and I also was having trouble talking with the customers so it made things kinda awkward because i kept stuttering lol, but I think i'll get better as I go on. 
Hahaha at first I thought you meant your interviewer proposed XD Congrats!
'You didn't get the job, but you get... Me! Will you marry me?'
'You didn't get the job, but you get... Me! Will you marry me?'
LOL.  Right?  Ha!  'Well, we don't think you're right for this position, but we think you might be right for *this position* amiright?  Haha. 
LOL.  Right?  Ha!  'Well, we don't think you're right for this position, but we think you might be right for *this position* amiright?  Haha. 
Hahaha! That broke me up!
How do depressed people manage to get boyfriends/girlfriends? Legitimate question.
I am wildly lucky.  I went through my most crippingly depressive and anxious and panicked and agoraphoibic two years after we'd already been together for two years.  So he signed on for the good stuff, then was strong enough to deal with the really bad stuff when it came up.  I totally won the lottery, I'm super lucky, I have no idea? 
Get really really really lucky and find someone wonderful?  But for me it was completely random situation and lots of communication and difficult talks at times.
1,000% agree.  So much communication, even when it's really ugly and makes your blue day even shooting worse.  Difficult talks to the power of 10.    We did it though, and that means every one can.  I'm not special.  We just agreed to talk about everything, then held up that bargain.
How do depressed people manage to get boyfriends/girlfriends? Legitimate question.
Step 1: be attractive.... 
Step 1: be attractive.... 
I agree - a lot of people who are depressed and dating are the sort who people assume can't be depressed because they're beautiful or handsome (or, like, sporty)
My guess?  We get lucky.  I'd kill to have a girlfriend, but it's not so easy...  I've inky ever asked one person, a good friend, and she turned me down, but we're still good friends.  I'm afraid to ask anyone else, because I'm actually afraid of both answers.  
> I'm afraid to ask anyone else, because I'm actually afraid of both answers.  That... is a very succinct explanation for why I'm afraid to ask girls out.
> I'm afraid to ask anyone else, because I'm actually afraid of both answers.  That... is a very succinct explanation for why I'm afraid to ask girls out.
Ikr...  On one hand, I'm afraid that I'm going to delude myself into thinking even more horrible things about myself if I get rejected, and on the other, I've never been in a relationship like this, so I'm afraid of massively screwing up.  So I just stay silent...
We are real humans too ya know? :P Just because someone is depressed doesn't mean their personality is entirely gone. Sheesh.
I still have a personality but I'd say 90% of my problem is that I can't believe someone would want to be with me, or I won't let someone get close to me because there's nothing about me that's worth 'having'. I'm giving the poster the benefit of the doubt and hoping he's asking because of how the depressed person feels, not how others feel about them (make sense ish?)
CONGRATS!!!! How did he propose? 
In the middle of a rainstorm while we were camping in our favourite place on Earth, my happy place, called Elora Ontario.  It was a total surprise to both of us!  Holy shit!
In the middle of a rainstorm while we were camping in our favourite place on Earth, my happy place, called Elora Ontario.  It was a total surprise to both of us!  Holy shit!
Oh my, that sounds so wonderfully romantic!!
I'm trying to feel happy for you, I honestly am, but I can only seem to feel jealous, since I've never been on a date, and you're getting shooting married. Sorry. I do wish you and your fiance the best, but I am really, really jealous.
Thank you, for your honesty and for, like you said, your attempt at good thoughts.  Like seriously thank you.  The thing that's made the most massive difference in my road to 'recovery' (*hate* that word) is honesty, even when it's not in its prettiest form.   How old are you?  I'm 36.  I'm no spring chicken.  This shit took time.  Are you in school right now?
Congrats. Finding someone to love you 'warts and all' is a beautiful thing. 
Yep.  Warts, scars, blue days, navy days, everything.  He's seen it all.  He's still here.  He wants me.  Oh my God! :)
Why is other people being happy supposed to make me happy again?  Really, all thats telling me is everyone else has positive things happen to them except me. I feel better when no one is posting here about how happy they are.
When did I say it was supposed to make you happy?
She sounds freaking awful and so freaking stupid. Hate when people lack decency yet we're the ones who feel sick because of their stupid shitty actions. Sorry you had to go through that. Some humans are just literal shits. 
Yes I knew a girl back in school who used to make fun of the faces of boys. The funny thing was she should've been the last person to do it because honestly she herself looked like a monkey. I don't understand why people make fun of someone's face when they themselves don't look like models.  
Yes I knew a girl back in school who used to make fun of the faces of boys. The funny thing was she should've been the last person to do it because honestly she herself looked like a monkey. I don't understand why people make fun of someone's face when they themselves don't look like models.  
I knew a girl like that too except she did it to girls. She saw me and was like 'ew' and its like stupid girl you look like a piece of shit. 
That shootin sucks. I wanna say young people can be thoughtlessly heartless, but older ones suck too.  They don't know how hard you worked. It's hard to lose that much weight. Congratulations on doing that. This is an emotional setback, but don't give up.
At least young people have a better chance of realizing how shitty they are and changing. Not that it's impossible for older people to change too but it's a lot less likely. Being an idiot can be a classic part of coming of age for some people, unfortunately. Doesn't make it okay but makes me more hopeful that they'll 'grow' out of it. 
Don't allow her to chip away at your self esteem. People are mean, but that doesn't make them 'right'.   You went from 300lbs to 230lbs? Good for you. It takes a lot of discipline. I was 237 at my heaviest and now I'm a little under 170. And you know what? People were critical the entire time.   Screw them. Convert their negativity into fuel for you to forge ahead.   Keep doing what you're doing. You'll get there. 
> People are mean, but that doesn't make them 'right'.  That's something I know I struggled with growing up. I think part of it is having the confidence to know they're wrong. 
Double standards. If you were a woman, and a man did this, torches and pitchforks would be raised.     This is bullshit.
Ugh, this is completely true. I feel like 'acceptable' double standards like this only perpetuate sexism against both men and women. It's awful and I hate it.
Don't worry about it. When she's fat and 40 and divorced with 3 kids she'll get her comeuppance. She didn't sound like a brain surgeon. 
How'd yoU know she'll end up with kids???? And three for that matter 
How'd yoU know she'll end up with kids???? And three for that matter 
I don't. But it often ends up that way - the bratty, shallow teens of today end up being the fat hausfraus of tomorrow. 
This made my heart hurt really bad. I wish I could give you a huge hug and I bet you're super cute. I'm a 18yr old female and I'd never dare insult someone like that. You just don't know how those 'jokes' will effect someone. I guess some people are too stupid to realise that. 
I think it's immaturity that some people unfortunately never grow out of. The moment you get a taste of empathy it changes your mind set- not that we don't have slip ups in morality from time to time. 
Next time, whiz on that pizza before delivering it.
Yeah, don't do that.
patriarchy is such nonsense. feminists: lets name everything bad in the world after men.  those situations are the worst when you're unhealthy. after a lot of therapy I now look at them as opportunities to challenge how I would react to them. Still not easy and often feels like shit but it's better than how I used to deal with it
That's a pretty extreme interpretation of feminism, to say the very least. Don't get me wrong, this lady sounds absolutely horrific and what she did is *completely* unacceptable, but that's not how feminism works, compadre.
I feel pretty disillusioned about feminism. I bought into it when I was in college but now I'm convinced they're not for gender equality at all. It's mutated into some kind of perverse women's interest group. Don't get me wrong they have a great legacy but imagine a bunch of men and women who want sexism to exist(to the degree which it did 50 years ago) in places it doesn't to feel closer kinship to that legacy by fighting for it. 
Please don't polarize this into a feminist issue. This girl was mean and blatantly wrong because of foolishness and ignorance. No one here is celebrating her bossy behavior and we're criticizing her for that. 
Grow up. You don't have a real problem, do you even realize how stupidly unimportant this is.
Do you realise how stupidly unimportant your comment is? Grow up.
Same here. Every night (and there have been a lot) of sad drinking and listening to Amy Winehouse inevitably leads me back here to you all. Go figure.   It kind of sucks because most of my friends are remarkably productive and successful and I'm just kind of... here. It's nice to have a community online with people who find life and other people as vexing as I do.
My depression got a little better when I quit drinking completely.  If you ever need support or an ear let me know.  The alcohol/depression spiral is a horrible place to be.
My depression got a little better when I quit drinking completely.  If you ever need support or an ear let me know.  The alcohol/depression spiral is a horrible place to be.
Oh yes
(⊃｡•́‿•̀｡)⊃
I almost felt this one. Really cool I reached some people with this. This really meant a lot to me believe it or not. For what it's worth, you all made my day. :)
I almost felt this one. Really cool I reached some people with this. This really meant a lot to me believe it or not. For what it's worth, you all made my day. :)
Awww dude I'm glad. Thanks for starting this lil love fest, I come here because there isn't a lot of empathy for depression in the real world
<3
<3
Yeah, I watch The Office over and over just because it reminds me of when I was overall happier and healthier. 
Nothing better than wallowing in the comfort that is Jim and Pam's relationship.
Nothing better than wallowing in the comfort that is Jim and Pam's relationship.
Seems like watching happy couples on TV just makes me feel worse. Anytime I find a funny show I think I can distract myself with for a couple hours I end up watching fictional people being happy and I end up just as upset if not worse than when I started. 
Seems like watching happy couples on TV just makes me feel worse. Anytime I find a funny show I think I can distract myself with for a couple hours I end up watching fictional people being happy and I end up just as upset if not worse than when I started. 
Yup. That's why It's Always Sunny in Philadelphia is a godsend. I can always watch Charlie huff glue and eat cat food and think 'Well, I haven't reached that level of shit yet.'   That, and it's funny shit. Looking forward to binge-watching season 10 now that it's on Netflix.
I watch Scrubs. All. The. Time. It reminds me of happier times, and had been pretty good at helping recognize nonverbal and verbal cues.
Same here. It's my show when I feel like everything is going wrong. 
I do this with parks and rec or sunny in Philly. hey even game grumps are nice to listen to as background noise.
Add 30 Rock and this is me. 
Yes! For me it's friends 
I'm currently on my fourth rewatch... love that show. Almost through season 10 though! Makes me sound lame, but I'm going to miss it.
Yeah, I kind of like that about TNG, and it's why I tried to get into it. I just couldn't get over all the cheesiness and horrible plots. I only lasted about 11 episodes into the 1st season. I read it doesn't really get good until season 3 or something though. 
When I rewatch it, I usually jump in randomly in season 2 or 3. It gives me a sense of calm, like yes their are crazy things out there we don't understand, but that's okay, our first reaction doesn't have to be destroy, it can be watch, wonder, and let be.
This. Star Trek, Stargate, maybe a little Doctor Who... it's all about that combination of big ideas, a wider world (or galaxy!) and the adventures I loved as a kid.   You're not weird. Or if you are, you're not the only one.
To a depressed mind the ceaseless wonder towards life is almost the most fantastical element.
Yes! I like to rewatch futurama, South Park, and Inuyasha the most. I kinda feel like doing that now. It'd be comforting.
Man, I watched Futurama twice in a row once. In about a month. It just made me feel so much better and I would spend all night watching it.
I watch Always Sunny every day.
How did you like the new episode?
How did you like the new episode?
Not one of my favorites but I enjoyed it! I'm really looking forward to more of this season. Season 10 might be my favorite. 
I'm a grown ass 24 year old man with a love for Adventure Time and My Little Pony. They both make me so happy.
Ha.  May have to try this.  I do like SpongeBob.
Ha.  May have to try this.  I do like SpongeBob.
Dude, I'm 34 and watch spongebob. I watch cartoons daily to get me to sleep.
Dude, I'm 34 and watch spongebob. I watch cartoons daily to get me to sleep.
I'm old enough to be your dad, and I still love my cartoons.  :-)
Absolutely. I have been watching Gilmore Girls over and over again since I was in junior high. It's comforting. And I know what is going to happen. And I am already emotionally adjusted to the characters. Most of my friends think it's strange that I don't like to branch out but..they don't know how great it is.
GG is my go-to comfort show. It's like a big bowl of homemade mac and cheese with a warm chocolate chip cookie after.
GG is my go-to comfort show. It's like a big bowl of homemade mac and cheese with a warm chocolate chip cookie after.
You described GG perfectly. I've seen every episode now at least 3-5 times because it's so comforting. 
Yes. It's archer for me
Same. It's 6:15am and yeah good idea. It's a good bit of escspism. I even made a fancy dress costume of him once by paitlnting a suit, before my life went to shit
Frasier. And not a TV show, but O&A or Howard Stern. 
Ugh, Frasier. Sometimes I love it, other times I cringe so damn hard and almost shout at the TV, 'JUST SAY THE THING THAT YOU THINK EVERYONE KNOWS BUT THEY DON'T WHICH IS THE ENTIRE REASON FOR THIS AWKWARDNESS'
omg Bojack Horseman is that you? :P
Bojack is special.  I may not be famous or get laid, but he's still me.
When badly depressed I used to cry and beg to go home. I finally realized what I really wanted was to go back in time to a time when I was happy.  
I wish I was an 8 year old again. I was actually happy then. :(
I wish I was an 8 year old again. I was actually happy then. :(
I don't even remember being happy when I was younger.
I don't even remember being happy when I was younger.
I do remember not being so worried about so many things. I miss that.
I sometimes get the thought of 'i want my mommy' even though im an adult and my mother is not a depression-free wizard
Upvoted out of appreciation for the concept of a depression-free wizard.
Upvoted out of appreciation for the concept of a depression-free wizard.
Upvoted out of appreciation for appreciating the concept of a depression-free wizard.
I haven't been anywhere I feel is home for about 15 years.. 
I haven't felt like I had a true home since I was 9 or 10. Every place I have lived since (one house I lived in for almost 8 years too) has felt like a bus station. Like I'm just waiting for something better to come along and to ride into a better place. Probably why I love trouble but hate coming home.
I know, right? but if your dog dies, it's defcon 3 full force breakdown.   ...I'm like that too. feelings are weird. 
Feelings are really weird, some major stuff has happened in my life and I haven't felt a thing. Then something that for most would seem trivial breaks me.
Feelings are really weird, some major stuff has happened in my life and I haven't felt a thing. Then something that for most would seem trivial breaks me.
It's easier to cope if you can make sense of it. The trivial things are often the most unexplainable/illogical/unfair. The disruption of order is what shoots with you. Grandpa died: that sucks, but he was old and smoked. Out of gas with no money: sudden realization you aren't where you are supposed to be in life, and you won't be able to make a lateral move.
this. Why is that?
Dogs accept you 100% as you are and don't judge you. You can look and feel depressed without masking it in front of them. They help give your life a purpose. Don't want to get out of bed? Too bad: Dog needs to eat! 
It's called denial and is the 'first stage' of grief.
I'm not speaking for OP but you could just, you know, realize death is an inevitable part of life and not be upset by it.
Mine is. Sometimes I'll go to sleep at eight, and sometimes I'll go days without sleeping, and sometimes I'll go to sleep in the morning and sleep all day.
Yeah it fluctuates with my mood. Hang in there.
Yeah it fluctuates with my mood. Hang in there.
Thanks, you hang in there too.
I slept from 4am-5:30pm on Wednesday. Slept right through 2 alarms. Tried to sleep at 4am on Thursday but I just laid in bed for 3 hours until I eventually fell asleep. Slept for 3 hours. Yeah, my schedule is shooted.
I feel that. I have to set like 50 alarms to wake up. If I was any heavier of a sleeper I'd be dead.
Are you me? heh.  I'm usually *in bed* before the sun comes up (5:30-6:00, usually) but I'm up reading and watching videos on my phone during sunrise. I'm torn about it. I like the peace and quiet brought by being awake while everyone else sleeps, but missing out on 1/2-2/3 of daylight the next day sucks.
Exactly.  You might be me.
Wow, that's weird. I went to sleep at that exact same time today (yesterday?). My sleep schedule is so wildly backwards it's not even funny. 
Yeah it's crazy. My goal is just to be able to get to sleep before the sun rises.
Yeah it's crazy. My goal is just to be able to get to sleep before the sun rises.
my goal is usually to distract myself until I'm tired enough to pretty much pass out when I hit the bed. If i don't do that I end up laying in bed and panicking about anything and everything. 
That's why I'm here now.
Welcome to the party. We have cookies and existential angst.
Yes i normally sleep anywhere from 5-7am and sleep until 3pm or later. I also have depression. Nothing i can do to change my sleep schedule. Ill stay up 2 days and sleep 4 hours only to be back where i was theres no point in fighting it anymore 
Okay at least I'm not the only one, I try to fix my sleep schedule all the time from 6am till 3pm but nothing ever works.. 
Yeah. I stopped caring about it. I let it go.
Me too. I don't think it's necessarily a good thing but it's probably better than the old method of waking up late and thinking 'Wow I'm a pathetic, worthless piece of shit.' Better to do the same thing without the crushing resentment about it.
I feel tired all the time, but I avoid sleeping, because there would be nothing to distract me from the loneliness. My hairline is receding, and my parents say it's due to my lack of sleep.  I'm 19.
You know your parents are full of shit, right? 
You know your parents are full of shit, right? 
Pretty much.
Went to bed at the exact same time haha. What do you do to pass time ?
I watch a lot of Netflix. Read. Listen to music. Drink. That's about it. It's like I can't get myself into bed unless I'm on the verge of passing out.
Do I have a disassociated personality and a second reddit account? Because I also went to sleep at 7:30am. 
This is a distinct possibility.  In which case, hello me.
What is sleep?
Yo I don't know but let me know if you find out 
I've heard that can help but THC makes me anxious and nauseated. I've tried melatonin though but really I just need to get myself in bed with the lights out earlier.   
When I use any sativa or hybrid strains I also freak out every time, but if you only use at least 80% pure indica strains I doubt you would be feeling very anxious.
You posting to this subreddit is good, it shows that you want to change. You're in college right? Check if your school offers free counselling and please, for your own good, talk to a counsellor. You posted here wanting to vent, which is healthy, but you also want help. This subreddit is great for advice, but a counsellor can do so much more for you so much faster.
Thank you. I actually just looked at my school Counseling Center, and scheduled an appointment. It's pretty far out, but I found that they offer support groups for various different things(grief,social anxiety, success etc.). I think it will really help a lot. 
I was also 19 in college.  It was shooting horrible, it was like living in solitary confinement and I hated all the shooting people around me acting happy and having fun while all I did was work and still fail.  What an absolutely detestable place.  I'd rather work 70 hours a week for the rest of my life then ever go back to that hellhole.  If I didn't drop out I probably would have gone insane and that's not an exaggeration.
Did dropping out work out in the end? I'm kinda in a similar position.
Did dropping out work out in the end? I'm kinda in a similar position.
I want to know that too. I'm in a similar situation.
I want to know that too. I'm in a similar situation.
Me too. I know I'm a smart person, but I just feel the urge to simplify my life and get a humble job. I much prefer working 50 hours a week doing physical work in the summer, rather than the 20 hours of bullshit schoolwork every week during the school year. Why not make that my life?
you ever try MDMA?
[Use may also lead to depression and fatigue.](https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/MDMA)  Doesn't sound good.
[Use may also lead to depression and fatigue.](https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/MDMA)  Doesn't sound good.
I feel like this should read **ab**use. MDMA can be very therapeutic and cathartic, especially first time. There's also plenty of exciting research going on into its use in treating PTSD and anxiety disorders by the MAPS organisation.
When will people understand that loneliness isn't depression? 
Loneliness and depression go hand in hand. Loneliness can cause depression if it gets bad enough. Depression can cause you to push people away and then be lonely. 
its my birthday also, happy birthday.  
Hey, thank-you, a very happy birthday to you :).
I know how you feel. My birthday is in 6 days, and every year I only get wishes from my family, because I don't have any actual friends either.    Birthdays always make me more suicidal, if I'm being honest. It's like, 'Oh, I'm one year older now. Still the same as I was before.'  Anyway, happy birthday. :) 
Yeah I have had suicidal thoughts building up to this day too. It's been the worst today. It almost like one day I want to go ahead with it, but the next day something comes along like a ray of hope and makes me curb those thoughts. But nothing has changed apart from that. I'm just watching my 'prime years' like they say go by.   But thankyou and a happy birthday to you in advance :) 
My birthday is in two days. My mother isn't speaking to me, I'm single, my friend is in inpatient rehabilitation, I'm unemployed, I live outside city limits with no transportation but my feet. I'll get a few birthday posts on Facebook but I'm pretty damn sure I'll be doing on Wednesday what I'm doing right now... watching my dog sleep and pokemon emerald on my phone. 
Same here man, unemployed, mother isn't speaking to me because she thinks I am a loser and haven't accomplished anything in life. Spending my birthday alone has become the norm.  But hey, happy birthday in advance :). Speaking of pokemon, I think I might just do the same with the rest of my day.
Same here man, unemployed, mother isn't speaking to me because she thinks I am a loser and haven't accomplished anything in life. Spending my birthday alone has become the norm.  But hey, happy birthday in advance :). Speaking of pokemon, I think I might just do the same with the rest of my day.
deleted  ^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^0.0623  [^^^What ^^^is ^^^this?](https://pastebin.com/FcrFs94k/92086)
Hey happy birthday buddy, it's gonna get better in time :)
Hello! Well, I mentioned the other day to my grandmother that my 9 year old cousin was shocked that I wouldn't be doing anything for my birthday. Because I'll be 31. Grandma patted my shoulder and said, 'wait till your 70's! See how many parties you get then!'   Yes, it could be worse!
Never had a 'birthday' since I was a kid. Sometimes I get my own age wrong.
I hope you are doing OK friend.
This. I'm a junior in college and think about this so much. I'm sad I have no 'good times in college' memories. It's vicious, because I don't have those memories because I have no friends because I'm miserable because I have no friends. The endless cycle. 11:30 am, so here's a drink to every other lonely soul. 
Kindred spirit. Im a senior though and it really hasnt gotten better :/
I seriously thought I was going to go into college and it was going to be only a slightly toned down version of animal house or something. I thought that people were going to drink and party all the time.   Turns out it seriously depends on the work load of your major and the type of people you want to hang out with. College isn't about good times and youthful experience,  it's about trying to build something in your own way so you can matter. 
I have a relatively busy major/minor (Economics/Math) and I landed an good internship. But all I do is work. Schoolwork, Intern work, Chores, grocery shopping, laundry, misc. errands; It's just like, what's the point? When do I enjoy life? When I'm retired? All I'm worth is my productivity. 
I've read your arguments repeatedly and I really can't validate these sources please link 
What sources ? Nothing I've said comes from scientific or researched material. It comes from experience.
What sources ? Nothing I've said comes from scientific or researched material. It comes from experience.
Dudes being an idiot. Ignore. 
What finally helped your family member? Therapy, meds? 
A combination of both, actually. They started going to therapy and after a couple years they eventually started a low dose of Prozac I think. They were really against meds at first.
I actually experience physical chest pain when I think about this, or when I watch movies like Perks of Being a Wallflower or Paper Towns or The Fault In Our Stars, which encompass friends and experiences I know I'll never have. 
That's why I can't watch those movies anymore.
Honestly almost everyone around me either smokes/drinks or gets high so I'd rather have no memories of highschool at all than those.
I made a couple of friends at uni and all we did was go out drink and do drugs every time we saw each other. It's not good. I can't socialize without those aids now, well I can but every time I do feel like a burden on the group, a drag, a bore and my friend circle grows ever shallower.
As a 15 year old I feel the same way 
I would highly suggest working on it now while you're young. I'm early twenties and I highly regret wasting my teenage years doing nothing. It's a horrible feeling. 
Me too. Just got fired from my job that I need.
I feel you. I got fired from my retail job because they didn't find me confident enough. Well they aren't wrong...
I dread going to sleep because I have to be alone with my thoughts with nothing to distract me.  I dread waking up because I have to face the day, repeat the bullshit, find nothing but fear and disappointment in everything I do. It's just bullshit. I'm so sick of it.
I have the same thing with sleeping but have found listening to podcasts as you sleep helps. I fill my head with people talking so I never have to deal with my loneliness or be alone with my thoughts. It might not be healthy, but it kinda works.
I have the same thing with sleeping but have found listening to podcasts as you sleep helps. I fill my head with people talking so I never have to deal with my loneliness or be alone with my thoughts. It might not be healthy, but it kinda works.
Do whatever works. I do the same thing. It helps a little with the basic human need to not be alone. 
This title is poetic. Could you write me a short poem? Please?
You’ll have to ask someone with talent to do that, I’m afraid. Any talent displayed here was a stroke of luck. 
What's amazing is that guy is still working there at all. That kind of behavior is more than enough grounds for termination.
I find the idiots of the world to be incredibly resilient.
It's hard to not have a breakdown some days, even the slightest and silent cry is unavoidable.  I just close my eyes, physically hold on to something with both hands and isolate my thoughts. It feels like my own mind hugging me, saying that i'm going to be fine someday. Maybe we will, i just want for the day to end and get to bed.
'You will be fine, someday.' I like that. I'm going to try it.
I've been trying that hard but jobs in this area are incredibly scarce at the moment, and the only other ones available are hospitality jobs :/
It is so hard! I've been in retail for 12 damn years, throughout school, university and then five more years after graduating. It's been so rough on my mental health. But, I just got a new job, one I think it will be good, that's far from retail. It's unbearable sometimes, but keep trying, like you are now. 
I have a couple coworkers that are my designated people that I'm 100% honest with no matter what. It helps cuz if I feel like shit I don't have to fake smile for them 
If I had a person like that, pretty much every day if they asked me how I feel I'd probably answer 'Literally nothing bad happened to me all day but I still, for some reason, feel sad. idk why so don't try to continue asking me cuz idk'
You're not alone, I cried at work today too. Wasn't the first time and probably won't be the last. I hope you're having a better day now OP.
When i posted this i was about to go to sleep as i live in Australia. But my manager called as he found out and asked me what was up, i told him and he has given me a couple of paid days off.   Sorry to hear you had a breakdown at work too, i hope your days get better soon!
Depression feels like.. Oh wait... I can't trust my feelings. 
I liked this. I'm glad I'm not always depressed, but man when it hits it really hits. 
Just waiting for Mr. Reaper himself to call me in so we can fill out the final paperwork. 
Unfortunately Mr Reaper is not waiting.  It is more pain n suffering.  Things even get worse but noone understand  us.
It's even more irritating to have fallen into a deep hole and the rescuers, with years of training and experience, perch outside the hole  and chat with you about the health benefits of honey.
Yeah, those just suck at their job. :(
After 5 minutes it's like 'have you called a suicide helpline - it's good to talk about these things to a stranger'. Then when you call a helpline, the operator says 'have you tried talking with friends and family - it's good if you can get their support'.
I talked with one once. Asked 1 very clear and straight forward question. How do I Feel better about my body. They spent an hour not answering my question then asked how they did. I told them what I said here. Then they just threw some websites at me and tried to teach me how to open a link and use a website. Never calling again.
I talked with one once. Asked 1 very clear and straight forward question. How do I Feel better about my body. They spent an hour not answering my question then asked how they did. I told them what I said here. Then they just threw some websites at me and tried to teach me how to open a link and use a website. Never calling again.
The problem is that it's an answer that doesn't really have an answer.  If it did, there wouldn't be so many body image issues.  Most people who do have a positive self-image gradually acquired it over an extended period using various things.  So the lack of conclusive answer is probably more of an inability to answer it than an unwillingness.  If you want a hard and fast answer, I will say that I've seen several studies that link weight training to better self-esteem.
Yeah unless you pay a shrink to care nobody can really do much for you. It is an internal struggle that WE have to face. There is not much else someone can do to help us. We have to help ourselves. What kind of help do you want out of people? What can they do for you that you cannot do for yourself other than offer suport?
>  There is not much else someone can do to help us. We have to help ourselves.  One of the symptoms of having depression is that it makes it hard to get help to get rid of it. No one just helps themselves alone. Yes, you have to be involved, but no, you can not get better without assistance and other people. 
That's what a therapist is for
Its not the same I'd rather just have a friend to watch a movie with than a therapist to talk with.
Read 'Subtle Art of Not Giving a Dang' the first chapter of the book was about not trying. It actually gives you a new perspective on things and it's a good read.
I recently picked up this book. One of the best reads I've ever had.
People suck. Don't try. That's the reality of life. I have very few great quality people in my life and that's all I need. You should do the same. Focus on quality not quantity, and its ok to have no friends, not everyone will get you and you dont need them anyway. You're better off.
But you still have someone. 
But you still have someone. 
This.  It's easy to say you 'don't give a shoot'. But when you have no one and you really need someone, everything counts.
yeah I just politely messaged a girl that I'd like to hangout sometime , she called me a creep. 
The word creep gets thrown way too much by girls these days, i mean you can say 'hi' and you're automatically a creep. 
Can confirm. Five years ago I was an insular software developer with a small group of friends I've had for 15-20 years. Then I discovered stand-up comedy and found a whole new circle of friends.
It's great when you branch out find new friends, new passions and like minded peeps. :) 
Your english is very good! I didn't catch it till you wrote teufelskreis.
so all the time lurking on reddit finally pays off!
I have a trick for you, act like your happy hour alone. Works loads for me. When you act happy to be alone not only to people see you as less of a loser and want to be friends with you but it’s also a “fake it till you make it” type situation. Try it out.
Dang that, why do we have to be fake so others like us
Dang that, why do we have to be fake so others like us
He asked for tips on how to get friends I gave him some tips on how I got friends.
Yup. I wouldn't wish this on anyone.
Me either, it's no way to live
Me either, it's no way to live
Yet we are here :/
Honestly I'd be happy if I was the only one with depression in the whole world, because I don't want anyone else to go through what I go through every day.
If we could take turns carrying all the hurt I would
If we could take turns carrying all the hurt I would
Better still, if no one had to ever go through it ever again, ever.
Am I the only one who feels alone when they help other people. Because they never seem to help out back 
Yeah, I've always lived my life with that golden rule they taught you in like kindergarten:  >Treat others how you want to be treated  So whenever someone slipped in life, I always helped them get back up, hoping one day they'd return the favor on the day I inevitably slipped, but it feels like I just keep slipping and everyone just watches...
If you're set on leaving, don't forget to notify your parents when u have the chance before too long has gone by. Last thing you want is a police search going out for you when you're not in trouble 
I'm planning to, but not until I'm officially gone. I couldn't handle talking to them right now. It would completely break me and at that point I don't think I would make it out of the country nor back home. I'd just end. 
I'm planning to, but not until I'm officially gone. I couldn't handle talking to them right now. It would completely break me and at that point I don't think I would make it out of the country nor back home. I'd just end. 
I understand that and I agree with your decision to make it through getting away before letting them know. Best wishes in your endeavors and not to sound cliché but I do hope you find yourself, I envy your courage to do so. 
I understand that and I agree with your decision to make it through getting away before letting them know. Best wishes in your endeavors and not to sound cliché but I do hope you find yourself, I envy your courage to do so. 
Not to be an idiot, but I wouldn't say courage was the prominent factor when you've got $10,000 in the bank.  I just hope he *is* searching. And not running.
Are you leaving your country?
I assume you mean leaving? And yes I am. My country is very small so no matter where I go, people can always find me and get to me within hours.
Damn. Sounds like you're in for a bit of an adventure. Would love to see how this pans out, mind updating us in a week or two?
I'll do my best. 
I'll do my best. 
week or two is too long, update in a day or two?
week or two is too long, update in a day or two?
I'll come back once I feel I'm in a safe place and things are calm. I don't wanna feel forced to post if I'm sleeping on a bench, you know?   You guys have been amazing though and have really helped me a lot.
Good luck, OP. May the road rise up to meet you wherever you go.
Thanks for the kind words. I'm guessing I'll need it. 
Thanks for the kind words. I'm guessing I'll need it. 
I'm kinda hoping you'll update if you do go on a journey. Take care.
I'm kinda hoping you'll update if you do go on a journey. Take care.
There seems to be interest in it so I'll most likely end up writing an update.
My flight is in 6 hours. I'll see if I can find somewhere to rest a bit at the airport and then it's off to a new life.  Thank you for all your positive comments and PMs. See all you guys later!
Keep us updated! Stay safe out there 
I have to disagree a bit.. the best decision I ever made was moving away from 'home'. Changing my  environment really helped with a number of issues I was having, including my depression/anxiety.  That being said, I was 24 at the time and had carefully planned and took plenty of time to consider all my options. I do agree that being so young and making such an emotional decision with all that money is probably not a good idea, however.
So... you don't disagree? Dude I suffer from depression too but what OP is doing is straight stupid. You admit yourself that you had planned that shit out way in advance and considered all of your options - something I can guarantee OP has not done. I didn't say leaving home was wrong. It helped you. Leaving home at 18 with ten large and mental health issues indicates you are not only depressed, but stupid, too. You don't disagree with me.
> She's obviously incredibly sad but she understand  I hope she can wait for you.  She sounds like a ray of sunshine in the darkness.
> She sounds like a ray of sunshine in the darkness.  She truly is. She probably saved my life.  I don't think I'd actually be around to leave the country if I hadn't met her.
God damn man, do know that doing this, you're living the dream most of us dream of, myself included.  Keep us updated!   EDIT: Oh, and here are a few subs that'll help you! /r/onebag /r/survival /r/frugal /r/bushcraft /r/travel 
I hope you get to live your dream one day too.  Thanks for that sub, I'll check it out.
I did this too, I felt trapped. I have no regrets, and good luck to you! 
Any chance we might hear your story?
Please at least let your family know what you're doing and where you've gone.  Being in their situation and not knowing where my child is would be one of the worst tortures I could imagine.
I am going to, don't worry. I just need to wait until I know for sure myself where I am. It's needs to be done properly and I need to be able to answer where the shoot I am or what the hell I'm doing.  Which is something I don't even know myself yet.
Not all who wander are lost. I hope you find whatever it is you're looking for friend 
Thank you very much!
Do you have a passport? If so, your 10k can last ages in some parts of the world.
I do, yes.
I do, yes.
Hey saw you're Euopean. You still should be able to get into The Philippines w/o a visa
Thailand 10k would last over 6 months 
Think about the hookers too. $2 a pop.
Sorry if my replies are taking a long time. I only have my phone and my fingers have gotten quite cold. 
Go into a coffee shop or literally any public place with heat.
Go into a coffee shop or literally any public place with heat.
I'm fine now. I'm in the train now almost at the airport.  I had just been sitting at the station for a while and I couldn't put my hands in my pocket because I was typing.
I'm fine now. I'm in the train now almost at the airport.  I had just been sitting at the station for a while and I couldn't put my hands in my pocket because I was typing.
That's good to here :) I hope you become a happy koala with hope <3
That sounds terrible. So are you set on leaving it all?
I have to. I'm going insane. 
Sorry, 7/11?
I think the proper spelling is 7-eleven. I was trying to save title space. 
I'm still confused, you want to work for a 7-eleven store?  
What? No. That was my excuse for leaving.   Sorry if I've caused confusion. 
10k to your name at 18? Hate to break it to you dude, no reason to be depressed. Your better off than 90% of the world. Figure out why you're depressed while you travel 
This just in: nobody has to have a reason to be depressed. You can be a billionaire and still have depression (likewise someone with just something a simple as a healthy family, or wonderful house, can be depressed.)
This so much. I often feel super lonely because I don't have anyone because I stopped going out. I stopped going out because it's too much work and effort but now I'm depressed because I have no friends. Trying to find friends just makes the anxiety worse, staying alone makes depression worse. I got a cat and she's the best thing that's ever happened to me.
That is really true-trying to make friends makes anxiety worse, staying at home makes depression worse. It is a no win situation. Thanks for sharing
It's not a no win situation. Keep trying.
Keep trying? Trying what exactly? Saying idealistic things is the easiest thing ever.  But in life, the more I keep trying, the more I keep getting tired and loosing hope. Even ignorance is not blissful
The picture is great! Thanks for sharing it.  I was having a really difficult time lastnight, and I stumbled upon this artsy radio drama called 'You Are Not Alone'. It's amazing how powerful art can be... I felt very affected after hearing it. Here's the link if you're interested:  http://thetruthapm.com/Story/Entries/2013/5/9_Youre_Not_Alone.html   I hope that you will keep creating. Art matters. A lot. And so do you.
Haha, I don't really art a lot. Haven't drawn anything for about 5 years..   No clue where this came from.
That's a really awesome picture dude. New wallpaper!
Thanks Avacado.
I feel ya, I had a similar experience recently and today I actually vacuumed my room and cleaned all my shit up. A step in the right direction? I hope so. 
Awesome! Tomorrow I'll do my laundry. Wish me luck.
I actually feel like this a lot too. It's like I'm feeling nostalgic for ... something or somewhere... I can never really figure out what it is I'm missing.
You are nostalgic for a place in time. your past when life was more fun, more full. They say, 'you can never go home'  and this is what they are referring to. You are only in a place in time, once you leave, you're in a tifferent place and time. Hope you find a new happy place in time.
You are nostalgic for a place in time. your past when life was more fun, more full. They say, 'you can never go home'  and this is what they are referring to. You are only in a place in time, once you leave, you're in a tifferent place and time. Hope you find a new happy place in time.
Even if you were able to actually move in time or transfer your current mind in to the past it won't be the same 'time' for you as a person. So, you can't go back (home) in time, ever, at all, no power in the universe can get you back there.  Though i don't feel like going back in time/place. I still feel... alien here, like no home my place whenever i go, whatever i do and with whatever whom i can be.
I think wanting to go home means you want comfort, safety, acceptance and love. Like when you were too little to know any better.
I agree. I so often thought, 'I want to go home.' It usualy means that I want to go to sleep, or eat, or relax. Whenever I feel uncomfortable I want home, even if I am feeling uncomfortable at home.  
I want to go home but got none. Lost it in 2015 when mom died. 
Same here. All my mothers(mom/all g'parents)died within a 6 month span in 2010 and now i have no one that loves me like they did. The yurn for home has only grown since. I would settle for just a hug from one of them one last time.  
Same here. All my mothers(mom/all g'parents)died within a 6 month span in 2010 and now i have no one that loves me like they did. The yurn for home has only grown since. I would settle for just a hug from one of them one last time.  
Holy crap. I thought I was the only one that feels completely unsettled and lost because my home was my mother. Ever since she died I mumble to myself 'I want to go home' no matter where I am at. I am now sobbing like crazy but understand myself a little better. I am so sorry for your losses. Many Internet hugs from a stranger, meaningless but heartfelt. 
Or start your own business 
Not everyone is an entrepreneur.  Not everyone can come up with something that would sell or a service they can provide.  
Nah, my life is straight shit. Mediocre would be an improvement.
This. I dream of mediocre. To actually achieve a pedestrian boring life like 99% of normal people. Go to work, bang the wife, hang with friends, bbq's, days at the beach instead of not leaving the house because I want to throw myself into traffic.
Yes! I cant sleep most nights. Its a terrible feeling. I wish I had someone to talk to. 
i wish i can have someone to talk too
> You don't have to live your life as a slave.  I'd love to think that's true, but how can it be? I don't have the money to just leave. I don't have the imagination to figure out what I would do, or where I would go. It's like there's a world of possibility, but there's invisible barriers around my home and I can't leave. 
Didn't you read OP's post? Just snap out of it and do all those things depression makes you incapable of! It's so easy we can just delete this sub now.
Keep visiting kitty's  Be their kitty godfather
[Be *the* kitty Godfather.](http://vignette3.wikia.nocookie.net/godfather/images/6/68/Don_Vito.jpg/revision/latest?cb=20101207175642)
[Be *the* kitty Godfather.](http://vignette3.wikia.nocookie.net/godfather/images/6/68/Don_Vito.jpg/revision/latest?cb=20101207175642)
By default, that cat is The Godfather in the cat world.
I'm medicated and I *still* have those thoughts. It's terrifying. But I have a pet rabbit, and even though I imagine doing horrible things to him, it makes me feel better when I groom him (his favorite is when I use a toothbrush to get all the tough spots). It tells me 'yeah, you have those thoughts, but you don't have to act on those thoughts.'
This [instagram](https://instagram.com/wally_and_molly/) made me smile last week.
This [instagram](https://instagram.com/wally_and_molly/) made me smile last week.
Awwww. Thanks for sharing!
Do you believe in love?
I do, yes.
Sometimes, you just have to believe in yourself.  It's the hardest thing to believe in if you ask me, but the most rewarding (HUGS).
Thank you, this is the best advice that I hear and always forget. *hugs*
Unfortunately i know the feeling yeah, don't know anything if who I was before beside the fact I was happier
Then let those memories remind you that you are still a likeable personality.
My personality has perrished. I still act in a certain way but it's more like a back-up personality - not really me, just some mask. Depression is the only thing I know. Depression is me, and I don't want to lose the last thing left of me.
This  I have no idea what kind of person I would be if I wasn't depressed. Like, what else is there?
Had it from about age 11 to 15. I don't remember much of myself back then outside of being bullied, loneliness, extreme school stress, and strained relationships with family members. I'm 18 now and I've come to be myself and who I am. Depression is not your personality. Every person has gold inside them. It's hard to see I'm sure with how hopeless depression looks and feels but when you figure out how to beat it, it's like you're a new person inside the same body.
Wtf we have like really similar stories
I know this feeling exactly. I don’t remember much of it, but I was in childhood therapy for a while after I threatened to kill myself at my daycare and another kid there reported me. I don’t think I was even in school yet, so I was younger than 5/6. I also remember being really unhappy in elementary school, thinking I’d never make it another year, literally thinking I would die. This continued on into middle school, high school, etc. Even now, I’m still battling with severe depression. 
Upvoted for hardest story. Stack all the treatments for depression you can safely try. You deserve it.
Upvoted for hardest story. Stack all the treatments for depression you can safely try. You deserve it.
Thank you. I truly appreciate it. I’m on shitty health insurance and combined with that and my anxiety, I still haven’t found a therapist. I’m also dealing with a lot of bullshit from my narcissistic parents, who for the past year have been trying to throw me in jail. It’s been a lot. I definitely want to seek treatment soon.
No support system: 'you shooting deserve it'    Support system: 'you don't shooting deserve it'
shoot
when depressed, nothing feels right. If I was given a personal island in the Pacific right now, I'd cry for no reason, srsly
This is the most true thing Ive read on this sub.
I've experienced that but more of a 'smart enough to know I really can't do anything about it'. Wouldn't it be nicer to be dumb and depressed sometimes? Not that I'm a genius by any means, but realistically I know I'm not a huge dummy. Damn, would it be nice to be one and believe very nice things that aren't reality. 
It absolutely kills me that someone like Kim Kardashian is a gazillionaire when she doesn't seem to have a single intelligent cell in her brain.  And then there's me.  :/
Well, I guess it's good you dodged that bullet then. I still wish people were more educated about depression. It's saddening to see some of the stuff people say online, or even things you hear in person.  
Language leads to it a lot. Look at what you just said, 'it's saddening' so many people would say depressing. It's desensitized people to the true meaning of the word. If I ever get famous from my writing I'm putting my money towards this sort of awareness the best I can.
I once had a guy tell me that they should put depressed people on a plane and make them skydive so they have to feel happy.  I still can't decide whether he was trying to provoke a reaction or whether he was just stupid and ignorant.
I've skydived, didn't cure depression. A statement like his is just asinine.
I've skydived, didn't cure depression. A statement like his is just asinine.
I can second this.  When I was at my worst, I went skydiving, hot air ballooning, zip-lining, went rock climbing a bunch, and did two Tough Mudders.  It was a temporary 'high', but certainly didn't make me happy. I felt the rush of endorphins, but was emotionally numb.  The comment is stupid, unfounded, and wouldn't even make a normal person 'happy' - it'd just get them energized.
I once had a guy tell me that they should put depressed people on a plane and make them skydive so they have to feel happy.  I still can't decide whether he was trying to provoke a reaction or whether he was just stupid and ignorant.
Maybe if I did it without a parachute
What we need for these people is a drug that simulates clinical depression in a reversible way, and challenge them to take this drug and then 'just snap out of it'.
That would be really cool.
That would be really cool.
Nah man, I wouldn't wish this on anybody.
Nah man, I wouldn't wish this on anybody.
I would for 24 hours to see how they like being made fun of for it. Yeah, I'm goddamm bitter. 
I think men should be forced to go a month on testosterone deprivation and women should go a month on high testosterone. Each other's shoes: try 'em on and go walk a mile. 
There's more to being male and female than hormonal levels. Try harder on that.
What we need for these people is a drug that simulates clinical depression in a reversible way, and challenge them to take this drug and then 'just snap out of it'.
Never wish your own misfortunes upon others. Even when they don't understand it is probably because of ignorance and what they've (not) been taught. 
Never wish your own misfortunes upon others. Even when they don't understand it is probably because of ignorance and what they've (not) been taught. 
Of course this imaginary drug would just be for people who wish to try it in order to gain better perspective, or because they think the challenge would be a piece of cake. I would never want to force it on anybody.
I went on one date with a similar guy.  In my case he said 'will I ever get to see you, you know without?...'  I finished his sentence for him - 'The Drugs?' 'yeah' (I take antidepressants).  Nope, you won't, cuz' I'm not going on a second date with your in denial drunkard ass.
WTH kind of question is that?! If you had some other kind of illness he would never have asked. 
Oh yeah! That's badass. I definitely wish I had this sort of integrity on some dates I've had. That's the way to be.
It got easy once I decided to not compromise my mental health for anyone or anything... after messing up a few times, I learned.  Keep practicing!
At least find solace that things ended early and that given that he has so many wonderful qualities he probably isn't having the roughest time finding someone to love him. He dodged a huge bullet by not getting too invested in someone like that. Next time you'll be able to speak up about that though. :)
I should have asked her for his number, haha.  I'm just sad that she has such opinions because we were pretty good friends back in the day and I was hoping to rekindle that friendship.  Now I don't think it is worth the effort. 
I should have asked her for his number, haha.  I'm just sad that she has such opinions because we were pretty good friends back in the day and I was hoping to rekindle that friendship.  Now I don't think it is worth the effort. 
You never know. Maybe try to talk to her about it and see if she can learn. If she's resistant to change and understanding, then move along. And yeah, you should STILL ask for his number, haha.
>What I called 'depression' went away easily in a couple of days. So **your** (real) depression is just as easy to cure. Have you tried exercising?  Can't tell you how many times I've heard something to that effect.
I wish I could be saintly enough to not lash out on shit like that. I just can't though.
>  List 2 ways you can address obstacles and not be lazy!  Gross. You should write   For you:  1) Read a book about depression instead of your own personal idiots journal you keep stored in your head.  2 ) Refer to 1.
    Bwahah, I wish I was quick witted enough to respond to people like that rather than having a cartoon-like head-pop-off-gasket-explosion situation.  Hehehe thanks for that.
Its okay to be ignorant of a feeling, but to me, it's not okay to tell others how to feel or react to their own feelings. Everyone is different. As adults we should all know those and be tactful when dealing with others issues. And I agree, saved myself a lot of trouble.
But that is the thing, this person is ignorant but they don't know they are ignorant. In their perspective, they think they actually know what they are talking about, which makes most of what they say come off ten times worse. And immaturity plays a huge role in these mix-ups; it is why I agree with you that adults should be tactful towards those issues.
I've gotten a lot of mileage out of the analogy to diabetes.  What this guy said is equivalent to 'Personally I don't operate in the diabetic.  It's a choice to make insulin or not.'  It's that ridiculous.  You're well rid of him.
I like that. Less extreme than cancer. 
I'm new here. Why the defensiveness? I am a depressed person myself, and I have found success in the 'its a choice' thought. I feel like Im making real progress for once in my life. Can you point me to the science that makes it explicit that you cant just snap out of it?
Try google or any basic book on depression. Or the dozens of other people in this post, hundreds on this sub who might have some more patience to delineate to you that 'depressed' is not clinical depression. It's 10 at night, I'm gearing up for bed so I an get up on time for the job I don't want to go to, and I'm not in the mood personally. 
Except they treat people who try and fail as losers anyway. It's all the same to them. The outcome is the only thing they really take into account, and if you don't look like the pretty picture on the outside, they use you to make themselves feel better. And even if you do, they'll still find ways to tear you down.  So yeah, and phrases like that are extra obnoxious because of how they discredit people right off the bat, despite being bandied about as motivational tripe.
People are wretched things. They envy anyone who possesses a little more than themselves, and yet, they despise them if they have nothing. Fear and loathing at the smallest difference.
What those people also fail to realize was that bill gates was a genius, even as a kid. 
>And also that Bill Gates's parents were \*loaded\*, got him into the best schools \(he had computer science classes in highschool....in 1967. Talk about being ahead of the curve\), and provided him with excellent connections to investors and guidance.    >   >   >   >'If you ever feel like you cannot do great things.. Do the smaller things instead, in a great way   >   >.'
What are you scared of? 
Failure. Defeat. Letting people down even more.   I hurt so much already, wouldn't survive another setback.
Well maybe they didn't try to change(thats just a assumption I don't know these people so it's just a sgot in the dark). But nothing is ever set in stone with our pschy .Introverts can become extraverts, anxious people can become the most active etc. A
If they never change then it's safe to assume it is a characteristic trait.
Yes. I sort of wait for the moment when my suicidal thoughts win with my common sense and I won't get psychiatric help quickly enough   And actually getting old seems to be much worse than dying relatively young. I'm afraid of old age 
Yes, this.  Wrinkled skin that just falls off sometimes, incontinence, one surgery after the other, a platter of daily pills... why do people want this?  Then the big one hits you - broken hip, heart attack, stroke, whatever - and you slowly, painfully die over the course of 6 months or a year or more.  Life is painful enough in my 20s and 'healthy'.
Yes, this.  Wrinkled skin that just falls off sometimes, incontinence, one surgery after the other, a platter of daily pills... why do people want this?  Then the big one hits you - broken hip, heart attack, stroke, whatever - and you slowly, painfully die over the course of 6 months or a year or more.  Life is painful enough in my 20s and 'healthy'.
I don't understand why more people don't decide to take their first and last dose of something very nice once they get like that. I'm not saying they should - I just can't comprehend why you wouldn't.
Cancer has claimed about half my family. I've seen how that destroys your life. No thanks, I'm not going out pumped full of poison and hooked up to a bunch of machines with tubes in every orifice. I don't care how I go, but it won't be by disease, cancer or any other disease. I'm going out as me, not some barely recognizable, frail husk of my former self.
It must have been horrible to see so many deaths like this. Completely understand your reasoning here. Dignified death for the terminally ill should absolutely be an option.
'I'll never make it past 30'  I thought that shit for 10-12 years.  Then I turned 30.   More than 20 years ago.
The 'youngsters' posting here will unfortunately have to learn life's lessons as we all do. Contrary to their current belief ('I won't make it past x years of age.') odds are they will in fact reach 50, 60, 70 and beyond. I hope they plan early for their retirement and not rely on social security. 
The 3rd line isn't perfectly smooth, but I get and like the message.   Keep writing, it helped a friend of mine get some happiness back, too. And share with people who appreciate your work, like us.
I like the 3rd line .. no, it's not smooth .. it's more of a 'power' statement, good or bad as power can be.   I recognise it because I used to write like that. Good job OP  ;)
Sometimes, if the content is jarring, a choppy meter helps to raise the feeling of discomfort. But for this one, you're right... Removing the 'And' will make it flow better in this instance.   Still I'm not sure why it would be downvoted somewhere. I quite like it.
Because of the theme. People in good spirits don't like to think about the possible hardships of men
